Nobody starts out with a comprehensive understanding of what Buddhism teaches.
It would be a mistake to keep entirely to yourself and proceed on what might be false assumptions.
PRENTICE: One thing that strikes me particularly about what you've told me is the definitive nature of Buddhism.
I mean, for a time I had the idea that Buddhism was sort of esoteric and other-worldly, full of rhapsodies about cranes flying across the autumn moon and life being an unreal dream and so on.
I'm beginning to understand that Buddhism is not at all vague, but precise and specific.
Where is the mysticism I've heard so much about?
BHIKKHU TISSA:: Where indeed?
Find it if you can!
PRENTICE: Of course, I understood that Buddhism has a specific body of doctrine, but your explanation seems more down-to-earth than I had expected.
You don't leave much room for dilettantes and dabblers!
It makes me a bit uncomfortable with my own approach.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Everybody with a serious interest must inquire and consider carefully.
That doesn't make you a dilettante.
Also, some people will feel inclined to devote themselves to the path more intensively than others.
But you are right that vague dabbling has no place in Buddhism.
The Buddha did not teach a doctrine consisting of so many theories.
He taught Dhamma, which is to say truth, reality, the actual nature of things.
Now, in an ordinary philosophical system, a person might browse about sampling this or that idea, amusing himself with this or that hypothesis as much as he pleases.
But in Buddhism such an approach is totally unprofitable and foolish.
For one thing, the Dhamma of the Buddha is not to be admired but practiced.
It has no value as a museum-piece.
For another, Dhamma is Dhamma regardless of whether we believe it or not.
That is, reality doesn't need our stamp of approval; it doesn't accommodate itself to our petty preferences.
We can't divide it up and take only the parts we like.
Even the Buddha, you may remember, did not invent the Dhamma but discovered it and made it known to mankind.
Someone who hears about Dhamma, who learns something of the teaching, may accept this or reject that or approve of this or disapprove of that, and may even try to fit the teaching, in whole or in part, into his own galaxy of beliefs.
This is mere dabbling, and it indicates that the individual is only leaping about, looking for amusement or confirmation of his prejudices, and can't hold still long enough to learn.
To jump toward something or to jump away from something — it's all the same.
Blind doubt is as bad as blind faith.
Anyone who wants to make progress must proceed wit an open and alert mind, going step by step, quickly or slowly, but going, not making qualifications or excuses, not making a hobby out of religious practice.
Insincerity is a great obstacle.
PRENTICE: I'm a little nervous wondering about my motives in interesting myself in Buddhism.
I'm not as open-minded as perhaps I should be.
But at least I can say that I'm sincere.
I have no interest in being a mere dabbler!
BHIKKHU TISSA: Good.
By all means examine Buddhist teaching and try it for yourself.
PRENTICE: And Buddhist teaching, I believe you said, begins with examining oneself.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Yes, but in order to get anywhere, that examination must be systematic.
Since you were a child you've been wondering about yourself, who you are, why you act the way you do, where you are going, and so forth — but such examination is only preliminary; it's incomplete and likely to remain so until you begin to practice in a disciplined way.
Once you have come to certain tentative conclusions about your situation in the world and about the possibility of freeing yourself, it is up to you to take the necessary steps.
Nobody is going to do it for you.
It's very important to understand this.
Nobody can do your work for you.
You can't simply declare yourself a believer in Buddhism and wait for enlightenment to sweep you up.
PRENTICE: As I told you earlier, Venerable Tissa, I've examined myself to the point where I feel the need for the kind of path the Buddha points out, and I'm favorably disposed toward undertaking it.
I've even been doing some meditation on my own, but I'm not sure I'm following the books correctly.
Oh, well, to be frank, I'm just stumbling in the dark at the moment, and I'd appreciate any advice you have on the correct meditation method to follow and what to watch out for and so on.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Let's not put the cart before the horse, Mr.
Prentice.
You are, I think, talking about formal sitting practice.
But I'm not sure you understand what meditation really means.
Can you define it for me?
PRENTICE: I could.
But I strongly suspect I'd be wrong!
BHIKKHU TISSA: In that case, let's talk basics.
The Pali word usually translated as meditation is bhavana, which really means mental cultivation or self-development.
It actually encompasses a great deal more than the English word.
Without any instruction in the matter a person is likely to think that Buddhist meditation means sitting in a dark place with crossed legs and contemplating infinity or something like that.
PRENTICE: I did entertain a similar idea.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Out of such ideas comes a host of mystical notions that have nothing to do with Buddhism.
Correct meditation is never dreamy or romantic, nor is it confined to one particular bodily position or place or time of day.
The key to the practice is mindfulness — in Pali, sati.
Mindfulness means presence of mind, attentiveness, awareness, observation, bare attention.
It is an attitude of impartial watchfulness and alertness.
To “meditate” means to set up mindfulness and maintain it by the power of concentration — in whatever position or circumstance you find yourself.
PRENTICE: It sounds like you're saying that meditation can be practiced along with any human activity.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Not “along with,” Mr.
Prentice.
Meditation is not something separate from ordinary life; it is not an exercise we impose on top of something else.
Rightly speaking, meditation is the mindful practice of daily life itself.
PRENTICE: Do you mean there really is no difference between meditation and daily life?
That's extraordinary.
BHIKKHU TISSA: There should be no difference, no distinction.
Unfortunately, many people cling tenaciously to the notion that there is a time for meditation and a time for comfortable carelessness.
They think that sitting for an hour or two a day on a cushion is sufficient.
PRENTICE: And it isn't?
BHIKKHU TISSA: One hour, two hours — the time is irrelevant.
This is an example of putting the cart before the horse.
First you have to understand what the practice is all about.
If you look at meditation in the same way as, say, practicing the piano, you are already off on the wrong path.
Since it is the whole man or woman we want to develop, what use is there in confining our attention to one brief activity or period of time?
If we are going to understand the world in its entirety we have to look at that world.
We have to develop and apply mindfulness at all times.
PRENTICE: Yes, I see, but how can we remember to be mindful at all times in the bustle of daily life?
We can only think of one thing at a time.
BHIKKHU TISSA: The original meaning of the Pali word sati is just “memory,” and that meaning is still present within the idea of mindfulness.
We have to have presence of mind, alertness, readiness, recollection of our duty to observe.
You are right that we can only think of one thing at a time, but this does not mean that mindfulness is impossible except when we are idle.
To be mindful is to be established in the present moment.
If you are working, then your attention should be fully on that work, not wandering hither and yon.
If you are eating, you should be mindful of eating.
If you are taking a shower, you should be mindful of showering.
The objects that present themselves to your senses are the objects of your meditation.
You should merely look at them, acknowledge them, and let them go.
PRENTICE: I don't understand.
How does this differ from an ordinary state of mind?
BHIKKHU TISSA: People ordinarily have only a little bit of mindfulness.
They are usually not attentive to the present moment.
Their minds are scattered, constantly wandering here and there, thinking about the past, thinking about the future, thrashing about with desire and aversion — just as we spoke of earlier.
They are always in a hurry to be someplace other than where they are, and as a consequence they pay as little attention as possible to what is going on right before them.
If you stop and think about it you will realize that most of the time the ordinary mind is without mindfulness and far away from matters at hand.
By consciously practicing mindfulness we counteract the wasteful agitation of the mind and return it to the present moment, which is, after all, the only place we can really live and work.
PRENTICE: So meditation is really a kind of training for the mind?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Yes.
Just as we train our overt behavior by observing the moral precepts, we train our minds with the practice of meditation.
PRENTICE: Is paying attention to the present moment all there is to meditation?
BHIKKHU TISSA: No.
Bare mindfulness must be linked with concentration — samadhi.
Mindfulness is the observing, the investigating, the attention to phenomena.
Concentration is the focusing power that holds our attention continuously to any object.
Then we must have a further development of mindfulness called sampajañña — clear comprehension.
Having fixed our attention on an object, having held it there and acknowledged the object dispassionately, we need this factor of clear comprehension to know what the object is, to fully comprehend it, to know what, if any, action is required of us and what benefit or danger the object represents.
If we have clear comprehension of all acts we perform, we will be able to distinguish the true from the false and the noble from the ignoble.
Carried to the highest level, such a practice can dissolve the difference between daily life and meditation.
PRENTICE: You refer to “objects.” Are there special objects recommended for meditation?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Any material thing or mental phenomenon can be an object of meditation.
Whatever we can cognize by means of eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, or mind can be scrutinized as the Buddha teaches.
PRENTICE: That covers just about everything.
I can see you really mean it when you say that daily life itself should be meditation!
But, tell me, do teachers recommend specific objects or exercises to their students?
BHIKKHU TISSA: In your reading have you come across something called the Four Foundations of Mindfulness?
PRENTICE: Yes, I think so, but to tell the truth my memory is a bit weak.
BHIKKHU TISSA: In the Maha-Satipatthana Sutta, the Buddha's great discourse on mindfulness, four categories or foundations of mindfulness are explained.
First, there is contemplation of the body, kayanupassana.
This concerns everything of a physical nature that arises in our own bodies.
The Buddha has declared that “in this very fathom-long body with its perceptions and thoughts there are the world's origin, the world's ending, and the path to the world's ending.” In other words, everything we need to discover and understand to reach liberation can be found right here in the body.
So mindfulness applied to the body and its processes is especially fruitful.
The second foundation of mindfulness is called vedananupassana — contemplation of feelings.
PRENTICE: What do you mean by feelings — emotions?
BHIKKHU TISSA: No.
“Feelings” here refers specifically to pleasant feelings, unpleasant feelings, and neutral feelings.
Every object which appears to us arouses feelings which may be pleasant, unpleasant, or simply neutral.
To practice vedananupassana is to notice mindfully the nature of these feelings — without, I might add, clinging to pleasant feelings or trying to avoid unpleasant feelings.
For any meditation to be effective it must be without partiality or grasping.
PRENTICE: Now that sounds difficult!
Not to prefer pleasant feelings to unpleasant feelings!
But, please, go on.
BHIKKHU TISSA: The third foundation of mindfulness is cittanupassana — contemplation of mental states.
This means observing the character of the mind at any given moment.
For instance, is the mind happy, unhappy, troubled, elated, slothful, energetic, concentrated, unconcentrated?
And so on.
PRENTICE: But how can the mind observe itself?
It's a paradox.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Not really.
The problem is only one of language.
We use words like “mind” as mere conventions.
Actually, what happens is that mindfulness observes or contemplates the mind — which is nothing but a collection of processes — and notes what its character is at any given moment.
PRENTICE: I see.
So contemplation of mental states concerns everything that is going on in the mind?
BHIKKHU TISSA: No.
Contemplation of mental states concerns only the character or state of the mind at a particular time.
For the contents of the mind, or the specific phenomena that engage our attention, we refer to the fourth foundation — dhammanupassana, or the contemplation of mental objects.
In this practice, mindfulness is directed toward the mental objects that the mind deals with.
These may be ideas, memories, concepts, hopes, fears, thoughts of all kinds.
PRENTICE: Why are these called “foundations” of mindfulness?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Mindfulness is the same thing no matter what its object.
But as a practical matter we need to be directed to specific objects or classes of objects in order to learn what mindfulness is and how it operates.
The Four Foundations of Mindfulness are specific aspects of experience on which we can set up or establish our practice.
For instance, in contemplation of the body, kayanupassana, we direct our attention to the body and note the experiences that rise to our attention out of the body.
In formal sitting practice a teacher will likely advise a student to concentrate on a single bodily object, such as the breathing or the rising and falling of the abdomen.
Mindfulness is founded on the body and built up by repeated effort and exertion.
The procedure is exactly the same with regard to feelings, mental states, and mental objects.
PRENTICE: Are the four foundations then purely arbitrary categories?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Not at all.
The four foundations concern distinct aspects of human experience which we usually confuse.
Remember that Buddhism emphasizes the necessity of self-examination.
In practicing the Four Foundations of Mindfulness we gradually learn the useful lesson that what we take to be the self is in fact a collection of quite impersonal processes.
The body is, we discover, just a body, not a self.
Feelings are just feelings.
Mental states are just mental states.
Mental objects are just mental objects.
PRENTICE: Yes, I understand that.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Excuse me, Mr.
Prentice.
You may understand my words.
You may agree with what I am saying.
But let me impress upon you that you have to reach these conclusions for yourself, in your own direct experience.
Real understanding depends on seeing for yourself.
PRENTICE: I hope I can do that.
But what you said a moment ago troubles me.
In connection with contemplation of feelings you said that we should not prefer pleasant feelings to unpleasant feelings.
How is such a thing possible?
BHIKKHU TISSA: In practicing any of these contemplations, the meditator aims only to be mindful of the rising and passing away of phenomena.
When he experiences a certain kind of feeling, for instance, he merely acknowledges it for what it is.
If it is pleasant, he notes it as pleasant.
If it is unpleasant, he notes it as unpleasant.
If it is neutral, he notes it as neutral.
PRENTICE: But, Bhikkhu Tissa, surely nobody can help preferring the pleasant to the unpleasant.
BHIKKHU TISSA: The Buddha doesn't expect us to like what is unpleasant or to dislike what is pleasant.
These feelings are what they are — agreeable or disagreeable or neither.
What the Buddha does expect us to do is to set aside desire and aversion and simply observe what is.
Desire and aversion cloud our understanding.
When practicing any of the contemplations I have mentioned, don't hanker after something you don't have, and don't run away from something you do have.
You should stay exactly where you are and note with equanimity whatever appears.
PRENTICE: Are you saying that we should endure any kind of unpleasantness without trying to do anything about it?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Not at all.
The Buddhist path aims at the total elimination of suffering, remember.
One who starts along the path does indeed diminish the suffering or unpleasantness in his life.
Even a highly experienced practitioner will experience unpleasantness, yet this need not be a problem because he will understand the unstable nature of all phenomena and will not indulge in vain clinging or aversion.
By developing equanimity in the face of changing circumstances he frees himself from the jungle of likes and dislikes and their attendant miseries.
He refrains from grasping.
Mental and physical events occur — he knows them for what they are, only knows them, and does not take the further step of celebrating or lamenting them.
PRENTICE: That must require a highly developed mind.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Every highly developed mind was once a wild and ignorant mind.
If you practice the Buddhist path earnestly, you will begin to train your mind and make it less dependent on changing conditions.
By practicing mindfulness you recognize impermanence within and without you.
All phenomena are changing with incredible speed, arising and perishing, flowing on and on.
If you see this truly, you will no longer wish to cling to anything.
PRENTICE: It all comes back to craving, doesn't it?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Craving lies deep in the mind, deeper than we can imagine.
By practicing the Dhamma we come to know ourselves better and better, and gradually we see where craving hides.
If we are attentive we will understand that craving continues as long as it is nourished by ignorance.
If we fall back into our old, slothful habits of mind, we may be sure that craving will go on generating suffering in our lives.
The wheel of cause and effect just keeps on turning.
If, on the other hand, we develop morality, concentration, and wisdom, we will be able to diminish and ultimately destroy craving and the suffering that follows it.
There is a task to be done; we can do it or not, as we choose.
PRENTICE: And… if we choose not to do it, what happens?
More of same?
BHIKKHU TISSA: More of same.
PRENTICE: So it's my responsibility.
I'm feeling this more and more.
Happiness just will not happen to me by accident, will it?
BHIKKHU TISSA: The joys of the world come and go, Mr.
Prentice.
Certainly permanent happiness will not come to you by accident.
PRENTICE: Is it possible to grasp real, permanent happiness?
BHIKKHU TISSA: No, it is not possible.
PRENTICE: No?.
But… is it possible by not grasping to attain such happiness?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Yes, it is possible.
PRENTICE: Oh, I see — excuse me, I begin to see!
BHIKKHU TISSA: Words of Dhamma are written down in books.
Words come out of the mouths of monks and laymen.
It is worthwhile to listen and remember.
But it is not enough.
PRENTICE: Bhikkhu Tissa, if a person were to — if I were to start on the Buddhist path, could I be sure of — I mean, do you think I would — succeed?
Bhikkhu Tissa says nothing.
Mr.
Prentice waits nervously.
It is twilight now, the air heavy and fragrant and still.
The darkness thickens moment by moment.
Bhikkhu Tissa makes no answer at all.
Mr.
Prentice fidgets uncomfortably in the silence.
At last he realizes that the monk is not going to reply.
Eventually, in some embarrassment, he breaks the silence himself.
PRENTICE: Oh, yes.
Yes, of course.
A foolish question.
It only came to my mind because I feel I should do something — do this.
What you've told me makes me think that — I mean, I want to be free, I do!
After a moment, Bhikkhu Tissa's voice floats out of the shadow.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Go easy, Mr.
Prentice.
Keep your mind in the present moment.
Look at your own hand there, clutching the grass so tightly and nervously.
Just release it, that's it.
Let go easy.
PRENTICE: All right.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Now keep on letting go.
PRENTICE: Keep on?
Oh!
Yes venerable sir.
A moment passes, then he straightens up
It's getting late.
If you'll excuse me, I'll be going now.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Good night, Mr.
Prentice.
PRENTICE: Thank you for your advice, Bhikkhu Tissa.
You've cleared up a number of doubts I had.
I think I — well, enough said.
He gets stiffly to his feet.
Good night, venerable sir.
He starts off across the lawn.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Mr.
Prentice.
PRENTICE: Sir?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Stay mindful.
PRENTICE: Yes.
I'll try.
Mr.
Prentice goes.
Bhikkhu Tissa remains where he is as the evening descends.
Grass, tree, and monk are lost to view.
Time goes on passing.
The author, an American from Louisville, Kentucky, graduated from Dartmouth after majoring in English.
An actor and a writer, he spends his free time in reading, meditating, and Dhamma-activities.
His previous publications with BPS include Radical Buddhism and To the Cemetery and Back.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In this city, as in all, the dead are granted a little space.
Our business and pleasure take us past the old iron gates a hundred times on the way to seemingly more immediate destinations.
But on this odd morning when time hangs lightly and pure chance finds us here gazing over these hills of stone and ivy, let us actually turn our steps into the cemetery and along its crooked paths.
The day is fine, the flowers glisten with last evening's rain, and a fair fragrance rises with the first breeze.
Just inside the gates, someone stands at an easel and paints flowers.
Farther off, a caretaker trims a hedge.
The signs are propitious — we shall have privacy but not solitude, and the morning's grace restrains the onslaught of gloom.
We may even, carefully, allow ourselves to think thoughts appropriate to the place.
On these finely tended hillsides the music of birds mingles strangely with the numberless testimonies of death.
The earth is half-paved with the stone remembrances and the middle air is full of obelisks and angels.
Names and dates surround us, some sharp and raw, some worn nearly to oblivion, all crowding upon us with the particulars of spent lives — of this family, of this age, with these virtues, with this hope of heaven.
What can this mean to us, especially if we have no family here?
The wind flings a rag of shade across the bright grass: We too shall die.
The birds sing on, the bees hum in the violets, and the thought is not so terrible.
Not so terrible, we remind ourselves, if the fever of life ends here, swathed in honeysuckles and southern airs.
We stroll on, reading the chronicles of grief: beloved wife, infant aged three days, daughter, son, darling children.
Generations are drawn from the world by the chain of mortality.
Do these stones mark an ending or only a continuance?
The deceased fare on according to their deeds while we living stay to grieve.
Where is there an end?
These picturesque stones only mark the limit of our knowledge.
Dress them how you will, O gardener, they bespeak our helplessness.
The rumble of the city dwindles and fails in these granite acres until a somber stillness attends our steps.
Despite our resolutions and the sparkling sun, we are troubled and would turn back to the gates, but unaccountably we are lost and the hills roll on with their bare legends.
Nothing to do but keep walking.
Assuredly we still live, and while we live we can try our philosophies against enormous mortality around us.
Look now, a butterfly flails at the air in what we hope is joy.
Beneath that tomb lives a chipmunk — see him frisk about and vanish down his hole.
We are briefly cheered and then plunged in doubt, for why should we lament the extinction of life and hail its repetition?
We grow weary of sentiments careening back and forth and wish for equilibrium within the volatile universe.
Samsara, we are told, is the terrible round of birth and death, but this disquiet, this resolution of doubt — is it not samsara as well?
Hardly can we set a foot down for fear of treading wrongly, so crowded is this cemetery.
We walk narrowly, wobbling on over the beautiful, terrible hills.
Here where the path straightens for a moment let us pause and experiment by closing our eyes.
At once the world collapses into red darkness and the pressure of the wind and sun.
Now we shall take a step, hesitantly, feeling the gravel underfoot, imagining boundaries and perils.
We move further.
Somewhere the ground drops off, but where?
Anxiety throws its coils around us, and we are walking through our minds — with danger unseen but guessed on every side.
Open eyes!
The world blurs back to us, green and lovely, composing itself slowly and almost mockingly.
Are we quite sure what is real?
Are we quite sure we understand death?
Here's an iron bench in the shade we can rest and consider our position.
Eyes closed or open, it's mind that assembles our world.
Mind stirs up fear, mind accommodates grief, mind moves thoughts and limbs according to its nature.
What is this nature?
To judge from our confusion and instability, it is restlessness.
We are, it would seem, not firm in space or conviction, not fully in control of anything.
If we watch closely, here in the semi-silence, we may discern the flutter, the whir, the unease of this shifting mind.
It knows not itself, it knows not the world, it only wants and hates by turns.
The odor of flowers heaves it momentarily to paradise.
The chiseled history of dead children hurls it down to despair.
A crow on a stone angel's head call forth a smile.
A fresh name on an old monument chills us.
Delight pulls us one way, grief another.
Neither can bear us across doubt or fear.
The mind runs endlessly in moments that flare and fizzle.
There is a being-born and a dying with every one of them — a birth and death of every thought and every breath happening right here while we worriedly scan the horizon for a supposed Great Death.
Consider this dying that goes on all the time — fits of memory and feeling, spasms of cells, torrents of desire and aversion, all tumbling in birth and death, birth and death — the weary reiteration of samsara.
Each instant ends but gives no rest because it ignites its successor; and in this the physical death memorialized around us is no different — the troubled flame of being is passed on and on.
What we fear out there, among the graven sorrows of the cemetery, is burning in here, in the mind, right now.
Death has been our neighbor long before we came to ponder headstones.
The Buddha understood this.
We as yet do not, and tremble in the presence of innocent stone — wide-eyed toward the symbol, blind to the blazing fact.
Sitting here alone, while the shade splashes silently around us, we hold all the worlds in our lap and can study them as the Buddha taught us, not with hunger, but with the clean dispassion that lays bare truth and liberates the beholder.
The Buddha called craving the source of suffering, and indeed, as we bend our attention closer, what do we find but craving nesting even in the fractured moment?
Every little death, every wretch of disappointment, is preceded by a birth, an upsurge of craving founded on ignorance.
Being blind to the true nature of things, we continually give rise to passion that veers this way and that, never satisfied, forging link by link in the moment the chain binds us over the years.
Events in themselves are only events; the deluded mind invests them with horrors and delights and ties the mortal chain around itself.
This cemetery with its solid stones is only a mirror, into which the Buddha bids us look to find the funeral procession within ourselves.
Say we look, then.
Say we are able to observe the deplorable state of our mind.
What can we do about it?
If birth and death are whirling on so mechanically and inexorably all efforts would appear futile.
Indeed, though we begin to notice the cascading instability of body and mind, our mere intellectual recognition does nothing to free us.
Birth — that is, the uprising of craving — will of necessity be followed by death — that is, the pang of impermanence and loss.
But craving itself is not an inevitable phenomenon; it springs up only in the soil of ignorance, and when ignorance is dispelled craving and its resultant miseries cease to exist.
The whole teaching of the Buddha drives to this end.
We are urged to strive diligently to see things as they are, to resist craving, to observe it unsparingly, to uproot it altogether.
All the defilements and afflictions of mind exist, as it were, with our permission.
Not knowing we have the power to end them, we go on muttering, “Yes, go ahead, there's no help for it.” But when we realize we do have the power to alter the painful course of life our excuses will no longer suffice.
We must look closely, fix on a straight line, and sail by the three points of morality, concentration, and wisdom.
Spurred by these thoughts, we rise from the iron bench and continue walking through the endless field of graves.
This business of being alive once seemed simple — either you were or you weren't — but even a brief contemplation reveals surprising complexities.
It appears we have long considered death as a single grim monolith that will one day thump us on the head, while in reality death is subtle, manifold, and coexistent with the mind that fears it.
Our steps drag slowly over the gravel, and around us the cemetery seems more empty than ever.
There is nobody to be seen, even the birds have vanished, and our solitude is complete.
The question must arise now; if we have misunderstood death, have we not misunderstood its corollary, life, as well?
If what we have been calling death is not singular and unique but threaded throughout the living process, can we even draw a clear and meaningful distinction between the two?
Here we must turn to the Buddha, who did not speak of “life” and “death” as independent realities but rather pointed out that experience is a continual becoming, a process of ceaseless change, a flux of arising and perishing — which is to say samsara, the great wheel of cause and effect, on whose flashing rim no beginning and no end can be found.
As we examine mind and body we feel increasingly the inadequacy of conventional words such as “birth,” and “death.” We have taken definitions for granted and now find them useless when we need them.
Experience upsets imagination.
We are forced to ask ourselves, “Whatever these words mean, who is it that is born, who is it that lives, who is it that dies?” Having so grossly misunderstood events we reach desperately for the one who undergoes events, but can we even find such a one?
The Buddha many times patiently explained that human beings are temporary compounds of five aggregates: form, feelings, perceptions, mental formations, and consciousness.
These aggregates are constantly changing, but so swiftly that they appear to retain a distinctive identity — hence the conventional notions of “you” and “I.” But such words and ideas are only conveniences which do not accord with ultimate reality.
Life and death are only the continual becoming of the five aggregates, within which there can be found no indwelling core, no identity or permanent “self.” Well, we may ask, does such-and-such a person live or not?
Of course we may say that he or she or they or I live — it is true enough on a mundane level.
We are all, in a sense, lost beings wandering through cycles of existence.
But we must clearly understand that ultimately there are only the five aggregates spinning through birth-and-death, afflicted with pain and pleasure, weighted with ignorance and goaded by desire and fear.
The question “Who?” becomes meaningless as we study mind and body.
Here we find instability, misery, and doubt burning in rightful chain reaction.
Rather than searching futilely for an owner of the fire, hadn't we better put it out?
The Buddha did not proclaim the Dhamma in order to satisfy our curiosity about the origin or end of the universe, or to reveal startling secrets, or to stimulate worship.
His purpose was to teach us to put an end to suffering — the same suffering we feel now as we contemplate these symbols and evidences of death.
By investigating with dispassionate minds we come to see things as they really are, seeing them we turn away from the destructive habit of craving, turning away we are by degrees liberated from all suffering.
We may be familiar with this idea and may even give it our intellectual assent, but until we make it work in our daily lives we must remain in doubt and under the sway of continual death.
We shall be buried soon enough — shall we stay in the tomb till then?
The light of insight can dispel the charnel darkness and free the suffering mind even in this present life.
If the present is well attended to, the future will take care of itself.
We look up through sunlight and find that our steps have gone full circle: just beyond a bank of ivy and flowers stand the gaunt gates of this cemetery.
The painter has gone; the caretaker is nowhere to be seen; nobody accompanies us on this quiet journey.
We pause by a final marker, an old one, whose legend has been eaten by time.
It lays flat, abject to the sky, speaking no longer any name of man but uttering the truth of impermanence.
Its individuality has been effaced — it is scarcely more regular then random nature — but still it declares in the sounding-box of thought the ineluctable fate of all compounded things.
It will bear our names as easily as any others, and indeed already does so — let the wise man read his own!
The death of the body is real, as are the small convulsions of flesh and thought in the present moment.
Let us drive to the end of all of these.
No evasion shall avail us, no distraction blur the sight — this marker is our own.
It shall not yield to the blows of hope or fear, but only to the long, cool gaze of wisdom.
We issue from the iron gates into the churning city once again, and the granite hills slip into distance and memory.
Walking familiar pavements we find, strangely, that we carry still a mood or vision before which all objects fall into atoms and aspects of the Buddha's revelation.
The city shows as many symbols as the graveyard.
Around us life burns as profligately as gunpowder — in getting and spending, gaining and losing, craving and hating.
We see buildings, avenues, hurrying people, but if we are careful we also see that we are really still walking among monuments in the mind.
We make our fate right here.
The cemetery and the city are one.
Shall we continue to build upon our little insight?
It's not so hard: the body moves, feelings spring up, mind comprehends, mental objects succeed one another — all these may be observed.
In city or cemetery the process is the same — let us simply keep looking, noting with cool attention the flow of the phenomena.
The defilements of mind cannot stand the scrutiny; they must perforce dissolve.
Who shall oppress us then?
Life, till now one long fatality, may unfold in understanding.
When birth and death are understood they are overcome, and with them all manner of suffering.
Whoever realizes a little, should he not strive to realize more?
Whoever would be free, should he not lay hands on his chains?
Whoever would act rightly, should he not found his actions on knowledge?
The Buddha has declared the nature of suffering, its origin, its end, and the means to its end.
His words hang in the air — pregnant, epic, awesome — until we begin to move by their guidance.
Then they become living truth.
Then the dark and mortal way we tread brightens with direct experience.
Final emancipation may be far or near.
What matters is the going.
Without quite intending it, we find ourselves over the years burdened by more and more responsibilities, difficulties, and doubts.
It seems practically a consequence of growing older.
Time passes like a river — so smooth to our puzzled eyes — but leaves, as if by magic, these boulders on our backs.
All of us but the very young sense this weight and wonder why, since we asked for none of it, it settles on us and will not be shirked.
Troubles old and new bear on us despite all the care we take to persevere ourselves and to build our castles against a turbulent world.
We will all, of course, acknowledge the possibility of catastrophes which could plunge us into genuine grief at any moment, but why now, as we live in relative comfort and health, should we feel this weight on the heart, this strain of apprehension?
Little annoyances and thorns of worry are just part of life, we tell ourselves as we make our way between the twin imponderables of birth and death.
If we are brave, determined, and optimistic, that should be enough, should it not?
Yet even in our joys there falls the shadow — the menace of great forces around us, the obscure sadness looking back at us from the mirror, the occasional sense of overwhelming futility and frailty.
We look around, wondering who is to blame?
If no culprit is forthcoming, we may turn with suspicion to the great, grim world at large and wonder if its influence goes deeper than the indigestion occasioned by the evening news.
Even if we are personally healthy and prosperous, perhaps malaise of the times has subtly infected us.
If the age we live in is corrupt and decadent can we remain altogether uncontaminated?
What sort of age is this, anyway?
Probably all but the most fanatical optimists have from time to time, while hearing of the latest crime or war or degradation of human decency, considered the proposition that the world has gone screaming mad.
The iniquity of mankind these days seems to surpass the merely incidental and to approach willful dementia.
Moral values retreat before the onslaught of hysterical cruelty and lust, and everywhere we see wicked fantasy enthroned — mankind and nations having lost faith in the god and the right.
Science, once hailed as our deliverance, labors mightily and produces bombs and video games to pacify — in one way or another — the frenzied multitudes.
But there is no peace.
Drugs, alcohol, and insanity hang on the communal body like leeches, draining what life remains and imparting a fever of nihilism that burns fearfully bright with decadent delights.
There is a murmur of woe but little resistance, for who can turn the trend of history?
The honest man — never easy to find — fades from view as evildoers are first excused, then celebrated by the timid and the envious.
Like a worn-out carousel, our society jangles, and wheezes toward collapse.
The instinct of most of us in times such as these is to keep our heads down and hang onto our pleasures and possessions and bear our pains as best we may.
We wish to run no risks in a world with chance so badly skewed against us.
The result is that we are trapped, closeted with our fears while the storm rages worse outside.
Here in this tight space dread grows, and the possibilities for remedy are few.
On television maniacally cheerful people contrive to sell us happiness.
Buy!
Enjoy!
Experience!
Out on the streets glowering zealots paste up posters urging struggle, war, confusion, and the death of their enemies — after which, presumably, mankind will enjoy bliss.
Civilization appears to be spiralling down into awesome decadence, and the fall of Rome comes to the minds of those not altogether oblivious to history.
It's an unpleasant thought, so we take shelter in our small delights or else in the blandishments of psychological and religious quacks who — for a fee to defray the costs of their own indulgences — will tell us anything we want to hear.
Do we feel guilty?
It's probably someone else's fault.
Are we tempted by vice?
Go ahead, fulfill yourselves!
Will we have to give up anything to achieve happiness?
Oh, never!
Perish the thought!
A golden age is dawning.
Most of us avoid the worst excesses of the age — not out of sturdy virtue so much as out of a trembling sense of self-preservation.
But all of us, Buddhists included, feel the sickness in our surroundings and grow fearful, hiding where we can.
In a dark age, who can blame our caution?
Yet the trouble with such caution is that it may mask mere cowardice or sloth.
Let us examine the matter a little closer.
Does this hobbling, failing century really qualify as a dark age?
Without pressing evidence to the contrary, we are apt to regard our own woes as the worst ever endured by the race.
But if we read a bit of history we will be hard put to champion the depravity of our own age against the past.
If we define dark age as a period when the light of understanding is eclipsed and evils multiply, what age of history may not be called dark?
The perfidy and wretchedness of our ancestors must give us pause and take the edge of our own complaints.
Wars, plagues, persecutions, and crimes abound in every era.
There's plenty of horror to go around, and the special poignancy of the present version is only that it's happening to us.
However dark the world may appear to us, we are not justified in retreating to the extremes of hedonism or nihilism.
There is a task to be done, and that task is not — as many people believe — to readjust self, society, or world to fit our blind desires.
Rather it is to train ourselves to the point where we know reality for what it is and free ourselves of the burdens of passion that now oppress us.
This task faces all Buddhists, though we are reluctant to admit it and tend to excuse ourselves on the grounds that the times are so bad and responsibilities so weighty that we cannot — most regrettably — take on the additional project of earnest Dhamma practice.
The woes of nations and the afflictions of persons are thereby perversely made reasons for not doing anything, and the way of Dhamma is implicitly called a burden.
As if it were not suffering that first impelled the Buddha toward liberation.
As if the Dhamma were not the means to that liberation.
Some of us may even rationalize to the extent of believing that since the times are too difficult for us to make a genuine effort toward emancipation, they are probably too difficult for everybody.
The days of high attainment are gone, and with them any reason to exert ourselves beyond a modicum of morality and ritual observance.
With war, crime, and madness round about, we have enough trouble just saving our skins.
Better to keep our heads down and lament cruel fate.
Yet to look honestly at ourselves and the Dhamma must bring us to another conclusion.
One era may be better or worse than another — as the world goes — but old age, sickness, and death come to all.
Anxiety, depression and grief come to all.
If we cannot overcome them now, how should we ever face them in heaven or a golden age when we are swimming in bliss?
What motivation would we have then?
A dark age will pass in five years or five hundred, the age of dukkha never.
This pervasive suffering, coarse or fine, settles like dust on us — swiftly or slowly with the winds of circumstance.
We can't outwait it, yearning for a golden age which, if it ever came, could only enervate us and leave us none the wiser.
Let it rain champagne, the heart will still thirst.
No time is worthier than now, for we have no other time.
The past expires at our feet; the future is being wrought for our present action.
We need not pretend that the world is good or evolving toward an age of light, or deny the dangers that beset us in this savage century, but we should rouse ourselves with the knowledge that the serenity and happiness preached by the Buddha remain as accessible now as ever, transcending and abolishing the jungle of the years.
A thorn in the mind is the father of all griefs.
The Buddha teaches us to pull it out.
The author, an American from Louisville, Kentucky, graduated from Dartmouth after majoring in English.
An actor and a writer, he spends his free time in reading, meditating, and Dhamma-activities.
Reproduced from The Washington Buddhist.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Buddhism comes West as a vast body of teaching, and we who receive it are often awed by its abundance, its complexity, and its subtlety.
Where is the center, the real thing we should fix on?
Or is there a real thing at all to be apprehended?
History shows that Buddhism can and will accommodate itself to new cultures, and will flourish according to the perceptiveness and energy of its new adherents.
Now in the West our perceptiveness and energy are put to the test to grasp the “real thing” by which this religion lives — its radicalism.
The Buddhas only point the way, and the way they point is a difficult one through the perfection of morality, concentration, and wisdom to the freedom from suffering called Nibbana.
It is a way of action.
A path is useless without the will to follow it, and good intentions alone are futile.
To make the journey, the roots of mental defilement must be torn out entirely; the old illusions we live by must be shattered; the mind must seek the light.
It is a radical way, because the Buddha enjoins us to give up what is before, give up what is behind, and give up what is in between.
Then and only then will the wheel of birth-and-death be knocked from its axis.
Those of us in the jaded and desperate West who hear the resonance of truth in the teachings of the Buddha must hear also that urging to act, to start an inner rebellion against our ancient sloth and stupidity.
Yet the more we ponder the more we recognize the enormity of the task, and an understandable reaction is to set about re-defining just what has to be done and just how prudent it might be to fling ourselves into action.
The danger here — so typical in our comfortable and seductive society — is to forget the radical imperative of suffering and try to make over Buddhism into a tame amalgam of platitudes suitable for pleasant contemplation — praising it in order to avoid practicing it.
Indeed, Buddhism is rational, patient, deep in wisdom, but should we then just bask in its reflected light?
Complacency is death.
If, out of custom and timidity, Western Buddhists turn their religion into a museum piece, or worse, a hobby, they lose the essence.
It is easy enough to settle for an undemanding status quo, a modicum of calm, a pleasant sense of harmonious living, and it is easy enough to postpone or forget any effort to break the shackles of old delusion, believing that one need not strain when the road will likely be long.
But in accommodating too much to personal or societal expediency we cheapen our ideals and slide further from the disturbing implications of the Noble Truth of Suffering.
We may even take the Buddhist vision of kamma as an indication that “everything is as it should be.” But everything is not as it should be.
Everything is in fact miserable.
If we are complacent we blind ourselves, and there is no safety in blindness.
In the radical view of the Buddha, Samsara is no cosmic merry-go-round, but a terrible juggernaut of birth and death dragging beings through endless cycles of woe.
“Free yourselves!” says the Buddha.
All lives and events are variations on the theme of suffering.
All are without substance, endurance, permanence — merely a web of emptiness, void upon void.
The “self” that everyone spends so much time defending and nurturing is pure fiction.
Dismiss it, says the Buddha.
The world will not conform to our wishes and to presume otherwise is folly; the disciple must cease clinging to it and proceed along the path to the end of suffering.
The root problem is craving, and the radical solution is the destruction of craving through wisdom.
The sober truths taught by the Buddha, squarely faced, present us with problems and choices.
Are we to assume that every Buddhist ought to be off grunting in a cave, sweating his way toward enlightenment?
Is this the radical conclusion?
Actually, the dilemma is not so formidable.
The Buddha taught gradually, according to the capacity of his hearers to understand and practice.
Every person should devote himself to the teaching as far as he is able.
The goal is ultimately the same for all, though progress along the path depends on the individual.
The Dhamma of the Buddha will lead us to the safety of Nibbana, and it will also sustain us along the way.
What matters is always to bear in mind where we are and where we are headed.
The radicalism of the Buddha is probably no more difficult for Westerners to comprehend than for anyone else, yet we are especially concerned with it now, because the teaching is only just now settling into our culture and its future direction is uncertain.
It is a critical time for the religion.
The fundamental teachings must not be neglected, lest we take to wearing our religion like warm slippers and doze into mediocrity.
Understood rightly, the Noble Truths are profoundly disturbing.
They compel us to act, to pursue the ideal of emancipation no matter how difficult the journey appears.
Buddhism truly goes against the stream of the world and demands an uncommon vigor of the disciple.
How well we respond depends on individual choice and ability, but what matters most is the recognition that a response is called for, that a path does exist, and that the goal can be achieved.
Understanding the basic teachings, Western Buddhists should be wary of tendencies to turn Buddhism into an instrument of secular reform, or a philosophical playground, or an esoteric hobby.
Before all else, there is suffering and the path to the end of suffering.
There is no safety in faddishness, complacency, or the compulsive intellectualism that hungers for truth but eats the menu instead of the dinner.
To reach the truth, to reach deliverance, we are told to give up what is before, give up what is behind, and give up what is in between.
The essence of Buddhism is to let go of everything, to cease clinging desperately to transient, woeful, empty phenomena.
The disciple who acts on this breathtaking advice may find the bottom dropping out of this fictitious world.
So be it!
Thus begins the journey.
Though seldom stated in so many words, a cherished belief of all human beings is that happiness lies in the satisfaction of our desires.
All our actions are usually predicated on this seemingly self-evident fact.
We are devoted to obtaining the objects of our desire; we consider it our right, our duty, and indeed our highest aspiration to get what we want, to obtain what we think will bring us enjoyment, satisfaction, or “fulfillment.” We are accustomed to asking one another, “What do you want out of life?” believing that if we can settle on some clear vision of happiness, and go after it, then all will be well.
Unfortunately, experience has a way of overturning our theories.
Those manifold objects we yearn for prove troublesome to capture; when captured they yield less pleasure than expected; when held onto they decay and cause us grief.
Then we are driven to turn for relief toward other enticements and thereby renew the cycle.
Somehow we believe that if only this search for gratification is conducted correctly, if only the right objects are selected, if only we can have a little luck to add to our efforts, then we can certainly attain that permanent happiness that now eludes us.
Badly thumped by fortune, we doggedly tell ourselves, “Yes, it's worth all the pain,” and turn a swollen eye toward fresh delights.
But is it worth all the pain?
Consider a succulent worm bobbing just below the surface of a pond, attracting the attention of a hungry fish.
In a flash the fish swallows the worm, only to discover the hidden hook, the barb that rips into its innards and causes it terror, suffering, and ultimately death.
The worm is attractive, but it delivers little satisfaction to the fish.
Such is the nature of sense-pleasures.
Those objects of eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind that we find so alluring are more likely to cause us misery than happiness, and the surprising truth is that it is not so much our choice of objects that is at fault, but the mere act of choosing in the first place, since all phenomena of this world are in reality flawed, connected to suffering, and unreliable.
According to the Buddha, true happiness is not to be found in the deceptive sense-pleasures of the world — not in wine or wealth or roses.
No matter how hard we try, we can never reach security as long as we persist in wrong views of the desirability of this or that sensual object.
Without a clear understanding of the nature of phenomena our search is doomed from the outset.
Our first task must be to confront the facts that the universe does not exist for our amusement and that such pleasures as we customarily derive from it are false, impermanent, and unworthy of our interest.
While the Buddha does not deny the existence of enjoyment in the world, he points out that all worldly pleasure is bound up with suffering, inseparable from suffering, and sure to give way to suffering.
Therefore in embracing the pleasant we cannot help but embrace the unpleasant.
Our craving prevents us from realizing these facts by continually projecting a false appearance on the world, convincing us that the tempting objects around us can actually be possessed and squeezed dry of some satisfying essence.
Without the intervention of wisdom, craving will keep us running from one disappointment to another.
Though we have many times taken the bait of sense-pleasure and suffered the inevitable pull of the hook, each new worm that comes wiggling through the water excites the heedless man.
The Buddha teaches that the solution to the terrible union of pleasure and pain is not to struggle hopelessly to split them apart, but to view the whole contaminated mass with detachment.
All phenomena share the same characteristics of impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and unsubstantiality, so it is futile to single out some objects for liking and others for loathing.
The whole cast of mind that sees things in terms of liking-and-loathing must be abandoned in favor of the detached observation called “mindfulness.” Clearly, if the bait hides a hook we do best to curb our appetites.
Forsaking attachment to sense-pleasures is a logical application of the Four Noble Truths, yet even among those who subscribe to the teachings of the Buddha there can be found a deep-seated reluctance to move from theory to practice.
The hold which craving has over our minds is so tenacious that we tend to straddle the abyss between truth arid illusion, hoping to live in both with some fast philosophical footwork.
For example, may we not propose that sense-pleasures are not in themselves harmful and may therefore be enjoyed in moderation?
We may propose it, but we are apt to justify thereby any craving that enters our heads.
As long as one regards any experience as personal or desirable, one remains mired in ignorance.
There are pleasant, unpleasant, and neutral feelings arising in the mind; they come and they go; they are to be observed, not sought after, because it is such seeking or craving that sustains the round of suffering.
Another common notion is that Buddhism may be employed to beautify life by making the individual more appreciative of the “harmony” of the universe.
This is false on two counts.
The Buddha did not aim to put a pleasing, comforting face on things, but to educate the individual to the ultimate worthlessness of suffering-dominated, conditioned existence.
Also, the only “harmony” discernible here and now is the implacable and impersonal law of cause and effect — not the blissful oneness beloved of poets.
A third erroneous notion is that sense-pleasures may be pursued full speed if they are part of worthy efforts and worthy goals.
This is a self-serving rationalization.
While mundane aspirations may be quite wholesome in conception, as long as they provide a surreptitious vehicle for craving they are flawed.
For the proper development of insight one needs to get rid of the idea of an ego or self that enjoys, possesses, and appropriates.
The noble-minded man is detached from both ego and world.
He acts for the welfare of himself and others without thought of reward or gratification.
He is indifferent to results; he is not swayed by the pleasant and the unpleasant.
In considering the lure and danger of sense-pleasures, it is not difficult to see that most of us will ultimately defend our indulgences, not from logic but from the blind urge, “I want.” What harm, we reason, can there be in a little innocent delight?
To clarify: the harm lies not in the sensation but in the deluded mind that fastens onto the sensation and clings to it obsessively.
What behooves the diligent Buddhist is to get beyond the whole idea of liking and disliking, to set it aside, to cease entertaining it — in order to advance to the fruitful fields of direct insight.
Suppose then, that we acknowledge the danger of the baited hook and agree that the restless, craving mind is a source of suffering.
What do we do about it?
Often we complain, “I can't help myself!
I know it's dangerous but I can't help it.” Anyone who has tried to oppose his own ravenous appetites for pleasure, amusement, or gratification knows this sense of helplessness.
A mind long accustomed to grasping is not dissuaded by mere rational arguments; it goes its own way, chewing up one experience after another in a hopeless search for happiness.
So what is to be done?
The trouble here, as is so often the case, is one of self-deception.
Although we may say we understand the danger of sensual obsession and the advantage of restraint, our weakness shows that in fact we do not.
Wisdom is simply incompatible with defilement.
As long as we are willing to compromise with our obsessions we have not fully understood the Buddha's teaching about the nature of reality.
We may-recognize intellectually that craving and clinging lead to suffering, but we have not penetrated to a direct experience of the truth.
Much work remains to be done: we can't simply throw up our hands and plead weakness.
If we truly recognize the hazards of succumbing to the baited hook, we must resist its enticements.
Yet the Buddha does not recommend a stubborn, stoical self-abnegation.
The disciple must deal with the problem intelligently.
Escape from suffering does not depend on obliterating or denying sense-pleasures but on seeing them for what they are through the systematic practice of mindfulness.
In ordinary life we are generally too caught up in gaining and losing to give sufficient attention to the elements and dynamics or the process.
We are borne along on these ancient waves only because of compulsive habit.
To stop our headlong career it is essential to develop and apply mindfulness, to cultivate scrupulous attention toward even the most mundane habits and desires.
Steady mindfulness, intensified in meditation, reveals that the mind is a ceaseless torrent of thoughts, feelings, perceptions, and mental impressions — never still for an instant, never stable enough to be considered substantial or enduring.
What we loosely term the “external” world is likewise a blur of evanescent phenomena, all changing with incredible speed, arising and vanishing with no beginning or end in sight.
Where then is the object that is truly desirable?
Gone!
Lost to view in the instant.
Where is the one who desires?
Gone!
Thought succeeds thought, effect succeeds cause in a tumble of empty foam, with a desiring “self” nowhere to be found.
Mindfulness discerns these truths directly, examining and breaking down experience until the “permanent” is understood as impermanent, until the “pleasant” is understood as unsatisfactory, until the “self” is understood as empty and unreal.
As with all of the truths taught by the Buddha, these three characteristics of existence must be realized through direct insight — not just through the ruminations of the intellect.
The practice of mindfulness can lead us to such insight if we undertake the task with patience and impartiality.
One who luxuriates in craving will remain twisting between misunderstood suffering and imagined pleasure, but one who recognizes danger will shun the baited hook and seek the bare facts of reality beneath the dazzling magic show of the senses.
By avoiding the baited hook of sense-pleasures we do not, as is sometimes maintained, rob life of all its joy.
On the contrary, we abandon false satisfaction and approach the true happiness that is born of freedom.
We take worldly enjoyment in moderation keeping it in perspective.
The wise disciple does not dwell in gloom and try to see the bad side of every experience.
If it is pleasant, he notes it as pleasant; if it is unpleasant, he notes it as unpleasant; if it is neutral, he notes it as neutral.
Whatever its appearance, he regards it with mindfulness and does not cling to it.
He enjoys life simply as he finds it.
In so doing, he escapes the peril of hook and line and sails freely toward the end of suffering.
Again and again the Buddha exhorts his followers to be mindful, because the world is burning with greed, hatred, and delusion.
Freedom can be won, but not by the careless, infatuated person.
The one who attains freedom will be the one who has mindfulness, energy, and the courage to see the canker in the rose.
A veneer of credulity and feeble optimism covers the dark preoccupations of our lives.
In an age marked everywhere with signs of spiritual decay, we somehow remain ever entranced by new toys, ever receptive to the latest balderdash from noisy charlatans, and ever ready to abandon the present moment for the lure of the next.
Let it be rumored that “self-fulfillment” has been glimpsed in somebody's book or therapy or religion, and immediately a cloud of dust obscures the sun as we stampede into the new territory — only to find ourselves, puzzlingly, still in the same dull company.
Do we really want happiness, or only titillation?
It's hard to say, because we rarely sit still long enough to examine the matter.
Suspecting dimly that life is treacherous, we keep moving fast to avoid calamity.
If we are credulous, we are no less skeptical.
We are quick to believe but find belief intolerable.
We topple today's idols and from their fragments eagerly assemble tomorrow's.
We pace up and down the shores of doubt, rousing one another with shouts of encouragement, but stepping into the river we find the water cold, and promptly conclude there's a better crossing further down.
The water is always cold.
Somebody sees a vision over the horizon, and the chilled troops waste no more time at this spot.
In our solitary reflections we may notice our inconstancy and regretfully wonder, “Has it always been thus?” If we are Buddhists we are bound to answer, “Yes.” This endlessly mutable landscape of disappointment, this lurch and halt of conviction, is called Samsara.
We are accustomed to regarding the “cycle of birth” and death as a remote, cosmic scheme of creation and dissolution.
In fact, Samsara whirls with cyclonic force here in the prosaic moment, here in the wavering and furtive mind.
If this is, that is.
Out of ignorance rises craving; out of craving rises the whole mass of anxiety and suffering.
We deceive ourselves even in our desire for happiness.
Our pursuit of pleasure or “self-fulfillment” is also a flight from despair.
Uneasy with the deteriorating present, we leap with unseemly greed toward the future, which, fictitious creature that it is, soon fails us and leaves us exactly where we were.
The great wheel turns, and has turned, and will turn again.
Freedom from Samsara does not spring from finding the right teacher or the right temple or the right style of meditations.
We must instead begin by discarding false expedients, brief enthusiasms, fashions, platitudes, and most of all, excuses.
Self-excuse is just grease for the wheel.
Ah, we sigh, if only we had met the Buddha in person!
Vain foolishness, this.
The Buddha was never to be found in six feet of flesh.
In his time and in ours he is only seen in the destruction of the defilements, in the giving up of excuses, evasions, and willful blindness.
If we earnestly strive to distinguish between the false and the true, the shallow and the profound, the path of the Buddha takes shape before us.
But after so many years of quick credulity and quicker doubt, of lukewarm and ambivalent effort, how can we make it across that cold, lonely river of ignorance?
If we divest ourselves of false and trivial comforts shall we not be left naked?
Indeed we shall.
And it is in precisely that condition that we may encounter the Buddha.
Buddhism is, after all, a religion of renunciation — renunciation of wrong thoughts, wrong speech, and wrong deeds.
When we give up our shabby illusions and the manifold hiding places of the mind we find ourselves naked and ready for the first time to see the world without distortion.
Whereas before we may have nominally accepted the reality of impermanence, suffering, and non-self, now we may begin to discern these truths directly and realize our predicament.
The old cliche, “The Buddhas only point the way,” strikes us with fresh significance.
Buddhism demands that we help ourselves, and here on the long, empty shore where we have so often wandered we may at last appreciate the task ahead.
The world around us may be crass and wicked, but not so crass and wicked as our own deluded minds.
We feast on the bones of cynicism and are not satisfied.
We give new names to iniquity and pursue it in shadows.
We mistake the pleasant for the good and perennially follow the easiest course.
Then in our accidental nights of fear we stare in bafflement at the four walls and ask ourselves, “Haven't I tried?” Silence replies with silence, and there's nothing left for us but to blunder after a new ghost of happiness, and thereby give the wheel of Samsara another spin.
Credulity is not faith, nor is skepticism wisdom.
The noble follower of the Buddha proceeds with a balanced mind, considering the world as he finds it, shunning the harmful and welcoming the useful.
He crosses the flood of Samsara on the raft of Dhamma, knowing that nobody will make the effort for him.
What distinguishes such a person from; his fellows is not necessarily brilliance of mind, but plain and simple perseverance, the resolve to follow the true course no matter how long it may take.
We can do likewise if we set ourselves firmly on the path.
Delay is the luxury of ignorance.
We commonly suppose Nibbana, the ultimate purity and freedom, to be something infinitely far away and terrifically difficult to reach.
We think of the Buddha as long departed.
But Nibbana is near for those who would have it near, and the Buddha is as close as true Dhamma truly observed.
What is required of us is to let go of our crumbling, mortal toys and to come down, alone, to the long shore of renunciation.
In that exhilarating solitude we may meet the Buddha, whose body is wisdom, whose face is compassion, and whose hand points out the waypoints directly to the deep and hidden purity in our hearts.
Early spring is a fitting time to consider death, though few of us, alas, appreciate this healthy practice.
When the first crocuses and skunk cabbage blunder into the sunshine the conventional mind waxes bold and brave and salutes the regeneration of the world.
We have won through once more, we've got another chance, we shall dawdle barefooted in gardens.
Gone is the dark time, the emphatically dead winter of land and heart.
We are, surely, about to participate in the general leafiness of things.
The gurgling pigeons in the park — formerly wretched pests — excite our fine feelings of sympathy.
We are magnanimous at seventy degrees.
We have great expectations.
Legions of us swarm the sidewalks with uplifted chins, celebrating what we had no part in making.
But there's a certain self-deception here.
If the sun burns more beneficently these days is it any of our doing?
If it shut down altogether would we be consulted?
We may fancy ourselves philosophers improvising on the rhapsody of spring, but we display, in the main, scarcely more independence than the pigeons.
We are seduced by the flowers April throws our way and esteem ourselves wise for having noted they are pretty.
We find in the loveliness of the season not a theme for true reflection but only a license for yearning.
We indulge without compunction, believing that we are in accord with the sacred law of the moment, when really we continue to flee the present moment and lust for the unborn fixture — some garden of promise yet to bloom.
Better we should turn our minds to dissolution and death — right now in the brilliant season.
Any fellow of sound faculties can stroll through late November and remark the transience of vital forces.
Ah, withered grass, leaden skies, brief span of happiness!
He is moved — having, as he thinks, come to terms with mortality.
The same fellow, come the daffodils, is warbling about youth and beauty.
But where is the brave heart who sees deeply in spring the bud dying to the flower, the flower to the fruit?
Where is he who at close of the year regards the snow-bitten rose and is not cast down?
Where is he who lives serenely in fair times and foul?
All things shall pass not only in black November but in pastel April as well — a lapsing without pause, a continual perishing of the dear, the unlovely, and the indifferent.
Nature suffers no moratorium on decay; it unrolls itself in seasons that, we, with our predilections for warmth and light, habitually misunderstand, finding gloom this month and gaiety in that.
To dote on April is to despise November.
We are caught up in liking and disliking, taking a sip of truth when we can't avoid it and spitting it out at the first opportunity, living tentatively like wine-tasters.
We ride the seasons on and ever on to the sweet, cruel music of hope, while the world burns because of us, because we've lit it with the torch of delusion.
Should we not now starve the fire to coolness and let be the race of forms we call our life?
Change sweeps all forms away, and no one can find peace in his time who does not attend to this universal moving-on.
So then, it is spring and the bluebirds are twittering.
Shall we pick our scabs and visit graveyards?
Of course not.
Let us go on breathing; if the air is sweet, why then, it is sweet.
If the rain blows off and the sun slants warm through the willow tree, so be it.
Let us sit on the porch and be alive.
No need to scourge ourselves or sleep on gravel.
No need to curse winter or praise spring.
They come and go independently of us: dead grass, dragonflies, thunderstorms, and snow — what scene should we prefer when all are flowing?
Reality cannot be seized; it arises when the mind stops grasping.
He who lets go is he who is established.
He lives in all seasons but serves none.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Mudita means appreciative joy at the success and good fortune of others.
Evaluation of achievement is a precursor to mudita, and appreciation a component of mudita.
Seeing the good in others and learning to recognize and admire what good there is, is what mudita tacitly implies.
Laughter and exhilaration are not characteristics of mudita.
Mudita is joy and appreciation flowing quietly out of the core of one's heart towards others like the waters from a spring flowing outwards from the bowels of the earth.
Spontaneous and sincere participation in another's glorious hour is possible only when the quality of mudita is developed to its fullest.
Genuine joy in the prosperity of others is indeed a rare quality.
The virtue of mudita may be best noticed at work in the joy of parents over the success of their offspring, and in the genuine ecstasy of teachers over the success of their pupils, particularly in the latter situation when the threat of the younger eclipsing the older is always imminent.
While it is easy to practice mudita within the narrow circle of one's family and friends, to identify oneself with the joys and triumphs of outsiders requires deliberate effort.
Yet the capacity for doing so is rooted in man's nature.
Smiling faces of adults make children respond readily with their own smiles.
This potential in the child should be nurtured and activated by parents and educationists.
For the seed of mudita planted early in a child will grow and blossom and bear fruit in his adolescence and in his adult life.
To some extent, man is a product of his environment — with this in mind, adults, parents, teachers and wardens who handle children should be of a cheerful disposition and an appreciative nature.
Latent in man are both noble characteristics as well as vicious tendencies.
It is strange that the vices latent in man seem almost natural and spontaneous, whereas the dormant virtues have to be brought to the surface with great effort.
As one advances in years, activating and developing the potential of mudita becomes more and more difficult — though not impossible.
Seeds will not take root in hard and crusty soil.
One has to loosen and soften the soil if one expects shoots from seeds.
In children the heart is tender and seeds planted therein will take root early and grow fast.
So the best time to activate and develop the positive and saintly tendencies which lie dormant in every human being is during the tender years.
When a child receives praise and approbation, he will naturally learn to give it to others for he knows the joy of recognition and appreciation.
Envy and jealousy are the chief opponents of mudita, or appreciative joy.
These noxious qualities arise partly out of a lack of confidence in one's achievements and one's capacity to achieve.
Dislike, boredom — nuances of the Pali term arati — may be considered as enemies of mudita.
The opposite sterling virtues which can vanquish these enemies are loving-kindness, metta, and compassion, karuna.
Mudita is placed third in the listing of the Brahma Viharas, for mudita is the natural outcome of the two preceding benign mental states.
Metta and karuna are the forces that urge one to alleviate the sufferings of others with purely altruistic motives, expecting nothing in return — not even gratitude.
What matters to the Buddhist is the little bit of joy he has brought to another's heart by relieving him of even a little bit of sorrow, of suffering.
Little do people realize how a kind word, a warm smile, a loving touch can act as a balm to a sorrow-laden heart.
We can now see how mudita becomes a natural result of metta and karuna.
Too often people are much more ready to sympathize with the misfortunes of others than to rejoice with them in their good fortune.
Where is a definition of a friend: “What are friends?
Are they not dear sweet people who abuse you behind your back and take an inward deep pleasure in hearing of your faults and misfortunes?” We have to take ourselves to task whenever we recognize these psychological perversities within us, and with great effort try to eradicate these unwholesome tendencies which seem to be deep-rooted.
We have to be honest with ourselves and look within.
Whenever traces of envy or jealousy enter our hearts, we should recognize the emotion as one which is unwholesome.
We should also make an effort not to let it take hold of us.
Let us ask this question: Why are we envious?
Because someone possesses something we do not.
Why do we not have that which we want, that which would give us joy?
The answer lies in our own kamma.
In the light of the Buddha Dhamma no one is to blame but ourselves.
The greatest sorrow for a woman is the inability to bear a child.
Why accumulate more bad kamma by envying those who have children?
Unwholesome states of mind such as hatred and anger are said to be the causes of infertility.
So why promote such a state in a future birth too by continuing that evil train of thought?
This line of thinking, of arguing, needs very great effort.
It is not easy.
That is why the Buddha praised effort, viriya, as a noble virtue.
“If it were not possible to do good I would not tell you to,” said the Buddha.
This mode of thinking helps to eradicate delusion — moha.
The source of all unwholesome kamma is ignorance of moha.
When the vail of moha is lifted, one sees clearly that craving is the source of all sorrows.
Craving gives rise to jealousy, envy, covetousness, avarice, greed — all enemies of mudita.
Let the fertile woman not look down upon her less fortunate sister who is denied the great joy of motherhood.
Let not the one endowed with beauty scorn her plain-looking sister.
Let not the wealthy insult the poor.
After all, we must remember that this earthly existence is but a short sojourn in our journey through Samsara.
The Buddha says there is no one on earth who has not in a previous existence been a mother, a father, a sister, a brother, a child to us.
So let us suffuse the whole world with metta, with karuna and with mudita.
This is why the Brahma Viharas are described as appamanna — illimitables.
They are so-called because they find no barrier or limit.
They embrace all living beings.
Jealousy can poison a man's system, mar his character, and ruin his social relationships.
And what is life but a series of relationships?
It is only in death that we are alone.
Today jealousy and greed for power have poisoned the mind of the world.
We now witness jealousy on a global scale.
We are destroying each other and our home — the earth.
The situation at the present is so very grave that we can no longer talk of individuals or groups or nations.
We have to speak for Earth.
Carl Sagan, the eminent astronomer, exasperated by the wanton destruction of our beautiful little planet and its resources asks, “Who speaks for Earth?” The practice of mudita never seemed to be as important as in the present day.
The forces of evil seem to have been unleashed in full measure in human hearts the world over.
Advances in science and technology have been of immense value to man's material progress and development, but the negative by-products of this progress are truly frightening.
Destruction of natural resources, pollution, unhealthy rivalry and dangerous competition have reached such colossal proportions that life on earth is threatened.
Discoveries and inventions in the fields of science and technology should be for a better and more comfortable life.
But now many of those discoveries' are a threat to life itself.
It is indeed depressing that the irony of this situation is not considered with sufficient concern.
The ills of the world are insidiously increasing so that there is a growing sense of cosmic gloom and defeatism.
Man's predicament as perceived by the modern poet, George Barker, is embodied in the following words:
Looking on, dejected and dispirited, is not the solution.
We have to struggle to save ourselves and our planet.
This is why institutions like the United Nations Assembly exist.
Though satisfactory results may not always be forthcoming, the fact that while a section is destroying, inventing weapons of hate, another section of mankind is arguing, demonstrating, petitioning for peace.
As long as such forces opposing evil are in existence, there is hope.
This means that there is still sympathy and love in men's hearts for their fellow beings.
So we must be hopeful.
Conflict is eternal; conflict is natural.
Conflict helps us to rediscover lost values.
We must not see only hatred in conflict.
Conflict is the natural prerequisite of a satisfactory solution.
A section of the world today is enveloped by the thick veil of delusion.
Hence their inability to see the truth.
Failure to perceive the Truth is delusion.
So it is with persistent effort and enduring patience that those who wish to be noble and serviceable must sublimate themselves and serve humanity, both by example and by precept.
The cultivation of mudita and the practice of this virtue can relieve humanity of the suffering it has brought upon itself.
Those with right understanding must by personal example work out salvation for themselves and for their fellow beings.
Diligent practice of mudita will make a person more amenable, flexible, and understanding.
He will learn to live outside himself.
He will experience a new kind of happiness, the joy of sharing.
This virtue will elevate him to eradicate the cankers of jealousy and egoistic craving; “We” and “ours” will be substituted for “me and “mine.” Wholesome camaraderie will build up, and he will gradually embrace the whole world with loving-kindness — sabbe satta bhavantu sukhitatta.
The ego will gradually disintegrate, and he will gain insight into anatta, the Buddha's central doctrine.
The fetters of attachment to self will break first, and with it all other fetters of attachment, which will lead him gradually toward renunciation.
The Buddha advocates the sharing not only of material resources, but of spiritual resources as well.
The transferring of merit to our dear departed ones is a truly beautiful sharing.
Our loved ones who are no more with us physically feel such a sense of joy in the thought that they are not forgotten; the joy that accrues to them by our enlightened acts is anumodana.
Mankind is on the eve of a nuclear war.
Sure and certain destruction will be the fate of the human race if war breaks out.
Now is the hour to muster benign forces within the human heart on a global scale.
The virtues of metta, karuna, mudita and upekkha must be practiced to combat the degrading forces of greed and hatred which cause dangerous divisions.
Once the sparks of divinity in men's hearts are released, all divisions of creed, colour, religion and race will recede into insignificance.
Then only one creed will be in evidence: the creed of humanity.
So let us activate, cultivate, and develop the sublime qualities — Brahma Viharas.
These powers hidden within the human heart are yet untapped, yet it is through these powers that humanity can be saved.
This seems to be the way — the only way out of the present entanglement.
The answer of the enlightened One given centuries ago embodies the solution to the present tangle.
It is, in fact, the answer to every generation — past, present, future.
“He who succeeds,” says the Buddha, “in disentangling this tangle, is the wise man, established well in virtue, who has developed consciousness and understanding.
Metta is a sincere wish for the welfare and genuine happiness of all beings, without exception.
It means that which softens one's heart — a friendly disposition.
“Just as a mother protects her only child even at the risk of her own life, even so should one cultivate loving-kindness towards all living beings.” It is not the passionate love of the mother that is stressed here, but her sincere selfless wish for a genuine welfare of her child.
Metta transcends all boundaries of caste, class, race and religion.
It is limitless in size and range; it has no barriers, no discriminations.
Think of the number of instances during a day when your actions are colored by discrimination.
When your unfortunate servant boy accidentally breaks an article, you shout at him.
When your own child does it, you tolerate it.
That servant boy is also somebody's child who, through bad kamma, has come under your roof to do your menial work — to do your bidding.
When you strike a blow across your dog's back for trampling your flower bed, do you realize the unwholesome state of your mind at the moment of such action?
You may even be a person who recites the gathas and the suttas, who goes to the temple, who observes the Eight Precepts, who listens to sermons, who gives alms.
But at the moment of such discriminating actions you have turned away from the Dhamma.
At some time you may bide the time, waiting for an opportunity to take revenge on someone who has slandered you.
During that period of waiting — please think of the Buddha.
Enact in your mind's eye the story of Cinca Manavika or the courtesan Sundari.
Then your little embarrassments and heartaches will fade into insignificance.
Metta is described as a divine state which cannot co-exist with anger or hatred.
“Hatreds never cease through hatreds in this world.
Through love alone they cease.
This is an eternal law.” Goodwill, loving-kindness, benevolence and universal love are suggested as the best renderings of the Pali word metta.
A point to be clarified here is that metta is not synonymous with ordinary affection.
The world cannot exist without mutual affection.
Between parents and children, between husbands and wives, between teachers and pupils, between friends, exist varying degrees of affection.
This affection is natural, and metta has to be cultivated.
A benevolent attitude is the chief characteristic of metta.
One who practices metta is constantly interested in promoting the welfare of others — not only in his family and friends.
Such a person is sincere when he says: “May all beings be happy.
Another very important point that should be clearly understood is that in exercising metta, do not ignore yourself.
How often do you say, “Oh, I got so angry with myself” or “I can never forgive myself”?
Some hasty words or actions on your part fill you with resentment towards yourself.
Remorse, though a fine corrective, is an extreme form which can bar your progress when indulged in again and again.
There are times when you may even make yourself mentally and physically ill.
So the most important person to make friends with is yourself.
Remorse, regret, diffidence and hopelessness are negative tendencies the existence of which can never result in a friendly disposition towards oneself.
Metta is a positive quality.
Unless you feel friendly toward yourself, you cannot be friendly towards others.
To the world outside you may appear to be well-disposed towards others and give the impression of possessing a benevolent, magnanimous nature.
But be aware of yourself.
Be honest with yourself.
Honesty is the starting point towards self-purification.
All men have their frailties.
What is meant by making friends with oneself does not mean that we expect to find within ourselves only that which is good and perfect.
We talk about understanding people.
Let us understand ourselves first.
Let us recognize our strong points and feel satisfied about them.
Let us recognize our failings, and strive towards lessening or eradicating them.
Let us not throw away our lives by throwing away that friend that is in us.
“I” or “myself” should be the central or starting point.
Metta radiates from oneself to others, so it is very important to feel a sense of goodwill, friendliness, well-being towards one-self.
This is a subtle point which has to be clearly understood.
The Buddha radiated metta equally towards his adversary Devadatta, Yasodhara his royal wife, and Patacara the demented woman, his royal father Kind Dusshodana and Sopaka the humble low-caste youth.
Metta then should be extended towards friend, foe and mere acquaintances alike.
The identification of oneself with all beings, making no difference between oneself and others is the culmination of metta.
The ideas of “me” and “mine” are building blocks of barriers.
Metta dissolves barriers and loosens all constraints.
With the diligent practice of metta, division evaporates and humanism is realized.
Such a mind is free from ill-will, and this freedom is bliss or sukha.
Ill-will is the antithesis of metta.
Anger, hatred, aversion are related qualities.
Metta cannot co-exist with such unwholesome attitudes.
Disparaging, condemning and belittling others is possible only through ill-will.
Pointing out another's faults with the intention of leading him towards good does not mean a lack of metta.
Parents, teachers and elders often have to resort to various methods of correction and reform where the young are concerned.
But one has to be very watchful when one is engaged in such activity.
The motive has to be analyzed carefully.
Elders sometimes react in anger.
At such moments one must question oneself: Was it to avert a disaster to the other that one acted so?
Or was it merely giving vent to one's own anger which oppressed one?
A mother who could not convince her son that the path through the jungle was unsafe and that he should take a safer route exclaimed in despair, “May a bear maul you!” The son departed and the mother radiating metta towards her son, hoped and prayed that no harm should befall him.
Though the jungle was infested with wild animals, the loving-kindness which radiated from the core of the mother's heart towards her son was a weapon against the fierce jungle beasts.
Metta, one has to understand, is a powerful weapon against evil — and protects one from many pitfalls in life.
Metta is a constructive healthy force with the power of combating hostile influences.
Just as anger can produce toxic effects on the system, benign thoughts can produce soothing health-bringing physical effects.
Many instances in the Buddha's life illustrate the fact that the peaceful thought vibrations of the Buddha produced salutary effects, so much so that the intoxicated elephant Nalagiri and the wild Angulimala were completely subdued.
The magnetic power of metta is indeed deeply rewarding.
Metta has a liberating influence on the one who possesses it and on the one to whom it is extended.
In our day-to-day lives with its trials, tribulations and complexities, the art of being friendly is fast disappearing.
We act like automatons.
We are so wrapped up in ourselves, in our own affairs, that we hardly think it is necessary to spend time over anything that is not connected directly to ourselves and our affairs.
We must teach our young the value of a friendly disposition.
We must do it by example more than by precept.
In our homes, in our schools, in our places of work, if this simple quality of friendliness is allowed to pervade the atmosphere, our corner of this earth can be a little haven — a true home.
Let us fill our hearts with metta, and let us make our hearts a home where peace and love and friendship will dwell.
Just as a water-course is dammed and directed through channels towards a chosen direction, so too the mind must be bent and consciously directed towards good, towards virtue, towards righteousness.
To amass wealth, to dig up the treasures from the bowels of the earth, man makes laborious efforts and spends enormous sums of money, but to dig up the invaluable treasures of the mind, man makes little or no effort.
But to make the effort man has first to realize, he has first to understand the mysterious and mighty potentialities hidden within his mind.
On the other hand, if, though well aware of the natural destructive forces within him, man makes little or no effort to curb them, he thereby causes untold misery to himself and to others.
Latent in man are both saintly characteristics and destructive tendencies.
It is strange that too often the vices latent in man seem almost natural and spontaneous, whereas the dormant virtues have to be brought to the surface with great effort.
It is worth noting that every vice possesses its opposite, a noble virtue which may not appear to be natural and automatic, yet which lies within the range of every person.
And so man lives enveloped in miseries of various types.
Man is never happy, never satisfied, always frustrated, always wanting something more, something new.
His mind is constantly in turmoil, and the misfortune is that he thinks that this has to be the natural condition common to all.
This is delusion, or moha.
It is a pity that man does not realize that all these fears, sorrows, phobias and miseries are mind-made — and can be eliminated.
A man can live in a constant state of bliss and joy devoid of unnecessary sufferings and live life to its fullest if only he would live the word of the Buddha, for the word of the Buddha embodies peace.
This is why the arahats often uttered:
A desert traveler with parched lips and burning soles will be gladdened on hearing that an oasis is not far off.
But he will not experience real joy until he tastes its waters with his lips, and dips his soles in the cool waters.
In like manner the word of the Buddha gladdens our hearts, but we should not stop until we have tasted the bliss of that noble state which is the panacea, the only panacea, for all the ills of the world.
The Dhamma is to be lived, not merely to be read about or listened to.
Listen.
Think.
Practice.
In our day-to-day lives, in the course of being engaged in our daily chores, we should think of the innumerable times when we have neglected the word of the Buddha.
Yet the incense chamber of the Buddha should be created within our hearts, and that fragrance must pervade every thought, every word, every action of our waking life.
“Purify your mind,” said the Blessed One.
Now think of the numberless unwholesome thoughts that daily pollute the mind.
We speak and we act impulsively, rashly.
Our words and our actions are often harsh; we cause pain of mind to others, which in turn brings on remorse.
A whole train of unwholesome thoughts are unleashed as a result of our inability to control our mind.
We get angry.
That anger even results in chemical changes in the body which can be injurious to our health, and to the well-being of others.
And then we repent for a lifetime a few words uttered impulsively.
So, realizing the unhappiness we bring upon ourselves and the suffering we cause others, we must first understand and accept the fact that we are not on the right path.
What is the remedy?
Do not let the mind drift.
Take hold if it.
Cultivate it.
What is cultivation?
It is meditation.
It is a process of mind cleansing.
What are the steps leading to purification of the mind, which is the heart of the Buddha's message?
To know the mind — that is so near to us; and is yet so unknown.
To shape the mind — that is unwieldy and obstinate, and yet may turn to pliant.
To free the mind — that is in bondage all over, and yet may win freedom here and now.
— The Heart of Buddhist Meditation, by Nyanaponika Thera
To know the mind one has to watch it from moment to moment.
Take a few minutes off your daily chores and sit down in a quiet place and be mindful of your thoughts.
Watch carefully the thought processes coursing incessantly through your mind like the rising and falling away of the ocean waves, but continuous — in a never-ending flow they arise and they fall away.
Recognize each thought as pleasant or unpleasant, as the nature of the thought may be.
We have to be honest with ourselves.
We must recognize jealousy as jealousy, know it to be unwholesome, cast it aside and substitute its antidote or opposite — which is appreciative joy or mudita.
We can gradually increase the period of watching by a few minutes each day.
After some time we will find that when watching and perceiving, all shades and nuances of thought pass through our mind.
With practice, this process will become automatic, natural and effortless, even while we are engaged in our daily activities.
This is as it should be — a very desirable condition for our well-being, for then we will be constantly mindful.
An action performed with mindfulness will be a skillful action.
The result, or vipaka, of such action will be pleasant and good.
So constantly our mind will be suffused with satisfaction, joy and bliss.
Let us look at a few of the common unwholesome states which too often pollute our minds:
Anger is a destructive vice which can be subdued with loving-kindness or metta.
Aggression is another vice that is responsible for much human suffering, errors and atrocities.
Its antidote is compassion or karuna.
Jealousy poisons one's system.
It has a corroding effect on a person like rust on metal.
It will destroy a person.
Appreciative joy or mudita is the remedy.
There are other universal characteristics that upset the equilibrium of man.
They are attachments to the pleasurable and aversion to the non-pleasurable.
The opposite force is equanimity, or upekkha, which alone can combat these two subtle but most prevalent defilements ever present in the mind.
Impregnated in the vices mentioned are the germs of a dreaded disease which seems to be taking its toll of many human lives today.
Self-destruction, depression, a sense of hopelessness, despair, gloom, pessimism, meaninglessness of life, are some of the symptoms of this dreaded disease which leads to so much unhappiness.
The disease is ignorance.
The cure for the disease is the substitution of the opposite virtues for each of the latent vices.
This will lead to the recognition of the beauty of life, its worthwhileness, its purposefulness.
The substitution of wholesome pleasant thoughts is a recognized form of mental therapy.
These virtues tend to elevate man.
If cultivated with diligence, man will realize that the earth is such a beautiful place, that human life is noble, and that it is still possible to gain peace for oneself and for others.
Mrs.
Eileen Siriwardhana graduated from the University of Ceylon in English, Singhalese and Pali.
She is now the Principal of Visakha Vidyalaya, the premier Buddhist Girl's School in Colombo.
She is also a distinguished writer in Singhalese.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
“Truly it will be not long before this body lies in the earth, bereft of consciousness, like a useless piece of wood, which is thrown away.
Usually, uninstructed worldly minded people do not think of death and do not like any pointed reference made to it by others.
Such unreflecting, uninstructed people often shut their minds deliberately to the fact that death is waiting for them.
They reject the possibility of a future life, and occupying themselves only with things of this life immerse themselves in the ephemeral joys of the five strands of sense desire.
To make such people think seriously on what is perhaps the most decisive event of life they have to reckon with — an event that will determine their future lives in no uncertain way — the Blessed One said, “Every householder and every one who has gone forth, should constantly reflect, 'I am subject to death.' The uninstructed worldly-minded man sees others dying around him but through intoxication with the pride of life he acts as if he were immortal.
He sees the victims of disease around him but due to intoxication with the pride of health he acts as if he were immune from disease.
Enjoying the first flush of life's springtime, he sees many an old man in the last stages of decrepitude but owing to his pride of youth, through becoming intoxicated with it, he acts as if he may never grow old.
And he sees many people losing their wealth and becoming paupers suddenly, but through his being intoxicated with the pride of power or position, he does not pity them, does not sympathize with them, and does not think that he too might be overtaken by similar misfortune.
Thus intoxicated by these, and many other intoxicants, he behaves like a man beside himself, heedless of right and wrong, heedless of this world and the world beyond, enjoying fleeting pleasures, like a crab in a cooking pot before the water heats up.
Even in his dreams he does not suspect that evil might befall him, but when he actually does, he loses control of himself, weeps, and bewails his lot.
Reflection on death if rightly practiced by a man opens his eyes to the individual essence of every form of being, its true nature, and removes the poison of pride, which makes him heedless of his welfare.
He sees them according to the words of the Buddha, “Uncertain is life, certain is death; it is necessary that I should die; at the close of my life there is death.
Life is indeed unsure but death is sure, death is sure.
He who thinks often of death becomes ardent in the fulfillment of his duties.
Therefore it is said, “The bhikkhu who is given to the practice of contemplating death becomes diligent.” Visnusarman says, “In the wise man who thinks again and again of death, the terrible penalty, all activity, becomes lax like leather bindings soaked with rain.
Thus, in those who seek immortality, all kinds of endeavor, exertion, to acquire worldly power and possessions become slack, through the perception of death, but they do all that has to be done for attaining the deathless state.
In the teaching of the Buddha the contemplation on death is intended to turn the mind away from the accumulation of mundane power and treasure and to increase the energy of the aspirant for highest freedom.
Even at the moment of death one has to do one's duty well.
Reflection on death quickens the mind and makes it develop unremitting ardor for the extinction of ill.
Such reflection can never make one negligent of actions leading to freedom from craving.
Who thinks often of death thinks thus: “Now is the time to endeavor to realize the goal.
Who knows that Death will not come till tomorrow?
What covenant have I with Death and his hosts to keep them at bay?
Those who frequently entertain the thought of death become convinced of the impermanence of all formations and the futility of emotion in the face of death.
Here it is good to remember how our Buddha acted as a bodhisatta and as a Buddha when death assailed him as well as those near and dear to him.
In his bodhisatta days, long before he became the Enlightened one, he developed the mindfulness on death and urged the members of his household too to develop it.
And when his son died suddenly bitten by a snake while he was working in the field he did not wail or lament.
He thought that the destructible had been destroyed, and Death had claimed what was his, and reflecting thus he went on working.
Then seeing a neighbor passing he sent a message to his wife, which she understood, and she and the rest of the household came to the field and all of them together made a pyre just in that field and burned what was the remains of one who was dear to all of them without any one of them shedding a single tear.
When the Buddha was told of the passing away of the venerable Sariputta Thera, who was considered the Commander of the Army of Righteousness, the Blessed One said this to the venerable Ananda Thera, who was upset, “Tell me Ananda, did Sariputta take the aggregate of virtue along with him and become extinct?
Or did he take the aggregate of concentration along with him and become extinct?
Or did he take along with him the aggregate of wisdom and become extinct?
Or did he take along with him the aggregate of freedom and become extinct?
Or did he take along with him the aggregate of knowledge and insight of freedom and become extinct?” — “No venerable sir.” — “Have I not indeed told you before that with all that is dear, pleasing, involved are change, separation, and variation?
The Buddha shows that it is not possible to stop the breaking up of what is born, produced and put together, and what has the nature of breaking, and compares the venerable Sariputta Thera to one of the greater branches of the mighty tree of the community of bhikkhus.
Comparable to the breaking of a bigger branch of a mighty tree, says the Buddha, is the venerable Sariputta Thera's passing away and no one can stop the breaking of what is breakable by ordering that thing not to break.
The Blessed One taught many persons such as Kisagotami the nature of death and led them through the gateway of the perception of death to immortality, by making them follow the path of virtue, concentration, and wisdom, in due order.
That is to say, by making them first establish themselves in virtue, and with virtue as the powerful condition making them bring about concentration, and then with concentration as the powerful condition making them bring in to being wisdom.
The Buddha himself and every one of his disciples, passed through the seven purifications, and the four stages of sanctitude to the ending of ill.
What is death?
It is the vanishing, the passing away, the dissolution, the disappearance, the dying commonly called death, the action of time, the break up of the aggregates, the laying down of the body of a being.
Or it is what takes place when vitality, action-produced heat, and consciousness leave the body, and the body is fit to be abandoned as useless for work, activity.
“This body,” says the Buddha, “is abandoned when life, warmth, and consciousness, leave it; and this body which is bereft of sense, becomes the food of others.
Once when the Blessed One was staying at Ayodhya on the Ganges he spoke thus:
“Bhikkhus, if in any manner, this river Ganges were to bring a great ball of foam, and an intelligent man were to see it, reflect on it, and thoroughly examine it, then, to that man who sees, reflects on and thoroughly examines it, worthless would that ball of foam appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in a ball of foam?
In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees, reflects on and thoroughly examines form of any kind, past, future, or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or high, far or near.
To the bhikkhu who sees, reflects on and thoroughly examines it, worthless would form appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus how can there be essence in form?
“If, in any manner, bhikkhus, when, in the heavy rain of autumn a bubble rises in water and passes away, and an intelligent man were to see it, reflect on it, and thoroughly examine it, then, to that man who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would that bubble appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in a bubble?
In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines feeling of any kind, past, future, or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or high, far or near.
To the bhikkhu who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would feeling appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in feeling?
“If, in any manner, bhikkhus, when a mirage quivers, at midday, in the last month of the hot season, and an intelligent man were to see it, reflect on it, and thoroughly examine it, then, to that man who sees, reflects on, and examines it, worthless would that mirage appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in a mirage?
In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines perception of any kind, past, future, or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or high, far or near.
To the bhikkhu who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would perception appear, empty, and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in perception?
“If, in any manner, bhikkhus, a man who moves about having need of heartwood, in search of, looking for it, were to enter with a sharp axe, a forest, see a giant young banana tree grown faultlessly, cut it at the root, cut off its top, and strip the rind from the stalk, he by stripping the rind from the stalk, should not come even to sapwood; how to heartwood?
Were an intelligent man to see it, reflect on it, and thoroughly examine it, then, to that man who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would that banana stalk appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in a banana stalk?
In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines formations of any kind, past, future, or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or high, far or near.
To the bhikkhu who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines those, worthless would formations appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in formations?
“If, in any manner, bhikkhus, an illusionist or his apprentice were to produce an illusion, at a junction of four great roads and an intelligent man were to see it, reflect on it, and thoroughly examine it, then, to that man who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would that illusion appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can these be essence in an illusion?
In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees, reflects on and thoroughly examines consciousness of any kind, past, future, or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or high, far or near.
To the bhikkhu who sees, reflects on, and thoroughly examines it, worthless would consciousness appear, empty and without essence.
Indeed, bhikkhus, how can there be essence in consciousness?
“The instructed noble disciple who sees thus, turns away from form, and also from feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.
Turning away he detaches himself.
With detachment he becomes free.
When freed he knows, 'I am freed,' and understands, 'Birth has been exhausted, the excellent life has been lived, what ought to be done has been done, and there will be nothing more to come of this.' Further, the Buddha said that one whose turban is on fire should be one who aspires to the deathless act.
There is no excuse for delay in working for deliverance from ill; Death is trying to take us always.
On a certain occasion the Blessed One went to a certain house set apart for sick bhikkhus and, having sat down on a seat prepared for him, said this: “Mindfully and with complete awareness should a bhikkhu meet his end.
This is the advice I give you.
Vibrant with compassion for suffering humanity, the wise being bent on supreme enlightenment, the Sambodhisatta thought, “My forbears accumulated much wealth and passed away taking nothing of their wealth with them; nor did they return to enjoy their treasure.
Alas!
they have been destroyed; they have missed the luck of getting the best out of a good rebirth”.
Thus do the great beings in search of liberation from ill look upon life, and they having made a gift of their possessions to the world go forth to endeavor for self-mastery that leads to final enlightenment.
Penetrating into the centuries, the millennia, and the aeons with his unclouded knowledge, the Master saw by means of his clear insight to the limits of the knowable and declared thus:
“In this sweeping on of life's stream, hard it is, to find another who has not been a person's own father, mother, brother, sister, son, or daughter.
Truly every living being might well have been associated closely with every other in this long trail of woe.” 
“Where in the whole wide earth could be found a spot unpolluted of the dead?
Sometime in Being's endless flux a living being has died wherever life manifested itself” 
To a brahman who was searching for virgin ground where no corpse had been burnt, the Master said that, corpses of that brahman's clan had been burnt on that very spot on which he stood and that there is not any place on earth that is not a cemetery.
Every brand of suffering does one undergo through rebirth in diverse planes of becoming.
And there is nothing in the world that arises that is fully pleasant.
Everything is mixed with suffering in such a way that for the thoughtful all pleasure appears as menaced with suffering or moving on to it because of impermanence.
Therefore the Foremost Speaker of Mankind, the greatest teacher of the world, the Buddha, taught that all that is felt, is embedded, sunk, planted, immersed in suffering, pain, grief, misery, disappointment, dissatisfaction.
And in view of the pain-laden character of being the Master set forth the wisdom of renunciation, giving up, detachment, thus, “Not to be known is the start of beings enmeshed in ignorance and fettered by craving, running on, speeding on, through interminable births and deaths.
Nor can it be said of the running on and speeding on of ignorant craving beings that they are tending to an end.
And in this interminable process for long have you all experienced grief bitter and sharp and made the graveyards bigger and bigger.
Because of that you should turn away from the formations cut them off, and become free of them.
During a long process of wayfaring in samsara very rarely does one gain the state of a human being.
“It is,” says the Buddha, “as if a man should cast into the wide ocean a yoke with a single opening in it, and that yoke should be carried hither and thither on the water by the wind's impetuosity — westward, eastward, northward, and southward.
Suppose a turtle blind of one eye should come to the surface of the sea once in a century.
“What do you think, bhikkhus?
Will that one-eyed turtle shoot its head through that yoke with the single hole every time it surfaced once in one hundred years?” — “Venerable sir, how may it be known should it succeed after a long time?” — “Well, bhikkhus, a one-eyed turtle surfacing once in one hundred years should shoot its head through that yoke with the single hole before a man who has fallen into a state of regress returns to the human plane.
Fully hard it is to accumulate merit when experiencing great suffering in states of loss or regress, that is to say, in the state of an animal trembling with fear of death at the time of seizure by net, snare and the like, as a draft animal painfully driven to work with various kinds of cruel punishment, as a ghost tearful of face subject to insatiable hunger and unquenchable thirst, with skin-and-bone body, and exclaiming from time to time, “Alas!
What woe!
Thus owing to extreme suffering in states of regress and owing to self-indulgence and intoxication with delight in the happy worlds of the shining ones, the so-called gods, devas, a person does not accomplish much merit in such states of being.
But in the human state through the combination of a fair measure of pleasant living and the fellowship of the virtuous, the door of merit is open.
If one suffers as a human there is every chance of that very suffering becoming a supportive condition for growth in right understanding, and for gaining confidence in the truth.
In the fashioning of the sword of spiritual science which destroys ignorance and the passions, the alternation of suffering and pleasure may be compared to the action of the smith who plunges the blade he is making alternately in fire and water to temper it by heating and cooling in turn.
Human life with its tolerableness becomes a suitable ground for producing skill.
Yet if human beings have the nature of the denizens of the states of regress, that is, of those tormented in hell, the ghost plane, or the animal plane, then such human beings though in human guise do not accumulate merit.
Three are the kinds of unfortunate beings in human guise and they may be known thus: the first kind by their readiness to take life and commit all kinds of violence, theft, lying, impurity; the second, by their energilessness and consequent depression and misery; the third, by their extreme proneness to self-indulgence, their lack of independence of character, and their transgression of all codes of decency.
Then to which kind of human being is it possible to acquire merit, wholesome states of mind, and a noble store of virtue?
Only to that kind which has established itself firm in human righteousness.
And what is that?
It is the state of being endowed with modesty and the fear to do evil.
It is settled reliance on the fact of kammavipaka, action and the result of action, stretching beyond this life to lives after this, until craving is destroyed through the consummate state, arahatta, the knowing of what is and what is not conducive to weal of self and society, compassion, plenitude of mental quickening to realize the good and the true according to actuality, the rejection of wrong courses of action, and the practice of the meritorious courses of action.
One established thus enters the place of merit; for him the way to the acquisition of worth is open; he grows in good; he becomes pure and a true servant of the world and thereby one who pays homage to the Blessed One, the Supremely Enlightened One, the Teacher of the Path to Immortality.
But all this can, according to the Buddha's principles of perfection, become accessible only through one way, the way of friendliness, of amity, loving-kindness, which is the precursor of all good.
Only through the way of friendly feeling, mettayana magga, does one approach perfection; no Buddhist can consider any one as his enemy.
A Buddhist is a follower of the Enlightened One, one who has put the idea of enmity far from him.
He has to eliminate the hate in his heart before he does anything else.
And when he gets rid of hate he has also canceled, obliterated, expunged, all thought of another as his enemy.
Really the ill mannered, the evil ones, the undisciplined ones, may be as vast as space.
If a person regards all the bad people in the world as his enemies how many of them is he able to destroy?
But when the thought of hate in his heart is destroyed then all enemies become non-existent for him and in that sense they are destroyed for him, through his becoming full of friendliness to them.
So the poet says:
— Bodhicariyavatara of Santideva
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
There was once a pair of jugglers who performed their acrobatic feats on a bamboo pole.
One day the master said to his apprentice: “Now get on my shoulders and climb up the bamboo pole.” When the apprentice had done so, the master said: “Now protect me well and I shall protect you!
By protecting and watching each other in that way, we shall be able to show our skill, make a good profit and safely get down from the bamboo pole.” But the apprentice said: “Not so, master!
You, O master, should protect yourself, and I too shall protect myself.
Thus self-protected and self-guarded we shall safely do our feats.
This is the right way,” said the Blessed One and spoke further as follows:
“It is just as the apprentice said: 'I shall protect myself' — in that way the foundations of mindfulness should be practiced.
'I shall protect others' — in that way the foundations of mindfulness should be practiced.
Protecting oneself, one protects others; protecting others, one protects oneself.
“And how does one, in protecting oneself, protect others?
By the repeated and frequent practice of meditation.
“And how does one, in protecting others, protect oneself?
By patience and forbearance, by a non-violent and harmless life, by loving kindness and compassion.
This sutta belongs to the considerable number of important and eminently practical teachings of the Buddha which are still hidden like buried treasure, unknown and unused.
Yet this text has an important message for us, and the fact that it is stamped with the royal seal of satipatthana gives it an additional claim to our attention.
The sutta deals with the relations between ourselves and our fellow beings, between individual and society.
It sums up in a succinct way the Buddhist attitude to the problems of individual and social ethics, of egoism and altruism.
The gist of it is contained in those two concise sentences:
“Protecting oneself, one protects others.” 
“Protecting others, one protects oneself.” 
These two sentences are supplementary and should not be taken or quoted separately.
Nowadays, when social service is so greatly stressed, people may be tempted to support their ideas by quoting only the second sentence.
But any such one-sided quotation would misrepresent the Buddha's standpoint.
It has to be remembered that in our story the Buddha expressly approved the words of the apprentice, that one has first to watch carefully one's own steps if one wishes to protect others from harm.
He who himself is sunk in the mud cannot help others out of it.
In that sense, self-protection forms the indispensable basis for the protection and help given to others.
But self-protection is not selfish protection.
It is self-control, ethical and spiritual self-development.
There are some great truths which are so comprehensive and profound that they seem to have an ever-expanding range of significance that grows with one's own range of understanding and practicing them.
Such truths are applicable on various levels of understanding, and are valid in various contexts of our life.
After reaching the first or second level, one will be surprised that again and again new vistas open themselves to our understanding, illumined by that same truth.
This also holds for the great twin truths of our text which we shall consider now in some detail.
“Protecting oneself, one protects others” — the truth of this statement begins at a very simple and practical level.
This first material level of the truth is so self-evident that we need say no more than a few words about it.
It is obvious that the protection of our own health will go far in protecting the health of others in our environment, especially where contagious diseases are concerned.
Caution and circumspection in all our doings and movements will protect others from the harm that may come to them through our carelessness and negligence.
By careful driving, abstention from alcohol, self-restraint in situations that might lead to violence — in all these and many other ways we shall protect others by protecting ourselves.
We come now to the ethical level of that truth.
Moral self-protection will safeguard others, individuals and society, against our own unrestrained passions and selfish impulses.
If we permit the “three roots” of evil — greed, hate and delusion — to take a firm hold in our hearts, then their outgrowths will spread far and wide like a jungle creeper, suffocating much healthy and noble growth all around.
But if we protect ourselves against these three roots, our fellow beings too will be safe.
They will be safe from our reckless greed for possessions and power, from our unrestrained lust and sensuality, from our envy and jealousy; safe from the disruptive consequences of our hate and enmity which may be destructive or even murderous; safe from the outbursts of our anger and from the resulting atmosphere of antagonism and conflict which may make life unbearable for them.
The harmful effects our greed and hate have upon others are not limited to the times when they become passive objects or victims of our hate, or when their possessions become the object of our greed.
Both greed and hate have an infectious power which vastly multiplies their evil effects.
If we ourselves think of nothing else than to crave and to grasp, to acquire and possess, to hold and to cling, then we may rouse or strengthen these possessive instincts in others.
Our bad conduct may become the standard of behavior for those around us — for our children, our friends, our colleagues.
Our own conduct may induce others to join us in the common satisfaction of rapacious desires; or we may arouse in them feelings of resentment and competitiveness.
If we are full of sensuality, we may also kindle the fire of lust in them.
Our own hate may provoke them to hate and vengeance.
We may also ally ourselves with others or instigate them to common acts of hate and enmity.
Greed and hate are, indeed, like contagious diseases.
If we protect ourselves against these evil infections, we shall to some extent at least also protect others.
As to the third root of evil, delusion or ignorance we know very well how much harm may be done to others through the stupidity, thoughtlessness, prejudices, illusions and delusions of a single person.
Without wisdom and knowledge, attempts to protect oneself and others will usually fail.
One will see the danger only when it is too late, one will not make provision for the future; one will not know the right and effective means of protection and help.
Therefore, self-protection through wisdom and knowledge is of the greatest importance.
By acquiring true wisdom and knowledge, we shall protect others from the harmful consequences of our own ignorance, prejudices, infectious fanaticism and delusions.
History shows us that great and destructive mass delusions have often been kindled by a single individual or a small number of people.
Self-protection through wisdom and knowledge will protect others from the pernicious effect of such influences.
We have briefly indicated how our own private life may have a strong impact on the lives of others.
If we leave unresolved the actual or potential sources of social evil within ourselves, our external social activity will be either futile or markedly incomplete.
Therefore, if we are moved by a spirit of social responsibility, we must not shirk the hard task of moral and spiritual self-development.
Preoccupation with social activities must not be made an excuse or escape from the first duty, to tidy up one's own house first.
On the other hand, he who earnestly devotes himself to moral self-improvement and spiritual self-development will be a strong and active force for good in the world, even if he does not engage in any external social service.
His silent example alone will give help and encouragement to many, by showing that the ideals of a selfless and harmless life can actually be lived and are not only topics of sermons.
We proceed now to the next higher level in the interpretation of our text.
It is expressed in the following words of the sutta: “And how does one, by protecting oneself, protect others?
By the repeated and frequent practice of meditation.” Moral self-protection will lack stability as long as it remains a rigid discipline enforced after a struggle of motives and against conflicting habits of thought and behavior.
Passionate desires and egotistic tendencies may grow in intensity if one tries to silence them by sheer force of will.
Even if one temporarily succeeds in suppressing passionate or egotistic impulses, the unresolved inner conflict will impede one's moral and spiritual progress and warp one's character.
Furthermore, inner disharmony caused by an enforced suppression of impulses will seek an outlet in external behavior.
It may make the individual irritable, resentful, domineering and aggressive towards others.
Thus harm may come to oneself as well as to others by a wrong method of self-protection.
Only when moral self-protection has become a spontaneous function, when it comes as naturally as the protective closing of the eyelid against dust — only then will our moral stature provide real protection and safety for ourselves and others.
This naturalness of moral conduct does not come to us as a gift from heaven.
It has to be acquired by repeated practice and cultivation.
Therefore our sutta says that it is by repeated practice that self-protection becomes strong enough to protect others too.
But if that repeated practice of the good takes place only on the practical, emotional and intellectual levels, its roots will not be firm and deep enough.
Such repeated practice must also extend to the level of meditative cultivation.
By meditation, the practical, emotional and intellectual motives of moral and spiritual self-protection will become our personal property which cannot easily be lost again.
Therefore our sutta speaks here of bhavana, the meditative development of the mind in its widest sense.
This is the highest form of protection which our world can bestow.
He who has developed his mind by meditation lives in peace with himself and the world.
From him no harm or violence will issue.
The peace and purity which he radiates will have an inspiring, uplifting power and will be a blessing to the world.
He will be a positive factor in society, even if he lives in seclusion and silence.
When understanding for, and recognition of, the social value of a meditative life ceases in a nation, it will be one of the first symptoms of spiritual deterioration.
We have now to consider the second part of the Buddha's utterance, a necessary complement to the first: “Protecting others one protects oneself.
And how?
By patience and forbearance, by a non-violent and harmless life, by loving-kindness and compassion.
He whose relation to his fellow-beings is governed by these principles will protect himself better than he could with physical strength or with any mighty weapon.
He who is patient and forbearing will avoid conflicts and quarrels, and will make friends of those for whom he has shown a patient understanding.
He who does not resort to force or coercion will, under normal conditions, rarely become an object of violence himself as he provokes no violence from others.
And if he should encounter violence, he will bring it to an early end as he will not perpetuate hostility through vengeance.
He who has love and compassion for all beings, and is free of enmity, will conquer the ill-will of others and disarm the violent and brutal.
A compassionate heart is the refuge of the whole world.
We shall now better understand how those two complementary sentences of our text harmonize.
Self-protection is the indispensable basis.
But true self-protection is possible only if it does not conflict with the protection of others; for one who seeks self-protection at the expense of others will defile as well as endanger himself.
On the other hand, protection of others must not conflict with the four principles of patience, non-violence, loving-kindness and compassion; it also must not interfere with their free spiritual development as it does in the case of various totalitarian doctrines.
Thus in the Buddhist conception of self-protection all selfishness is excluded, and in the protection of others violence and interference have no place.
Self-protection and protection of others correspond to the great twin virtues of Buddhism, wisdom and compassion.
Right self-protection is the expression of wisdom, right protection of others the expression of compassion.
Wisdom and compassion, being the primary elements of Bodhi or Enlightenment, have found their highest perfection in the Fully Enlightened One, the Buddha.
The insistence on their harmonious development is a characteristic feature of the entire Dhamma.
We meet them in the four sublime states, where equanimity corresponds to wisdom and self-protection, while loving-kindness, compassion and sympathetic joy correspond to compassion and the protection of others.
These two great principles of self-protection and protection of others are of equal importance to both individual and social ethics and bring the ends of both into harmony.
Their beneficial impact, however, does not stop at the ethical level, but leads the individual upwards to the highest realization of the Dhamma, while at the same time providing a firm foundation for the welfare of society.
It is the writer's belief that the understanding of those two great principles of self-protection and protection of others, as manifesting the twin virtues of wisdom and compassion, is of vital importance to Buddhist education, for young and old alike.
They are the cornerstones of character building and deserve a central place in the present world wide endeavor for a Buddhist revival.
“I shall protect myself” — thus should we establish our mindfulness, and guided by it devote ourselves to the practice of meditation, for the sake of our own liberation.
“I shall protect others” — thus should we establish our mindfulness, and guided by it regulate our conduct by patience, harmlessness, loving-kindness and compassion, for the welfare and happiness of many.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
When you hear something about Buddhism in the daily news you usually think of it having a background of huge idols and yellow-robed monks, with a thick atmosphere of incense fumes.
You never feel that there is anything in it for you, except, maybe, an exotic spectacle.
But is that all there is in Buddhism?
Do the news photographers take pictures of the real Buddhism?
Do the glossy magazines show you the fundamentals, or only the externals?
Let us see, then, what Buddhism really is, Buddhism as it was originally expounded and as it still exists underneath the external trappings and trimmings.
Although generally regarded as a religion, Buddhism is basically a method of cultivating the mind.
It is true that, with its monastic tradition and its emphasis on ethical factors, it possesses many of the surface characteristics that Westerners associate with religion.
However, it is not theistic, since it affirms that the universe is governed by impersonal laws and not by any creator-god; it has no use for prayer, for the Buddha was a teacher and not a god; and it regards devotion not as a religious obligation but as a means of expressing gratitude to its founder and as a means of self-development.
Thus it is not a religion at all from these points of view.
Again, Buddhism knows faith only in the sense of confidence in the way recommended by the Buddha.
A Buddhist is not expected to have faith or to believe in anything merely because the Buddha said it, or because it is written in the ancient books, or because it has been handed down by tradition, or because others believe it.
He may, of course, agree with himself to take the Buddha-doctrine as a working hypothesis and to have confidence in it; but he is not expected to accept anything unless his reason accepts it.
This does not mean that everything can be demonstrated rationally, for many points lie beyond the scope of the intellect and can be cognized only by the development of higher faculties.
But the fact remains that there is no need for blind acceptance of anything in the Buddha-doctrine.
Buddhism is a way of life based on the training of the mind.
Its one ultimate aim is to show the way to complete liberation from suffering by the attainment of the Unconditioned, a state beyond the range of the normal untrained mind.
Its immediate aim is to strike at the roots of suffering in everyday life.
All human activity is directed, either immediately or remotely, towards the attainment of happiness in some form or other; or, to express the same thing in negative terms, all human activity is directed towards liberation from some kind of unsatisfactoriness or dissatisfaction.
Dissatisfaction, then, can be regarded as the starting point in human activity, with happiness as its ultimate goal.
Dissatisfaction, the starting point in human activity, is also the starting point in Buddhism; and this point is expressed in the formula of the Four Basic Statements, which set out the fact of dissatisfaction, its cause, its cure, and the method of its cure.
The First Basic Statement can be stated thus:
Dissatisfaction is Inescapable in En-self-ed Life
In its original meaning, the word which is here rendered as “dissatisfaction” and which is often translated as “suffering” embraces the meanings not only of pain, sorrow, and displeasure, but also of everything that is unsatisfactory, ranging from acute physical pain and severe mental anguish to slight tiredness, boredom, or mild disappointment.
Sometimes the term is rendered as “dissatisfaction” or “unsatisfactoriness”; in some contexts these are perhaps more accurate, while at other times the word “suffering” is more expressive.
For this reason we shall use both “suffering” and “dissatisfaction” or “unsatisfactoriness” according to context.
In some translations of the original texts it is stated that birth is suffering, sickness is suffering, old age is suffering, and pleasure is suffering.
In English, this last statement fails to make sense; but if we restate it as “pleasure is unsatisfactory” it becomes more readily understandable, for all pleasure is impermanent and is eventually succeeded by its opposite, and from this point of view at least it is unsatisfactory.
Now the Buddha-doctrine teaches that dissatisfaction or suffering is inescapable in en-self-ed life; and the term “en-self-ed life” needs some explanation.
In brief, the doctrine teaches that the self, considered as a fixed, unchanging eternal soul, has no reality.
The central core of every being is not an unchanging soul but a life-current, an ever-changing stream of energy which is never the same for two consecutive seconds.
The self, considered as an eternal soul, therefore, is a delusion, and when regarded from the ultimate standpoint it has no reality; and it is only within this delusion of selfhood that ultimate suffering can exist.
When the self-delusion is finally transcended and the final enlightenment is attained, the ultimate state which lies beyond the relative universe is reached.
In this ultimate state, the Unconditioned, suffering is extinguished; but while any element of selfhood remains, even though it is a delusion, suffering remains potentially within it.
We must understand, then, that the First Basic Statement does not mean that suffering is inescapable; it means that suffering is inescapable in enselfed life, or while the delusion of selfhood remains.
We can now move on to the Second Basic Statement, which says:
The Origin of Dissatisfaction is Craving
If you fall on a slippery floor and suffer from bruises, you say that the cause of your suffering is the slippery floor.
In an immediate sense you are right, of course, and to say that the cause of your bruises is craving fails to make sense.
But the Second Statement does not refer to individual cases or to immediate causes.
It means that the integrating force that holds together the life-current is self-centered craving; for this life-current — this self-delusion — contains in itself the conditions for suffering, while the slippery floor is merely an occasion for suffering.
It is obviously impossible, by the nature of the world we live in, to cure suffering by the removal of all the occasions for suffering; whereas it is possible in Buddhism to strike at its prime or fundamental cause.
Therefore the Third Basic Statement states:
Liberation May Be Achieved by Destroying Craving
It is self-centered craving that holds together the forces which comprise the life-current, the stream of existence which we call the self; and it is only with self-delusion that unsatisfactoriness or suffering can exist.
By the destruction of that which holds together the delusion of the self, the root cause of suffering is also destroyed.
The ultimate aim of Buddhist practice, then, is to annihilate the self.
This is where a great deal of misunderstanding arises, and naturally so; but once it is realized that to annihilate the self is to annihilate a delusion, this misunderstanding disappears.
When the delusion is removed, the reality appears; so that to destroy delusion is to reveal the reality.
The reality cannot be discovered while the delusion of self continues to obscure it.
Now what is this reality which appears when the delusion is removed?
The ultimate reality is the Unconditioned, called also the Unborn, the Unoriginated, the Uncreated, and the Uncompounded.
We can, inadequately and not very accurately, describe it as a positive state of being.
It is characterized by supreme bliss and complete freedom from suffering and is so utterly different from ordinary existence that no real description of it can be given.
The Unconditioned can be indicated — up to a point — only by stating what it is not; for it is beyond words and beyond thought.
Hence, in the Buddhist texts, the Unconditioned is often explained as the final elimination from one's own mind, of greed, hatred and delusion.
This, of course, also implies the perfection of the opposite positive qualities of selflessness, loving-kindness, and wisdom.
The attainment of the Unconditioned is the ultimate aim of all Buddhist practice, and is the same as complete liberation from dissatisfaction or suffering.
This brings us to the last of the Four Basic Statements:
The Way of Liberation Is the Noble Eightfold Path
The eight factors of the path are these:
Now you will see that in this Noble Eightfold Path there is nothing of an essentially religious nature; it is more a sort of moral psychology.
But in the East as well as in the West people as a whole demand external show of some sort, and — on the outside at least — the non-essentials have assumed more importance than the essentials.
While some external features in the practice of Buddhism must of necessity vary according to environment, the essential and constant characteristics of that practice are summed up in the following outline of the Noble Eightfold Path, the Middle Way between harmful extremes, as taught by the Buddha.
Although it is convenient to speak of the various aspects of the eightfold path as eight steps, they are not to be regarded as separate steps, taken one after another.
On the contrary, each one must be practiced along with the others, and it might perhaps be better to think of them as if they were eight parallel lanes within the one road rather than eight successive steps.
The first step of this path, right understanding, is primarily a matter of seeing things as they really are — or at least trying to do so without self-deceit or evasion.
In another sense, right understanding commences as an intellectual appreciation of the nature of existence, and as such it can be regarded as the beginning of the path; but, when the path has been followed to the end, this merely intellectual appreciation is supplanted by a direct and penetrating discernment of the principles of the teaching first accepted intellectually.
While right understanding can be regarded as the complete understanding of the Buddha doctrine, it is based on the recognition of three dominating characteristics of the relative universe, of the universe of time, form and matter.
These three characteristics can briefly be set out in this way:
The self, then, is not a static entity but an ever-changing flux.
This dynamic concept of existence is typical of deeper Buddhist thought; there is nothing static in life, and since it is ever-flowing you must learn to flow with it.
Another aspect of right understanding is the recognition that the universe runs its course on the basis of a strict sequence of cause and effect, or of action and reaction, a sequence just as invariable and just as exact in the mental or moral realm as in the physical.
In accordance with this law of moral action and reaction all morally good or wholesome will actions eventually bring to the doer happiness at some time, while unwholesome or morally bad will-actions bring suffering to the doer.
The effects of wholesome and unwholesome will-actions — that is to say, the happiness and suffering that result from them — do not generally follow immediately; there is often a considerable time-lag, for the resultant happiness and suffering can arise only when appropriate conditions are present.
The results may not appear within the present lifetime.
Thus at death there is normally a balance of “merit” which has not yet brought about its experience of happiness; and at the same time there is also a balance of “demerit” which has not yet given rise to the suffering which is to be its inevitable result.
After death, the body disintegrates, of course, but the life-current continues, not in the form of an unchanging soul, but in the form of an ever-changing stream of energy.
Immediately after death a new being commences life to carry on this life current; but the new being is not necessarily a human being, and the instantaneous rebirth may take place on another plane of existence.
But in any case, the new being is a direct sequel to the being that has just died.
Thus the new being becomes an uninterrupted continuation of the old being, and the life-current is unbroken.
The new being inherits the balance of merit built up by the old being, and this balance of merit will inevitably bring happiness at some future time.
At the same time, the new being inherits the old being's balance of demerit, which will bring suffering at some time in the future.
In effect, in the sense of continuity, the new being is the same as the old being.
In just the same way — that is, in the sense of continuity only — an old man is the same as the young man he once was, the young man is the same as the boy he once was, and the boy is the same as the baby he once was.
But the identity of the old man with the young man, and with the boy, and with the baby, is due only to continuity; there is no other identity.
Everything in the universe changes from day to day and from moment to moment, so that every being at this moment is a slightly different being from that of the moment before; the only identity is due to continuity.
In the same way, the being that is reborn is different from the previous one that died; but the identity due to continuity remains as before.
These teachings are basic to the Buddha-doctrine — the illusory nature of the self, the law of action and reaction in the moral sphere, and the rebirth of the life-forces — but there is no need for anyone to accept anything that does not appeal to his reason.
Acceptance of any particular teaching is unimportant; what is important is the continual effort to see things as they really are, without self-deceit or evasion.
So much for a brief outline of the doctrine under the heading of right understanding.
The second step, right thought or aim, is a matter of freeing the intellectual faculties from adverse emotional factors, such as sensuality, ill-will, and cruelty, which render wise and unbiased decisions impossible.
Right speech, right action, and right livelihood together make up the moral section of the path, their function being to keep the defilements of the mind under control and to prevent them from reaching adverse expression.
These defilements, however, cannot be completely eradicated by morality alone, and the other steps of the path must be applied to cleanse the mind completely of its defilements.
Now in the next step — right effort — we enter the sphere of practical psychology, for right effort in this context means effort of will.
In other words, the sixth step of the path is self-discipline, the training of the will in order to prevent and overcome those states of mind that retard development, and to arouse and cultivate those that bring about mental progress.
The seventh step of the path is also one of practical psychology; this is the step called right mindfulness, and it consists of the fullest possible development of the ordinary faculty of attention.
It is largely by the development of attention — expanded and intensified awareness — that the mind can eventually become capable of discerning things as they really are.
The primary function of the seventh step, right mindfulness, is to develop an increasing awareness of the unreality of the self.
However, it functions also by continually improving the normal faculty of attention, thus equipping the mind better to meet the problems and stresses of the workaday world.
In the Buddha-way, mindfulness consists of developing the faculty of attention so as to produce a constant awareness of all thoughts that arise, all words that are spoken, and all actions that are done, with a view to keeping them free from self-interest, from emotional bias, and from self-delusion.
Right mindfulness has many applications in the sphere of everyday activities.
For example, it can be employed to bring about a sharpened awareness, a clear comprehension, of the motives of these activities, and this clear comprehension of motive is extremely important.
In right concentration, the last of the eight steps, the cultivation of higher mind-states — up to the meditative absorptions — is undertaken, and these higher mind-states serve to unify, purify, and strengthen the mind for the achievement of liberating insight.
In this ultimate achievement the delusion of selfhood, with its craving and suffering, is transcended and extinguished.
This penetrating insight is the ultimate goal of all Buddhist practices, and with it comes a direct insight into the true nature of life, culminating in realization of the Unconditioned.
While the Unconditioned is the extinction of self, it is nevertheless not mere non-existence or annihilation, for the extinction of self is nothing but the extinction of a delusion.
Every description of the Unconditioned must fail, for it lies not only beyond words but beyond even thought; and the only way to know it is to follow the Noble Eightfold Path to its end.
This, then, is the original Buddhism; this is the Buddhism of the Noble Eightfold Path, of the path that leads from the bondage of self to liberating insight into reality.
Leonard A.
Bullen was one of the pioneers of the Buddhist movement in Australia.
He was the first president of the Buddhist Society of Victoria when it was established in and one of the first office-bearers of the executive committee of the Buddhist Federation of Australia.
He was also a co-editors of the Buddhist journal Metta.
He passed away in at the age of.
His other publications issued by BPS are A Technique of Living and “Action and Reaction in Buddhist Teaching” in Kamma and Its Fruit.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The ultimate goal of Buddhism is the deathless condition of Nibbana, the sole reality.
Hence, one who aspires to that state should renounce mundane pursuits and attachments, which are ephemeral, for the sake of that reality.
But there are very few who are sufficiently mature to develop themselves to achieve that state in this very life.
Thus the Buddha does not force the life of renunciation upon those who lack the spiritual capacity to embark upon the higher life.
Therefore, one should follow the path of mundane advantage which is twofold, namely, the advantage obtainable here in this very life and the advantage obtainable in future lives, as steps on the path to the spiritual life.
Although one may enjoy the pleasures of life, one must regard one's body as an instrument with which to practice virtue for one's own and other's benefit; in short, one should live a useful life of moral integrity, a life of simplicity and paucity of wants.
As regards acquisition of wealth, the Buddha said: “One must be diligent and energetic,” and as regards the safeguarding of one's wealth, “one must be mindful and economical.
It is not impossible that even the life of such a man may be somehow or other disturbed and harassed as a result of the actions of “unskillful” men.
Although this might induce him to abandon his chosen path, it is at such times that one must not forget the steps to be taken for the purpose of establishing peace.
According to the teaching of the Buddha this includes the reflection: “Others may be harmful, but I shall be harmless, thus should I train myself.” We must not forget that the whole spirit of Buddhism is one of pacification.
In the calm and placid atmosphere of the Buddha's teaching there is every chance, every possibility, of removing hatred, jealousy and violence from our mind.
It is no wonder if we, at times, in our everyday life, feel angry with somebody about something.
But we should not allow this feeling to reside in our mind.
We should try to curb it at the very moment it has arisen.
Generally there are eight ways to curb or control our anger.
The first method is to recollect the teachings of the Buddha.
On very many occasions the Buddha explained the disadvantages of an angry temper.
Here is one of his admonitions:
Suppose some bandits catch one of you and sever his body limb from limb with a two-handed saw, and if he should feel angry thereby even at that moment, he is no follower of my teaching.
— Kakacupama Sutta, Majjhima Nikaya 
As a log from a pyre, burnt at both ends and fouled in the middle, serves neither for firewood in the village nor for timber in the forest, so is such a wrathful man.
— Anguttara Nikaya II, 
Further, we may consider the Buddha's advice to be found in the Dhammapada:
He abused me, he beat me, he defeated me, he robbed me of my property.
Whosoever harbor such thoughts will never be able to still their enmity.
Never indeed is hatred stilled by hatred; it will only be stilled by non-hatred — this is an eternal law.
— Dhp., vv.
-
Do not speak harshly to anyone.
Those who are harshly spoken to might retaliate against you.
Angry words hurt other's feelings, even blows may overtake you in return.
— Dhp., v.

Forbearance is the highest observance.
Patience is the highest virtue.
So the Buddhas say.
— Dhp., v.

Let a man remove his anger.
Let him root out his pride.
Let him overcome all fetters of passions.
No sufferings overtake him who neither clings to mind-and-body nor claims anything of the world.
— Dhp., v.

Conquer anger by non-anger.
Conquer evil by good.
Conquer miserliness by liberality.
Conquer a liar by truthfulness.
— Dhp., v.

Guard your mind against an outburst of wrong feelings.
Keep your mind controlled.
Renouncing evil thoughts, develop purity of mind.
— Dhp., v.

If by contemplating the advice of the Buddha in this way one cannot curb his anger, then let him try the second method.
Naturally, any bad person may possess some good quality.
Some men are evil in mind but speak in deceptive language or slyly perform their deeds in an unsuspecting manner.
Some men are coarse only in their language but not in their mind or deeds.
Some men are coarse and cruel in their deeds but neither in their speech nor in their mind.
Some are soft and kind in mind, speech and deed as well.
When we feel angry with any person, we should try to find out some good in him, either in his way of thinking, or in his way of speaking or in his way of acting.
If we find some redeeming quality in him, we should ponder its value and ignore his bad qualities as natural weaknesses that are to be found in everyone.
Whilst we think thus, our mind will soften and we may even feel kindly towards that person.
If we develop this way of thinking we will be able to curb or eliminate our anger towards him.
At times, this method may not be successful and we shall then have to try the third method.
Basically, this entails reflecting thus:
“He has done that wrong, being subject to anger, should I too follow him, making my mind subject to anger?
Is it not foolish to imitate him?
He harboring his hatred destroys himself internally.
Why should I, on his account, destroy my reputation?
“All things are momentary.
Both his mind and body are momentary too.
The thoughts and the body with which the wrong was done to me are not now existing.
What I call the same man now are the thoughts and physical parts which are different from the earlier ones that harmed me although belonging to the same psycho-physical process.
Thus, one thought together with one mass of physical parts did me some wrong, and vanished there and then, giving place to succeeding thoughts and material parts to appear.
So with which am I getting angry?
With the vanished and disappeared thoughts and physical parts or with the thoughts and material parts which do not do any wrong now?
Should I get angry with one thing which is innocent whereas another thing has done me wrong and vanished?
“The so-called 'I' is not the same for two consecutive moments.
At the moment the wrong was done there was another thought and another mass of molecules which were regarded as 'I,' whereas what are regarded as 'I' at the present moment are a different thought and collection of molecules, though belonging to the same process.
Thus some other being did wrong to someone else and another gets angry with another.
Is this not a ridiculous situation?
If we scrutinize the exact nature of our life and its happenings in this manner, our anger might subside or vanish there and then.
There is another way, too, to eliminate upsurging anger.
Suppose we think of someone who has done wrong to us.
On such occasions we should remember that we suffer harm or loss as a result of our previous kamma.
Even if others were angry with us, they could not harm us if there were no latent force of past unwholesome kamma committed by us which took advantage of this opportunity to arouse our adversary.
So it is I who am responsible for this harm or loss and not anybody else.
And at the same time, now while I am suffering the result of past kamma, if I, on account of this, should get angry and do any harm to him, by that do I accumulate much more unwholesome kamma which would bring me correspondingly unwholesome results.
If we recall to mind this law of kamma, our anger may subside immediately.
We can consider such a situation in another way too.
We as the followers of Buddha believe that our Bodhisatta passed through incalculable numbers of lives practicing virtues before he attained Buddhahood.
The Buddha related the history of some of his past lives as illustrations to teach us how he practiced these virtues.
The lives of the prince Dhammapala and the ascetic Khantivadi are most illustrative and draw our attention.
At one time the Bodhisatta had been born as the son of a certain king named Mahapatapa.
The child was named Culla Dhammapala.
One day the Queen sat on a chair fondling her child and did not notice the King passing by.
The King thought the Queen was so proud of her child as not to get up from her chair even when she saw that her lord the King passed that way.
So he grew angry and immediately sent for the executioner.
When he came the King ordered him to snatch the child from the Queen's arms and cut his hands, feet and head off, which he did instantly.
The child, our Bodhisatta, suffered all that with extreme patience and did not grow ill-tempered or relinquish his impartial love for his cruel father, lamenting mother and the executioner.
So far had he matured in the practice of forbearance and loving-kindness at that time.
At another time, our Bodhisatta was an ascetic well-known for his developed virtue of forbearance and consequently people named him Khantivadi, the preacher of forbearance.
One day he visited Benares and took his lodgings at the royal pleasure grove.
Meanwhile, the King passed that way with his harem and, seeing the ascetic seated under a tree, asked what virtue he was practicing, to which the ascetic replied that of forbearance.
The King was a materialist who regarded the practice of virtue to be humbug.
So, hearing the words of the ascetic, he sent for the executioner and ordered him to cut off his hands and feet and questioned the ascetic as to whether he could hold to forbearance at the severing of his limbs.
The ascetic did not feel ill-tempered but even at that time he lay down extending his loving-kindness and holding his forbearance undiminished.
He spoke to the King in reply to the effect that his forbearance and other virtues were not in his limbs but in his mind.
The King, being unsuccessful in his attempts to disturb the ascetic's feelings, grew angrier and kicked the stomach of the ascetic with his heel and went away.
Meanwhile, the King's minister came over and, seeing what had happened, bowed before the dying ascetic and begged him saying: “Venerable one, none of us agreed to this cruel act of the King and we are all sorrowing over what has been done to you by that devilish man.
We ask you to curse the King but not us.” At this the ascetic said: “May that king who has caused my hands and feet to be cut off, as well as you, live long in happiness.
Persons who practice virtues like me never get angry.” Saying this, he breathed his last.
Since the Buddha in his past lives, while still imperfect like us, practiced forbearance and loving-kindness to such a high extent, why cannot we follow his example?
When we remember and think of similar noble characters of great souls, we should be able to bear any harm, unmoved by anger.
Or if we consider the nature of the round of rebirths in this beginningless and infinite universe, we will be able to curb our upspringing anger.
For, it is said by the Buddha: “It is not easy to find a being who has not been your mother, your father, your brother, sister, son or daughter.” Hence with regard to the person whom we have now taken for our enemy, we should think: “This one now, in the past has been my mother who bore me in her womb for nine months, gave birth to me, unweariedly cleansed me of impurities, hid me in her bosom, carried me on her hip and nourished me.
This one was my father in another life and spent time and energy, engaged in toilsome business, with a view to maintaining me, even sacrificing life for my sake,” and so on.
When we ponder over these facts, it should be expected that our arisen anger against our enemy will subside.
And further, we should reflect on the advantages of the development of mind through the practice of extending loving-kindness.
For, the Buddha has expounded to us eleven advantages to be looked for from its development.
What are the eleven?
The person who fully develops loving-kindness sleeps happily.
He wakes happily.
He experiences no evil dreams.
He is beloved of men.
He is beloved even of non-human beings.
He is protected by the gods.
He can be harmed neither by fire, poison or a weapon.
His mind is quickly composed.
His complexion is serene.
At the moment of his death he passes away unbewildered.
If he can go no further along the path of realization, he will at least be reborn in the heavenly abode of the Brahma Devas.
So, by every similar and possible way should we endeavor to quench our anger and at last be able to extend our loving-kindness towards any and every being in the world.
When we are able to curb our anger and control our mind, we should extend from ourselves boundless love as far as we can imagine throughout every direction pervading and touching all living beings with loving-kindness.
We should practice this meditation every day at regular times without any break.
As a result of this practice, we will be able, one day, to attain to the jhanas or meditative absorptions, comprising four grades which entail the control of sensuality, ill-will and many other passions, bringing at the same time purity, serenity and peace of mind.
Once while the Blessed One stayed near Rajagaha in the Veluvana Monastery at the Squirrels' Feeding Place, there lived at Rajagha a Brahman of the Bharadvaja clan who was later called “the Reviler.” When he learned that one of his clan had gone forth from home life and had become a monk under the recluse Gotama, he was angry and displeased.
And in that mood he went to see the Blessed One, and having arrived he reviled and abused him in rude and harsh speech.
Thus being spoken to, the Blessed One said: “How is it, Brahman: do you sometimes receive visits from friends, relatives or other guests?
“Yes, Master Gotama, I sometimes have visitors.
“When they come, do you offer to them various kinds of foods and a place for resting?
“Yes, I sometimes do so.
“But if, Brahman, your visitors do not accept what you offer, to whom does it then belong?
“Well, Master Gotama, if they do not accept it, these things remain with us.
“It is just so in this case, Brahman: you revile us who do not revile in return, you scold us who do not scold in return, you abuse us who do not abuse in return.
So we do not accept it from you and hence it remains with you, it belongs to you, Brahman…
— Abridged and freely rendered from Samyutta Nikaya, Brahmana Samyutta, No..
Verses translated by A.
F.
Rhys Davids, in “Kindred Sayings,” vol.
I.
Retold from an ancient Buddhist Story, by Nyanaponika Thera
Once there lived a demon who had a peculiar diet: he fed on the anger of others.
And as his feeding ground was the human world, there was no lack of food for him.
He found it quite easy to provoke a family quarrel, or national and racial hatred.
Even to stir up a war was not very difficult for him.
And whenever he succeeded in causing a war, he could properly gorge himself without much further effort; because once a war starts, hate multiplies by its own momentum and affects even normally friendly people.
So the demon's food supply became so rich that he sometimes had to restrain himself from over-eating, being content with nibbling just a small piece of resentment found close-by.
But as it often happens with successful people, he became rather overbearing and one day when feeling bored he thought: “Shouldn't I try it with the gods?” On reflection he chose the Heaven of the Thirty-three Deities, ruled by Sakka, Lord of Gods.
He knew that only a few of these gods had entirely eliminated the fetters of ill-will and aversion, though they were far above petty and selfish quarrels.
So by magic power he transferred himself to that heavenly realm and was lucky enough to come at a time when Sakka the Divine King was absent.
There was none in the large audience hall and without much ado the demon seated himself on Sakka's empty throne, waiting quietly for things to happen, which he hoped would bring him a good feed.
Soon some of the gods came to the hall and first they could hardly believe their own divine eyes when they saw that ugly demon sitting on the throne, squat and grinning.
Having recovered from their shock, they started to shout and lament: “Oh you ugly demon, how can you dare to sit on the throne of our Lord?
What utter cheekiness!
What a crime!
you should be thrown headlong into the hell and straight into a boiling cauldron!
You should be quartered alive!
Begone!
Begone!
But while the gods were growing more and more angry, the demon was quite pleased because from moment to moment he grew in size, in strength and in power.
The anger he absorbed into his system started to ooze from his body as a smoky red-glowing mist.
This evil aura kept the gods at a distance and their radiance was dimmed.
Suddenly a bright glow appeared at the other end of the hall and it grew into a dazzling light from which Sakka emerged, the King of Gods.
He who had firmly entered the undeflectible Stream that leads Nibbana-wards, was unshaken by what he saw.
The smoke-screen created by the gods' anger parted when he slowly and politely approached the usurper of his throne.
“Welcome, friend!
Please remain seated.
I can take another chair.
May I offer you the drink of hospitality?
Our Amrita is not bad this year.
Or do you prefer a stronger brew, the vedic Soma?
While Sakka spoke these friendly words, the demon rapidly shrank to a diminutive size and finally disappeared, trailing behind a whiff of malodorous smoke which likewise soon dissolved.
— Based on Samyutta Nikaya, Sakka Samyutta, No.

The gist of this story dates back to the discourses of the Buddha.
But even now, over years later, our world looks as if large hordes of Anger-eating Demons were haunting it and were kept well nourished by millions slaving for them all over the earth.
Fires of hate and wide-traveling waves of violence threaten to engulf mankind.
Also the grass roots of society are poisoned by conflict and discord, manifesting in angry thoughts and words and in violent deeds.
Is it not time to end this self-destructive slavery of man to his impulses of hate and aggression which only serve the demoniac forces?
Our story tells how these demons of hate can be exorcised by the power of gentleness and love.
If this power of love can be tested and proven, at grass-root level, in the widely spread net of personal relationships, society at large, the world at large, will not remain unaffected by it.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
For inspiration to write this little booklet I wish to thank my good friend and teacher, Anagarika Tibbotuwawa.
I also wish to thank my husband for his kindly suggestions and excellent editing.
May all beings be well and happy!
For the beginning meditator I believe it would be helpful to establish an order in the various steps taken in meditation.
First, then, it would be wise to establish a place of quiet to which one may retire daily and not be interrupted in his endeavors.
Then wash carefully face, hands and feet.
Better yet, if time permits, take a cleansing shower and put on loose, comfortable clothes.
It is wise to meditate at the same time daily to establish a habit.
I do it at a.m.
and p.m.
when the birds begin to retire in the evening.
Then when you begin to meditate consider your posture.
With spine erect and a spirit of awareness be mindful of sitting without strain but with complete alertness.
Now you are ready to begin.
But, first, some introductory thoughts.
As Sujata states in his little book Beginning to See, “Meditation is the best thing you can do for yourself.” However, it is far from the simple thing it may seem to beginners.
It takes a strong urge to peer deeply within oneself and beyond it.
It takes discipline and willingness to go farther than merely trying to escape or sidestep personal problems one may have.
Why meditate?
There are many reasons.
But those that stand out most strongly are learning to think clearly, and to dispel ignorance, illusion, greed, hatred and craving.
This is the road to Nirvana or Nibbana through which one must lose all clinging to “self.” The feeling of having a self is highly resistant to extinguishing.
It is persistent and devious.
Often one may feel it has vanished only to have it crop up again.
Only by diligence and persistence — and the road for many may be long — can victory over it be achieved.
You are seated now, cross-legged on the floor, in a quiet chamber.
In lotus position, if you can, or in half-lotus, or even on a chair if disability precludes otherwise.
Keep your head erect and balanced lightly on your shoulders.
Still, do not strain; be comfortable, relaxed and attentive.
The first stages of meditation should be simply observation of breath.
Concentrate on the nostrils where the breath flows in… out… in… out.
Be aware of the touch of air as it strikes the passage through the nostrils.
In fact be aware of everything and nothing.
This sounds contradictory.
Yet it is really not.
For this is no time to daydream, to entertain vagrant and migratory thoughts.
You are aware of your physical posture.
Then you forget that also.
You are aware that the past is dead, that it is gone.
Yet specific consciousness of your whole preceding life is absent.
The future does not yet exist.
All you have is “right now”… the in… out… in… out rhythm of the breath of life.
The idea is to “empty the mind,” to get rid of all “garbage,” all fleeting and intruding thoughts.
Simply to breathe — in out — in out, never forcing the breath.
You are not even the breather, but the breathing breathing you, the you, which as time goes on, will grow more and more vague as it begins to dissipate, disappear.
Just allow the mind to feel the “touch” of breath as it flows in and flows out.
In your first sessions think of nothing more.
You will find the breath thinning out as it becomes more subtle and finer until in time you begin to feel you are not breathing at all.
This is the calming of the breath flow.
It becomes very pleasant and satisfying.
I keep a candle burning in the meditation chamber.
It serves two purposes, maybe three.
At first, if the mind wanders, it serves as a point of focus.
The eyes, at first observing the candle, soon close, lightly, easily, by themselves.
But even through closed lids one feels the presence of the light.
One can see it in one's mind's eye.
It restores the mind's wandering back to the present.
The second purpose is symbolic: to me it signifies the Light of the Dhamma, the doctrine on which the meditation is based.
And finally, it makes for a pleasant, lovely atmosphere.
Incense, flowers, Buddha sculpture are nice but really not necessary.
One can, in truth, meditate anywhere, any quiet place where there can be no interruption.
Wherever you meditate, if it is at home and you have a telephone, it is wise to remove the receiver to avoid incoming calls.
Bear in mind that the place of meditation is not of key importance, but it is wise to return to the same place at the same time daily so that the habit of meditating becomes established.
The Buddha meditated under a Bodhi tree where he achieved enlightenment.
An advanced meditator can choose almost any place and it will serve his purpose — a crowded market place, a burial ground, a cave, a park or a refuse dump.
In his inward turning he becomes totally oblivious of his surroundings; or, contrariwise, makes the very surroundings, as he advances deeper and deeper into meditating, the subject of his thoughts.
The important thing to remember is that these thoughts must be schooled and channeled.
They must be kept “on center.
But you, now, are still in your beginning stages.
Untoward thoughts will persist in entering your mind.
This is only natural.
You will be amazed at how many and how trivial these intrusions can be.
You must learn, however, to treat these intruders with courtesy.
Do not shove them away in anger.
Be gentle, kindly.
Label each one — past — present — future?
Worthy?
Unworthy?
Animosity?
Vanity?
Desire?
Egotism?
Your very act of branding them will assist in their cessation.
As they begin to disappear, your mind will gently return to your nostrils, your breathing.
It will grow quieter and quieter.
Other hindrances will obtrude themselves.
Noises will penetrate your consciousness — children playing and shouting, buses or airplanes passing.
Label them as you do other passing thoughts.
Keep centering on the breathing, the slowing inflow, outflow.
In time the noises, too, will vanish.
Whenever you find yourself “out there,” bring yourself gently back to “here” and to “right now.” When you have been able to accomplish this “no thought” for at least a half hour, your breathing will have slowed to a point of almost indistinguishable rhythm, to “it” breathing “you” and not the other way around.
I find it helps in all of this to keep a semi-smile on my face such as that of the Buddha.
It aids in brightening the mind, makes it happier.
At this point in your beginning meditation, if you have been at it a half hour or longer, you may terminate it if you wish or continue as before.
Or you can go on to extend metta or loving-kindness.
This meditation subject is good because it eliminates hatred, envy, anger and self-pity.
It accomplishes love for all, destruction of self, sympathetic joy, and a good feeling for every being or non-being that lives or has left this life.
Your extension of loving-kindness should reach out to encompass the earth, the universe.
You will find it difficult in time, to snuff out the life of even the smallest insect.
In extending loving-kindness it is of great importance that you first love yourself.
In the right way, of course.
You accomplish this by ridding your thoughts of all “impurities.” Think to yourself “I will rid my mind of every defilement: anger, hatred, ignorance, fear, greed, craving.
I will make my mind clear, fresh and pure.
Like a transparent window is my mind.
Then with my stain-free mind, I pour out thoughts of loving-kindness, of love and of kindness.
Try to get a mental image of each one you are extending this loving-kindness to.
Get into that person.
Feel his or her personality enter your own being and direct your feeling straight into the mind and heart of that individual.
You will find in time, that there is a sort of mental telepathy emerging.
You will feel the warmth of response.
Do not dwell on this.
Go on to the next person and the next and next.
Bring forth all the warmth and kindness of your spirit and instill this into the being or non-being it is directed toward.
If you do this once or twice daily, your horizon will widen.
You will find yourself directing these vibrations to all beings and non-beings who have entered your consciousness, without exceptions.
This will include brand-new acquaintances you hardly know.
People you do not even know but see pass by regularly or irregularly down the street.
All who live.
All who have died.
Known and unknown.
All animals, insects, trees.
Everything organic and inorganic.
And in this outflowing there will ride your self, vanishing into the all-inclusive.
When you have completed this meditation sitting, later try a walking meditation, and, in this, think of the Four Noble Truths of the Buddha; that all beings are born to suffer, etc.
Then go on to find the “way out”; the way out and the “end” of suffering.
Find this secure path and incorporate it into your daily life, and, this accomplished, find Nibbana right here on earth!
When I first came to Sri Lanka from America, I had just about given up all hope of living.
The doctors in America had provided me with maybe twenty-five different drugs for a very bad heart condition and other ailments.
We fled America, my husband and I, to live out our lives among peaceful surroundings — in the heart of Buddha-land.
Shortly after arrival, what with the long trip and thoughts of death, I truly was dying.
I had a myocardial infarction and was taken to the hospital.
I found the hospital conditions so deplorable, I felt it would be better to die in bed at home.
Consequently, I left the hospital.
My husband had found a lovely home for us and there I waited to die.
After much pain and emotional upheaval my husband found an anagarika, a Buddhist lay brother, who came to our home and performed a miracle, or to state it better, pointed out to me the “path” that I shall follow for the rest of my days here on earth.
This monk-like follower of the Buddha, the Anagarika Tibbotuwawa, instructed me in meditation.
We went through four stages and in time I threw out all drugs, and the life “here and now” became clear and meaningful.
Many strange things began to occur in the course of meditation.
First I began to feel that I was on another plane of consciousness.
I no longer had a self, sick or otherwise.
I was at one with all, all of us in a new world, with all non-beings too.
I found that the “ego” that nearly wrecked my life was now gone.
I felt reborn, and extended my meditation to vibrations of loving-kindness.
Thought messages I call them.
Then one morning a friend called from America.
On the phone he said that he had received my message.
He was elated beyond belief, thanked me and promised to come here in the near future.
The strangest of all was a telegram from my sister.
She asked if we could accommodate her at our home in three weeks.
I nearly had a heart attack!
My sister is seventy-eight years old.
I had heard no word from her for fifteen years.
Yet I had been sending her “thought messages” of loving-kindness, and her image was growing clearer and clearer — even before arrival.
She was “with me” even before arrival.
At age seventy-eight she had traveled half-way around the world to see me.
When she arrived she said she had had a compelling urge to see me.
We were both delighted and, to my amazement, she meditated each evening with me and said she had never known such “peace and love” as she found in our home.
She could not remain with us, as I had hoped, but had responsibilities at home that she felt better able to cope with now.
She left, adding, “I have promises to keep — and many miles to go before I sleep.
These few experiences have been so uplifting that now, even though I never proselytize, many young people come to me for instruction in meditation.
Recently a young man from Switzerland came to our home.
He felt he was dying of rabies.
I was so sure he did not have this disease that I suggested that he meditate with me and Anagarika that day, and he seemed pleased with the experience.
Well, this young man came not only each evening, but also every morning at: a.m.
bringing fresh flowers for the Buddha.
He left, after three weeks of intensive meditation and instruction and reading of the Dhamma, well and happy and full of ideas to help suffering humanity.
There are, of course, many ideas I have omitted which are advanced procedures in insight meditation, the three stages which usually follow the concentration on breathing.
These are body, feelings, perceptions and consciousness, ultimately expressing themselves in “the mind experiencing pure mind.” I feel, however, that the reader can find these steps in many publications that have been released on this subject.
If this booklet helps the beginner with just a little insight into the “way” and the “why” of meditation, this will be my happiness.
This is a question which is often asked.
It really depends upon how one defines religion.
If it is thought of as a belief in a supreme being to whom one prays for redemption, security, favors or relief from suffering, then, no, Buddhism is not a religion.
The Buddha himself never claimed divinity — only clear-sightedness and purity of apprehension of truth through deepest intuition, leading to equanimity and enlightenment.
He was a great and rare individual but not a god.
If some simple and mistaken few have elevated him to godship and worship him with requests for favors and special dispensations, this does not alter the situation one bit.
It seems that in these troubled times, as, indeed, since time immemorial, man has felt the need to have a faith in a supreme being, one who could redeem him from “sin” and relieve his suffering.
This is a great fallacy.
If indeed there were such a being, why should he be asked to give redemption?
Isn't it more important for man to redeem himself?
This is what the Buddha believed.
Man, he said, is born to suffering.
Life is suffering.
That is the first of the Four Noble Truths he enunciates — that there is suffering.
In the Second Truth he points out that all suffering has its origins which we must learn to understand, because this is the only way we can arrive at the Third Truth, which is that cessation of this suffering can be achieved.
His Fourth Truth clarifies the way out from suffering via the Eightfold Path which we will discuss later.
Therefore we ask, if Buddhism is not a religion, what then is it?
Our reply is: Buddhism is a way of life, a philosophy, a psychology, a way of thinking, through which we may ourselves take on the responsibility of determining how our life-bearing kamma will work out for us.
Meditation is one of the procedures of mental discipline and purification through which we may begin to learn such responsibility.
Many young people have come to me saying, “How can I embrace Buddhism without destroying my own beliefs and culture?” I tell the Christians among them to think about the precepts of Christ.
Are they so totally opposed to, and different from, those of the Buddha?
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not steal or commit adultery.
The ethical injunctions among the Ten Commandments — are they not almost exactly the same as the precepts of the moral life laid down by the Buddha?
I tell them that the Dhamma, the sacred texts of Buddhism, are much more voluminous and explicit than those of the Old and New Testaments and commentaries.
The Buddhist texts are, in fact, elevenfold as extensive and contain an enormous range of wise teachings, none of them derogatory to the faiths of other creeds.
He did not deny the existence of deities, but he did reserve scepticism as to the infinity of their duration, their omnipotency, their powers to help mankind in every kind of urgency.
Have these gods and messiahs, which we of Western faiths have been prone to believe in, been sublimely successful in the mitigation of human suffering, hunger, sorrow and affliction?
The answer is open to doubt.
So to these young Christians I can say, “Believe in Christ if you wish, but remember, Jesus never claimed divinity either.” Yes, believe in a unitary God, too, if you wish, but cease your imploring, pleading for personal dispensations, health, wealth, relief from suffering.
Study the Eightfold Path.
Seek the insights and enlightenment that come through meditative learnings.
And find out how to achieve for yourself what prayer and solicitation of forces beyond you are unable to accomplish.
There are many young people who believe that God answers their prayers.
Does he?
Is prayer-answering the purpose of a supreme being?
A young man recently came to us asking for food and shelter.
He was young, able-bodied, and, yes, intelligent.
We received him, fed him and gave him a room for several days.
When it became apparent that this fellow had no intention of ever leaving, we felt he should go off on his own.
He was highly indignant!
When he left we asked him if he intended to work and earn enough to take care of his own needs.
He answered, “No, God will provide.
If I follow his light, that is enough.
He will take care of me!
If there is a God, why should he take care of able-bodied young men simply because they have unreserved and total faith in him, when there are so many really unfortunate, desolate people who really need help?
Did God provide for the millions of Jews in concentration camps who were slowly gassed to death en-masse, their agonies of asphyxiation often lasting a full half-hour, before they were incinerated in German ovens?
Is he there offering respite each day to the millions who are dying of cancer and other agonizing diseases all over the universe?
Does he provide for all the masses of people, victims of floods, disasters and earthquakes, who are homeless and starving daily throughout the world?
Yes, believe in a God, if you will, I tell them, but don't ask, ask and ask.
Don't beg.
Provide, as best you are able, for yourself first.
Then fill your heart and mind with love, with metta, and help, to the fullest possible extent, in the relief of suffering among others.
This is the answer I give them.
But cease your petitioning, your constant solicitation for private preference.
A Jewish girl from Israel came to meditate.
She felt happy and calm in meditation, but she was worried.
She said, “I do not want to forget my heritage.
I was born in Jerusalem and am steeped in Jewish tradition.” I answered her: “No problem.
When you finish meditating, say the 'Shmah'!” This is the ancient prayer of the Jews to be said each morning of their lives and on their deathbeds.
It consists of the words, “Hear, O Israel, the Lord our God, the Lord is one.” This, to those of the Jewish faith, may be a solacing thought, one that may yield them comfort, I told her.
There is nothing in Buddhism, as a matter of fact, denying the right to believe in God if you so wish.
Yet it must be pointed out that Buddhism places deityship on quite a different plane than monotheistic and polytheistic religions do.
Still, with all your beliefs intact, you can benefit from much that Buddhism teaches, for instance from Buddhist meditation.
We are all inter-related in common suffering.
Even the word religion, derived from Latin, means joined or linked.
Just as the word yoga also means the same, united.
Whether this is expressed through a belief in a deity or not is of less importance than the fact that we recognize and accept the wonder of our common interrelationship.
Certainly, I told her, there is nothing in the practice of Judaism that denies man's common relationship.
The young lady was satisfied.
As far as I know she still meditates daily and recites the “Shmah.
Sometimes it is said that the Buddhists worship idols.
Why all the incense, oil lamps, flowers set before Buddha-images?
You must understand, I tell these young people, that the Buddhists are merely expressing their reverence for a great man of overwhelming vision and insight, one of the wisest teachers that ever lived, a man who laid out a whole way of life an a means of alleviating sorrow, strife and suffering.
When they bow to him with hands clasped before them they do so in reverence and worship.
But the meaning they attach to “worship” is not that of Western religionists.
They ask nothing for their separate selves, no intercession of gods, no personal favors.
Why is that?
Because the Buddhist, neither in his life practice nor his philosophy, believes himself to be a separate being, a singular self, apart from others.
Therefore, lacking separate personhood, there is no one for whom preference is sought.
For the Buddhist “worship,” then mean praise, reverence, a desire to imitate and be like the Buddha, to follow his ways and show appreciation for his teachings.
He offers them no dispensations or favors, only a body of wisdom contained in the Dhamma which, if they but apply it to themselves, amounts to self-dispensation.
In essence this means dispensing with all vanity, clinging, attachments, greed and ignorance, which may yet hamper them from being like the Buddha and aspiring to the perfection of being, which he in his life attained when reaching Nibbana here and now!
The great American statesman Thomas Paine said, “My mind is my church.” In this statement he reiterates the belief of the Buddha.
Buddhists do not believe it is necessary to have a middleman intercede between them and the perfection of the Master they chose to emulate and be like.
In Buddhism there is no need for priests, ministers and preachers to pray for them in churches or temples.
The Buddhist monk teaches, not preaches.
He teaches man to find his way.
He teaches purity of mind, and compassion, and love for all beings.
He does not perform marriage service, but devotes his life only to teaching and scholarship and study, and to continuing self-purification through meditation, so that he can be an example to others.
Who may become a Buddha?
And how does one become one?
These are questions frequently asked me.
The answers are that one has to enroll or join nothing, sign no document, be initiated by no baptism, nor disavow any other belief.
All he has to do is to begin to live as Buddhists live, to find inspiration in the Buddha, to like and reverence his teachings, to begin to try to follow his Eightfold Path and, through meditation, to seek to gain merit and purity.
To aspire, in fact, to become a Buddha himself!
For Buddhahood is not a limited society.
It is open to all.
Many have attained it.
Even the Buddha himself, in previous lives chose to deny himself release through Nibbana and chose rebirth so that he might stay on and teach others.
Now let us examine the Buddha's remedy for the ending of suffering.
A friend of mine once said, with respect to this, “It is all very simple: practice right thought, right speech and right action!
Very good and very important.
However, not so fast, my friend!
All of the Eightfold Path is necessary, not just the small part of it you mention.
It is all beautifully interrelated.
There must be right understanding with right speech.
There must be right action.
There must be right effort.
And with the right effort must follow right livelihood.
And for all of these steps to work, think of them as steps.
You don't get very far just moving up one step and remaining there.
You have to combine them, join them, link them, and finally, climax them with still one more step to reach the top.
And that step is right mindfulness.
How beautifully all these hang together like pearls on a necklace.
But now think for a moment about what is meant by “right”: that is to say, the rightness of speech, thought, action.
Few pause to think what “right” means within this context.
Does it mean right as opposed to wrong?
Perhaps it does.
And then, again, perhaps it doesn't.
How many of us are able to discriminate at every juncture of our lives what is right and what is wrong?
Does right, then, mean appropriate?
Appropriate action, appropriate speech, etc.?
Appropriate means suitable, suitable for the occasion.
Is that always so easy to determine?
What, then, does the Buddha's use of the word right come down to?
Does it not come down to the fact that he is pointing out that there is choice, and that we have choice, that we can go this way or go that way, and that it is up to us and not him, and no god or supreme being, to determine our way?
Is he not saying that this choice or volition amounts to our own kamma?
And that while a lot of it is predetermined through our past lives or genetically, however you want to think of it, we can still alter, correct, change, refine re-aim this kamma, change its course?
We and nobody else!
And does not all of this point back to such qualities of action, speech, and thought, as are characterized as greedy, selfish, hateful, hostile, hurtful?
As opposed to such qualities as generousness, selflessness, lovingness, kindliness, helpfulness?
Do you not see that the Buddha is telling us to look behind words and not to accept them for their face value but for their internal, shall we say nuclear, meanings?
So we return again to the question as to whether Buddhism is a religion.
In the sense that it offers us a moral code helping to conjoin us in the living together of a better life, yes, it is a religion.
For that is the inner or nuclear meaning of religion — relinking, rejoining.
But if Buddhism is taken to imply belief in a supreme being who rules the universe and can be bribed to alter his decisions by our prayers and solicitations for personal preference, it is not a religion.
And this Buddhism does not do.
Well, then, the Christian may argue, man without God, without conscience, without a ruler of the universe, will revert to bestiality.
Is this not like saying a being can't exist without a taskmaster?
Are we then children?
So weak that we can't exist without being “told” what we can and cannot do?
How can we justify this?
The answers should be obvious.
Man can rely on himself.
Man can train his mind to right thinking, not because thereby he will be saved by a righteous God, but because right thinking will lead him on to the path of final liberation from suffering, which consists of right moral conduct, right meditation and right wisdom.
Now look at Buddhism.
Does it not look up to you rather than down to you, treat you as an adult rather than a child, not demand and command, but patiently teach and instruct what practically amounts to the same thing?
The Buddha states that we are heirs to our kamma, that we make it, form it, and that what we do in this existence does affect our lives in the next one.
However, in Buddhism, there is no need of beating our breasts and heeding authoritarian demands that we repent.
We can rise up out of our sloth and torpor, out of evil and ugliness, by “following the path.” If it were true that without a vengeful God man would be less than human, how do we justify the existence for thousands of years of Buddhists living in peace and love with each other?
Christ and Buddha were alike in many ways.
It is not my intention to disparage anyone's belief in Christ.
Christ said, “Love thy neighbor as thyself.” Buddha said, “Show compassion and loving-kindness to all beings.” God said to the Jews, “Do not unto others that which you would not do unto yourself.” This is what Christ later said in reverse, positively, but with the same meaning.
It was Moses who interpreted the words of God to his people, but for that reason they did not clothe him in divinity, nor did he do so himself.
Where the Buddhists and Christians part company is the Christ's followers accorded him divinity, whereas Buddha's disciples accord him reverence as a great being.
Buddha had taught, that it is man's clinging to the idea of separate selfness which is the cause of his suffering.
Implicit in separate selfhood is egotism and craving.
This is illusion, the basic illusion.
The man who “prays to God” expresses craving.
He is a clinger.
He wishes something for self, is egotistic.
Even the idea of a God expresses the thought of an extension of his egotism into a future life — in heaven or wherever.
The prayer craves for a beautiful painfree future or continuation of the present.
In return he promises his God to be of good behavior.
Buddha teaches that beauty is fleeting, life is impermanent and transitory, that pain and sorrow are an outcome of the craving egotistic self.
That craving is our suffering.
Craving implies cravenness.
To be craven is to fear.
Fearfulness is suffering.
Life is fearful.
There is suffering in the world because the fearful, fearing self continues in its illusion of lonely separateness.
The separate self clings to its fears, its self-seeking, its pleading, hoping, craving.
“Give me,” it implores its God, “help me.” What is the Buddha's answer to this?
Does he not say, “Cleanse yourself of the self-idea, of its greed, hatred, ignorance”?
And what is this ignorance?
Is it not our ignoring, our refusal to see the basic illusion of selfhood?
We finally return to meditation again, to why we meditate.
Meditation is a way, the Buddha's way of self-cleansing, self-elimination, of freeing the mind of its attachments to the impermananent and illusory.
Through meditation we learn to detach the self from its assumptions, to realize that ego is substance-less, to free our mind from its defilements and illusions; to approach, through wisdom and compassion, the ultimate cessation of suffering which comes with Nibbana, the utter abandonment of our selfhood.
In this no eternity is sought, no endless continuity.
And no annihilation.
For, since there is no one, what is there to annihilate?
Or to eternalize?
In a way of thinking, is not this a kind of sublime mysticism?
A creed or belief that yields unseeking equanimity, quietude and the end of suffering?
Since all being, in the end, is mystery; since trembling, transitory being is but an illusory drop of water in a depthless ocean, why not accept it as so?
Those who crave for and pray to gods often achieve thereby a kind of mental purification.
Even the prayers of sceptics often achieve the same result.
If prayer brings relief and quietude, remission of suffering, it cannot be bad.
But what if the relief is unlasting?
Apart from the notion that prayer implies a dependency on external or supernatural authority, which I have no reason to bring into question, it definitely is based on the idea of a self as opposed to an other, and of bringing the two together in a sort of bargaining process.
But what if we can accept the idea that there is no self to begin with and therefore no one to do the bargaining?
I am reminded, in conclusion, of a little story:
A Christian missionary found a Chinese priest chanting in a temple.
When the Chinese had finished, the missionary asked him: “To whom were you praying?
“To no one,” replied the Chinese priest.
“Well, what were you praying for?” the missionary insisted.
“Nothing,” said the Chinese,
The missionary turned away, baffled.
As the was leaving the temple the Chinese added, kindly: “And there was no one praying, you know!
I have learned that through meditation one comes to appreciate vistas of truth in no other way attainable; and that if one does not come to understand totally and unquestionably the fullest depths of meaning possible as to the causes of suffering, one does at least arrive by painful experience and mindfulness to comprehension of its imponderability and immensity.
I see it in a personal way, in my seventh decade, in severe and frequent anginas, in arthritic pains which make sittings so difficult that I must frequently change positions during meditation, or do standing meditation.
I see it in my deafened and daily worsening hearing, the dimming of my eyes and in the realization that in the course of minding my breath and giving consideration to the dissolution of every component of my body, anicca, impermanence, is the source out of which this suffering or dukkha flows.
Out of this impermanence, too, I sense the vastness of the illusion that we possess anything life abiding, continuous and distinguishable selfhood and that the epitome of suffering arises from this basic illusion — that there is a “one,” a “self” which is suffering or sufferable.
The facts of suffering, its truth, and the facts of impermanence as well, are widely recognized by most religions.
All accept the basic tragical quality of life.
Where Buddhism goes forward from the rest is in the maintenance and espousal of the theme of no-self.
Life, death, impermanence and suffering then become but a process in which, in an ultimate and fundamental sense, there is no personal participation.
From this notion comes release, emancipation and enlightenment.
As phenomena we may continue to go on until the ultimate collapse of our bodies and death overtakes us.
But since no self is any longer engaged in the process, it becomes depersonalized.
We are no longer subjects or even objects of calamity, despair, disease.
Disturbance, dejection, worry, dread, anguish, decay, enfeeblement, senility, no longer concern us.
Serenity and equanimity come with a new wisdom reflecting our detachment not alone from these negative emotions but also from the positive ones such as longing, craving, hoping, desiring, wishing, clinging.
Because, whether we realize and attain the positive results or goals sought through these emotions, or do not, there is continued suffering.
We suffer if we fail to attain them and there is disappointment.
If we do attain them, they are impermanent, suffer their own kind of decay, and out of this loss we suffer as well.
The goal, in the end, becomes the even-minded depersonalized middle course wherein irritation, aversion, uncertainty vanish.
Hate and animosity become impossible.
One is neither submissive nor rebellious.
We transcend the need for personal love or hate.
Quietude comes to us.
Release.
These are the goals of insight or vipassana meditation, whose aim is release from suffering.
How close we come to realizing them will depend on the quality of those we seek out to teach us and on our own assiduity in the mindfulness with which we seek, through our meditation, to arrive at the other shore.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The idea of renunciation has never been a particularly attractive one for most people, even when its importance as an ideal has been admitted.
For much of the Western world today, however, renunciation seems not so much unpalatable as unfamiliar, and indeed all but incomprehensible.
This was not always so, of course.
The people of the Middle Ages were well acquainted with the traditional Christian conception of this world as something which presents many snares for the soul, and is of little importance when compared with the eternal life to come.
That this conception has ceased to be as influential as it once was, is the result of a number of complex historical processes, but as far as present-day attitudes are concerned, the factor of the greatest and most immediate importance would probably be the rapid development of science and technology in the nineteenth and twentieth century.
Science has, I think, influenced people's attitudes towards the world in three ways.
Firstly, it appears to have confirmed by its achievements the ancient Greek philosophers' faith in the ability of human reason to fathom all the mysteries of the universe.
Secondly, these impressive achievements have led people to feel the physical world, which has up till now been the province of scientific investigation, is the only world worth investigating, and even the only “real” world.
And thirdly, by providing, through the technology which it has made possible, an abundance of good things for our enjoyment, science has encouraged a preoccupation with the objects and pleasures of the senses, and a corresponding indifference to those things which are presumed to lie outside the range of the senses.
If, then, this world we perceive is the only reality, and the senses and the reason are the only valid means of knowledge, it follows that renunciation of the world is pointless, and that aspiration to a reality which transcends the reason and the senses is bound to be futile.
There have always been many people who would agree with this, and materialist philosophers were not lacking even in the Buddha's day.
But I think it would be true to say that ideas of this nature have never been so widely accepted as they are in Western and Western-influenced countries today.
Even religious thought has been affected, and a number of progressive Christian theologians are trying to adapt their doctrines to the spirit of the age by glossing over the element of renunciation in Jesus' teaching and Christian tradition, and stressing, after the Jewish fashion, involvement in the world rather than detachment from it.
A similar tendency can be observed elsewhere: in many of the “ new religions” of modern Japan, for example, or in the writings of Indian thinkers like Radhakrishnan and Sri Aurobindo.
In light of all this, Buddhism must be considered somewhat unfashionable.
Some critics have accused it of being pessimistic, nihilistic and life-denying.
Of course, Buddhism is not pessimistic.
In fact, it is the most optimistic of religions, for it teaches that man can perfect himself here and now, and free himself by his own efforts from all suffering and unhappiness.
Nor is it nihilistic.
As the Buddha has often pointed out, he taught only the annihilation of suffering and ignorance.
And if Buddhism is life-denying, it is only because it is death-defying, for life and death are inseparable.
Nevertheless, these critics have sensed an important truth about the Dharma; that it is essentially a teaching of renunciation.
In one sense, Buddhism is more “this-worldly” than any other religion, since it takes as its starting point, not some remote and transcendental Being or Act, but the world as it is experienced by ordinary living beings.
In another sense, however, it is more “other-worldly” than most, for according to the Buddha, the world as we know it has three fundamental characteristics: it contains nothing that is permanent; it is, for that reason, essentially unsatisfactory to those who see it as it really is, and are not led astray by superficial appearances; and finally, it contains nothing worth consideration as “me” or “mine,” nothing that is in any way unchanging or substantial.
These three characteristics are the basis of the Buddha's Teaching, and the second of them, known as “ill” or “suffering,” is the theme of the Four Truths which the Buddha expounded in his first sermon.
There is nothing ambiguous about this.
The Buddha was well aware that much pleasure and happiness is to be found in the world as it is ordinarily experienced, but he insisted that these pleasures were transient and therefore relative and limited, and that true happiness is only to be found by renouncing what is worldly, transient, relative and limited, and seeking instead what is transcendental, unchanging, absolute and unlimited.
This absolute state is what is called Nirvana.
It can be defined, if at all, only in negative terms, for what is completely transcendental is necessarily indescribable.
It is certainly not a God creating and sustaining the world, nor is it a Godhead which is the source or substance of the world.
In fact, although it can be attained by those still living in the world, it really has no connection with the world whatever, and for that reason its nature cannot be conveyed by means of such an earthbound thing as language, although the poetic use of language may certainly be able to suggest something of its quality, as in the following famous passage: “There is, monks, a realm where there is neither earth, nor water, nor fire, nor wind… neither this world nor the next, neither sun nor moon.
There, monks, I say there is neither coming, nor going, nor remaining; neither deceasing nor being born.
Without foundation is it, without continuity, without support: this is the end of suffering”.
Buddhism, then, is a teaching of renunciation.
It remains to see what is renounced and why.
The Buddha said: “What I teach is just ill and its cessation.” What is renounced, then, is ill, suffering, unsatisfactoriness.
But what is unsatisfactoriness?
Here is the Buddha's answer: “Birth is ill; old age and decay are ill; death is ill; sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair are ill; not to get what one wants is ill.
In short, the five groups that are the object of clinging are ill.” These “five groups,” taken together, constitute the totality of what we call a “being,” and what that being feels to be its “self.” They may be translated as follows: form or matter, feeling, perception or ideation, motivation or mental activities, and consciousness.
It is oneself, then, that is the source of suffering, and it is self that must be renounced if one would be free from suffering.
This is a truth which is recognized by most religions, but only in Buddhism is it fully understood.
The feeling of “self,” the deep-rooted sense of “I-ness,” involves the desire for the continued existence of self.
It generates, in other words, greed and attachment, both for the self and also for those things which enhance the existence of the self and make it feel secure, such things as sense-pleasures, possessions, kinship with others, and so on.
It also generates hatred for or aversion from what is anti-self, that is, from those things which threaten the continued existence or the happiness of the self by attacking it or by frustrating it in any way.
Thus the self can never be really happy, for it is continually agitated by desires and fears which bind it tightly to the world, and cause the “ill” for which the Buddha has prescribed the cure.
It will be seen from this brief analysis that the self and the world are interdependent, our emotional responses to the world strengthening our sense of self, and our sense of self causing the illusory appearance of a permanent and substantial world with objective qualities of desirability and undesirability.
Therefore, renunciation of the world and the renunciation of the self are but two aspects of the same thing, and what we see as the world may, on deeper analysis, be found present within ourselves.
So the Buddha said: “In this very body, six feet in length, with its sense-impressions, its thoughts and ideas… are the world, the origin of the world, the cessation of the world, and the Way that leads to the cessation of the world”.
In the practice of renunciation, three stages may be distinguished.
First of all, there is outward renunciation, as when a man or woman leaves the household life to become a monk or a nun.
Outward renunciation has no intrinsic value, and may theoretically be dispensed with, but there is no doubt that it makes true renunciation very much easier.
True renunciation is a matter of the heart and mind rather than the body.
It is renunciation of the world of desires and aversions within, rather than of the world of “objects” without.
Finally, there is the ultimate renunciation, which is the renunciation of one's “self” in its entirety, and the consequent destruction of all ill.
To illustrate the traditional Buddhist method of renunciation, I should like to examine a stereotype passage which occurs, with slight variations, at a number of places in the Pali canon.
It describes the ideal life of the monk, beginning with his first hearing of the Dharma and concluding with his attainment of Nirvana.
It starts as follows:
“Suppose that a Perfect One arises in the world, an Accomplished One, fully Awakened, complete in knowledge and conduct, knower of the worlds, sublime, incomparable, trainer of those to-be-tamed, teacher of gods and men, Awakened, blest.
Having thoroughly understood, by his own supernormal insight, this world with its gods, its Mara, its Brahma, its ascetics and brahmans, its gods and men, he declares his knowledge.
He preaches the Truth, good in its beginning, good in its development, good in its consummation.
He makes known the holy life in all its fullness and purity.
“A householder, or a householder's son, or one born into some good family, hears that Dharma.
Having heard it, he comes to feel faith in the Perfect One.
Possessed of this faith, he reflects thus: 'The household life is cramped.
It is a path choked with dust.
To leave it is to come out into the open air.
It is not easy for one who lives at home to lead the holy life in all its perfect fullness and purity, bright as mother-of-pearl.
Surely I should now shave off my hair and beard, go forth into the homeless life.' In course of time, he gives up his possessions, be they many or few, and his circle of kinsmen, be it small or large, shaves off his hair and beard, puts on the yellow robe, and, leaving his home, goes forth into the homeless life.
So far, this is outward renunciation.
Now the new monk must turn his attention to the world within.
The first step is to free his mind from the domination by unwholesome emotions and sense-desires, and to this end he begins to discipline himself by strict observance of morality.
The text continues: “So he lives the homeless life, observing self-restraint according to the rules of the Order, possessed of good conduct, seeing danger in the slightest offense, accepting and training himself in the precepts.” There follows a detailed account of over forty things which the monk must shun.
The first seven are of basic importance, for they are the most general in character.
They are also worth looking at because they stress the positive qualities of mind which the monk should be developing at this time, thereby helping to dispel the impression, which a series of prohibitions tends to give, that observance of the moralities is something dry and negative.
In fact, just as one only renounces Samsara in order to obtain Nirvana, so the sole purpose of renouncing bad or unwholesome qualities is to allow good or wholesome ones to take their place.
The wording of these first seven precepts makes this quite clear:
“Here, the monk, having abandoned the taking of life, continues to abstain therefrom.
Having once used stick and sword, now feeling shame, he is kind and compassionate to all living things… Having abandoned the taking of what is not given, he continues to abstain therefrom.
Taking only what is given, he waits for the gift.
Committing no theft, he lives as one who become pure… Having abandoned unchasity, he is chaste and keeps aloof, abstaining from coition, from the practice of the village-folk… Having abandoned false speech he continues to abstain therefrom, and is a speaker of truth.
Pledged to truth, he is reliable and trustworthy, never lying to the world… Having abandoned slander, he continues to abstain therefrom.
What he hears here, he does not repeat elsewhere in order to raise a quarrel against the people here.
What he hears elsewhere, he does not repeat here in order to raise a quarrel against the people there.
Thus he reconciles those who are divided, and encourages those who are friends.
Harmony is his pleasure, his delight and joy, and he speaks words that creates harmony… Having abandoned harsh speech, he continues to abstain therefrom.
Whatever words are gentle, pleasing to the ear, affectionate, touching the heart, polite, pleasant and agreeable to the people — such are the words he speaks… Having abandoned trivial chatter, he continues to abstain therefrom.
His words are timely, in accordance with the truth, meaningful, concerning the Dharma and the Discipline and the Order.
He speaks words that are worth treasuring.
They are uttered at the right time, are accompanied by reasons, are well-defined, and profitable.
These are the first seven moral observances.
The rest concern other things to be avoided, such as harming vegetation, and various activities connected with mealtimes, personal adornments, entertainments, games, trading, and so on.
The section on morality concludes as follows:
“Then the monk, being thus complete in morality, sees no reason for fear on any side, as far as self-restraint in his conduct is concerned.
Just as a ruler, duly anointed, whose enemies have been crushed, sees no reason for fear on any side, as far as enemies are concerned; so the monk, thus being complete in morality, sees no reason for fear on any side, as far as self-restraint in his conduct is concerned.
And, possessed of this noble group of moralities, he experiences unalloyed happiness within himself.
So far, the monk has progressed through two stages of renunciation.
First, he has publicly renounced the world and left the household life.
Then, by strict self-discipline, he has ensured that no moral lapse on his part will cause him to become entangled once again in the life that he has left behind, and his success in this self-discipline has given him a confidence and a happiness that he never had before.
Thus, he has made his initial, outward renunciation secure.
Now he is free to turn his attention to renunciation of the other, inner world, of the psychophysical life which is his “self.” He begins by endeavoring to become detached from the activities of his senses, and of his mind and body, by the practice of mindfulness.
He will now observe the things which impinge on his senses, watching to see that he does not react to them in an unwholesome or “unskillful” manner.
Thus morality becomes mind-control.
Then, when sense-impressions are no longer capable of agitating his mind unduly, he learns to become aware of his bodily actions as he performs them, contemplating his body disinterestedly, as though it were somebody else's:
“How is the monk guarded as to the doors of his senses?
Having perceived a form with his eye, he does not fasten on its general appearance, or on its secondary characteristics.
As long as he lived with his faculty of sight unrestrained, he fell prey to craving and unhappiness, to evil and unskilled states of mind.
So he undertakes restraint, watching over his faculty of sight and restraining it.
The monk, possessed of this noble restraint of the faculties, experiences unalloyed happiness within himself.
And how is the monk mindful and aware?
The monk, in going forth or returning, is clearly aware of his action.
So also when looking ahead or looking around, when bending his arm in or stretching it out, when wearing his robe or carrying his alms bowl, when eating, drinking, chewing or tasting, when defecating or urinating, when walking, standing, sitting, sleeping, waking, speaking or keeping silent; in all this he is clearly aware of what he is doing.
Thus is the monk mindful and aware.
The monk has now shaken off most of his worldly desires, and has gained a considerable degree of detachment from himself.
As a consequence, he is perfectly content with his lot and with his few necessary possessions: “He is contented with the robes that protect his body and the alms food that protects his belly… Just as a bird carries its wings with it wherever it flies, so the monk is contented with the robes that protect his body and the alms food that protect his belly, and he has only them with him wherever he goes.
Thus he is content.
Now, having surrendered attachment both to the world and to his own body, the monk can concentrate all his efforts on the true source of ill, which is his mind.
Sitting in a quiet spot, he strives to cleanse his mind of what are known as the “five hindrances.” The text describes the process as follows:
“Having given up covetousness for the world, he remains with his heart free from and cleansed of covetousness.
Having given up ill will and hatred, he remains with his heart free from ill will and hatred.
Friendly and compassionate to all living things, he remains free of them.
Conscious of light, mindful and fully aware, he cleanses his heart of sloth and torpor.
Having given up restlessness and worry, he remains free of them.
Inwardly calm, he cleanses his heart of restlessness and worry.
Having given up doubt, he remains having passed beyond doubt.
No longer uncertain of what is skillful, he cleanses his mind of doubt.
Having brought about a subsidence of the five hindrances, he is filled with an exhilarating sense of freedom.
The Buddha compares his feelings of relief and happiness to those of a man who has just discharged a debt, or recovered from a painful illness, or been freed from prison, or released from slavery, or who has safely crossed a dangerous wilderness.
This subsidence of the five hindrances, and the ensuing calmness and happiness of the body and mind, make it possible for the monk to attain what is called the first “absorption.” This is the first of a series of levels of consciousness which can be achieved by the successful practice of intense concentration of the mind — a process which is often called, rather vaguely, “meditation.” The attainment of these absorptions not only produces a blissfulness that is far beyond the range of worldly pleasures, it is also makes the mind an instrument of knowledge that can transcend the limitations of the senses.
After attaining the first absorption, the monk passes on to the second, third and fourth, shedding successively thought conception, the exhilarating and blissful sensations that arise in him, and finally all feelings of happiness and unhappiness, pleasure and displeasure.
He is now in a state of pure mindfulness and equanimity, and his mind — which has become “composed, purified, spotless, undefiled, pliant, workable, firm and imperturbable” — is capable of that direct and penetrating insight into the true nature of existence which brings deliverance.
Now he has left the world a long way behind, but he must turn his mind back to it, if he would complete the process of renunciation; for the final deliverance comes, not from looking away from the world or the self, but from seeing through them.
So he scrutinizes his self, his body and his mind, noting that “this is my body, possessed of form, composed of the four elements, springing from father and mother, built up by solid and liquid food; a thing impermanent by nature, fragile, perishable, and subject to total destruction.
And this is my consciousness, bound up with and dependent on it.
At this point he is said to be able to acquire certain supernormal powers if he wishes, including the ability to recall his own innumerable past lives, and the direct awareness of the death and rebirth of other beings in accordance with their past actions.
His final deliverance, his ultimate renunciation, comes now with the destruction of what are known as the asavas or asravas, a word which defies translation.
These “cankers” epitomize the forces which bring about continued existence or “becoming,” and their destruction involves complete and perfect understanding of the conditioned and unsatisfactory nature of becoming, as it is summed up in the Four Truths.
“It is as if,” the Buddha says, “there were a pool of water in the mountains, limpid, clear and still, and a man were to stand on the bank and see with his eyes the various shells, the gravel and pebbles, and the shoals of fish moving about or at rest.” So the monk, “with his mind composed, purified, cleansed, spotless, undefiled, pliant, workable, firm, and imperturbable, directs his mind to the destruction of the cankers.
He knows as it really is: 'This is ill, this is the origin of ill, this is the cessation of ill, and this is the Way that leads to cessation… These are the cankers, this is their origin, this is their cessation, and this is the Way that leads to their cessation.' Knowing and seeing thus his heart is freed from the cankers of sense-desires, the canker of becoming, and the canker of ignorance.
Free, he knows that he is free, and he understands: 'Exhausted is birth, the holy life is fulfilled, what was to be done has been done, there will be no more of the present state.' With this final and certain insight, renunciation of both self and world becomes complete, and the monk, now an arahant, has attained the deathless state, Nirvana.
Having considered the theory and practice of renunciation as it is set forth in the Pali texts, I should like to conclude by examining some possible misconceptions concerning the nature of renunciation in general and Buddhist renunciation in particular.
First of all, one may note that the text quoted in the previous section deals with the life of a monk.
This is true of the great majority of the discourses in the Pali canon, and some people have concluded that Buddhism teaches a path of total renunciation which can only be followed by monks and nuns.
To show that this is a misunderstanding, one need only point to the many instructions on political, social, moral and religious matters which the Buddha addressed to lay people.
One might also mention the many lay men and women throughout Buddhist history who have successfully followed the Buddha's Teaching even to the threshold of Nirvana.
And finally, there is the fact that, although a discourse may be addressed to monks, it is not necessarily intended for them exclusively.
So the Commentary to the Greater discourse on Mindfulness, for example, says:” The monk is given here as an example of those dedicated to the practice of the Teaching… Whoever undertakes that practice… is here included under the term 'monk.' Nevertheless, while the Buddha never neglected his lay followers, it cannot be denied that he gave more attention to his monks and nuns.
It is as if, he says, there were a farmer with three fields; one good, one middling, and one poor.
He would sow the good one first, then the middling one, and he may or may not sow the poor one.
These three fields the Buddha likens respectively to his monks and nuns, his lay followers, and “recluses, brahmans, and wanderers of other sects.” Just as the farmer sows his crop in the fields, so the Buddha teaches Dhamma to all impartially, even to the last of the three groups, for “if they were to understand even a single sentence, that would be a blessing and a happiness for them for a long time”.
It is clear, however, that, as the farmer will expect a greater yield from the first field so the Buddha expected his teachings to bear more fruit amongst his monks and nuns then among the laity.
The reason is that the Dhamma, as has been said, aims at an inner renunciation, and the outward renunciation of the monastic life consequently provides the best conditions for its practice.
To perfect oneself in morality, mindfulness and concentration is no easy task, and monks and nuns are not hampered in their pursuit of it by having to worry about earning a living, about money, property, family, and all the daily noise and bustle that distracted the householder's life even in ancient India, and no doubt do so still more in our modern urban civilization.
In short, although the Path of renunciation is theoretically open to all, whoever and wherever they are, yet success in following it can be greatly affected by one's outward circumstance, and a layman will have to overcome many more obstacles than a monk.
What, then, of the weaker vessels among the laity who may not have the opportunity, the ability, or even the desire to renounce the world?
It would be a mistake here to imagine that the Buddhist is called upon to make an immediate, once-and-for-all choice between Samsara and Nirvana, renouncing the world in the same spirit as the candidate for Christian baptism renounces Satan and all his works.
For a start, there is no need for the Buddhist to hurry unless he truly desires to do so.
An infinity of deaths and births stretches before him, and he has plenty of time in which to prepare himself for renunciation if he is not yet ready for it — provided, of course, that he continues to lead a morally blameless life, thus ensuring that he will continue to be born in more or less favorable circumstances in future.
Again, there is no sharp distinction in Buddhism between the saved and the damned.
There are many degrees of spiritual development, and, as a skilled teacher should, the Buddha always adapted his message to the needs and capacities of his audience.
To those who were aware of the hollowness of worldly things he taught the path of final deliverance, while to those who were still in love with the world he simply pointed out the way to lead a good life, one which would bring as much benefit as possible, and as little harm or suffering, for themselves and others.
He never demanded more from anybody than they were capable of at any given time, saying that, just as the great ocean deepens gradually as one goes further out from shore, and does not plunge down abruptly, so “in this Dharma and Discipline the training is gradual, the practice is gradual, the progress is gradual.
There is no abrupt attainment of the ultimate knowledge “.
So there is no need for anybody to try and plunge into deep water before he has first learned to swim in the shallows.
Such a procedure would in fact be very dangerous, as the Dhammapada warns: “As a blade of grass will cut the hand when wrongly grasped, so the ascetic life will drag one down to hell if wrongly taken up.” And the disciple need not lack for means of self-improvement even at the beginning of the path.
Devotional practices, living as blameless a life as possible by observing the precepts, trying to be kind to others and speak and think kindly of them, study of and reflection on the Dharma, degree of self-knowledge through mindfulness, and some practice of meditation perhaps; all of these things, among others, are within the reach of the most worldly-minded, and will have a good result.
One does not have to be a saint, or even a monk or nun, to attempt them.
Patience and persistence are all that is necessary to ensure progress.
Here one might recall the words of the Dhammapada: “Do not underrate goodness, thinking 'it will not come to me.' By falling drops of water a water jug is filled, and a wise man will be full of goodness, even though he accumulates it bit by bit”.
And again: “Let the wise man gradually remove the impurities form himself, as the smith from silver, bit by bit and from moment to moment”.
A second misconception is that renunciation is a gloomy and depressing business.
A biographer of the Christian mystic St.
John of the Cross says that on a first reading of his work: “Few persons, however spiritually minded, will fail to find it repellent.
It strikes a deadly chill, not only into the unhealthy heat of sense-affection, but into the glowing warmth of what one had hoped and believed to be pure love of God.
It calls on one to go out from God-given light into a black and unknown darkness.” I think that, God aside, many people are repelled in a similar way when they first encounter the Buddha's Teaching of renunciation, which may be one reason for the recurrent charges of nihilism and pessimism.
The reason for this reaction is not far to seek, and the clue lies in the words “unknown darkness.
For most people, the pleasures of the senses are the only pleasures, the only source of happiness that they know.
Naturally, they do not take kindly to the suggestion that they give these up for some far-off and indescribable goal.
But it is only ignorance that makes the goal appear dark.
The darkness is, as it were, only the objective counterpart of a subjective blindness, and, in fact, as those who have had experience of this forbidding “darkness” repeatedly assert, the successful abandoning of sense-pleasures brings a happiness far greater than anything that they had known hitherto.
It is not difficult to see why this should be so, when one considers the way in which sense-pleasures come about.
A sense-pleasure arises from the gratification of a desire, in the following way.
First of all, a desire arises and creates a kind of tension in the mind of the being which feels the desire.
Since this tension is felt as unpleasant, the being is then impelled to get rid of it by gratifying the desire.
When the desired object is obtained, the desire is gratified, and the tension in the mind is relaxed.
From the relaxation of the tension flows a sense of satisfaction and fulfillment, a greater or lesser degree of happiness or pleasure.
Now, as long as existence continues, desires of one kind and another will be continually arising, at every moment, and agitating the mind.
This means that the relaxation of tension, and hence the pleasure of happiness, which comes from their gratification can never be anything but temporary and incomplete.
If, then, happiness comes, not from desire itself, but from its subsiding, it follows that the renunciation of sense-desires, so far from making one miserable, really opens up the only path to true and lasting happiness.
And when the goal has been attained, becoming has ceased, and the mind is no longer troubled by the arising of any kind of desire.
The result must be a state of calm and imperturbable happiness that ordinary beings, still enmeshed in worldly desires, can scarcely comprehend.
Even the temporary quiescence of the mind in deep “meditation” is said to create a sense of bliss that far surpasses anything in ordinary experience, and in this way to give a foretaste of the unutterable peace of Nirvana.
It is important to bear all this in mind, otherwise it might be easy to imagine that Buddhism is “pessimistic” and that Buddhists seek to renounce the world out of hatred for it.
But there is no more un-Buddhist emotion than hatred, whether for the world or anything else, and to attempt renunciation for that reason would not be only futile but deadly.
The correct motive for renunciation is rather that given in the Dhammapada: “If by surrendering a slight happiness one may realize a great happiness, the wise man should give up the slight happiness, considering the greater one.
Another error would be to suppose that Buddhists, like followers of some other religions, think that one should renounce the world because it is corrupt, or evil, or ugly; but no Buddhist has ever held such a view.
It is not that worldly happiness and beauty are non-existent, or sinful, or even worthless.
It is just that they are flawed by their transience and their liability to change into suffering and ugliness.
The Buddhist ideal is to feel neither attachment in the case of happiness and beauty, nor revulsion in the case of suffering and ugliness, but simply to observe things as they really are, with equanimity and perfect freedom of mind.
A different kind of mistake is to think that renunciation is impossibly difficult, only to be achieved, if at all, by a superhuman effort of will and forcible suppression of natural desires.
Of course, to sever the ties that bind one to the world are rarely an easy or a pleasant task, and strict self-discipline and persistent effort are necessary until the goal has been attained.
Nevertheless, renunciation should never be forced.
The man who has to force himself to renounce the world only shows that he is not yet ready to do so, and he must learn to be more patient, for otherwise he will only strengthen his bonds instead of loosening them.
We do not have to compel ourselves to abandon the games and toys of our childhood; we simply outgrew them.
So should it be with one who renounces worldly pleasures and preoccupations.
Even though he may not yet be entirely free from nostalgia for these things of his spiritual childhood, he is beginning to outgrow them, and he no longer truly desires them.
For him, renunciation, while it may be difficult, is not a forbidding and distasteful task.
It is, on the contrary, the only way to genuine and lasting happiness.
True renunciation does not involve “driving Nature out with a pitchfork”: it is simply a question of learning to let go.
Finally, I would like to consider the objection that renunciation is a flight from the world's problems, a selfish escapism.
I think that enough has already been said to show that renunciation is by no means an easy way out of anything.
On the contrary, it requires a considerable effort of self-discipline.
Again, the aim of renunciation is to overcome the ills of the world, to understand and destroy the suffering that is at the root of the world's problems, and not run away from it.
As for the charge of selfishness and lack of concern for the welfare of others, it could be answered in a number of ways.
First, one might point out that, in the Buddha's words, “it is not possible for one who is himself sunk in a mire to pull out another who is in the same situation.
But it is possible for one who is not sunk in a mire to pull out another who is”.
In other words, no one can give effective help to others unless he has first helped himself.
Nobody can solve for others problems that he has not yet solved for himself, and that is why self-development must precede altruistic activity.
Secondly, one might reply that not only is deliberate selfishness impossible for a true follower of the Buddha, for he will be aiming at the destruction of “self,” but also, as was seen above, kindness and compassion towards all living things are enjoined on the monk as an indispensable part of the path.
After he has succeeded in his aim, and attained final deliverance, he will continue to live only for the sakes of others, in order to pull them “out of the mire.” The Buddha himself set the example in this, and when his first sixty monks had realized Nirvana, he sent them out singly to preach with those words: “Go your way, monks, for the benefit of the many: for the happiness of the many, out of compassion for the world, for the welfare, the benefit, the happiness of gods and men”.
Finally, it should be remembered that compassion for the world and detachment from the world are not incompatible.
On the contrary, they are inseparable, for compassion is purest only where it is totally disinterested.
It is easy to see that if I help another from some ulterior motive, such as expectation of a reward, my compassion, if compassion is present in me at all, will be tainted by self-interest.
What is perhaps not so obvious is that if I am in any way concerned about my action or its results, if I care about the person I am helping, my motives are still touched with selfishness, for I am identifying myself with my action or with the other person.
Furthermore, since a sense of self is an indication that ignorance has not been completely eliminated, it shows that I am not yet “out of the mire,” and my help will, for that reason, be less effective than the help of someone who is completely disinterested.
Thus one arrives at the paradoxical conclusion that perfect compassion can arise, and perfect help can be given, only where there is perfect detachment, and that those who have totally renounced the world are precisely the people who can be of most benefit to it.
The clearest illumination of this is the life of the Buddha himself.
He began by renouncing the world, and finally transcended it.
And yet, despite the fact that he had nothing whatever to gain from it, he spent the remainder of his long life, after his Awakening, tramping on the roads of north-eastern India in order to help “beings” which he knew full well had no substantial existence.
There is no doubt that he did this out of the purest compassion, for being totally disinterested in the matter, he could have had no other motive; and to the extent of the help that he was able to give, twenty-five centuries of Buddhist history bear eloquent witness.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The mental exercise known as meditation is found in all religious systems.
Prayer is a form of discursive meditation, and in Hinduism the reciting of slokas and mantras is employed to tranquilize the mind to a state of receptivity.
In most of these systems the goal is identified with the particular psychic results that ensue, sometimes very quickly; and the visions that come in the semi-trance state, or the sounds that are heard, are considered to be the end-result of the exercise.
This is not the case in the forms of meditation practiced in Buddhism.
There is still comparatively little known about the mind, its functions and its powers, and it is difficult for most people to distinguish between self-hypnosis, the development of mediumistic states, and the real process of mental clarification and direct perception which is the object of Buddhist mental concentration.
The fact that mystics of every religion have induced on themselves states wherein they see visions and hear voices that are in accordance with their own religious beliefs indicates that their meditation has resulted only in bringing to the surface of the mind and objectifying the concepts already embedded in the deepest strata of their subconscious minds.
The Christian sees and converses with the saints of whom he already knows; the Hindu visualizes the gods of the Hindu pantheon, and so on.
When Sri Ramakrishna Paramahamsa, the Bengali mystic, began to turn his thoughts towards Christianity, he saw visions of Jesus in his meditations, in place of his former eidetic images of the Hindu Avatars.
The practiced hypnotic subject becomes more and more readily able to surrender himself to the suggestions made to him by the hypnotiser, and anyone who has studied this subject is bound to see a connection between the mental state of compliance he has reached and the facility with which the mystic can induce whatever kind of experiences he wills himself to undergo.
There is still another possibility latent in the practice of meditation; the development of mediumistic faculties by which the subject can actually see and hear beings on different planes of existence, the Devalokas and the realm of the unhappy ghosts, for example.
These worlds being nearest to our own are the more readily accessible, and this is the true explanation of the psychic phenomena of Western Spiritualism.
The object of Buddhist meditation, however, is none of these things.
They arise as side-products, but not only are they not its goal, but they are hindrances which have to be overcome.
The Christian who has seen Jesus, or the Hindu who has conversed with Bhagavan Krishna may be quite satisfied that he has fulfilled the purpose of his religious life, but the Buddhist who sees a vision of the Buddha knows by that very fact that he has only succeeded in objectifying a concept in his own mind, for the Buddha after his Parinibbana is, in his own words, no longer visible to gods or men.
There is an essential difference, then, between Buddhist meditation and concentration and that practiced in other systems.
The Buddhist embarking on a course of meditation does well to recognize this difference and to establish in his own conscious mind a clear idea of what it is he is trying to do.
The root-cause of rebirth and suffering is avijja conjoined with and reacting upon tanha.
These two causes form a vicious circle; on the one hand, concepts, the result of ignorance, and on the other hand, desire arising from concepts.
The world of phenomena has no meaning beyond the meaning given to it by our own interpretation.
When that interpretation is conditioned by avijja, we are subject to the state known as vipallasa, or hallucination.
Sañña-vipallasa, hallucination of perception; citta-vipallasa, hallucination of consciousness, and ditthi-vipallasa, hallucination of views, cause us to regard that which is impermanent as permanent, that which is painful as a source of pleasure, and that which is unreal, or literally without any self existence, as being a real, self-existing entity.
Consequently, we place a false interpretation on all the sensory experiences we gain through the six channels of cognition, that is, the eye, ear, nose, tongue, sense of touch and mind cakkhu, sota, ghana, jivha, kaya and mano.
Physics, by showing that the realm of phenomena we know through these channels of cognition does not really correspond to the physical world known to science, has confirmed this Buddhist truth.
We are deluded by our own senses.
Pursuing what we imagine to be desirable, an object of pleasure, we are in reality only following a shadow, trying to grasp a mirage.
It is anicca, dukkha, anatta — impermanent, associated with suffering, an insubstantial.
Being so, it can only be the cause of impermanence, suffering and insubstantiality, since like begets like; and we ourselves, who chase the illusion, are also impermanent, subject to suffering and without any persistent ego-principle.
It is a case of a shadow pursuing a shadow.
The purpose of Buddhist meditation, therefore, is to gain more than an intellectual understanding of this truth, to liberate ourselves from the delusion and thereby put an end to both ignorance and craving.
If the meditation does not produce results tending to this consummation — results which are observable in the character and the whole attitude to life — it is clear that there is something wrong either with the system or with the method of employing it.
It is not enough to see lights, to have visions or to experience ecstasy.
These phenomena are too common to be impressive to the Buddhist who really understands the purpose of Buddhist meditation.
There are actual dangers in them which are apparent to one who is also a student of psychopathology.
In the Buddha's great discourse on the practice of mindfulness, the Maha-satipatthana Sutta, both the object and the means of attaining it are clearly set forth.
Attentiveness to the movements of the body, to the ever-changing states of the mind, is to be cultivated in order that their real nature should be known.
Instead of identifying these physical and mental phenomena with the false concept of “self,” we are to see them as they really are: movements of a physical body, an aggregate of the four elements, subject to physical laws of causality on the one hand, and on the other, a flux of successive phases of consciousness arising and passing away in response to external stimuli.
They are to be viewed objectively, as though they were processes not associated with ourselves but belonging to another order of phenomena.
From what can selfishness and egotism proceed if not from the concept of “self”?
If the practice of any form of meditation leaves selfishness or egotism unabated, it has not been successful.
A tree is judged by its fruits and a man by his actions; there is no other criterion.
Particularly is this true in Buddhist psychology, because the man is his actions.
In the truest sense they, or the continuity of kamma and vipaka which they represent, are the only claim he can make to any persistent identity, not only through the different phases of this life but also from one life to another.
Attentiveness with regard to body and mind serves to break down the illusion of self; and not only that, it also cuts off craving and attachment to external objects, so that ultimately there is neither the “self” that craves nor any object of craving.
It is a long and arduous discipline, and one that can only be undertaken in retirement from the world and its cares.
Yet even a temporary retirement, a temporary course of this discipline, can bear good results in that it establishes an attitude of mind which can be applied to some degree in the ordinary situations of life.
Detachment, objectivity, is an invaluable aid to clear thinking; it enables a man to sum up a given situation without bias, personal or otherwise, and to act in that situation with courage and discretion.
Another gift it bestows is that of concentration — the ability to focus the mind and keep it steadily fixed on a single point, and this is the great secret of success in any undertaking.
The mind is hard to tame; it roams here and there restlessly as the wind, or like an untamed horse, but when it is fully under control, it is the most powerful instrument in the whole universe.
He who has mastered his own mind is indeed master of the Three Worlds.
In the first place he is without fear.
Fear arises because we associate mind and body with “self”; consequently any harm to either is considered to be harm done to oneself.
But he who has broken down this illusion by realizing that the five khandha process is merely the manifestation of cause and effect, does not fear death or misfortune.
He remains equable alike in success and failure, unaffected by praise or blame.
The only thing he fears is demeritorious action, because he knows that no thing or person in the world can harm him except himself, and as his detachment increases, he becomes less and less liable to demeritorious deeds.
Unwholesome action comes of an unwholesome mind, and as the mind becomes purified, healed of its disorders, bad kamma ceases to accumulate.
He comes to have a horror of wrong action and to take greater and greater delight in those deeds that are rooted in alobha, adosa, and amoha — generosity, benevolence and wisdom.
One of the most universally-applicable methods of cultivating mental concentration is anapanasati, attentiveness on the in-going and out-going breath.
This, unlike the Yogic systems, does not call for any interference with the normal breathing, the breath being merely used as a point on which to fix the attention, at the tip of the nostrils.
The attention must not wander, even to follow the breath, but must be kept rigidly on the selected spot.
In the initial stages it is advisable to mark the respiration by counting, but as soon as it is possible to keep the mind fixed without this artificial aid, it should be discontinued and only used when it is necessary to recall the attention.
As the state of mental quiescence is approached, the breath appears to become fainter and fainter, until it is hardly discernible.
It is at this stage that certain psychic phenomena appear, which may at first be disconcerting.
A stage is reached when the actual bodily dukkha, the sensation of arising and passing away of the physical elements in the body, is felt.
This is experienced as a disturbance, but it must be remembered that it is an agitation that is always present in the body but we are unaware of it until the mind becomes stabilized.
It is the first direct experience of the dukkha which is inherent in all phenomena — the realization within oneself of the first of the Four Noble Truths, Dukkha Ariya Sacca.
When that is passed there follows the sensation of piti, rapturous joy associated with the physical body.
The teacher of vipassana, however, is careful never to describe to his pupil beforehand what he is likely to experience, for if he does so, there is a strong possibility that the power of suggestion will produce a false reaction, particularly in those cases where the pupil is very suggestible and greatly under the influence of the teacher.
In kammattana, it is permissible to use certain devices, such as the earth or color kasina, as focal points for the attention.
A candle flame, a hole in the wall, or some metal object can also be used, and the method of using them is found in the Pali texts and the Visuddhi-magga.
In the texts themselves it is to be noted that the Buddha gave objects of meditation to disciples in accordance with their individual characteristics, and his unerring knowledge of the right technique for each came from his insight into their previous births.
Similarly with recursive meditation, a subject would be given which was easily comprehensible to the pupil, or which served to counteract some strong, unwholesome tendency in his nature.
Thus, to one attracted by sensual indulgence, the Buddha would recommend meditation on the impurity of the body, or the “cemetery meditation.” Here the object is to counterbalance attraction by repulsion, but it is only a “skillful means” to reach the final state, in which attraction and repulsion both cease to exist.
In the arahant there is neither liking nor disliking: he regards all things with perfect equanimity, as did Thera Maha Moggallana when he accepted a handful of rice from a leper.
The use of the rosary in Buddhism is often misunderstood.
If it is used for the mechanical repetition of a set formula, the repeating of so many phrases as an act of piety, as in other religions, its value is negligible.
When it is used as means of holding the attention and purifying the mind, however, it can be a great help.
One of the best ways of employing it, because it calls for undivided attention, is to repeat the Pali formula of the qualities of Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha, beginning “Iti'pi so Bhagava — “ with the first bead, starting again with the second and continuing to the next quality: “Iti'pi so Bhagava, Arahan — “ and so on until with the last bead the entire formula is repeated from beginning to end.
This cannot be carried out successfully unless the mind is entirely concentrated on what is being done.
At the same time the recalling of the noble qualities of Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha lifts the mind to a lofty plane, since the words carry with them a meaning the impresses itself on the pattern of the thought-moments as they arise and pass away.
The value of this in terms of Abhidhamma psychology lies in the wholesome nature of the cittakkhana, or “consciousness-moment” in its uppada, thiti and bhanga phases.
Each of these wholesome cittakkhana contributes to the improvement of the sankhara; or aggregate of tendencies; in other words, it directs the subsequent thought-moments into a higher realm and tends to establish the character on that level.
Samatha bhavana, the development of mental tranquillity with concentration, is accompanied by three benefits; it gives happiness in the present life, a favorable rebirth, and the freedom from mental defilements which is a prerequisite for attainment of insight.
In samatha the mind becomes like a still, clear pool completely free from disturbance and agitation, and ready to mirror on its surface the nature of things as they really are, the aspect of them which is hidden from ordinary knowledge by the restlessness of craving.
It is the peace and fulfillment which is depicted on the features of the Buddha, investing his images with a significance that impresses even those who have no knowledge of what it means.
Such an image of the Buddha can itself be a very suitable object of meditation, and is, in fact, the one that most Buddhists instinctively use.
The very sight of the tranquil image can calm and pacify a mind distraught with worldly hopes and fears.
It is the certain and visible assurance of Nibbana.
Vipassana bhavana is realization of the three signs of being, anicca, dukkha, and anatta, by direct insight.
These three characteristics, impermanence, suffering and non-self, can be grasped intellectually, as scientific and philosophical truth, but this is not in itself sufficient to rid the mind of egoism and craving.
The final objective lies on a higher level of awareness, the direct “intuitional” plane, where it is actually experienced as psychological fact.
Until this personal confirmation is obtained, the sphere of sense perception and sensory-responses remain stronger than the intellectual conviction; the two function side by side on different levels of consciousness, but it is usually the sphere dominated by avijja which continues to determine the course of life by volitional action.
The philosopher who fails to live according to his philosophy is the most familiar example of this incompatibility between theory and practice.
When the direct perception is obtained, however, what was at its highest intellectual level still merely a theory becomes actual knowledge, in precisely the same way that we “know” when we are hot or cold hungry or thirsty.
The mind that has attained it is established in the Dhamma, and pañña, wisdom, has taken the place of delusion.
Discursive meditation, such as that practiced in Christian devotion, is entirely on the mental level, and can be undertaken by anyone at any time.
It calls for no special preparation or conditions.
For the more advanced exercises of samatha and vipassana, however, the strictest observance of sila, the basic moral rules, becomes necessary.
These techniques are best followed in seclusion, away from the impurities of worldly life and under the guidance of an accomplished master.
Many people have done themselves psychic harm by embarking on them without due care in this respect.
It is not advisable for anyone to experiment on his own; those who are unable to place themselves under a trustworthy teacher will do best to confine themselves to discursive meditation.
It cannot take them to enlightenment but will benefit them morally and prepare them for the next stage.
Metta bhavana is the most universally beneficial form of discursive meditation, and can be practiced in any conditions.
Thoughts of universal, undiscriminating benevolence, like radio waves reaching out in all directions, sublimate the creative energy of the mind.
With steady perseverance in metta bhavana a point can be reached at which it becomes impossible even to harbor a thought of ill-will.
True peace can only come to the world through minds that are at peace, If people everywhere in the world could be persuaded to devote half an hour daily to the practice of metta bhavana, we should see more real advance towards world peace and security than international agreements will ever bring us.
It would be a good thing if, in this new era of the Buddha Sasana, people of all creeds could be invited to take part in a world-wide movement for the practice of metta bhavana and pledge themselves to live in accordance with the highest tenets of their own religion, whatever it may be.
In so doing they would be paying homage to the Supreme Buddha and to their own particular religious teacher as well, for on this level all the great religions of the world unite.
If there is a common denominator to be found among them, it is surely here, in the teaching of universal loving-kindness which transcends doctrinal differences and draws all being together by the power of a timeless and all-embracing truth.
The classic formulation of metta as an attitude of mind to be developed by meditation is found in the Karaniya Metta Sutta.
It is recommended that this sutta be recited before beginning meditation, and again at its close, a practice which is invariably followed in the Buddhist countries.
The verses of the sutta embody the highest concept to which the thought of loving-kindness can reach, and it serves both as a means of self-protection against unwholesome mental states and as a subject of contemplation.
It is taught in Buddhism that the cultivation of benevolence must begin with oneself.
There is a profound psychological truth in this, for no one who hates or despises himself consciously or unconsciously can feel true loving-kindness for others.
To each of us the self is the nearest object; if one's attitude towards oneself is not a wholesome one, the spring of love is poisoned at its source.
This does not mean that we should build up an idealized picture of ourselves as an object of admiration, but that, while being fully aware of our faults and deficiencies, we should not condemn but resolve to improve ourselves and cherish confidence in our ability to do so.
Metta bhavana, therefore, begins with the thought: “May I be free from enmity; may I be free from ill-will; may I be rid of suffering; may I be happy.
This thought having been developed, the next stage is to apply it in exactly the same form and to the same degree, to someone for whom one has naturally a feeling of friendship.
In so doing, two points must be observed: the object should be a living person, and should not be one of the opposite sex.
The second prohibition is to guard against the feeling of metta turning into its “near enemy,” sensuality.
Those whose sensual leanings have a different orientation must vary the rule to suit their own needs.
When the thought of metta has been developed towards a friend, the next object should be someone towards whom one has no marked feelings of like or dislike.
Lastly, the thought of metta is to be turned towards someone who is hostile.
It is here that difficulties arise.
They are to be expected, and the meditator must be prepared to meet and wrestle with them.
To this end, several techniques are described in the Visuddhimagga and elsewhere.
The first is to think of the hostile personality in terms of anatta — impersonality.
The meditator is advised to analyze the hostile personality into its impersonal components — the body, the feelings, the perceptions, the volitional formations and the consciousness.
The body, to begin with, consists of purely material items: hair of the head, hair of the body, skin, nails, teeth and so on.
There can be no basis for enmity against these.
The feelings, perceptions, volitional formations and consciousness are all transitory phenomena, interdependent, conditioned and bound up with suffering.
They are anicca, dukkha and anatta, impermanent, fraught with suffering and void of selfhood.
There is no more individual personality in them than there is in the physical body itself.
So towards them, likewise, there can be no real ground for enmity.
If this approach should prove to be not altogether effective, there are others in which emotionally counteractive states of mind are brought into play, as for example regarding the hostile person with compassion.
The meditator should reflect: “As he is, so am As I am, so is he.
We are both bound to the inexorable Wheel of Life by ignorance and craving.
Both of us are subject to the law of cause and effect, and whatever evil we do, for that we must suffer.
Why then should I blame or call anyone my enemy?
Rather should I purify my mind and wish that he may do the same, so that both of us may be freed from suffering.
If this thought is dwelt upon and fully comprehended, feelings of hostility will be cast out.
When the thought of loving-kindness is exactly the same, in quality and degree, for all these four objects — oneself, one's friend, the person toward whom one is neutral, and the enemy — the meditation has been successful.
The next stage is to widen and extend it.
This process is a threefold one: suffusing metta without limitation, suffusing it with limitation, and suffusing it in all of the ten directions, east, west, north, south, the intermediate points, above and below.
In suffusing metta without limitation, the meditator thinks of the objects of loving-kindness under five heads: all sentient beings; all things that have life; all beings that have come into existence; all that have personality; all that have assumed individual being.
For each of these groups separately he formulates the thought: “May they be free from enmity; may they be free from enmity; may they be free from ill will; may they be rid of suffering; may they be happy.
For each object he specifies the particular group which he is suffusing with metta: “May all sentient beings be free from enmity, etc… May all things that have life be free from enmity, etc.” This meditation embraces all without particular reference to locality, and so is called “suffusing without limitation.
In suffusing metta with limitation, there are seven groups which form the objects of the meditation.
They are: all females; all males; all Noble Ones; all imperfect ones; all Devas; all human beings; all beings in states of woe.
Each of the groups should be meditated upon as described above: “May all females be free from enmity, etc.” This method is called “suffusing metta with limitation” because it defines the groups according to their nature and condition.
Suffusing with metta all beings in the ten directions is carried out in the same way.
Directing his mind towards the east, the meditator concentrates on the thought: “May all beings in the east be free from enmity; may they be free from ill will; may they be rid of suffering; may they be happy!” And so with the beings in the west, the north, the south, the north-east, south-west, north-west, south-east, above and below.
Lastly, each of the twelve groups belonging to the unlimited and limited suffusions of metta can be dealt with separately for each of the ten directions, using the appropriate formulas.
It is taught that each of these twenty-two modes of practicing metta bhavana is capable of being developed up to the stage of a appana-samadhi, that is, the concentration which leads to jhana, or mental absorption.
For this reason it is described as the method for attaining release of the mind through metta.
It is the first of the Four Brahma Viharas, the sublime states of which the Karaniya Metta Sutta: “Brahmam etam viharam idhamahu” — “Here is declared the Highest Life.
Metta, karuna, mudita, upekkha: loving-kindness, compassion, sympathetic joy and detachment, these four states of mind represent the highest levels of mundane consciousness.
One who has attained to them and dwells in them is impervious to the ills of life.
Like a god he moves and acts in undisturbed serenity, armored against the blows of fate and the uncertainty of worldly conditions.
And the first of them to be cultivated is metta, because it is through boundless love that the mind gains its first taste of liberation.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
If one regards himself superior or equal or inferior by reason of the body that is impermanent, painful and subject to change, what else is it than not seeing reality?
Or if one regards himself superior or equal or inferior by reason of feelings, perceptions, volitions or consciousness, what else is it than not seeing reality?
If one does not regard himself superior or equal or inferior by reason of the body, the feelings, perceptions, volitions or consciousness what else is it than seeing reality?
In Christian literature of the lighter sort we sometimes come across the expression “Little Devil DOUBT.” This personage is not known to Buddhists, but another little devil can be still more devastating.
He is an ugly little Mara, named CONCEIT.
Unlike his big brother Pride, who is not lacking in dignity, Conceit is a mean, slinking little devil, lurking in dark corners and always ready to rush out and nip our heels.
Doubt is slain when the disciple wins the stream: Conceit being a manifestation of Pride, remains a menace to the very end.
Pride in all its forms, devolves from self-esteem, which is in reality “ego-worship.” It stems, so they say, from Greed, the first of the Roots of evil.
The thought here is rather subtle: when the ordinary person thinks of greed he thinks first of what one puts into one's tummy — that second helping of plum-pudding, or the consumption of a pound of candies in a single evening.
The commentators of old were much more drastic.
Greed is “delight in one's own possessions.” Hence we can be greedy about anything to which we have affixed the label “mine.” My car, my table, my cat, my best beloved.
The Greedy aspect of Conceit is recognized when we realize we are “taking delight” in our own good qualities or capacities.
Conceit can arise from the most trivial cause.
One completes a piece of work, and having made a good job of it, one is naturally pleased.
There's no harm in that: we all know the difference between a worker whose only interest is his pay-packet, and the man who takes pride in his work.
The trouble arises when we begin to make comparisons — “couldn't have done it half as well.” That may be quite true, but it is dangerous to think that because one's skill is superior in a single instance that one is therefore a better person.
That is “Superiority Conceit,” and it has its counterpart in the “Inferiority Conceit” of the unsuccessful person, and the “Equality Conceit” of the man who says “I'm as good as you.” With the underlying implication “And a good deal better!
A feeling of superiority is a very pleasant mental state, but it is essentially akusala — unhealthy and unskilled, highly dangerous in its results.
Any conceit that arises in connection with the practice of Dhamma is much to be deplored.
This sometimes occurs when students are making good progress in their studies.
Some queer experience or flash of “insight” is assumed to be a sign of virtue or an advance towards Higher Consciousness, and the student, instead of checking up on his experience with a wise teacher, jumps to the conclusion that he is half-way to being an Arahant.
We do well to remember that no two people have exactly the same experience in regard to meditation practice.
The was recognized in the Buddha's own day: Sariputta was revered for his wisdom, and Moggallana for his psychic powers, but both were venerated as “Great Beings.
Conceit is very prone to arise when one is praised for some particular work or mental quality.
Within limits praise from a knowledgeable person is stimulating and encouraging; some people who are modest or diffident by nature can only work well when they are appreciated.
The trouble is that too much praise, particularly if it borders on flattery, stimulates the sense of “I”-ness.
The ego sticks out its chest and feels two inches taller; it has a delicious feeling of security and believes itself to be invulnerable!
This is the nasty sort of pride that the ancient Greeks called hubris; it was looked upon as an insult to the gods, and when the Olympians found a man suffering from it they unloosed Nemesis, the goddess of revenge, who brought him to death or destruction.
The cultivation of humility is not easy; there's a temptation to indulge in mock-modesty, and untruthfully disclaim any real achievement, and still worse to be conceited about not being conceited.
It is wiser, I think, to tackle Conceit at its first uprising; if one can do that, then Humility will develop in the natural course of events.
For our comfort we find that much can be done to curb the activities of this persistent Mara.
Pride has been aptly described as the “giant weed.” We may grub up a few roots in this life-span, but the thing has already gone to seed and will appear in the future.
say the old gardeners.
If we acquire the habit of eradicating conceit in this life, the habit will travel on in our sankharas and bear good fruit in future lives.
Recognize Conceit whenever he pops up and name him.
This as readers will remember is the advise given by Nyanaponika Thera in his valuable articles in “Sangha.” Mara, like Satan, hates to be recognized.
This practice is doubly effective because it “keeps one on one's toes,” and induces a real dislike of the tendency.
Get back to the first two “steps” of the Noble Eightfold Path Right Understanding of the mental quality or capacity involved: to see according to reality “This is not mine; I am not this; there is no self in it”; Right Aspiration towards the expunging of Conceit.
In the Discourse on Expunging we read “Now I say that the arising of thoughts is very helpful in regard to skilled states of mind.
Therefore the thought should arise 'Others may be harmful; as to this we will not be harmful' and so on for all our evil propensities.
Others may be conceited; but we as to this will not be conceited.' The method of analysis is also helpful.
“I” am being praised for some real or imagined virtue, say generosity.
Generosity is non-greed one of the Good Roots, and as such appears in the list of dharmas given in the Abhidharma philosophy.
According to Mahayana “All dharmas are empty of own-being” — that is to say they are non-existent.
Therefore “I” am being praised for something which doesn't exist.
This is so absurd that it knocks the bottom out of my conceit.
Alternatively “I” am the result of past kamma.
My talents are not due to my own virtue, but have arisen on account of the skilled actions performed by vanished personalities whose kammic descendant “I” am.
Therefore it is silly of me to be conceited about qualities which are not in any real sense “mine.
Again and again in the suttas we find the expression “Thus must you train…” This is Buddhist mental culture: it is Right or Supreme Effort to put down unskilled mental states and prevent them rising in the future, and furthermore to encourage the arising of skilled states.
A word of warning may not be out of place here.
It is inadvisable to dwell too much on our so-obvious faults.
By unwisely reflecting on them we encourage them to root themselves still more firmly in our unconscious.
Instead remember the advice of Paul the Apostle “Whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest… whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, if there be any praise, think on these things.” We as Buddhists have the Buddha Dhamma to think about — “lovely in the beginning, lovely in the middle, lovely in the ending.” This as Dr.
Henn Collins has pointed out is the true philosopher's stone whose alchemy will transmute the base metal of our ordinary consciousness into the gold of Enlightenment.
Few of us are free from Pride in one form or another.
We know that in the interests of spiritual development it must be killed out.
We are taught as much, and accept the teaching without question.
But the method by which Pride may be eliminated is a problem not easy to solve, and the indirect, sweeping precepts of the sages are of little practical help to us.
It is all very well saying: “Kill out this, and kill out that,” but what we want to know is, how may we go about it?
In the first place: what is Pride?
Let us call analogy to our aid.
Regard pride as a weed, propagating itself with alarming fecundity in the garden of the mind.
Its root is not visible, but the flowering shoots are in plain view.
Cut down these shoots and either they grow again or the roots puts out new ones.
The only way to destroy it is to dig it up altogether.
That root is Self-Esteem.
From it grow the roots of Conceit, Boastfulness, Ambition, Jealousy, Envy and Intolerance.
There are others, but let us take these six manifestations for the sake of discussions.
Unbiased, detached self-scrutiny will disclose what others may exist in one's own character, and it is unlikely that all will be found equally developed.
There is cause for alarm when we discover them in ourselves.
Pride is invariably despised when observed in others, yet we sometimes boast of possessing it.
“I have my pride, you know,” is a common assertion.
Beneath every manifestation of Pride, lies Self-Esteem.
It is the conviction of superiority over others — the feeling that we are what they are not, or that we can do what they cannot do.
Successes in early childhood may sow the seeds of it.
The praise of relatives fosters it.
Once planted, it grows, and not even the flattening criticism by one's own contemporaries in adolescence can stop it.
By and by it becomes a habit to compare oneself with the people one meets or passes in the street, generally to their disadvantage.
What we know of our own accomplishments is measured by what we presume they lack.
We think we know our friends inside and out, and our judgments are based on a firm belief in the infallibility of our perception.
There is a tendency to group those who are not obviously outstanding under the heading of “Ordinary People,” and sometimes to place them in the inferior category for no more reason than that they look as if they belong there.
How often we hear the remark: “He seems so ordinary, but when you get to know him there's a lot in him!” We are surprised to see our spot judgment wrong — that there really is something in that very ordinary-looking person.
Can we honestly claim to be free of this habit of automatically comparing others with our own ideas of ourselves?
If so, then Self-Esteem is not present.
It would be bad enough if Pride flourished in no more then Self-Esteem, but it must manifest itself in every way it can.
It strives to show on the surface, which is perhaps just as well, for then it becomes obvious.
Conceit, first shoot of the weed Pride, is Self-Esteem manifesting in visible form.
Not content with merely feeling superior to the people around us, we show it in our bearing.
A glance from some passer-by of the opposite sex may be interpreted as a look of approval.
The fine figure reflected in the shop window as we pass engenders a feeling of warm satisfaction.
Smart clothes, we believe, do justice to our carriage.
We may not be so tall as that person over yonder, but we have a more distinguished look.
No one would pick out any one of them in a crowd, but all can see we are different.
Crude, isn't it?
But that is the way Conceit affects us, and its crudity is indeed shocking when self-analysis brings us face to face with it.
Inspired by a consciousness of a desire for Truth, our minds turn the searchlight of enquiry inwards upon our own characters, and then there dawns the realization that Conceit has been part of us for as long as we remember.
Formerly, we would have angrily denied the charge of being conceited.
Now we see that it is well founded.
Our “apartness,” our treasured “individuality,” is plainly one of its aspects.
Conceit has grown without its presence being suspected, and an even more dangerous and disgusting shoot has sprung up beside it.
This is Boastfulness — Self-Esteem's oral manifestation.
One of our national conventions is the taboo on bragging, and the idea of voicing a plain, undisguised boast would shock us as much as it would disgust the conventional listener.
a very admirable convention too — but it by no means eliminates Boastfulness, for there are other ways of boasting, and as long as the desire to call attention to oneself exists, that particular ramification of Pride is a danger.
We can get others to boast for us.
We can also impress them that they sing our praises to others.
In this way we gain more than were it to come from ourselves, and run no risk of its incurring disagreeable criticism.
We can seek publicity and, once gained, declaim it.
We may artfully bring a conversation round to a point at which we “modestly” have to admit to something we are really proud of.
It takes a certain amount of courage to probe one's own secret heart and bring to light some of the many ways in which we who sincerely believe ourselves to be guiltless can actually indulge in Boastfulness.
It is one of the most persistent roots of the weed of Pride, and the most dangerous because so frequently overlooked.
There are two kinds of Ambition.
There is Wrong Ambition, and Right Ambition.
One is based on Self-Esteem; the other is free of any taint of it.
Wrong Ambition is the desire to excel or succeed in order to enhance one's standing — one's reputation.
It is the urge to achieve with the object of “putting the other chap's eye out!” In its more acceptable, and therefore more insidious aspect, it is the will to gain admiration and respect — to become, in fact, a worldly “success,” which nearly always means a financial success.
Confident of our great worth, we cannot be satisfied until repeated success have called the attention of others to it.
We feel that wealth is a concrete recognition of it.
Right Ambition, on the other hand, is above itself.
It is the will to succeed, not for the gratification of self-esteem, but to further achievement for its own sake.
The painter who strives to express adequately the idea inspiring him — the poet who seeks to express an emotion as it has never been expressed — the craftsman ever intent on bettering his achievement — all are followers of Right Ambition.
Their “selves” are forgotten.
They work as instruments, and they feel that in the expression of their art is little personal, but rather a universal power whose tools they are.
Noblest ambition of all is the desire to achieve an objective of disinterested service to one's fellow creatures, whether human or animal.
it is sometimes gratifying to learn how many of us have this objective.
Jealousy might be defined as the resentment felt against another for competing at the same level.
Note that it is at the same level that competition begets jealousy.
An admission of inferiority by the other will quickly banish the jealousy we may feel against him.
Those we admit to be our superiors do not arouse our jealousy.
It is a bestial emotion, but one that undoubtedly had its uses in our passage through the lives in the Instinctive Mind, for it was an aid to our survival.
Carried over into the influence of Intellect it has no place, and puts a drag on our upward progress.
He who is at one moment the object of our jealousy, is regarded with affection once that jealousy has been smothered.
What may has served us for the conservation of the means of life when we existed in a lower condition is now no more than a vehicle for Pride's manifestation, and its redundancy is obvious the moment the reason has torn Jealousy's red veil from the perception.
We know it is useless, and long to rid ourselves of it.
We seem to succeed, and then conditions come about favorable to its reappearance, and the unwelcome pangs are felt again.
Remember, then, that it is a shoot of Self-Esteem and until that root has been killed out the shoot may be beaten down only to blossom again.
We joke about Envy, and are inclined to look on it as less despicable than Jealousy, its near relative.
Think about it — think over and around it — define it to yourself — get to know it.
When the nature of an unpleasant thing is known, it is less to be dreaded.
With all these ramifications of the weed of Pride the same approach can be recommended.
Define them to yourself.
Figure out what they are and how much you are subject to their influence.
Envy can be called the resentment felt against another for possessing that which one values and does not posses oneself.
It may be only a gentle resentment sometimes, but is dangerous nevertheless, for it may become fierce.
Underlying it is the feeling, “Why should he have it, and not I?” Self-Esteem is outraged.
Then there is Intolerance.
Sometimes it is the only form of Pride we are subject to.
It is often the most robust shoot of the whole plant.
It springs directly from Self-Esteem, for it is a refusal to accept anything that conflicts with our own ideas.
It is to brand as wrong all that to us is not right.
Intolerance causes us to condemn a person for doing that with which we disagree, but let him do just what we would do ourselves and — here is what is so unreasonable — a feeling of jealousy may be aroused.
Pride sweeps us first one way, then another.
There is no keeping our feet when once in its grasp.
Don't expect Pride to be in any way “reasonable,” for it wilts and disappears in the light of reason, its greatest foe.
We are repeatedly being asked: “Why carry the burden of Pride?
Throw it aside!
It is so much relief to rid yourselves of its weight and know the lightness of freedom!” We feel inclined to retort: “ That's all very well, but how can we get rid of it?
We know we must, but we don't know how to begin!
The sickle which can cut down these roots is Reason — calm reflection — Meditation.
Make it your task for a few weeks to give up half an hour daily for reasoning it out, and the results may amaze you.
Look at yourself, as it were, from outside.
Be honest with yourself, in making a searching examination to determine how Pride is manifesting through you, for fair self-analysis is in itself a powerful weapon to use against it.
Classify those manifestations.
Reason them out.
Do they make sense?
In your everyday life try and form the habit of watching with interest to spot each of Pride's several shoots as it appears, and once a week spend a meditation hour in asking yourself for a detailed report of every one noted.
Form a picture in your mind of the perfect character, and compare your own character with it.
For example, say to your self: “Now, I think there was an inclination to boast in my remark to Mrs.
So-and-so at tea yesterday.
How would the Ideal Being have acted under the circumstances?” Or again: “Would the Ideal Being have considered himself superior in bearing to those ugly people I passed in such-and-such a street?
Of course not!
He would have been above that.” The power of standing apart from, and criticizing, the Ego who is subject to Pride, allows you to find satisfaction in adverse criticism from others.
Whereas formerly you felt bitter if ridiculed or put “in the wrong,” it now amuses you, for you see what good medicine it is for the Self you desire to set free.
When others treat you with intolerance, welcome it, for they are doing you a favor by striking direct at your own intolerance.
Seek those things which formerly aroused in you the pangs of Envy or Jealousy.
Find pleasure in feeling that other self hurt by them, knowing that the wounds are suffered by the false Ego — Pride — and not by the real You.
It will not be long before the pain is gone, and then you will have a good laugh at the memory of that squirming demon who fled surprised and vanquished.
We who are subject to Conceit dread ridicule.
Cease to dread it.
When we see the wicked caricatures, or witness those vivid mimicries of ourselves, it is for us to welcome them, for they are aiding us materially in the conquest of Pride.
So also, to hear ourselves belittled is an antidote for Boastfulness.
When we do, there is no need to hide a raging heart behind a sickly smile.
Once we have learned the trick of standing apart from ourselves these things can no longer hurt.
But beat down the shoots of Pride as we may, we cannot be free from the weed until the root has gone.
It is right to prevent the shoots from thriving.
Destroy them by all means.
But Pride will persist in making its appearance until Self-Esteem is rooted out — and to accomplish that is the hardest job of all!
Here is a tip that may perhaps be of service.
Try and form the habit of supposing every passer-by on whom the thoughts rest to be possessed of at least one attribute superior to your own.
Think to yourself: “This creature isn't much to look at, but I'll bet she is far more even-tempered than I am!” Look at that rather foppish young man whose appearance used to annoy you, and think: “All the same, in a pinch he would show far greater physical courage than I.” Cease to regard the large, loud-mouthed person as empty-headed, and think instead: “He's probably far cleverer with his hands than I.” We are all learning our lessons in Life's school-room.
Some are more advanced than us in one thing, and behind us in others.
The person who cannot resist the temptation to gratify the senses may nevertheless be a good angel to others in need of help.
The thief may be an actual hero.
If we consistently regard others as possessing at least one of those desirable characteristics we ourselves are striving for, we are actually admitting our inferiority, and Self-Esteem suffers a staggering blow.
Remember that Self-Esteem is a habit, and just as a habit must be acquired, so may it be abandoned.
We are not born with it.
We cultivate it by regarding ourselves as superior to others in some particular thing — later in more things — ultimately in everything.
Kill it out by recognizing the superiority of others in some way.
Credit them with that superiority, even though you don't know they possess it.
Self-Esteem will die for lack of nourishment, and one day will come the first joyful realization that there is no Him nor Her nor You, but that we are all one.
You need not fear going too far and acquiring an “inferiority complex.” Your eyes will be open, and what you will find is True Humility.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
This rendering of King Asoka's Edicts is based heavily on Amulyachandra Sen's English translation, which includes the original Magadhi and a Sanskrit and English translation of the text.
However, many parts of the edicts are far from clear in meaning and the numerous translations of them differ widely.
Therefore, I have also consulted the translations of D.
Sircar and D.
R.
Bhandarkar and in parts favored their interpretations.
Any credit this small book deserves is due entirely to the labors and learning of these scholars.
With the rediscovery and translation of Indian literature by European scholars in the th century, it was not just the religion and philosophy of Buddhism that came to light, but also its many legendary histories and biographies.
Amongst this class of literature, one name that came to be noticed was that of Asoka, a good king who was supposed to have ruled India in the distant past.
Stories about this king, similar in outline but differing greatly in details, were found in the Divyavadana, the Asokavadana, the Mahavamsa and several other works.
They told of an exceptionally cruel and ruthless prince who had many of his brothers killed in order to seize the throne, who was dramatically converted to Buddhism and who ruled wisely and justly for the rest of his life.
None of these stories were taken seriously — after all many pre-modern cultures had legends about “too good to be true” kings who had ruled righteously in the past and who, people hoped, would rule again soon.
Most of these legends had their origins more in popular longing to be rid of the despotic and uncaring kings than in any historical fact.
And the numerous stories about Asoka were assumed to be the same.
But in, James Prinsep succeeded in deciphering an ancient inscription on a large stone pillar in Delhi.
Several other pillars and rocks with similar inscriptions had been known for some time and had attracted the curiosity of scholars.
Prinsep's inscription proved to be a series of edicts issued by a king calling himself “Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi.” In the following decades, more and more edicts by this same king were discovered and with increasingly accurate decipherment of their language, a more complete picture of this man and his deeds began to emerge.
Gradually, it dawned on scholars that the King Piyadasi of the edicts might be the King Asoka so often praised in Buddhist legends.
However, it was not until, when another edict actually mentioning the name Asoka was discovered, that the identification was confirmed.
Having been forgotten for nearly years, one of the greatest men in history became known to the world once again.
Asoka's edicts are mainly concerned with the reforms he instituted and the moral principles he recommended in his attempt to create a just and humane society.
As such, they give us little information about his life, the details of which have to be culled from other sources.
Although the exact dates of Asoka's life are a matter of dispute among scholars, he was born in about B.and became the third king of the Mauryan dynasty after the death of his father, Bindusara.
His given name was Asoka but he assumed the title Devanampiya Piyadasi which means “Beloved-of-the-Gods, He Who Looks On With Affection.” There seems to have been a two-year war of succession during which at least one of Asoka's brothers was killed.
In B.C., eight years after his coronation, Asoka's armies attacked and conquered Kalinga, a country that roughly corresponds to the modern state of Orissa.
The loss of life caused by battle, reprisals, deportations and the turmoil that always exists in the aftermath of war so horrified Asoka that it brought about a complete change in his personality.
It seems that Asoka had been calling himself a Buddhist for at least two years prior to the Kalinga war, but his commitment to Buddhism was only lukewarm and perhaps had a political motive behind it.
But after the war Asoka dedicated the rest of his life trying to apply Buddhist principles to the administration of his vast empire.
He had a crucial part to play in helping Buddhism to spread both throughout India and abroad, and probably built the first major Buddhist monuments.
Asoka died in B.in the thirty-eighth year of his reign.
Asoka's edicts are to be found scattered in more than thirty places throughout India, Nepal, Pakistan and Afghanistan.
Most of them are written in Brahmi script from which all Indian scripts and many of those used in Southeast Asia later developed.
The language used in the edicts found in the eastern part of the sub-continent is a type of Magadhi, probably the official language of Asoka's court.
The language used in the edicts found in the western part of India is closer to Sanskrit although one bilingual edict in Afghanistan is written in Aramaic and Greek.
Asoka's edicts, which comprise the earliest decipherable corpus of written documents from India, have survived throughout the centuries because they are written on rocks and stone pillars.
These pillars in particular are testimony to the technological and artistic genius of ancient Indian civilization.
Originally, there must have been many of them, although only ten with inscriptions still survive.
Averaging between forty and fifty feet in height, and weighing up to fifty tons each, all the pillars were quarried at Chunar, just south of Varanasi and dragged, sometimes hundreds of miles, to where they were erected.
Each pillar was originally capped by a capital, sometimes a roaring lion, a noble bull or a spirited horse, and the few capitals that survive are widely recognized as masterpieces of Indian art.
Both the pillars and the capitals exhibit a remarkable mirror-like polish that has survived despite centuries of exposure to the elements.
The location of the rock edicts is governed by the availability of suitable rocks, but the edicts on pillars are all to be found in very specific places.
Some, like the Lumbini pillar, mark the Buddha's birthplace, while its inscriptions commemorate Asoka's pilgrimage to that place.
Others are to be found in or near important population centers so that their edicts could be read by as many people as possible.
There is little doubt that Asoka's edicts were written in his own words rather than in the stylistic language in which royal edicts or proclamations in the ancient world were usually written in.
Their distinctly personal tone gives us a unique glimpse into the personality of this complex and remarkable man.
Asoka's style tends to be somewhat repetitious and plodding as if explaining something to one who has difficulty in understanding.
Asoka frequently refers to the good works he has done, although not in a boastful way, but more, it seems, to convince the reader of his sincerity.
In fact, an anxiousness to be thought of as a sincere person and a good administrator is present in nearly every edict.
Asoka tells his subjects that he looked upon them as his children, that their welfare is his main concern; he apologizes for the Kalinga war and reassures the people beyond the borders of his empire that he has no expansionist intentions towards them.
Mixed with this sincerity, there is a definite puritanical streak in Asoka's character suggested by his disapproval of festivals and of religious rituals many of which while being of little value were nonetheless harmless.
It is also very clear that Buddhism was the most influential force in Asoka's life and that he hoped his subjects likewise would adopt his religion.
He went on pilgrimages to Lumbini and Bodh Gaya, sent teaching monks to various regions in India and beyond its borders, and he was familiar enough with the sacred texts to recommend some of them to the monastic community.
It is also very clear that Asoka saw the reforms he instituted as being a part of his duties as a Buddhist.
But, while he was an enthusiastic Buddhist, he was not partisan towards his own religion or intolerant of other religions.
He seems to have genuinely hoped to be able to encourage everyone to practice his or her own religion with the same conviction that he practiced his.
Scholars have suggested that because the edicts say nothing about the philosophical aspects of Buddhism, Asoka had a simplistic and naive understanding of the Dhamma.
This view does not take into account the fact that the purpose of the edicts was not to expound the truths of Buddhism, but to inform the people of Asoka's reforms and to encourage them to be more generous, kind and moral.
This being the case, there was no reason for Asoka to discuss Buddhist philosophy.
Asoka emerges from his edicts as an able administrator, an intelligent human being and as a devoted Buddhist, and we could expect him to take as keen an interest in Buddhist philosophy as he did in Buddhist practice.
The contents of Asoka's edicts make it clear that all the legends about his wise and humane rule are more than justified and qualify him to be ranked as one of the greatest rulers.
In his edicts, he spoke of what might be called state morality, and private or individual morality.
The first was what he based his administration upon and what he hoped would lead to a more just, more spiritually inclined society, while the second was what he recommended and encouraged individuals to practice.
Both these types of morality were imbued with the Buddhist values of compassion, moderation, tolerance and respect for all life.
The Asokan state gave up the predatory foreign policy that had characterized the Mauryan empire up till then and replaced it with a policy of peaceful co-existence.
The judicial system was reformed in order to make it more fair, less harsh and less open to abuse, while those sentenced to death were given a stay of execution to prepare appeals and regular amnesties were given to prisoners.
State resources were used for useful public works like the importation and cultivation of medical herbs, the building of rest houses, the digging of wells at regular intervals along main roads and the planting of fruit and shade trees.
To ensue that these reforms and projects were carried out, Asoka made himself more accessible to his subjects by going on frequent inspection tours and he expected his district officers to follow his example.
To the same end, he gave orders that important state business or petitions were never to be kept from him no matter what he was doing at the time.
The state had a responsibility not just to protect and promote the welfare of its people but also its wildlife.
Hunting certain species of wild animals was banned, forest and wildlife reserves were established and cruelty to domestic and wild animals was prohibited.
The protection of all religions, their promotion and the fostering of harmony between them, was also seen as one of the duties of the state.
It even seems that something like a Department of Religious Affairs was established with officers called Dhamma Mahamatras whose job it was to look after the affairs of various religious bodies and to encourage the practice of religion.
The individual morality that Asoka hoped to foster included respect towards parents, elders, teachers, friends, servants, ascetics and brahmans — behavior that accords with the advice given to Sigala by the Buddha.
He encouraged generosity to the poor, to ascetics and brahmans, and to friends and relatives.
Not surprisingly, Asoka encouraged harmlessness towards all life.
In conformity with the Buddha's advice in the Anguttara Nikaya, II:, he also considered moderation in spending and moderation in saving to be good.
Treating people properly, he suggested, was much more important than performing ceremonies that were supposed to bring good luck.
Because it helped promote tolerance and mutual respect, Asoka desired that people should be well-learned in the good doctrines of other people's religions.
The qualities of heart that are recommended by Asoka in the edicts indicate his deep spirituality.
They include kindness, self-examination, truthfulness, gratitude, purity of heart, enthusiasm, strong loyalty, self-control and love of the Dhamma.
We have no way of knowing how effective Asoka's reforms were or how long they lasted but we do know that monarchs throughout the ancient Buddhist world were encouraged to look to his style of government as an ideal to be followed.
King Asoka has to be credited with the first attempt to develop a Buddhist polity.
Today, with widespread disillusionment in prevailing ideologies and the search for a political philosophy that goes beyond greed, hatred and delusion, Asoka's edicts may make a meaningful contribution to the development of a more spiritually based political system.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, has caused this Dhamma edict to be written.
Here no living beings are to be slaughtered or offered in sacrifice.
Nor should festivals be held, for Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, sees much to object to in such festivals, although there are some festivals that Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, does approve of.
Formerly, in the kitchen of Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, hundreds of thousands of animals were killed every day to make curry.
But now with the writing of this Dhamma edict only three creatures, two peacocks and a deer are killed, and the deer not always.
And in time, not even these three creatures will be killed.
Everywhere within Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi's domain, and among the people beyond the borders, the Cholas, the Pandyas, the Satiyaputras, the Keralaputras, as far as Tamraparni and where the Greek king Antiochos rules, and among the kings who are neighbors of Antiochos, everywhere has Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, made provision for two types of medical treatment: medical treatment for humans and medical treatment for animals.
Wherever medical herbs suitable for humans or animals are not available, I have had them imported and grown.
Wherever medical roots or fruits are not available I have had them imported and grown.
Along roads I have had wells dug and trees planted for the benefit of humans and animals.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: Twelve years after my coronation this has been ordered — Everywhere in my domain the Yuktas, the Rajjukas and the Pradesikas shall go on inspection tours every five years for the purpose of Dhamma instruction and also to conduct other business.
Respect for mother and father is good, generosity to friends, acquaintances, relatives, Brahmans and ascetics is good, not killing living beings is good, moderation in spending and moderation in saving is good.
The Council shall notify the Yuktas about the observance of these instructions in these very words.
In the past, for many hundreds of years, killing or harming living beings and improper behavior towards relatives, and improper behavior towards Brahmans and ascetics has increased.
But now due to Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi's Dhamma practice, the sound of the drum has been replaced by the sound of the Dhamma.
The sighting of heavenly cars, auspicious elephants, bodies of fire and other divine sightings has not happened for many hundreds of years.
But now because Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi promotes restraint in the killing and harming of living beings, proper behavior towards relatives, Brahmans and ascetics, and respect for mother, father and elders, such sightings have increased.
These and many other kinds of Dhamma practice have been encouraged by Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, and he will continue to promote Dhamma practice.
And the sons, grandsons and great-grandsons of Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, too will continue to promote Dhamma practice until the end of time; living by Dhamma and virtue, they will instruct in Dhamma.
Truly, this is the highest work, to instruct in Dhamma.
But practicing the Dhamma cannot be done by one who is devoid of virtue and therefore its promotion and growth is commendable.
This edict has been written so that it may please my successors to devote themselves to promoting these things and not allow them to decline.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, has had this written twelve years after his coronation.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: To do good is difficult.
One who does good first does something hard to do.
I have done many good deeds, and, if my sons, grandsons and their descendants up to the end of the world act in like manner, they too will do much good.
But whoever amongst them neglects this, they will do evil.
Truly, it is easy to do evil.
In the past there were no Dhamma Mahamatras but such officers were appointed by me thirteen years after my coronation.
Now they work among all religions for the establishment of Dhamma, for the promotion of Dhamma, and for the welfare and happiness of all who are devoted to Dhamma.
They work among the Greeks, the Kambojas, the Gandharas, the Rastrikas, the Pitinikas and other peoples on the western borders.
They work among soldiers, chiefs, Brahmans, householders, the poor, the aged and those devoted to Dhamma — for their welfare and happiness — so that they may be free from harassment.
They work for the proper treatment of prisoners, towards their unfettering, and if the Mahamatras think, “This one has a family to support,” “That one has been bewitched,” “This one is old,” then they work for the release of such prisoners.
They work here, in outlying towns, in the women's quarters belonging to my brothers and sisters, and among my other relatives.
They are occupied everywhere.
These Dhamma Mahamatras are occupied in my domain among people devoted to Dhamma to determine who is devoted to Dhamma, who is established in Dhamma, and who is generous.
This Dhamma edict has been written on stone so that it might endure long and that my descendants might act in conformity with it.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: In the past, state business was not transacted nor were reports delivered to the king at all hours.
But now I have given this order, that at any time, whether I am eating, in the women's quarters, the bed chamber, the chariot, the palanquin, in the park or wherever, reporters are to be posted with instructions to report to me the affairs of the people so that I might attend to these affairs wherever I am.
And whatever I orally order in connection with donations or proclamations, or when urgent business presses itself on the Mahamatras, if disagreement or debate arises in the Council, then it must be reported to me immediately.
This is what I have ordered.
I am never content with exerting myself or with despatching business.
Truly, I consider the welfare of all to be my duty, and the root of this is exertion and the prompt despatch of business.
There is no better work than promoting the welfare of all the people and whatever efforts I am making is to repay the debt I owe to all beings to assure their happiness in this life, and attain heaven in the next.
Therefore this Dhamma edict has been written to last long and that my sons, grandsons and great-grandsons might act in conformity with it for the welfare of the world.
However, this is difficult to do without great exertion.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, desires that all religions should reside everywhere, for all of them desire self-control and purity of heart.
But people have various desires and various passions, and they may practice all of what they should or only a part of it.
But one who receives great gifts yet is lacking in self-control, purity of heart, gratitude and firm devotion, such a person is mean.
In the past kings used to go out on pleasure tours during which there was hunting and other entertainment.
But ten years after Beloved-of-the-Gods had been coronated, he went on a tour to Sambodhi and thus instituted Dhamma tours.
During these tours, the following things took place: visits and gifts to Brahmans and ascetics, visits and gifts of gold to the aged, visits to people in the countryside, instructing them in Dhamma, and discussing Dhamma with them as is suitable.
It is this that delights Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, and is, as it were, another type of revenue.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: In times of sickness, for the marriage of sons and daughters, at the birth of children, before embarking on a journey, on these and other occasions, people perform various ceremonies.
Women in particular perform many vulgar and worthless ceremonies.
These types of ceremonies can be performed by all means, but they bear little fruit.
What does bear great fruit, however, is the ceremony of the Dhamma.
This involves proper behavior towards servants and employees, respect for teachers, restraint towards living beings, and generosity towards ascetics and Brahmans.
These and other things constitute the ceremony of the Dhamma.
Therefore a father, a son, a brother, a master, a friend, a companion, and even a neighbor should say: “This is good, this is the ceremony that should be performed until its purpose is fulfilled, this I shall do.” Other ceremonies are of doubtful fruit, for they may achieve their purpose, or they may not, and even if they do, it is only in this world.
But the ceremony of the Dhamma is timeless.
Even if it does not achieve its purpose in this world, it produces great merit in the next, whereas if it does achieve its purpose in this world, one gets great merit both here and there through the ceremony of the Dhamma.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, does not consider glory and fame to be of great account unless they are achieved through having my subjects respect Dhamma and practice Dhamma, both now and in the future.
For this alone does Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, desire glory and fame.
And whatever efforts Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, is making, all of that is only for the welfare of the people in the next world, and that they will have little evil.
And being without merit is evil.
This is difficult for either a humble person or a great person to do except with great effort, and by giving up other interests.
In fact, it may be even more difficult for a great person to do.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: There is no gift like the gift of the Dhamma, acquaintance with Dhamma, distribution of Dhamma, and kinship through Dhamma.
And it consists of this: proper behavior towards servants and employees, respect for mother and father, generosity to friends, companions, relations, Brahmans and ascetics, and not killing living beings.
Therefore a father, a son, a brother, a master, a friend, a companion or a neighbor should say: “This is good, this should be done.” One benefits in this world and gains great merit in the next by giving the gift of the Dhamma.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, honors both ascetics and the householders of all religions, and he honors them with gifts and honors of various kinds.
But Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, does not value gifts and honors as much as he values this — that there should be growth in the essentials of all religions.
Growth in essentials can be done in different ways, but all of them have as their root restraint in speech, that is, not praising one's own religion, or condemning the religion of others without good cause.
And if there is cause for criticism, it should be done in a mild way.
But it is better to honor other religions for this reason.
By so doing, one's own religion benefits, and so do other religions, while doing otherwise harms one's own religion and the religions of others.
Whoever praises his own religion, due to excessive devotion, and condemns others with the thought “Let me glorify my own religion,” only harms his own religion.
Therefore contact is good.
One should listen to and respect the doctrines professed by others.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, desires that all should be well-learned in the good doctrines of other religions.
Those who are content with their own religion should be told this: Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, does not value gifts and honors as much as he values that there should be growth in the essentials of all religions.
And to this end many are working — Dhamma Mahamatras, Mahamatras in charge of the women's quarters, officers in charge of outlying areas, and other such officers.
And the fruit of this is that one's own religion grows and the Dhamma is illuminated also.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, conquered the Kalingas eight years after his coronation.
One hundred and fifty thousand were deported, one hundred thousand were killed and many more died.
After the Kalingas had been conquered, Beloved-of-the-Gods came to feel a strong inclination towards the Dhamma, a love for the Dhamma and for instruction in Dhamma.
Now Beloved-of-the-Gods feels deep remorse for having conquered the Kalingas.
Indeed, Beloved-of-the-Gods is deeply pained by the killing, dying and deportation that take place when an unconquered country is conquered.
But Beloved-of-the-Gods is pained even more by this — that Brahmans, ascetics, and householders of different religions who live in those countries, and who are respectful to superiors, to mother and father, to elders, and who behave properly and have strong loyalty towards friends, acquaintances, companions, relatives, servants and employees — that they are injured, killed or separated from their loved ones.
Even those who are not affected suffer when they see friends, acquaintances, companions and relatives affected.
These misfortunes befall all, and this pains Beloved-of-the-Gods.
There is no country, except among the Greeks, where these two groups, Brahmans and ascetics, are not found, and there is no country where people are not devoted to one or another religion.
Therefore the killing, death or deportation of a hundredth, or even a thousandth part of those who died during the conquest of Kalinga now pains Beloved-of-the-Gods.
Now Beloved-of-the-Gods thinks that even those who do wrong should be forgiven where forgiveness is possible.
Even the forest people, who live in Beloved-of-the-Gods' domain, are entreated and reasoned with to act properly.
They are told that despite his remorse Beloved-of-the-Gods has the power to punish them if necessary, so that they should be ashamed of their wrong and not be killed.
Truly, Beloved-of-the-Gods desires non-injury, restraint and impartiality to all beings, even where wrong has been done.
Now it is conquest by Dhamma that Beloved-of-the-Gods considers to be the best conquest.
And it has been won here, on the borders, even six hundred yojanas away, where the Greek king Antiochos rules, beyond there where the four kings named Ptolemy, Antigonos, Magas and Alexander rule, likewise in the south among the Cholas, the Pandyas, and as far as Tamraparni.
Here in the king's domain among the Greeks, the Kambojas, the Nabhakas, the Nabhapamkits, the Bhojas, the Pitinikas, the Andhras and the Palidas, everywhere people are following Beloved-of-the-Gods' instructions in Dhamma.
Even where Beloved-of-the-Gods' envoys have not been, these people too, having heard of the practice of Dhamma and the ordinances and instructions in Dhamma given by Beloved-of-the-Gods, are following it and will continue to do so.
This conquest has been won everywhere, and it gives great joy — the joy which only conquest by Dhamma can give.
But even this joy is of little consequence.
Beloved-of-the-Gods considers the great fruit to be experienced in the next world to be more important.
I have had this Dhamma edict written so that my sons and great-grandsons may not consider making new conquests, or that if military conquests are made, that they be done with forbearance and light punishment, or better still, that they consider making conquest by Dhamma only, for that bears fruit in this world and the next.
May all their intense devotion be given to this which has a result in this world and the next.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, has had these Dhamma edicts written in brief, in medium length, and in extended form.
Not all of them occur everywhere, for my domain is vast, but much has been written, and I will have still more written.
And also there are some subjects here that have been spoken of again and again because of their sweetness, and so that the people may act in accordance with them.
If some things written are incomplete, this is because of the locality, or in consideration of the object, or due to the fault of the scribe.
Beloved-of-the-Gods says that the Mahamatras of Tosali who are judicial officers in the city are to be told this: I wish to see that everything I consider to be proper is carried out in the right way.
And I consider instructing you to be the best way of accomplishing this.
I have placed you over many thousands of people that you may win the people's affection.
All men are my children.
What I desire for my own children, and I desire their welfare and happiness both in this world and the next, that I desire for all men.
You do not understand to what extent I desire this, and if some of you do understand, you do not understand the full extent of my desire.
You must attend to this matter.
While being completely law-abiding, some people are imprisoned, treated harshly and even killed without cause so that many people suffer.
Therefore your aim should be to act with impartiality.
It is because of these things — envy, anger, cruelty, hate, indifference, laziness or tiredness — that such a thing does not happen.
Therefore your aim should be: “May these things not be in me.” And the root of this is non-anger and patience.
Those who are bored with the administration of justice will not be promoted; will move upwards and be promoted.
Whoever among you understands this should say to his colleagues: “See that you do your duty properly.
Such and such are Beloved-of-the-Gods' instructions.” Great fruit will result from doing your duty, while failing in it will result in gaining neither heaven nor the king's pleasure.
Failure in duty on your part will not please me.
But done properly, it will win you heaven and you will be discharging your debts to me.
This edict is to be listened to on Tisa day, between Tisa days, and on other suitable occasions, it should be listened to even by a single person.
Acting thus, you will be doing your duty.
This edict has been written for the following purpose: that the judicial officers of the city may strive to do their duty and that the people under them might not suffer unjust imprisonment or harsh treatment.
To achieve this, I will send out Mahamatras every five years who are not harsh or cruel, but who are merciful and who can ascertain if the judicial officers have understood my purpose and are acting according to my instructions.
Similarly, from Ujjayini, the prince will send similar persons with the same purpose without allowing three years to elapse.
Likewise from Takhasila also.
When these Mahamatras go on tours of inspection each year, then without neglecting their normal duties, they will ascertain if judicial officers are acting according to the king's instructions.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: This royal order is to be addressed to the Mahamatras at Samapa.
I wish to see that everything I consider to be proper is carried out in the right way.
And I consider instructing you to be the best way of accomplishing this.
All men are my children.
What I desire for my own children, and I desire their welfare and happiness both in this world and the next, that I desire for all men.
The people of the unconquered territories beyond the borders might think: “What is the king's intentions towards us?” My only intention is that they live without fear of me, that they may trust me and that I may give them happiness, not sorrow.
Furthermore, they should understand that the king will forgive those who can be forgiven, and that he wishes to encourage them to practice Dhamma so that they may attain happiness in this world and the next.
I am telling you this so that I may discharge the debts I owe, and that in instructing you, that you may know that my vow and my promise will not be broken.
Therefore acting in this way, you should perform your duties and assure them that: “The king is like a father.
He feels towards us as he feels towards himself.
We are to him like his own children.
By instructing you and informing you of my vow and my promise I shall be applying myself in complete fullness to achieving this object.
You are able indeed to inspire them with confidence and to secure their welfare and happiness in this world and the next, and by acting thus, you will attain heaven as well as discharge the debts you owe to me.
And so that the Mahamatras can devote themselves at all times to inspiring the border areas with confidence and encouraging them to practice Dhamma, this edict has been written here.
This edict is to be listened to every four months on Tisa day, between Tisa days, and on other suitable occasions, it should be listened to even by a single person.
Acting thus, you will be doing your duty.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: It is now more than two and a half years since I became a lay-disciple, but until now I have not been very zealous.
But now that I have visited the Sangha for more than a year, I have become very zealous.
Now the people in India who have not associated with the gods do so.
This is the result of zeal and it is not just the great who can do this.
Even the humble, if they are zealous, can attain heaven.
And this proclamation has been made with this aim.
Let both humble and great be zealous, let even those on the borders know and let zeal last long.
Then this zeal will increase, it will greatly increase, it will increase up to one-and-a-half times.
This message has been proclaimed two hundred and fifty-six times by the king while on tour.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: Father and mother should be respected and so should elders, kindness to living beings should be made strong and the truth should be spoken.
In these ways, the Dhamma should be promoted.
Likewise, a teacher should be honored by his pupil and proper manners should be shown towards relations.
This is an ancient rule that conduces to long life.
Thus should one act.
Written by the scribe Chapala.
Piyadasi, King of Magadha, saluting the Sangha and wishing them good health and happiness, speaks thus: You know, reverend sirs, how great my faith in the Buddha, the Dhamma and Sangha is.
Whatever, reverend sirs, has been spoken by Lord Buddha, all that is well-spoken.
I consider it proper, reverend sirs, to advise on how the good Dhamma should last long.
These Dhamma texts — Extracts from the Discipline, the Noble Way of Life, the Fears to Come, the Poem on the Silent Sage, the Discourse on the Pure Life, Upatisa's Questions, and the Advice to Rahula which was spoken by the Buddha concerning false speech — these Dhamma texts, reverend sirs, I desire that all the monks and nuns may constantly listen to and remember.
Likewise the laymen and laywomen.
I have had this written that you may know my intentions.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: This Dhamma edict was written twenty-six years after my coronation.
Happiness in this world and the next is difficult to obtain without much love for the Dhamma, much self-examination, much respect, much fear, and much enthusiasm.
But through my instruction this regard for Dhamma and love of Dhamma has grown day by day, and will continue to grow.
And my officers of high, low and middle rank are practicing and conforming to Dhamma, and are capable of inspiring others to do the same.
Mahamatras in border areas are doing the same.
And these are my instructions: to protect with Dhamma, to make happiness through Dhamma and to guard with Dhamma.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: Dhamma is good, but what constitutes Dhamma?
little evil, much good, kindness, generosity, truthfulness and purity.
I have given the gift of sight in various ways.
To two-footed and four-footed beings, to birds and aquatic animals, I have given various things including the gift of life.
And many other good deeds have been done by me.
This Dhamma edict has been written that people might follow it and it might endure for a long time.
And the one who follows it properly will do something good.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: People see only their good deeds saying, “I have done this good deed.” But they do not see their evil deeds saying, “I have done this evil deed” or “This is called evil.” But this is difficult to see.
One should think like this: “It is these things that lead to evil, to violence, to cruelty, anger, pride and jealousy.
Let me not ruin myself with these things.” And further, one should think: “This leads to happiness in this world and the next.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: This Dhamma edict was written twenty-six years after my coronation.
My Rajjukas are working among the people, among many hundreds of thousands of people.
The hearing of petitions and the administration of justice has been left to them so that they can do their duties confidently and fearlessly and so that they can work for the welfare, happiness and benefit of the people in the country.
But they should remember what causes happiness and sorrow, and being themselves devoted to Dhamma, they should encourage the people in the country, that they may attain happiness in this world and the next.
These Rajjukas are eager to serve me.
They also obey other officers who know my desires, who instruct the Rajjukas so that they can please me.
Just as a person feels confident having entrusted his child to an expert nurse thinking: “The nurse will keep my child well,” even so, the Rajjukas have been appointed by me for the welfare and happiness of the people in the country.
The hearing of petitions and the administration of justice have been left to the Rajjukas so that they can do their duties unperturbed, fearlessly and confidently.
It is my desire that there should be uniformity in law and uniformity in sentencing.
I even go this far, to grant a three-day stay for those in prison who have been tried and sentenced to death.
During this time their relatives can make appeals to have the prisoners' lives spared.
If there is none to appeal on their behalf, the prisoners can give gifts in order to make merit for the next world, or observe fasts.
Indeed, it is my wish that in this way, even if a prisoner's time is limited, he can prepare for the next world, and that people's Dhamma practice, self-control and generosity may grow.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: Twenty-six years after my coronation various animals were declared to be protected — parrots, mainas, aruna, ruddy geese, wild ducks, nandimukhas, gelatas, bats, queen ants, terrapins, boneless fish, vedareyaka, gangapuputaka, sankiya fish, tortoises, porcupines, squirrels, deer, bulls, okapinda, wild asses, wild pigeons, domestic pigeons and all four-footed creatures that are neither useful nor edible.
Those nanny goats, ewes and sows which are with young or giving milk to their young are protected, and so are young ones less than six months old.
Cocks are not to be caponized, husks hiding living beings are not to be burnt and forests are not to be burnt either without reason or to kill creatures.
One animal is not to be fed to another.
On the three Caturmasis, the three days of Tisa and during the fourteenth and fifteenth of the Uposatha, fish are protected and not to be sold.
During these days animals are not to be killed in the elephant reserves or the fish reserves either.
On the eighth of every fortnight, on the fourteenth and fifteenth, on Tisa, Punarvasu, the three Caturmasis and other auspicious days, bulls are not to be castrated, billy goats, rams, boars and other animals that are usually castrated are not to be.
On Tisa, Punarvasu, Caturmasis and the fortnight of Caturmasis, horses and bullocks are not be branded.
In the twenty-six years since my coronation prisoners have been given amnesty on twenty-five occasions.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: Twelve years after my coronation I started to have Dhamma edicts written for the welfare and happiness of the people, and so that not transgressing them they might grow in the Dhamma.
Thinking: “How can the welfare and happiness of the people be secured?” I give attention to my relatives, to those dwelling near and those dwelling far, so I can lead them to happiness and then I act accordingly.
I do the same for all groups.
I have honored all religions with various honors.
But I consider it best to meet with people personally.
This Dhamma edict was written twenty-six years after my coronation.
Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: In the past kings desired that the people might grow through the promotion of the Dhamma.
But despite this, people did not grow through the promotion of the Dhamma.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, said concerning this: “It occurs to me that in the past kings desired that the people might grow through the promotion of the Dhamma.
But despite this, people did not grow through the promotion of the Dhamma.
Now how can the people be encouraged to follow it?
How can the people be encouraged to grow through the promotion of the Dhamma?
How can I elevate them by promoting the Dhamma?” Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, further said concerning this: “It occurs to me that I shall have proclamations on Dhamma announced and instruction on Dhamma given.
When people hear these, they will follow them, elevate themselves and grow considerably through the promotion of the Dhamma.” It is for this purpose that proclamations on Dhamma have been announced and various instructions on Dhamma have been given and that officers who work among many promote and explain them in detail.
The Rajjukas who work among hundreds of thousands of people have likewise been ordered: “In this way and that encourage those who are devoted to Dhamma.” Beloved-of-the-Gods speaks thus: “Having this object in view, I have set up Dhamma pillars, appointed Dhamma Mahamatras, and announced Dhamma proclamations.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, says: Along roads I have had banyan trees planted so that they can give shade to animals and men, and I have had mango groves planted.
At intervals of eight krosas, I have had wells dug, rest-houses built, and in various places, I have had watering-places made for the use of animals and men.
But these are but minor achievements.
Such things to make the people happy have been done by former kings.
I have done these things for this purpose, that the people might practice the Dhamma.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: My Dhamma Mahamatras too are occupied with various good works among the ascetics and householders of all religions.
I have ordered that they should be occupied with the affairs of the Sangha.
I have also ordered that they should be occupied with the affairs of the Brahmans and the Ajivikas.
I have ordered that they be occupied with the Niganthas.
In fact, I have ordered that different Mahamatras be occupied with the particular affairs of all different religions.
And my Dhamma Mahamatras likewise are occupied with these and other religions.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: These and other principal officers are occupied with the distribution of gifts, mine as well as those of the queens.
In my women's quarters, they organize various charitable activities here and in the provinces.
I have also ordered my sons and the sons of other queens to distribute gifts so that noble deeds of Dhamma and the practice of Dhamma may be promoted.
And noble deeds of Dhamma and the practice of Dhamma consist of having kindness, generosity, truthfulness, purity, gentleness and goodness increase among the people.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: Whatever good deeds have been done by me, those the people accept and those they follow.
Therefore they have progressed and will continue to progress by being respectful to mother and father, respectful to elders, by courtesy to the aged and proper behavior towards Brahmans and ascetics, towards the poor and distressed, and even towards servants and employees.
Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, speaks thus: This progress among the people through Dhamma has been done by two means, by Dhamma regulations and by persuasion.
Of these, Dhamma regulation is of little effect, while persuasion has much more effect.
The Dhamma regulations I have given are that various animals must be protected.
And I have given many other Dhamma regulations also.
But it is by persuasion that progress among the people through Dhamma has had a greater effect in respect of harmlessness to living beings and non-killing of living beings.
Concerning this, Beloved-of-the-Gods says: Wherever there are stone pillars or stone slabs, there this Dhamma edict is to be engraved so that it may long endure.
It has been engraved so that it may endure as long as my sons and great-grandsons live and as long as the sun and the moon shine, and so that people may practice it as instructed.
For by practicing it happiness will be attained in this world and the next.
This Dhamma edict has been written by me twenty-seven years after my coronation.
Twenty years after his coronation, Beloved-of-the-Gods, King Piyadasi, visited this place and worshipped because here the Buddha, the sage of the Sakyans, was born.
He had a stone figure and a pillar set up and because the Lord was born here, the village of Lumbini was exempted from tax and required to pay only one eighth of the produce.
Beloved-of-the-Gods commands: The Mahamatras at Kosambi which is now united, is not to be admitted into the Sangha.
Whoever, whether monk or nun, splits the Sangha is to be made to wear white clothes and to reside somewhere other than in a monastery.
It has also been said: “Generosity is good.” But there is no gift or benefit like the gift of the Dhamma or benefit like the benefit of the Dhamma.
There a friend, a well-wisher, a relative or a companion should encourage others thus on appropriate occasions: “This should be done, this is good, by doing this, one can attain heaven.” And what greater achievement is there than this, to attain heaven?
D.
R.
Bhandarkar, Asoka.
Calcutta, 
R.
Mookerji, Asoka.
Delhi, 
A.
Sen, Asoka's Edicts.
Calcutta, 
A.
Seneviratna, King Asoka and Buddhism.
Kandy.
Scheduled for.
D.
Sircar, Inscriptions of Asoka.
Delhi, 
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Innumerable books have been written about Buddhism, but most of these are far too exhaustive, too specialized, or too scholarly to be of much practical help to the busy lay Buddhist in search of concise guidance.
A short, clear, and simple handbook on how to live a proper Buddhist lay life was therefore a much felt need.
The present essay attempts to fill that gap by providing exactly what its title offers: A Simple Guide to Life.
For easy reference the essay has been divided into short, convenient sections.
The first section is theoretical in emphasis.
It attempts to fix in the reader's mind the essential principles of the Buddha's teaching, without complicated and sophisticated explanations.
The principles discussed here should serve as a clear-cut philosophy of life, a framework which illuminates the meaning and purpose of the Buddhist life.
These principles will enable the lay Buddhist to understand his or her place in the larger scheme of things, to order priorities, and to devise a proper way to achieve them.
The lack of a clear philosophy of life, so widespread today, is largely responsible for the steady decline in ethical standards, both individually and socially, in Sri Lanka and in the world as a whole.
The second section is concerned with the practical implications of adopting the understanding of existence sketched in the first section.
We here examine the visible benefits of accepting the Buddha-Dhamma as a way of thinking and living; in this section we will also throw a sidelong glance at what happens to a society when spiritual values are abandoned in favor of an exclusive stress on material development.
The next two sections discuss respectively the need to draw up an individual life plan and the obstacles likely to impede the successful implementation of that plan.
The central problem of a Buddhist lay follower is to combine a successful lay life with Buddhist moral and spiritual principles.
This problem can be solved by organizing one's life as a lay Buddhist within the framework of the Noble Eightfold Path, which represents the Master's teaching in practice.
Because some degree of economic security is essential to growth in the Dhamma, the Buddha was concerned with the material welfare of his lay disciples as much as with their spiritual development.
He did not deter them from seeking mundane happiness, but he stressed that in pursuing mundane goals, the lay Buddhist should take great care to avoid breaking the basic rules of morality.
These rules are summed up in the Five Precepts of virtue, the minimum code of ethics to be followed by a Buddhist householder.
As the Five Precepts are thus of such fundamental importance to a Buddhist lay follower, a separate section is devoted to discussing them.
The remaining sections of the essay show how to apply the basic principles of Buddhism to the other major areas of a Buddhist householder's life.
The essay ends with a section briefly describing what is expected of an ideal lay Buddhist in daily life.
The guiding maxim of the entire essay is: A little well done is better than a lot poorly done.
To sum up: The Buddha's teaching, which is unique in its completeness, is the most rational and consistent plan for wholesome living.
It is not based on dogma or blind faith, but on facts and verifiable conclusions.
It therefore offers a reasonable way of life which should be attractive to any thinking person.
Moreover, the Dhamma is completely compatible with the advances of modern science and does not require clever reinterpretations to avoid clashes with scientific discoveries.
The mere fact of accepting Buddhism intellectually, however, will not ensure happiness and security.
To yield its fruit the Buddha's teaching has to be utilized intelligently and constructively in all the activities of our daily life.
It has to be adopted, adapted, and applied until all its basic principles are absorbed and made habitual by repeated practice, for a theoretical knowledge of Buddhism is insufficient in itself.
If one wishes to make changes in the changing personality that one now is, these changes will take time and patience.
The lofty heights of Nibbana are not to be reached by a sudden leap but by quiet, persistent endeavor over a long period, guided by the Master's teaching.
Let us not forget that a journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step.
Daily practice, beginning with the strict observance of the Five Precepts, is the way to orderly progress along the path.
Even a little practice every day brings the practitioner a little nearer to the goal each day.
I take this opportunity to offer the merit of this gift of Dhamma most gratefully and most devotedly to my parents, now no more.
Such a gift excels all other gifts: Sabbadanam dhammadanam jinati.
May it redound to their happiness.
To be happy, successful, and secure, we must first learn to see ourselves and the world as they truly are and should then shape our everyday activities in keeping with this view.
We must also look for solutions to our problems in terms of the relationship of cause and effect, for the universal law of causality operates in the field of human behavior as much as it does in the physical world.
The foundation for a fruitful life is an understanding of the moral law of kamma.
Kamma is volitional action, action that expresses morally determinate intentions or volitions.
We need to recognize clearly that wholesome and unwholesome deeds produce corresponding good and bad results.
As a person sows, so shall he reap.
Good begets good, and evil begets evil.
This retributive power is inherent in volitional action or kamma.
Kamma is also cumulative.
Not only do our deeds generate pleasant and painful results, but in their cumulative force they also determine our character.
The deeds we perform in any one life are transmitted to future lives in the form of dispositions.
These dispositions constitute our character traits.
Inherent in the action is the power of producing its due result.
This happens without the intervention or help of any external agency.
Buddhism denies the existence of a Creator-God.
Kamma is neither fate nor predestination, but our own willed action considered as capable of producing results.
Understanding the kammic moral law of cause and effect, we will learn to control our actions in order to serve our own welfare as well as to promote the good of others.
There are ten unwholesome courses of action, deeds which originate from the defilements of greed, hatred, and delusion.
These are: killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, slander, harsh speech, useless talk, covetousness, ill will, and false views.
Contrary to these, there are ten bases of merit, deeds which spring from the virtuous qualities of detachment, goodwill, and wisdom, and which generate wholesome kamma: generosity, morality, meditation, reverence, service, transference of merit, rejoicing in the good deeds of others, hearing the Dhamma, expounding the Dhamma, and straightening out one's views.
It is lack of right understanding and ignorance of the underlying laws of life that account for the prevalence of materialism in today's world, even in the traditional homelands of the Buddha-Dhamma.
When people become convinced that everything perishes at death, they lose sight of lofty ethical ideals and become indifferent to the long-range consequences of their deeds.
Their entire lives revolve around the blind pursuit of sensual pleasures.
Thus we find that today people worship money regardless of how it is earned, hunt for pleasure no matter where it is found, chase power and fame regardless of the cost to their personal integrity.
Ignorance of the law is no valid excuse in a court of law, and so it is with regard to the moral law of kamma: the law operates regardless of whether one believes in it or not, due effects following from their respective causes.
Just as an infant will get burnt if it touches fire regardless of whether or not it understands the dangers in playing with fire, so those who violate the laws of morality will have to face the consequences when their kamma ripens, regardless of whether or not they accept the teaching of kamma.
Just as a shadow is connected with an object, so is rebirth connected with kamma.
Craving, selfish desire, prompts us to do life-affirming deeds, kamma, volitional action.
No force in nature is ever lost, and moral energy is no exception.
So long as craving and ignorance remain in the mind, kamma must find expression at death.
The inevitable fruit of craving for existence is rebirth.
Buddhism affirms the continuity of the individual life-flux at death, but denies the existence of a permanent soul.
Mind is a flux of mental processes without any persisting core, yet this flux, though insubstantial, continues from life to life as long as it is driven on by the thirst for more becoming.
The mind of a dying person, owing to the latent craving for continued existence, grasps at some object, idea, or feeling connected with an action done during his lifetime, and this grasping vitalizes an appropriate germ of life.
The new form of life may be human or non-human, in keeping with the kamma or moral forces generated during the deceased's lifetime.
The germ of life kindled by the process of rebirth is endowed with an initial consciousness in which lie latent all the past impressions, characteristics, and tendencies of that particular individual.
Hence death leads to birth and birth to death.
Rebirth is thus possible without a transmigrating soul.
The twin Buddhist doctrines of kamma and rebirth are the “middle way” that provides a satisfactory answer to the problem of life.
The middle way avoids the extremes of theism and materialism, preserving moral accountability without the problems raised by positing an almighty yet benevolent God.
A human being is the visible expression of his or her own past action.
One is born from one's past kamma, supported by one's present kamma, and at death goes where one's accumulated kamma leads one.
Buddhism teaches that human beings evolve according to the quality of the kamma they have performed during their lifetime.
This supplies a rational basis for morality in place of the commandments of a Creator-God.
According to the Buddha's teachings, there can be regression from the human plane to subhuman realms such as the animal world, and progress from the human plane to the heavenly planes.
Taking into account the dangers of a fall to subhuman realms, one should always act with care.
Virtue, based on a righteous code of conduct, protects one from regression and ensures spiritual progress.
A true follower of the Buddha accepts the moral law of kamma as just, recognizing it as the chief reason for the many inequalities among human beings in regard to health, wealth, and wisdom.
He also learns to face life's losses, disappointments, failures, and adversities calmly, without complaining; for he knows that they are the result of his own past misdeeds.
If he asks himself: “Why has this happened to me?” the answer will be expressed in terms of action and result.
He will try to solve his problems to the best of his ability and will adjust himself to the new situation when external change is not possible.
He will not act rashly, nor fall into despair, nor try to escape his difficulties by resorting to drink, drugs, or suicide, as so often happens in Sri Lanka.
Such conduct only shows emotional immaturity and ignorance of the Buddha's teachings.
For a genuine Buddhist, then, one's everyday activities, by way of thought, word, and deed, are more important than anything else in life.
A proper understanding of the Buddhist moral law of kamma and rebirth is essential for happy and sensible living and for the welfare of the world.
In the Buddha's own words:
— Samyutta Nikaya, Kosala Samyutta, trans.
by Sir Robert Chalmers
Although we imagine ourselves to be a self — a real substantial individual — according to the Buddha's teaching we are in reality nothing more than a flame-like process, an ever-changing combination of matter and mind, neither of which is the same for two consecutive moments.
All the components of our being are impermanent, unsatisfactory, and devoid of self.
Life is not a being, an identity, but a becoming; not a product, but a process.
There is in actuality no doer, only a doing; no thinker, only a thinking; no goer, only a going.
The Buddha teaches us how to put an end to the beginningless cycle of rebirths in which we undergo the manifold kinds of suffering.
The way to end the cycle is by removing the causes that drive it forward life after life.
The principal cause is craving, which assumes many forms.
Craving impels a person to engage in action designed to satisfy the craving, yet as craving is essentially insatiable the result is rebirth.
Craving is a powerful mental force latent in all unenlightened beings.
The cause of craving is ignorance of the true nature of life: not knowing that life is an ever-changing process, subject to suffering, and totally devoid of a self or core.
All life, wherever it is found, bears this same nature: a process stamped with the three marks of impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and egolessness.
The Buddha realized for himself the true nature of life and through this realization attained to something beyond life and death: a reality that is permanent, blissful, and deathless.
This state cannot be described but has to be realized inwardly as a matter of direct personal experience; it has to be attained for oneself and by oneself.
This ultimate reality, where thought expires in experience, is Nibbana, the goal of the Buddhist path.
The Buddha's teachings may thus be condensed into these four verifiable truths, called the Four Noble Truths: suffering, its cause, its cessation, and the way leading to cessation of suffering.
These are eternal truths, truths that do not change and cannot change with time and place.
The only way for us to avoid unhappiness and dissatisfaction is to eliminate the craving that gives birth to it; for everything eagerly sought for and clung to is impermanent.
Nothing lasts forever — no person, no object, no experience.
Whatever arises must perish, and to cling to the perishable sooner or later ends in suffering.
It is by no means easy to eliminate craving; in fact, it is the most difficult challenge of all.
But when we do so, we will reach a state of inward perfection and unshakable calm.
We can reach the end of suffering by cultivating the Noble Eightfold Path in its three stages of morality, concentration, and wisdom — sila, samadhi, pañña.
Morality purifies conduct and concentration makes the mind calm.
When the mind is calm and concentrated, wisdom arises, clear insight, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are.
With the arising of wisdom, craving in all its forms is forever destroyed; the flame of life is then extinguished for want of fuel.
The Unconditioned has been won — Nibbana, which is deathless, blissful, and real.
The Noble Eightfold Path consists of the following eight factors, inter-related and inter-connected, ordered into three groups:
These eight factors summarize the Buddha's teaching and its practice.
They are the very heart of the Buddha-Dhamma.
It is not enough to know and admire the Dhamma; it must be practiced in daily life, for the difficulty of knowing what is right is nothing compared to the difficulty of putting it into practice.
We really know something only when we do it repeatedly, when we make it part of our nature.
The practical side of the Dhamma is the threefold training in morality, concentration, and wisdom, which collectively constitute the Noble Eightfold Path, the “middle way” discovered by the Blessed One for the realization of Nibbana.
Monastics and laypeople alike tread the same path.
Both start from the same foundation, right understanding; both pursue the same goal, Nibbana.
The only difference lies in the degree of commitment to the practice and the pace of progress.
But whether as a layperson or as a monk, the systematic practice of the Eightfold Path will foster the growth of the wholesome qualities leading to liberation — generosity, goodwill, and wisdom.
As these qualities gradually reach maturity, they will weaken and finally snap the fetters of greed, hatred, and delusion which have held us for so long in bondage to the round of rebirth and suffering.
Right understanding is the foundation for developing a proper sense of values, so sorely lacking in our age.
Without right understanding our vision is dimmed and the way is lost; all our efforts will be misguided and misdirected, all our plans for individual and social development must flounder and fail.
Such plans will have to be based on the Eightfold Path with its emphasis on self-effort, self-control, and respect for the individual.
When wrong views prevail we will operate with a perverted sense of values: we will fling ourselves into the blind pursuit of wealth, power, and possessions; we will be obsessed by the urge to conquer and dominate; we will pine for ruthless revenge; we will dumbly conform to social conventions and norms.
Right views will point us towards an enlightened sense of values: towards detachment and kindness; towards generosity of spirit and selfless service to others; towards the pursuit of wisdom and understanding.
The confusion and moral lunacy now prevalent in the world can be eased, if not eliminated, if the path of the Buddha is followed.
Right livelihood and right action, for instance, can help us avoid the conflicts that result from a wrong way of life and wrong action, thereby enabling a society to live in peace and harmony.
Although in the affluent countries of the West people now enjoy high standards of goods and services, the inward quality of their lives does not bear evidence of a corresponding level of improvement.
The reason for the poverty of their interior life is the neglect of spiritual values.
When materialism erodes the higher spiritual dimension of life, a plunge into moral nihilism is bound to follow.
We see this in the alarming statistics characteristic of materialist society: in the increased rate of suicide, in the explosion of crime, in the proliferation of sexual offenses, alcoholism, and drug abuse.
This shows that a one-sided stress on material development in a pleasure-seeking society is ultimately self-destructive, like a piece of iron that is devoured by the rust arising from within itself.
Even knowledge and discipline on their own are not adequate, for without moral ideals they may turn a society into nothing more than a mass-scale workshop or military camp.
It is only the cultivation of a proper sense of values that can make society cultured and civilized in the true meaning of those terms.
Having right understanding will enable us to recognize that worldly values are man-made and relative.
These false worldly values lead people astray and make them suffer in vain.
A Buddha teaches authentic values, real values, values that are grounded in timeless truth.
A Buddha first realizes for himself the true nature of life, then he reveals to blind worldlings the Dhamma, the eternal law of righteousness and truth.
This Dhamma includes the Four Noble Truths and the principles of kamma and rebirth.
Any values that deviate from these principles, no matter how widely they may be accepted as the common norm, are worthless and deceptive.
While those whose minds are shrouded in wrong views will be deceived by them, one with right view will realize their hollowness at once.
Seeing that life involves incessant change and that it is subject to many forms of suffering, one with right understanding learns to live simply and to regulate desire.
A wise and virtuous person is moderate in his desires and follows the middle way in all matters.
Understanding the close connection between craving and suffering, he will realize the importance of holding desire in check by simple living.
One with right understanding is aware that real happiness is an inward state — a quality of the mind — and should therefore be sought inwardly.
Happiness is independent of external things, though of course a certain degree of material security is necessary as a basis for inner development.
We require only four basic kinds of physical sustenance: wholesome food, clothing, shelter, and medicine.
Complementary to these, we have four mental needs: right knowledge, virtue, guarding the doors of the senses, and meditation.
These are the two sets of basic requisites for leading a lofty life.
Living simply, without superfluous possessions and entanglements, leads to contentment and peace of mind, releasing time and energy to pursue higher virtues and values.
It is pride and vanity that keep us tied to false goals, and the smaller the mind, the greater is the pride.
Buddhism upholds the objectivity of moral values, for its ethics is based on the law of cause and effect in the moral sphere, and this law, like the physical law of gravity, is an unvarying truth valid for all time.
Good deeds and bad deeds will produce their respective pleasant and painful fruits regardless of the views and wishes of the people who engage in them.
Recognizing the objectivity of the moral law and the undeviating connection between deeds and their results, a person with right view will abstain from wrong actions and adhere to the standards of wholesome conduct embodied in the Five Precepts of virtuous conduct.
As instability is inherent in life, the most unexpected things can happen.
Therefore the wise Buddhist recognizes the need to control his feelings.
When calamity comes, we must face it calmly, without lamenting or falling into despair.
The ability to remain equanimous amidst the fluctuations of fortune is a benefit of right understanding.
We should understand that everything that happens to us happens because of causes and conditions for which we are ultimately responsible.
Similarly, as we obtain some degree of emotional control, we will be able to discard irrational fears and worries.
The seeming injustices of life, grievances, emotional maladjustments, etc., are all explained fully and rationally by the law of kamma and rebirth.
By understanding this law, we will see that, in the final analysis, we are the architects of our own destiny.
A further fruit of right understanding is the ability to look at people, things, and events objectively, stripped bare of likes and dislikes, of bias and prejudice.
This capacity for objectivity, a sign of true mental maturity, will issue in clearer thinking, saner living, a marked reduction of susceptibility to the pernicious influence of the mass media, and an improvement in inter-personal relationships.
One with right understanding will be able to think for himself.
He is able to make up his own mind, to form his own opinions, to face life's difficulties armed with the principles of reality taught by the Buddha.
The true Buddhist will not be a moral and intellectual coward, but will be prepared to stand alone regardless of what others say or think.
Of course, he will seek advice when necessary, but he will make his own decisions and have the courage of his convictions.
Right understanding will give us a purpose for living.
A lay Buddhist must learn to live purposefully, with a worthy aim — both an immediate aim and an ultimate aim, the one fitting harmoniously into the other.
To be truly happy we require a simple but sound philosophy of life.
Philosophy is the keen desire to understand the nature of man and our destiny in the universe.
It gives life a sense of direction and meaning.
Without one, we either dream our way through life or muddle through life.
A clear-cut philosophy makes life meaningful and fruitful, enabling us to live in harmony with our fellows and with the natural environment.
To make the best use of our human potential, we need not only a practical aim in life, but a life plan for achieving that aim.
The preceding two sections of this essay show the groundwork for developing a proper sense of values, the values essential for gaining happiness, success, and security within the mundane life and for progressing towards the ultimate goal of the Buddhist path, Nibbana.
While we walk along the path to liberation, as laypeople we have to live in the world, and our immediate objective will be to make our life in the world both a means to worldly success and a stepping-stone to final liberation.
To accomplish this, we must organize our life within the framework of the Noble Eightfold Path.
We can best realize our immediate aims by drawing up an individual life plan in keeping with our powers and circumstances.
This life plan must be realistic.
It must envisage a realistic development of our innate potential, steering us towards the fullest actualization of our possibilities.
At the start, we require an honest understanding of ourselves.
It is pointless to devise a workable life plan on the foundation stone of grandiose delusions about our character and abilities.
The more we find out about ourselves, by self-observation and self-examination, the better will be our chances of self-improvement.
We should ask ourselves how far and to what degree we are generous, kind, even-tempered, considerate, honest, sober in morals, truthful, diligent, energetic, industrious, cautious, patient, tolerant, and tactful.
These are the qualities of a well-developed Buddhist, the qualities we ourselves should emulate.
We need to improve ourselves wherever we are weak.
A little practice everyday is all that is necessary.
We should remember that the more often an action is performed, the easier it becomes for us to perform it in the future and the stronger becomes the tendency to do it again and again until it becomes a habit, an ingrained part of our character.
Our life plan should cover all the main areas of a normal householder's life, including occupation, marriage, the procreation and raising of children, retirement, old age and death.
The happiness of lay life consists in finding out exactly what one can do and doing it well.
A clear mental picture of a practical aim in life and a realistic sketch of the steps needed to achieve that aim will help guide us to the fulfillment of our ideal.
We tend to become what we really want to be, provided we act realistically and effectively to realize our aim.
The following five states are likely to prevent or block the success of our efforts to lead the upright life of a Buddhist lay follower.
They are called by the Buddha the five mental hindrances because they close the doors to both spiritual and worldly progress.
Although the Buddha originally taught them as the main obstacles to meditation, with a little reflection we can see that they are equally detrimental to success in our mundane undertakings.
The first of the five hindrances is sensual craving, obsessive hankering for possessions or for the gratification of the senses.
While the lay Buddhist will seek wealth and possessions as an integral part of mundane happiness, he will also be aware of the limits to be observed in their pursuit.He will recognize that if one obtains wealth and position by unjust means, or becomes excessively attached to them, they will become a source of misery and despair rather than of joy and contentment.
Money alone cannot solve all our problems.
Many people never learn this, and spend their time and energy accumulating wealth and the so-called “good things” it can buy.
But in fact, the more they acquire the more they want.
Such people can never find happiness.
A lay Buddhist must be moderate in all things.
Extreme desires — for riches, the enjoyment of sex, liquor, the ostentatious display of one's success — are sure signs of internal insecurity, things to be avoided.
Ill will or hatred, the second hindrance, is the emotional opposite of desire, yet it is an equally potent obstacle to personal development.
Because we are attracted to desirable things, we are repelled by what is undesirable.
Like and dislike are the two forces that delude the world, leading people astray into conflict and confusion and drenching the earth with blood.
Both are born of ignorance.
Desire colors everything in tinsel and drives us to acquire what we want.
Hatred colors everything black and drives us to destroy what we suspect is inimical to our interests.
The best way to overcome hatred is by cultivating loving-kindness, explained later in this essay.
Indolence and mental inertia is the next hindrance, the obstacle to strenuous effort.
The lazy person is not inclined to strive for correct understanding or high standards of conduct.
He is a drifter or a dreamer, easy prey to the thieves of craving and hatred.
Restlessness and worry are twin hindrances very much in evidence today.
Restlessness is manifest in the agitation, impatience, thirst for excitement, and unsettled character of our daily existence.
Worry is the guilt and remorse that one feels when one broods sadly or regretfully over an evil deed that has been done or a good deed left undone.
The best remedy for a lapse or transgression already committed is to decide never to repeat it; the best remedy for neglecting to do good is to do it without delay.
The last hindrance is doubt.
Doubt is the inability to decide, the lack of resolution that prevents one from making a firm commitment to higher ideals and from pursuing the good with a steady will.
These five hindrances are great handicaps to one's progress.
They deprive the mind of understanding and happiness and cause much unnecessary suffering.
By cultivating the five cardinal virtues — confidence, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom — and by constant effort one can reduce their harmful influence.
Modern life is full of stress and strain.
Therefore relaxation is a necessary ingredient of happiness.
By understanding the causes of stress and by regulating these causes, we can live calmly even in the midst of strenuous activity.
Hard work without tension never killed anyone.
Why is it then that some people always work anxiously and feverishly?
Generally, such a person is driven by craving, by intense desire.
He wants to achieve his goal so eagerly, with such avidity, that he simply cannot rest until he gets it; or he is so fearful of losing something he prizes that he cannot relax and enjoy the present moment; or he is driven by resentment against those who obstruct his thirst; or he is constantly hankering after power, position, and prestige on account of some irrational need to prove his worth to himself and others.
If a person wants to avoid stress and strain, then he will have to train his mind to view everything he encounters — persons, objects, events, and experiences — realistically, as transient phenomena, dependently arisen through conditions.
He should reflect upon them in terms of the three characteristics — as impermanent, unsatisfactory, and without a self.
Doing so will help to reduce the investment of self-concern in these phenomena, and thereby will reduce the craving and attachment for them.
He should also avoid anger, anxiety, and pride — the thoughts of “me” and “mine” — since such emotions are productive of stress and strain.
When one adopts this attitude to life, one will discover greater detachment, deeper calm, more durable peace of heart even amidst the same situations that previously produced nothing but stress and worry.
The key to managing stress is through the disciplining and mastery of the mind.
One can also reduce stress by forming good work habits.
One should confine oneself to doing one thing at a time, since attempts to juggle multiple tasks only lead to poor results in all of them.
One should keep work and leisure separate.
One should work in a relaxed frame of mind, repeatedly reminding oneself during the course of the day that one can accomplish more work and better work if one works calmly and intersperses one's routine with breaks.
The following additional disciplines will also be helpful in combatting stress and tension:
Keeping the Five Precepts conscientiously.
The feeling of guilt increases stress.
By observing the precepts, a person leads a blameless life and thereby enjoys freedom from the nagging sense of guilt that harasses one who violates the basic rules of morality.
A guilty conscience is a vexing companion during the day, an uncomfortable bed-fellow at night.
Sense control.
The mind is constantly attracted to pleasant sense objects and repelled by unpleasant objects.
Wandering recklessly among the objective fields, it becomes scattered and distraught.
By guarding the sense doors, this wasteful agitation is checked.
The mind becomes calm and settled, and as a result one experiences an unblemished happiness.
Meditation.
Meditation, or bhavana, purifies the mind.
As the mind is gradually cleansed, one can see with greater clarity the true nature of life.
One then becomes increasingly detached from worldly things and develops an equanimity that cannot be shaken by the fluctuations of fortune.
Cultivating the four sublime attitudes.
The four sublime attitudes are loving-kindness, compassion, altruistic joy, and equanimity.
These are enlightened emotions that reduce the stress and strain of daily life, improve interpersonal relationships at home and in the workplace, promote racial accord and amity, help in the development of an even mind, and increase calm and inner peace.
One final piece of practical advice: Time, energy, and funds are limited, while wants are unlimited.
Therefore a person must have a sense of priorities.
A lay Buddhist, in particular, must be able to discriminate: to know what is really essential to a wholesome life; what is desirable but not urgent; what is trivial and dispensable; and what is detrimental.
Having made these distinctions, one must pursue what ranks high in the scale of priorities and eschew what ranks low.
This will enable one to avoid unnecessary waste and worry, and help to promote balanced, frugal living.
The minimal code of ethics followed by a lay Buddhist is the Five Precepts of virtue.
These precepts are moral rules voluntarily undertaken to promote the purity of one's own conduct and to avoid causing harm and suffering to others.
Evil conduct is harmful to oneself and others and strengthens the defilements of greed, hatred, and delusion.
To engage in unwholesome activity is not merely a matter of free choice: it is a violation of the cosmic moral law entailing inevitable suffering both in this life and in future existences.
The opposite of evil conduct is virtue.
Virtue involves the avoidance of immoral deeds by voluntarily accepting ethical principles of restraint.
Virtuous action springs from the three wholesome roots of non-attachment, goodwill, and wisdom.
By undertaking moral precepts one pledges to regulate one's conduct in accordance with these three virtuous qualities.
The Five Precepts are as follows:
Following the Five Precepts also implies shunning the five kinds of occupation forbidden to a lay Buddhist: trading in arms, in human beings, in flesh, in intoxicants, and in poisons.
Virtue, though formulated negatively in the precepts, is not a mere negative state.
To the contrary, it is most decidedly a powerful mental achievement.
To observe the precepts conscientiously in one's daily life brings a simultaneous growth in mental purity, skillfulness, and wisdom.
Refraining from killing, for example, increases compassion and loving-kindness for all living beings, two of the “sublime attitudes” extolled by the Buddha.
Honesty gives courage, generosity, and love of justice.
Sexual restraint results in physical strength, vitality, and keenness of the senses.
Truthfulness makes for uprightness.
Avoiding intoxicants and stupefying drugs promotes clarity of mind.
Finally, mindfulness is essential to observing all the precepts, and one's constant effort to maintain the precepts in turn issues in an increase in the clarity of mindfulness.
The habitual practice of the Five Precepts leads to increased self-control and strength of character.
The mind that succeeds in controlling desire, even to a slight degree, gains in power.
Desire is a force every bit as real as electricity.
When desire is uncontrolled, allowed to run riot, it expends itself in the pursuit of things that are harmful to oneself and others.
The Buddha's teaching, far from encouraging the proliferation of desire, counsels us in the methods by which we may harness, divert, and sublimate the powerful force of desire and use it for worthy ends.
Virtue is the first stage in the development of the Noble Eightfold Path; as explained above, it comprises the path factors of Right Speech, Right Action, and Right Livelihood.
The energy conserved by virtue is then used for the practice of the second stage, concentration of mind, which in turn is the soil for the growth of wisdom.
The observance of the Five Precepts is a voluntary act which each individual must take up on his or her own initiative.
The Buddha did not formulate the precepts as commandments, nor did he threaten anyone with punishment for violating them.
However, this much has to be said: The Buddha perfectly understood the workings of the universe, and he proclaimed the inviolable moral law of cause and effect: good deeds beget pleasant fruits, evil deeds beget painful fruits.
The Five Precepts are the guidelines the Buddha has bequeathed us to steer us away from evil conduct and towards the lines of conduct that will prove most beneficial for ourselves and others.
When we mold our actions by the Five Precepts, we are acting in accordance with the Dhamma, avoiding future misery and building up protection and happiness for ourselves and others both here and in the hereafter.
Thus the closer we live to the Five Precepts, the greater will be the blessing power of our lives.
An emotion is a state of deep feeling, an “inward stirring” which can act as a motivation for action.
Emotions are often associated with the instincts, the inborn tendencies to act in specific ways in specific situations.
Human beings are conditioned to a very great extent by their emotions, by their likes and dislikes.
Too often their emotions are biased by self-interest and egotism, even to the extent that they overwhelm sense and reason, compelling us to act in ways that, in saner moments, we regard with dismay.
Emotions generally arise in response to the spontaneous evaluation of perceptions.
A person evaluates his or her percepts — of another person, an object, a situation — as desirable or undesirable, as helpful or as threatening.
On the basis of this evaluation an emotion will arise in response to the situation: desire for those things positively evaluated, aversion or fear towards those things seen in a negative light.
Emotions may be harmful, such as lust, anger, and fear, or wholesome, such as sympathy and compassion.
While desire and aversion are the prototypes of the unwholesome emotions, loving-kindness and compassion are outstanding examples of emotions that ennoble us and elevate human nature.
People vary widely in their emotional development and in the range and strength of their emotions.
While one person is passionate and impulsive, another is cool and reflective; while one is quick to anger, another is patient; while one is emotionally impassive, another is capable of running through a wide range of emotions in less time than a finger snap.
One important reason for these differences is that each individual brings along a different kammic inheritance of tendencies and character traits from previous lives.
Whether emotions are repressed or expressed, indulged in or sublimated, depends on a combination of factors: innate temperament, family background, and the ethos and traditions of the larger society.
We cannot grow in the Dhamma or find happiness without some degree of emotional control.
A person who easily gets angry spoils his own happiness and disturbs the peace of mind of others as well.
Instinctive emotions are the raw material of character.
If an instinctive impulse is misdirected or repressed, much harm and suffering may ensue.
But if the energy that is normally channeled into this emotion is redirected towards a worthy object, the force of the emotion will be sublimated in a way that results in great benefit to oneself and to the community.
For the Buddhist, the worthiest of all ideals is the attainment of Nibbana; hence it is the quest for this ideal that has the capacity to absorb and transform our emotional life.
Such a noble ideal has the power of evoking and harmonizing all our emotional energies so that they guide us towards the realization of our ultimate good.
Without deliberate effort, emotions will not be under the direct control of the will.
The Buddhist training aims at mastering the emotions.
The first step in gaining such mastery is the observance of the Five Precepts.
Practicing the precepts in everyday life will help us to control the grosser forms of craving and emotion.
The next step is to train the mind to control the emotions just as they begin to arise.
This is accomplished by mindfulness: by objectively watching, with close attention, the emotions that arise and swiftly ascribing a name to them, a mental label thus: “mind with lust,” “mind with anger,” “mind with jealousy,” “mind with sorrow,” etc.
Once we have named the emotion, we are then in a better position to let it go, without being swept away by it.
The moment one calmly registers the fact that one is angry — when one is aware of the fact that a mind with anger has arisen — one then ceases to be angry.
A mind that is occupied with the wholesome thought of mindful awareness has no scope within it simultaneously for an unwholesome thought of anger.
This same procedure should be adopted with any other harmful emotion that arises.
At the start it may prove helpful if, during the course of the day, one mentally repeats to oneself a formula such as: “What am I feeling now?” or “What am I thinking now?” and immediately answers the question thus: “I am feeling angry,” or “I am feeling jealous,” etc.
We should also investigate, even later, when and why anger — or any other adverse emotion — overwhelmed us then, and thus avoid such situations and responses in the future.
By patient and persistent practice we can gradually gain control over our harmful emotions.
The discipline and effort involved is worthwhile, for it will bring greater harmony internally — in one's own mind — and externally, in one's relations with others.
The key to such control is firm adherence to the basic precepts of morality and, above all, mindfulness of one's own thoughts and emotions.
Buddhism teaches the need for clear thinking, self-control, self-help, and meditation.
Although each human being is endowed with a mind, very few of us use that mind to think for ourselves.
The great majority of people today allow others to do their thinking for them.
The mind absorbs a great deal of poison from the outer environment by continuous exposure to suggestions from others.
This mental passivity has become especially baneful with the development of the mass media.
Radio, television, and newspapers, pulp journals and tabloids, blare their messages at us every minute of the day, and their power of penetration is reinforced by the ingrained human disposition to accept what we are told and to comply with what we are urged to do.
Bombarded left and right by ten thousand inducements, we no longer think our own thoughts, feel our own emotions, or initiate our own actions; instead, we think as others want us to think, feel as others want us to feel, act in ways that will win the approval of our peers and superiors.
The pull of the crowd has become irresistible.
Every time we open a newspaper, turn on the radio, or sit down before the television set, we are immediately subjected to propaganda, advertising, and subtle social suggestions.
This is done daily, deliberately and systematically.
All these media are teaching us to suspend our capacity for thought, or if we are to think at all, to think as they would like us to think.
Newspapers, for instance, seek to command assent not only by their editorials and opinion columns, but by their layout, language, and lines of emphasis.
Those who exploit the media in this manner are generally small but powerful groups: the owners and sponsors of the media, advertising agencies, the masters of commerce.
Such people are motivated primarily by self-interest, greed for wealth and power, a sense of self-importance.
Often they play dominant roles in various walks of life, including politics, business, law, medicine, and education.
Among the general public the role of reason tends to be subordinate to that of emotion, while mental inertia and indifference make the conquest of reason easier.
Hence, by shaping public opinion through the manipulation of the media, a small minority is able to control the majority.
Those who comprise this small but powerful minority all have something to sell.
Commercial advertisements make us want more and more goods that bring us no real happiness, no real peace of mind.
We are told that our felicity depends on having a radio, television, video player, stereo set, and computer games.
Yet, however much we deck ourselves with all these instruments of diversion, we still feel our lives painfully lacking.
The speed, power, and efficiency of all these technological and social developments within a purely materialistic society such as ours has led to a rising incidence of stress disease and mental breakdown.
Those who do not crack under pressure find other escape routes, such as drugs, alcohol, and psychotic cults, while for those who cannot cope at all there remains the last resort: suicide, which has reached alarming proportions in our midst.
How then is a Buddhist to protect himself or herself from the baneful influences to which we are everywhere exposed in the modern world?
As lay Buddhists we should always adopt a critical attitude towards the written and spoken word and should always apply mindfulness to protect ourselves from being emotionally swayed by those who seek to win our favor.
We should stand back from the topic under review and examine it objectively from all angles.
Only after appraising the alternatives should we arrive at a decision or evaluation.
When we hear a particular opinion being voiced, we should make an effort to find out who the writer or speaker is, what interests he or she represents, including political affiliations, religious leanings, and social background.
We should also never forget that there are at least two sides to any issue, and that we are more likely to arrive at a correct stand if we first give unbiased consideration to both sides.
Before arriving at a conclusion, one should gather all the relevant facts, maintain a calm mind free from emotional excitation, and prevent oneself from being swayed by preferences and anger, praise and blame.
The same principle of objective thinking should also be applied to other matters in everyday life.
If we properly understand the working of kamma and rebirth, we will recognize that no one can be alike, and thus we will also avoid drawing comparisons; for this is a world of comparisons as well as of propaganda.
The only meaningful comparison that one should make is between the person that one was a month ago, a year ago, or a decade ago, and the person that one is now: physically, intellectually, morally, and financially.
If there has been no improvement, or insufficient improvement, one should inquire why this is so and remedy one's deficiencies without delay.
If this annual stocktaking is done regularly, it will be most beneficial.
Putting aside pride and prejudice, revising one's values and outlook, one will then lead a simpler, saner, and happier life.
For the adult it is natural to love one person of the opposite sex.
The lay Buddhist will recognize that there is nothing “sinful” or shameful in sex, and hence will not suffer from a guilt complex over sexual desire.
At the same time he or she will be aware that sexual desire, like any other form of desire, must be regulated and controlled to avoid harm to oneself and to others.
In a successful marriage the contracting parties must realize that love is a sentiment far wider than sexual attraction.
If one person really loves another, he or she has to learn to give without expecting anything in return.
Only in this way can the problem of sex be solved satisfactorily.
Further, the would-be partners should ask themselves, “What do I expect of my partner?” and should find out objectively to what extent the prospective partner has the requisite qualities.
One might enlist the help of a trustworthy, balanced friend who has known the would-be partner for some time and might be in a better position to offer a correct evaluation.
There are obvious dangers in being one's own marriage broker.
Too often one is inclined to endow the would-be partner with qualities and virtues that she clearly lacks in the eyes of the unbiased observer.
This danger has to be frankly acknowledged, for disillusionment might otherwise set in sooner or later, and then the stage is set for marital discontent and misery.
No doubt, in married life sex is important, but it must be kept in its proper place, as an expression of marital love.
Sex is by no means the sole concern of married life; only when it is subordinated to personal love and affection does sexuality provide a truly satisfying emotional experience.
Above and beyond sexual compatibility, a happy marriage calls for mutual understanding and adjustments, for sacrifices and selflessness, for tolerance and patience.
Married life becomes truly a blessing rather than a curse when it is viewed as a partnership of two persons who are committed to think more of the partnership than they do of themselves, who are ready to make the mutual effort necessary to attain harmony and contentment.
Most married couples hope to have children.
Children differ, for each brings his or her own kammic inheritance from many past lives, a kammic inheritance that includes potential tendencies that set the general tone and trend of the child's character.
This fact indicates both the responsibilities and the limitations of the parents in the upbringing of their children.
The child spends most of the formative years of his or her life at home, and early in life learns to follow by imitation the values and lifestyle of the parents.
Schools and other influential agencies cannot supplant or replace the parents.
Buddhist parents should recognize their solemn obligation to serve as models for their children.
They should therefore regularly observe the Five Precepts and show their children by example that the Dhamma yet lives and rules their daily lives.
Parents must be aware that the child has immense potentials for both good and evil, and thus must fulfill their responsibility to help the child to develop his or her potential for good and to check the potential for evil.
It is only if parents bestow their loving care and attention on their child that the child will be able to satisfy the hopes and aspirations of the parents.
The Buddha has advised parents to guide their children, to supply their needs, to see to their education, to give them in marriage at the proper time, and to attend to all other aspects of their well-being.
Unfortunately, however, many parents today do not discharge these duties, with the result that too often children go astray.
Responsible Buddhist parents must be prepared to forgo their own pleasure in order to attend to the upbringing of their children.
They must realize that the home influence is ultimately what matters most in forming the child's character, outweighing all other outside influences to which the child may be exposed.
In areas where the parents lack adequate expertise, they should be prepared to consult a non-technical manual on proper child rearing.
The first five years of a child's life are the most crucial in the formation of his or her character, and it is at this stage that they are most susceptible to the influence of the parents.
Thereafter the needs of the child change, and will continue to change radically at different stages of development.
Parents should remember this and meet the new needs as they arise.
In the early years three factors are essential for balanced and wholesome growth: parental love and affection; a stable home environment; and scope for creative activity and personal initiative.
Young children learn largely by imitation.
If parents show emotional maturity, avoid quarrels, respect and trust each other, and do likewise with their children, then the children will develop characters that are sound both morally and psychologically.
When the child is brought up with love and understanding, with insight into his or her changing needs, nourished with high ideals and lofty aspirations, then he or she will have a secure foundation upon which to build a character and a future.
In this way the very first steps along the Buddha's path will have been well planted.
Adolescence is a period of stress and strain, when children may be inclined to rebel against parental authority.
It is therefore at this stage that the greatest love and understanding are called for.
In adolescence, as the sexual instinct awakens, sensible Buddhist parents should be capable of guiding their children and helping them to adjust to the changes taking place in their bodies and their lives.
When children ask their parents questions about sex, the parents should be ready to answer them calmly and briefly in a matter-of-fact way, just as they would answer any other question.
If parents are unable to tell the adolescent children the facts of life in an unself-conscious manner they might give them a suitable book to enable them to instruct themselves about the subject.
Above all, in this age of sexually provocative entertainment, irresponsible promiscuity, and an exploding AIDS epidemic, withholding vital information is not a means of protecting the youngster but of exposing him or her to danger.
When parental control, supervision, and proper guidance are lacking, the children often incline to delinquency and drugs.
Parents should therefore take greater interest in their children, should spend more time with them, should know how they use their leisure, and should make the acquaintance of their friends.
Real problem children are few; it is only problem parents who are many.
As the child reaches maturity it is the duty of the parents to help him wisely choose a suitable career as well as a mate, but the child's wishes in these spheres have to be respected.
To order the young person about as if he or she were still a child is only to invite trouble.
Since we live in a world of keen competition in many areas of life, wise Buddhist parents will limit the size of their family in order to give their children the best.
In developing countries like Sri Lanka, where the rate of reproduction is generally higher than the rate of production of real wealth, this is a necessary measure to eliminate poverty, especially among the working classes in both town and countryside, whose families are generally large with many dependants.
Buddhism is not opposed to population control, except by means of abortion, and with the world's resources dwindling today under dense population pressure, Buddhist parents should recognize the need for family limitation to ensure the best for the children.
In a country like Sri Lanka it is the duty of the state to popularize family limitation by making freely available safe, effective, and inexpensive methods of birth control.
Production that is centered on the population at large — rather than on enhancing the wealth of a privileged few — using appropriate technology, with just distribution of resources and extensive family planning, will increase real wealth and help to improve the quality of life of the masses, provided they also cultivate a wise sense of values.
Otherwise they will always remain poor.
The moral and spiritual edification of the children should accompany their physical and emotional development.
As they grow up, parents should teach them the essentials of the Buddha-Dhamma, using simple language and everyday examples.
They should explain the working of the moral law of kamma and rebirth, should instruct them in the proper rules of conduct, and should clarify the reasons for practicing virtue in daily life.
Furthermore, in a Buddhist country children should be regularly taken to the temple, especially on quiet days.
They should be enrolled in Dhamma school if such is available, and should be encouraged to ask their questions and discuss their problems with wise and virtuous bhikkhus.
The Dhamma, after all, is intended to guide us in how to live this very life we are leading now.
It is the art of happiness here and now, and the path to deliverance in the hereafter.
Materialism is steadily eroding traditional values, moral, spiritual, and social.
The influence of materialism now reaches even the remote villages, the ancient strongholds of the Buddhist way of life.
But young people who have been rightly brought up by Buddhist parents to discover the value of the Dhamma for themselves are unlikely to be led astray.
The desire to do good, to bring about the happiness and well-being of others, is effectively cultivated in Buddhism by the systematic practice of the four “sublime attitudes”: loving-kindness, compassion, altruistic joy, and equanimity.
By cultivating these qualities a Buddhist can gradually remove the mental defilements such as hatred, cruelty, and envy, and bring into being the most exalted virtues.
The sublime attitudes elevate human beings to a divine-like stature; they break the barriers that separate individuals and groups; they build bridges more solid than those constructed of stone and steel.
Metta is goodwill, loving-kindness, universal love; a feeling of friendliness and heartfelt concern for all living beings, human or non-human, in all situations.
The chief mark of metta is a benevolent attitude: a keen desire to promote the welfare of others.
Metta subdues the vice of hatred in all its varied shades: anger, ill-will, aversion, and resentment.
The Buddha said:
This stanza is of special significance to us in this nuclear era when the most appalling destructiveness has erupted all over the globe.
Peace will never be achieved by meeting force with force, bombs with bombs, violence with retaliation.
Metta or loving-kindness is the only effective answer to violence and destructiveness, whether by conventional weapons or nuclear missiles.
Karuna is the attitude conveyed by such terms as compassion, sympathy, pity, and mercy.
Its basic characteristic is sympathy for all who suffer, and it arouses a desire to relieve or remove the pain and suffering of others.
Karuna helps to eliminate callousness and indifference to others' woes.
It is the direct antidote to cruelty, another vice common in the world today.
It is compassion that prompts one to serve others selflessly, expecting nothing, not even gratitude, in return.
Mudita is altruistic joy, appreciative joy: the desire to see others rejoicing in their happiness, the ability to share the happiness and success of others.
This attitude is the complement of karuna: while karuna shares the sorrow of others, mudita shares their joy.
Mudita is the direct antidote to envy.
Envy arises over the good fortune of others: it resents those who achieve position, prestige, power, and success.
But one who practices mudita will not only be happy when others do well, but will try to promote their progress and welfare.
Hence this attitude is of vital importance for achieving social concord and peace.
Upekkha, the last of the four sublime attitudes, is equanimity.
Upekkha establishes an even or balanced mind in an unbalanced world with fluctuating fortunes and circumstances: gain and loss, fame and ill-repute, praise and blame, pleasure and pain.
Upekkha also looks upon all beings impartially, as heirs to the results of their own actions, without attachment or aversion.
Upekkha is the serene neutrality of the one who knows.
The constant, methodical, and deliberate cultivation of these sublime virtues in everyday life transforms the attitudes and outlook of the practitioner.
They should be the foundation of all Buddhist social action, as well as of individual and collective peace and harmony.
Buddhist social welfare work may take many forms, but what is most essential is the spirit in which it is performed.
This spirit should be marked by the subordination of the private good to the good of the whole.
For Buddhist social work to be of real value, action should spring from genuine love, sympathy, and understanding for one's fellow humans, guided by knowledge and training.
Welfare work should be the perfect expression of compassion, untouched by condescension, washed clean of pride — even of the pride of doing good.
It should be a sheer manifestation of the brotherhood of all human beings.
The four sublime attitudes should be diligently cultivated with unremitting effort by every true follower of the Master.
These qualities never become obsolete.
They convey a universal message which transforms us into universal human beings.
Mind occupies the pre-eminent place in Buddhism, for everything that one says or does first arises in the mind as a thought.
To have a well-trained mind is indeed to possess a treasure.
When a person trains the mind, turns inward to examine and cleanse his own mind, he will find therein a vast storehouse of happiness.
Real happiness is a quality of the mind which has to be sought and found in the mind.
The Buddha teaches that non-attachment to worldly pleasures is a greater happiness than the enjoyment of worldly pleasures.
Nibbana is the highest happiness, the happiness of relief from suffering and from repeated birth, and this happiness is only to be attained by freeing the mind from its defilements.
The misguided worldling thinks otherwise.
In his view the enjoyment of sensual pleasures is the only real happiness.
He forgets, however, that sensual happiness arises merely from the gratification of desire, and thus that this happiness must fade when the desired object is obtained.
Nor will the multiplication of desires make sensual pleasure permanent, for there is no permanence in the passing.
The pursuit of sensual pleasures ends only in restlessness and dissatisfaction.
The aim of Buddhist mental culture is to gain direct intuitive knowledge of the real nature of existence by systematic training of the mind through meditation.
This practice issues in detachment and thus frees the mind from its delusions.
Meditation leads the mind from the pain-laden things of the world to the sorrowless, transcendent state of deliverance, Nibbana.
The basic cause of rebirth and suffering is ignorance of the true nature of life.
We consider what is passing, unsatisfactory, and empty to be permanent, a source of true happiness, and substantial.
This delusion sustains the craving for more existence and leads to the accumulation of kamma.
Meditation is designed to lead step-by-step to the dissolution of these delusions and thereby to freedom from the grip of craving.
There are two kinds of meditation recognized in Buddhism: the development of tranquillity, which emphasizes concentration, and the development of insight, which emphasizes wisdom.
These two types of meditation respectively correspond to the second and third groups of the Noble Eightfold Path, the concentration group and the wisdom group.
Concentration means one-pointedness of the mind, the ability to fix the mind on a single object to the exclusion of all else.
Concentration is not an end in itself, but to be developed primarily because it is the basis for wisdom, the ability to see things exactly as they are.
It is this wisdom that frees the mind from bondage.
To train the mind is not at all easy, for the mind has long been accustomed to flow in the channels of greed, hatred, and delusion; through ages we have relished sense pleasures, raged with anger, wallowed in torpor, fidgeted restlessly, and vacillated with doubt.
Such habits are indeed difficult to break.
Moreover, it is the very nature of the untrained mind to wander from one idea to another.
Thus when the meditator sits down to begin the practice, strange thoughts may dance before his mind.
To overcome these disturbances, the Buddha has taught five methods of expelling distracting thoughts:
At the outset meditation will be a continual effort to pull the mind back whenever it strays from the subject of meditation.
It will seem impossible to focus the attention on the selected subject for more than a few seconds at a stretch.
With continued practice, however, one will refine one's skills until one can keep the mind focused steadily and calmly on the chosen topic for increasingly longer periods.
Then the practice becomes more engaging, more rewarding, and also less tiring.
Eventually one's efforts will culminate in one-pointedness of mind, samadhi.
With the attainment of the one-pointed mind, the meditator turns this pure, steady, clear mind to the contemplation of existence itself.
This marks the beginning of vipassana-bhavana, the meditative development of insight.
The meditator mindfully investigates his own compound of the “five aggregates.” He sees that the body, or form, is made up of changing physical qualities, while mind itself consists of fleeting mental factors: feeling, perception, mental formations, and consciousness.
He sees that these all occur in mutual dependence, all in a flow.
There is no substantial self, no immortal soul within them to be called “I” or “mine.” As the impermanence, the unsatisfactoriness, and the selfless nature of the five aggregates become manifest to the meditator, he realizes that nothing conditioned is worth clinging to; for everything conditioned is fleeting, and in the fleeting it is impossible to find stable happiness.
This is pañña, wisdom, the third and final stage in the Noble Eightfold Path.
With the development of wisdom, ignorance ceases in all its forms and shades.
Craving and kamma, the fuel for the flame of becoming, is exhausted, and no more fresh fuel is supplied.
Hence the flame of existence burns out for lack of fuel.
When such a person who has reached the goal passes away, he no longer takes rebirth in any realm of becoming.
He has attained Nibbana, the Deathless.
Mindfulness of breathing is an excellent subject of meditation particularly useful to the busy layperson, as it can be practiced safely by anyone, anywhere, at any time.
To practice this type of meditation, one should first adopt a seated meditation posture.
Those who can sit comfortably in full lotus or half-lotus posture may adopt those positions; those who find this difficult may assume any cross-legged sitting posture that enables them to hold upright the upper part of the body; those who find even this difficult may sit on a straight-backed chair.
The torso should be held erect but not stiff; the hands should be placed one over the other on the lap; and the feet should rest on the floor.
The meditator should then breathe calmly and naturally, mentally following the whole breath in and out without a break in attentiveness.
At the outset one should simply breathe in and out without reflecting about it.
One may fix the attention on the nostrils or upper lip, wherever the breath is felt most distinctly as one breathes in and out.
There the attention should remain.
As one proceeds with the observation of the breath, one becomes more and more deeply concentrated upon it.
One then feels light in body and mind, very calm and peaceful; one may even feel as if one were floating in the air.
When strong calm is established and the mind becomes one-pointed, one may then turn one's attention towards the development of insight, aiming to gain direct insight into the true nature of existence.
This type of meditation, when successful, leads by stages to the realization of Nibbana.
Apart from its ultimate benefits, mindfulness of breathing has an immediate value that can be seen in one's daily life.
It promotes detachment and objectivity.
It allows one the mental distance needed to arrive at wise decisions in the countless difficulties of daily life.
Regular practice of this meditation brings increased concentration and self-control, improved mindfulness, and is also conducive to healthy and relaxed living.
Death is the only absolutely certain thing in life, yet how many of us plan for it and prepare ourselves adequately in advance to face it calmly?
All human beings must die.
The body disintegrates, breaks apart, and turns to ashes and dust.
The only thing we own that remains with us beyond death is our kamma, our intentional deeds.
Our deeds continue, bringing into being a new form of life until all craving is extinguished.
We are born and evolve according to the quality of our kamma.
Good deeds will produce a good rebirth, bad deeds a bad rebirth.
The materialistic view that a human being is merely a biological result of the union of sperm and ovum which utterly terminates in death is inadequate as a total explanation of human life.
Nature and nurture, heredity and the environment, cannot by themselves explain, for example, why twins born of the same parents, physically almost identical, enjoying equal privileges, brought up in the same environment, often exhibit widely different characteristics, mental, moral, and emotional.
Moreover, science would meet difficulties accounting for the existence of infant prodigies and the recollection of past lives, particularly by children.
A realistic Buddhist, knowing that death is inevitable, plans for it and trains himself to face it with equanimity.
He also knows that the best way to plan for death is to lead a virtuous and upright life.
Thus the devoted Buddhist regularly observes the Five Precepts, performs many kind and generous acts, and endeavors to lessen his greed and hate.
The fact that one has led a blameless life will be an added solace and source of strength at death.
The fear of death then loses its force and sting.
In preparing for death, a householder should fulfill his obligations to his family, to others, and to his religion.
In practice, this means leaving behind a sufficient income for one's family, making out a proper last will, planning one's own funeral arrangements, and providing funds for the maintenance of virtuous and learned monks who observe the rules of discipline and who can preach the correct Dhamma.
The Buddha teaches his lay followers, as well as the monks and nuns, that they should often reflect on the inevitability of death: “Death is certain, life is uncertain”.
These words are a clarion call reminding us of the need to put our own house in order, morally and philosophically, without delay, and to face each day as if it were our last.
The world of today would indeed be a happier and safer place to live if people the world over would only pay heed to this call.
The preceding sections of this essay will help the Buddhist lay follower to understand, from a practical angle, the main points of the Buddha's teachings as they bear on the conduct of daily life.
Constant practice of these principles will ensure that they are built into his character, enabling him to develop into a well-rounded human being, a center of sanity in a confused world adrift in fashionable philosophies full of empty promises.
At the very minimum a lay follower of the Buddha must keep the Five Precepts, which enables him to develop virtue in regard to his bodily and verbal behavior.
But one should not stop with this.
One who seeks the true perfection of happiness must also attend to the cultivation of the mind.
One must be mindful of the arising of unwholesome states such as greed, anger, and delusion, and know how to deal with them effectively when they threaten to throw one off balance.
One should proceed even further and attempt to cultivate the mind systematically through the practice of meditation for tranquillity and insight.
The society in which we live is a reflection of the minds of the human beings who have created that society.
If our society has become corrupt, rife with immorality, and destructive of the higher potentials of human nature, that is because the people who comprise that society have allowed themselves to drift into corrupt and immoral states of mind.
The quality of a society inevitably rests on the quality of the lives led by the persons who make up that society.
One single individual may not be able to change the whole society for the better.
But each one of us can, at any rate, transform the world of our own mind.
How is this to be done?
By observing the Five Precepts flawlessly, by being as mindful as possible in everyday life, by cleansing the mind of its blemishes, by cultivating the four sublime states, by meditating energetically every day, by listening to discourses on the Dhamma and clarifying one's doubts about the teaching.
By following these guidelines one is sure to reap their fruits: peace of mind, contentment, the absence of inner conflicts even in the midst of our confusing and chaotic world.
A good Buddhist should ever seek the opportunity to do deeds of mercy, kindness, and charity.
He should be keen on helping those less fortunate than himself.
When practicing giving, however, one should give with discrimination, as the Buddha advises: viceyya danam databbam.
Thus the most needy will be benefited with the things they need most.
A good Buddhist should set apart a few minutes every day to review the day's happenings, and to see whether or not he has strayed from the Master's teachings.
If so, he should inquire why he has done so in order to avoid a future repetition.
Methodical reading on the Dhamma will also help one to put the whole of life into the right perspective.
It is a useful habit to read daily an inspiring discourse of the Buddha, such as the Maha-Mangala Sutta, or to recite some verses of the Dhammapada and reflect for a few moments on their relevance to one's own life.
Doing so will help one to forget one's trifling worries and troubles, to clarify one's thinking, and to recall the ultimate values and truths upon which one should build one's life.
The Buddha's teachings consist of virtue, concentration, and wisdom.
Only with their practice will the Buddha-Dhamma flourish; when they are neglected, the Buddha-Dhamma will decline.
This fact should always be remembered by those who are anxious to avert the decline and disappearance of the Sasana.
As religion withers the world over, more and more attention is paid to empty rites, rituals, and ceremonies, while little or no attention is paid to the actual practice of the principles of religion as they bear on real life.
It is this, however, that matters most.
By following the above guidelines, a good Buddhist will grow in all aspects of the Dhamma.
These guidelines will help to mold one's whole personality, to instil the true principles of the Dhamma into one's understanding, to train the emotions and to discipline the will.
Doing so will conduce to the ultimate best interest of oneself, and help one to make one's life a blessing for others as well.
Robert Bogoda was born in in Colombo, the business capital of Sri Lanka.
His secondary education was cut short by the sudden demise of his father, which compelled him to work at a modest job as a teacher.
While engaged in teaching, he obtained by self study the B.Sc.
and M.Sc.
degrees from the University of London, specializing in Social Administration.
Now retired, he pursues his interests in Buddhism and social welfare.
The essay “A Simple Guide to Life” was written against this background.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
At.
a.m.
Japanese time, on August th, a U.S.
plane dropped a bomb named “Little Boy” over the center of the city of Hiroshima.
The total number of people who were killed immediately and in the following months was probably close to,.
Some claim that this bomb and the one which fell on Nagasaki ended the war quickly and saved American and Japanese lives — a consequentialist theory to justify horrific violence against innocent civilians.
Others say the newly developed weapons had to be tested as a matter of necessity.
Hiroshima and Nagasaki ushered in a new age.
Humankind's tendency towards conflict and violence can now wipe out the entire human habitat.
The weapon used on Hiroshima had a destructive force of.
kilotons; a contemporary cruise missile has the power of kilotons.
All war, violence and conflict at national and international levels in the last quarter of the twentieth century has thus taken on sinister proportions.
It is not that human nature has changed but that the resources at our disposal have.
No country is free from the threat of nuclear annihilation; no country is free from internal conflict and the barrel of the gun.
It is against the urgency of this background that the teachings of Buddhism about violence must be studied and interpreted.
Excerpts such as the following have been extracted and used to sum up the Buddhist attitude to this issue:
These verses would seem to indicate a clearly defined Buddhist perspective.
Yet such text extraction can lead to misrepresentation if not undergirded with a strong supporting framework.
Furthermore, if Buddhism has a message for a violent world, it must do more than condemn violence.
It must be able to interpret its nature, its roots, its hold on the world and the possibilities for its transformation.
It must dialogue with other philosophies and ideologies such as utilitarianism, scientific socialism and the belief in a just or “holy” war.
For instance, utilitarianism still lives among those who believe that violence can be justified if more people will benefit than will be hurt, and the consequentialist theory mentioned with reference to Hiroshima is similar to this.
Then there are those who hold that certain forms of injustice and exploitation can only be destroyed through violence and that history will justify its legitimacy.
The view that violent change is a historical inevitability is close to this.
Buddhism must be able to comment on the stance which argues that if Hitler had been assassinated early in his career numerous deaths would have been avoided, or the claim that force is justified against a government which is using violence against its people under the pretext of law.
If it cannot, it will stand accused of irrelevance.
In this study, I define violence as that which harms, debases, dehumanizes or brutalizes human beings, animals or the natural world; and the violent person, as one who causes harm in speech or action, either directly or indirectly, or whose mind is filled with such thoughts.
The approach will be scriptural, and the resource I use will be the Pali texts.
The basic issue I investigate is what this resource says on the subject of violence.
Identity is not assumed between the sixth century B.and the twentieth century A.D.
Rather, the potential of the scriptures of any religion to provide guidelines for action and models for contemporary interpretation is recognized.
Hence, the following specific questions will provide the framework for my study:
For what reasons do the texts condemn violence or call it into question?
What do they see to be the roots of violence?
Do the texts give any guidelines for the eradication of violence in the individual or in society?
The sermons of the Buddha, as they have been handed down to us, are replete with details about the contemporary realities of the times.
They reveal much about the social contexts within which the Buddha moved and the faces of society with which he was familiar.
The Canki Sutta shows a brahman overlord insisting that the Buddha is equal to him in birth, riches and the knowledge of the Vedas.
He continues:
Important here is the reference to kings.
The texts show clearly that the Buddha had an intimate knowledge of statecraft.
Records of his conversations with Pasenadi and Bimbisara show him speaking in a language which those involved in government could understand.
Pasenadi, for instance, comes through as a man torn between his duties as king, involving some degree of ruthlessness, and his concern for spiritual things.
At one moment, he is seen preparing a sacrifice in which many animals are to be slaughtered and menials beaten and, at another, speaking seriously with the Buddha about the dangers of wealth, power and evil conduct.
What is significant is the level of knowledge shown by the Buddha about the pressures on a king such as Pasenadi.
His use of similes and illustrations, for instance, appeals to Pasenadi's experience, including the central concern of all rulers at that time — defense against aggression.
At one point Pasenadi asks about the value of gifts and to whom a gift should be given for the gift to bear much fruit.
The Buddha replies:
The Buddha thus uses similes from Pasenadi's military world to indicate that virtue does not depend on birth but on qualities of character.
In fact, in a number of texts, illustrations drawn from the context of the state, defense and martial arts can be found.
Not only does the Buddha make use of military metaphors, but the texts show that he had extensive knowledge of the strategies of war, punishment and political patronage.
The Mahadukkhakkhandha Sutta, for instance, uses graphic description to show that war and conflict spring from sensual desires:
And again, monks, when sense pleasures are the cause… having taken sword and shield, having girded on bow and quiver, they leap on to the newly daubed ramparts, and arrows are hurled and knives are hurled and swords are flashing.
Those who wound with arrows and wound with knives and pour boiling cow-dung over them and crush them with the portcullis and decapitate them with their swords, these suffer dying then and pain like unto dying.
In the next part of the sutta, a variety of horrific punishments are described and a keen awareness of their nature is seen:
In another sermon handed down to us, two men are pointed out while the Buddha is talking to a headman, Pataliya.
One of them is garlanded and well-groomed; the other is tightly bound, about to lose his head.
We are told that the same deed has been committed by both.
The difference is that the former has killed the foe of the king and has been rewarded for it, whilst the latter was the king's enemy.
Hence it is stressed that the laws of the state are not impartial: they can mete out punishment or patronage according to the wish of the king and his cravings for revenge or security.
It cannot be argued that the Buddha was ignorant of the political realities of his day.
He spurned frivolous talk about such things as affairs of state but he was neither indifferent to them nor uninformed.
On the contrary, his concern for the human predicament made him acutely aware of the potential for violence within the economic and political forces around him.
The political milieu of rival republics and monarchies in northern India forms a backdrop to his teaching, whether the rivalries between the kingdoms of Kosala and Magadha or the struggles of the republics to maintain their traditions and their independence in the face of the rising monarchies.
However, the violence attached to politics and statecraft forms one section only of the picture which emerges from the texts.
Violence is detected in the brahmanical sacrificial system, in the austerities practiced by some wanderers, and in the climate of philosophical dispute among the many sramana groupings as well as in the area of social discrimination and the economic order.
Religion, to take this first, is seen as a cause of physical, verbal and mental violence.
The violence inflicted through sacrifices is described thus:
In contrast, the sramana groupings within this period eschewed sacrifice.
Denying the authority of the Vedas and a realm of gods to be manipulated, their emphasis was on renunciation, the gaining of insight and philosophical debate.
Nevertheless, a form of violence was present.
The austerities practiced by some of those who came to the Buddha were worse than any enemy might inflict as punishment.
The Buddha himself confessed to having practiced them before his enlightenment.
In the Maha-Saccaka and the Maha-sihanada Suttas there is vivid description of the excesses undertaken.
Taken together, the two suttas cover the complete range of contemporary Indian practices, which included nakedness or the wearing of rags, tree-bark fiber, kusa grass, wood shavings or human hair; deprivation of food to the extent of existing on a single fruit or rice grain; self-mortification through lying on thorns or exposing the body to extremes of heat and cold; copying the habits of animals such as walking on all fours or eating similar food.
It was the Buddha's view that such practices were a form of violence, although undertaken in the name of religion and truth-seeking.
Undertaken also in the name of truth were verbal battles between different groups of wanderers.
The Buddha's followers, in fact, were frequently at the receiving end of an aggressive campaign by other groups to ridicule their beliefs.
The description of these incidents gives useful evidence of the prevailing atmosphere.
In the Udumbarika Sihanada Sutta, Nigrodha the Jain claims:
In the Kassapa Sihanada Sutta, the Buddha speaks out:
Violence of state and violence in the name of religion were two faces of the Buddha's society.
Violence within the economic order was another.
The sixth century B.in India witnessed urbanization and commercial growth.
Savatthi, Saketa, Kosambhi, Benares, Rajagaha and Champa would have been some of the most important centers known to the Buddha, who spent much time in urban environments.
As Trevor Ling argues in his study, The Buddha, the growth of these cities spawned individualism and competition in response to changing economic patterns and social dislocation.
The potentially violent tensions generated are reflected in the Buddha's teachings through such themes as the rightful gaining of wealth, the place of service and work, correct duties towards employees, and the wise choosing of friends.
For instance, a Samyutta Nikaya text contains a conversation between Rasiya the Headman and the Buddha.
The Buddha speaks out against those who gain wealth by unlawful means, especially with violence.
Then, in the Sigalovada Sutta, the Buddha outlines rights and duties for the different social relationships in society.
An employer is advised to: assign work according to the strength of the employee; supply food and wages; tend workers in sickness; share with them unusual delicacies; grant them leave.
The same sutta comments on friendship and says that four foes in the likeness of friends should be avoided: a rapacious person, a man of words not deeds, the flatterer and the fellow-waster.
The study of what the Early Buddhist texts say about violence must be seen against this background of political violence and social change.
The empiricism of Early Buddhism also demands this — the Buddha's appeal to what is observed in society as a basis for evaluating the truth of his teachings.
The analysis of historical context calls into question whether any philosophy or thought system can have universal relevance.
Since the human situation across the permutations of history is indeed subject to change, the issue is a valid one.
Yet there is also a continuity in evolution such that parallels can be drawn between the forces at work in the sixth century B.and those operating in the latter part of the twentieth century.
The sixth century B.is not identical to the twentieth but neither is it completely different.
The teaching of Early Buddhism on violence, therefore, should not be used as if there were either identity or utter separateness.
In each new context and historical period, there is a need for re-interpretation and re-evaluation.
At this point, it is enough to stress that the texts reveal much about Indian society at the time of the Buddha and about the Buddha's own breadth of awareness.
It cannot be argued that he had no knowledge of the violence within his own society or that his words were divorced from the tensions around him.
On the contrary, their import drew urgency from contemporary observable reality.
Central to Buddhism's approach to the analysis of social phenomena is the doctrine of paticca samuppada or dependent origination, which can be expressed thus:
Events and tendencies within the material world are interpreted from the standpoint of causality.
Phenomena are conditioned.
Buddhism, therefore, calls for an analytical attitude in dealing with anything to do with human life, including the question of violence.
One consequence which flows from this is that generalizations and statements based on categories of pure reason are suspect.
Evidence can be drawn from the suttas to show that the Buddha insisted on making discriminations when presented with dogmatically held views.
For instance, in the Subha Sutta, Subha comes out with the view that a householder is accomplishing the right path and one who has renounced is not.
The Buddha replies: “On this point, brahman youth, I discriminate, on this point I do not speak definitely.” He stresses that both householder and the one who has renounced can be living wrongly; both can be living rightly.
The deciding factor is not the label, but rightness of action, speech and thought.
A similar approach can be seen in the Esukari Sutta where the Buddha speaks about service.
In this case, the deciding factor as to whether a person should serve is whether the one who serves is better for the service in terms of such things as growing in moral habit and wisdom.
Then, when faced with the question of sacrifice by the brahman Ujjaya, there is again discrimination according to condition.
Not every sacrifice is blameworthy.
Where living creatures are not killed or where the sacrifice is an offering for the welfare of the family, there is no blame: “No, brahman, I do not praise every sacrifice.
Yet, I would not withhold praise from every sacrifice.” The deciding factor here is the presence of suffering for animals.
Paticca samuppada opposes the human tendency to generalize and encourages analysis on the basis of empirical data and moral values applied to these.
It criticizes standpoints which use inappropriate categories through insufficient observation and dogmatic statements about right and wrong which do not take empirically observed facts into account.
To understand Early Buddhism's analysis of violence, this conditionality is important.
When the Buddha speaks about the causes and the remedies of violence, his approach is dependent on the conditions prevalent in a particular situation.
For instance, psychological factors are not emphasized when the Buddha is speaking to those in power about societal disruption; social and economic causes are stressed instead.
Yet, in other contexts, particularly when monks are addressed, it is the psychological factor which is given prominence.
In contrast again, with King Pasenadi, the Buddha does not condemn violence in defense of the realm but places it within the larger context of impermanence and death to encourage reflection.
It is possible to hold together the above divergent emphases if we bear in mind the full implications of conditionality and the empiricism of Early Buddhism.
We should not expect dogmatic, non-empirical generalizations.
For instance, if craving is to be posited as the root of much violence, it would not follow that every situation was conditioned by tanha in the same way or that the remedy in each situation would be identical.
Likewise, it would not follow that what was incumbent on one type of person in one situation would be incumbent on all sections of society in all contexts.
Before looking more closely at what is said about the roots of violence, it is worth drawing out reasons given in the texts for the avoidance, questioning or non-espousal of violence.
Interconnected frameworks emerge: nibbana as the goal of the spiritual life; the demands of metta and karuna; the need for peace, concord and harmony within society.
Since the ultimate goal of the spiritual path for the Buddhist is nibbana, attitudes towards violence must first be seen in relation to it.
Nibbana is the ultimate eradication of dukkha.
It is a possible goal within this life and, among other things, involves a complete de-toxification of the mind from greed, hatred and delusion, a revolution in the way the world is perceived, freedom from craving and liberation from the delusion of ego.
The Therigatha or Songs of the Sisters contain some of the most moving testimonies to this reality; they are paeans of joy about liberation:
Nibbana and samsara are antithetical.
One is the ceasing of the other.
In the context of the goal of nibbana, actions, thoughts and words can be evaluated as to whether they build samsara or lead to nibbana: whether they are unskilled or skilled.
Indulgence in violence is normally deemed akusala.
In other words, it cannot lead to the goal of nibbana.
In the Ambalatthika-Rahulovada Sutta, the Buddha says to the Venerable Rahula:
Harm to others is central to what is unskilled.
In the Sallekha Sutta advice is given to monks about the cleansing of the mind as the basis of spiritual progress.
Foremost among the thoughts which have to be cleansed are those connected with harming and violence; both represent unskilled states which lead downwards:
When the Buddha is in conversation with Bhaddiya, sarambha is added to lobha, dosa and moha as a defilement which flows from them.
Sarambha can be translated as “accompanied by violence.” As the mind filled with lobha, dosa and moha is led to actions which are akusala, so is the mind filled with the violence which accompanies the triad.
All lead to a person's loss:
The point of the above suttas is that violent action and violent thought, actions which harm and debase others and thoughts which contemplate the same, stand in the way of spiritual growth and the self-conquest which leads to the goal of existence.
In this respect, indulging in violence is doing to oneself what an enemy would wish.
It is a form of self-harming:
In contrast, abstaining from violence has personal benefit in the present and in the future.
It is part of the training of mind and body which lays the foundation for spiritual progress.
The accusation has been made that the application of the terms kusala and akusala are oriented only towards an individualistic goal, making the motivation for abstention from violence a selfish one.
But it can be argued that the distinction between altruism and egoism breaks down for anyone truly following the Noble Eightfold Path.
There are also many textual references to the inherent importance of harmony, justice and compassion in society to balance those passages which seem to be solely individualistic.
Harmony and justice are recognized as worthwhile in themselves as well as a prerequisite for the spiritual progress of society's members.
Hence, in society, violence is to be eschewed because it brings pain to beings with similar feelings to oneself:
On the level of personal analogy, men and women are to condemn violence.
It is an analogy which demands metta and karuna of the human being.
They call on a frame of mind which cannot remain insensitive to suffering in others or untouched by the agony produced by violence.
Non-violence, therefore, arises through the urge to prevent anguish in others:
The Buddha, however, did not credit all people with this level of awareness.
He is recorded as saying that shame and fear of blame protect the world, and if there were not these forces, the world would come to confusion and promiscuity.
Not all beings rally to the call for compassion on the grounds that others have like feelings to themselves or that harmony in society is necessary.
Therefore, some texts invoke the concepts of heaven and hell, rewards and punishments, to control violence.
Vivid pictures are drawn of the agonies of hell:
Even so, monks, that anguish and dejection that man experiences while he is being stabbed with three hundred spears, compared with the anguish of Niraya Hell does not count, it does not amount even to an infinitesimal fraction of it, it cannot even be compared to it.
Monks, the guardians of Niraya Hell subject him to what is called the fivefold pinion.
They drive a red-hot iron stake through each hand and each foot and a red-hot iron stake through his breast.
Thereat, he feels feelings that are painful, sharp and severe.
But he does not do his time until he makes an end of that evil deed.
Here, self-interest in terms of avoidance of future pain is appealed to as a reason to desist from violence.
This emphasis can also be seen in the Petavatthu in which those fallen to the realm of the petas speak to those on the human level about the reasons for their suffering.
Falsehood, failing in the duties of wife or husband, stinginess and fraud are some of the actions mentioned.
Story No., however, speaks of a deerhunter who explains that he was “a ruthless man of bloody hands”: “Among harmless creatures, I, with wicked mind, walked about, very ruthless, ever finding delight in slaying others unrestrained,” he declares in verse three.
His punishment is to be devoured by dogs during the daytime, the hours when he used to be involved in slaughter.
He is able to teach the living that the First Precept should be kept and that it applies not only to the killing of human beings but also to animals.
The deerhunter, therefore, is held up as an authoritative witness to what happens to violent individuals.
His story is useful as a deterrent to socially disruptive elements and is confirmation of the importance Buddhism places on non-violence within the social fabric.
The threat of future punishment is used to control potentially violent elements.
Two broad, interconnected areas, therefore, emerge in the reasons for the condemnation of violence within the Early Buddhist texts.
Firstly, thoughts of violence and violent action are defilements and must be eradicated if nibbana is to be reached.
In this light, nibbana is the highest ethical good.
This stress alone, however, can lead to distortion if nibbana is seen as a metaphysical state above the empirical world and the path to it as divorced from society.
Early Buddhism was rooted in the empirical.
Violence was to be repudiated because it caused anguish to men and women and disruption in society.
The human person was seen as precious.
Harming a being who desired happiness and felt pain could rarely be right.
If a society was to be established in which people could live without fear and with the freedom of mind to follow the Eightfold Path, violence had to be eschewed.
The question of political, defensive violence, however, must be mentioned here.
Can violence be justified in a situation where the state needs to defend its citizens against external and internal threats?
Is this a situation in which violence is not condemned?
The texts suggest Buddhism would here insist on discrimination.
The Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta gives this advice to the righteous king:
This passage implies that the need for an army and consequently for the use of force in defense is accepted as a worldly necessity.
But the picture which emerges is not glorification of the “just” war but an appeal for war and violence to be seen against a higher set of values.
Relevant perspectives on these political realities are seen in the Buddha's advice to the Vajjians and to King Pasenadi.
The Vajjians are faced with vicious aggression from King Ajatasattu, King of Magadha, who is bent on destroying them.
The latter sends a brahman to the Buddha for advice and a prediction about how successful he will be in war.
The very fact that he does so shows that he does not consider the Buddha either ill-informed or dismissive of such political conflicts.
The reply he receives is significant.
The Buddha does not refer directly to Ajatasattu but implies that the use of arms against a people who are morally pure and in concord would be fruitless.
His words to Ajatasattu become words of advice to the Vajjians that they should meet together in concord and give respect to their elders, their ancient institutions, their traditions and their women.
No mention is made of the Vajjian military strength; only of their moral strength.
Moral strength is held up as defense against violence.
Yet it is not denied but implicitly understood that the Vajjians would have to use force to repulse aggression, and also present is an implicit condemnation of Ajatasattu's intentions.
King Pasenadi is also seen in conflict with Ajatasattu, meeting force with force.
At first, Ajatasattu is the aggressor and the victor.
The reported response of the Buddha is significant:
Thus Pasenadi's role as defender of the nation against aggression is accepted as necessary and praiseworthy.
In the next battle, Pasenadi is the victor.
Ajatasattu's army is confiscated but Pasenadi is merciful enough to grant Ajatasattu his life.
It is still Ajatasattu who is condemned.
His fate is seen in kammic terms:
In one respect, Pasenadi becomes an instrument of kamma for Ajatasattu.
At another level, acceptance of political realities emerges.
The king has a duty to protect his citizens from external threats of violence.
Therefore, the advice given to a king or those with responsibility for government about reacting to the violence of others is fitted to the situation, a situation in which the use of violence may become a political necessity in a world governed by craving.
Yet, even with affairs of state, war is placed in the perspective of a more important set of values.
To Pasenadi, burdened by responsibility, the Buddha says:
War is not presented as worthy of praise in itself.
It is recognized that battle cannot take place without hatred and the wish to kill, in both the mind of aggressor and victim.
A Samyutta Nikaya passage illustrates this.
A fighting man comes to the Buddha and explains his belief that the warrior who is killed whilst fighting energetically in battle is reborn in the company of the Devas of Passionate Delight.
The Buddha's answer condemns this idea as perverted.
A warrior is always led by the idea, “Let those beings be exterminated so that they may be never thought to have existed.” Such a view can only lead downwards rather than to any heavenly world.
The Buddha thus rejects any glorification of war, since there can be no glory when the mind is dominated by hate.
Another duty of the state is to punish.
Punishment, although a harming of creatures and a cause of pain to them, is nevertheless seen as a social necessity because of the need to protect society from the greater violence which would flow from undeterred greed.
Fear of punishment is described in vivid terms, with the mention of specific punishments.
A man sees them and thinks: “If I were to do such deeds as those for which the rajahs seize a bandit, a miscreant, and so treat him… they would surely treat me in like manner.” Important here is the fact that Early Buddhism would make discriminations about the question of punishment.
As a deterrent, punishment has value.
Meted out as an expression of hate, it is to be rejected.
Inflicted where social justice is the requisite, it is also condemned, as seen in the Kutadanta Sutta, referred to in the next part.
The Attadanda Sutta of the Sutta Nipata is the voice of someone overcome by despair because of the violence he sees:
Seeing people struggling like fish, writhing in shallow water, with enmity against one another, I became afraid.
At one time, I had wanted to find some place where I could take shelter, but I never saw such a place.
There is nothing in this world that is solid at base and not a part of it that is changeless.
I had seen them all trapped in mutual conflict and that is why I had felt so repelled.
But then I noticed something buried deep in their hearts.
It was — I could just make it out — a dart.
The above is from a translation of the Sutta Nipata which attempts to preserve the spirit of the text rather than the letter.
Here it is the spirit of dismay and fear leading to discovery which is of prime importance.
The speaker detects a common root — the dart of craving and greed — a view directly in line with the Four Noble Truths.
Violence arises because the right nourishment is present.
However, it has been pointed out earlier that differences may exist in the way in which tanha conditions situations of violence.
On analysis, two broad and mutually interdependent areas emerge: violence arising from an individual's maladjustment, and craving and violence arising from unsatisfactory social and environmental conditions, caused by the craving of others.
The latter can be taken first with reference to the following texts: The Kutadanta Sutta; the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta; and certain Anguttara Nikaya passages.
The first weaves a myth within a myth.
The inner myth tells the story of a king, King Wide-Realm, whose land is wracked with discontent and crime such that people are afraid to walk in the streets for fear of violence.
The king's solution is to hold a sacrifice for the nation and he goes to a holy man for advice.
But the king is not given what he expects.
The sage tells the king that fines, bonds and death for the wrongdoers would be self-defeating.
Punishment is not the right path.
On the contrary, it would increase the malady because the root causes remained untouched, in this instance, economic injustice and poverty.
King Wide-Realm is advised to give food and seed corn to farmers, capital to traders and food to those in government service:
The above analysis recognizes that men and women can be pushed to violence if the prevailing conditions do not enable them to preserve their own lives without it.
The instinct to survive is credited with enough strength to push people to struggle before they will sink into need.
In such a situation, it follows that to press down the hand of the law will not be effective.
In fact, it could encourage a growth in serious crime.
This is what happens in the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta, another mythological story dealing with disruption in society.
It has already been mentioned with reference to the duty of kingship.
But there is one clause concerning his duty that has not yet been mentioned: “Throughout your kingdom let no wrongdoing prevail.
And whosoever in your kingdom is poor, to him let wealth be given.” The kings of the story who keep to this are blessed with peace.
Yet a king eventually arises who neglects the giving of wealth to the poor.
He is soon faced with a situation beyond his control.
Poverty becomes rampant and this leads to theft, since people would rather steal than die.
When the king realizes the cause, he starts by being lenient on the wrongdoer, by giving him the means to live.
Such kindness too late leads others to see the only way to survive is turning to theft and receiving a royal handout in return.
The king has given charity, not justice, and crime increases leading to a return to brutal punishments.
The brutality of the punishments encourages the people to be more extreme in their own crime as they try to survive.
Punishment here fails to deter because of the desperation of the people.
The sutta presents a disturbing picture of how a society can fall into utter confusion because of a lack of economic justice.
The extremes reached are far greater than anything envisaged in the Kutadanta Sutta and they stem from the state's blindness to the realities of poverty.
Thus the sutta states in refrain after every deterioration:
Theft and killing lead to false speech, jealousy, adultery, incest and perverted lust until:
Among such humans, brethren, there will arise a sword-period of seven days during which they will look on each other as wild beasts; sharp swords will appear ready to their hands, and they thinking, “This is a wild beast, this is a wild beast,” will with their swords deprive each other of life.
In the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta, the nourishment of the violence is the state's neglect of the poor.
The whole myth illustrates the principle of paticca samuppada.
Each state of degeneration is dependent on the state before it.
An evolutionary process is seen.
An inevitability seems to emerge, an inevitable movement towards bestiality.
It is significant that the sutta does not concentrate on the psychological state of the people.
The obsessive cravings which overtake them are traced back to the failure of the state rather than to failings in their own adjustment to reality.
The root is the defilement in the state — the raga, dosa and moha in the king which afflict his perception of his duty.
An Anguttara Nikaya passage states this principle in simple and direct terms.
If the king is righteous, his ministers will be righteous, the country will be righteous and the natural world will be a friend rather than an enemy.
The opposite, of course, is also true and is placed first in the sutta:
The above passages show that a change of heart is needed where violence exists but this change is needed in those who wield power in society.
When a state is corrupt, the citizens become victims of the state and their own wish to survive and they are then led to actions they would never consider if they were free from want.
There is an understanding that, besides those who do evil, there exists a category of people to whom wrong is done and whose reactions are conditioned by the original wrongdoing.
To pass now to the psychological roots of violence, another myth can be cited, the Aggañña Sutta.
Like the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta, it describes an evolutionary process which takes on its own momentum.
The root of the process is significant — the craving of beings.
The sutta explains, in myth form, the process by which undifferentiated beings come to earth from a World of Radiance to eat the earth's savory crust, to the point where there is private property and the division of labor.
One of its purposes is to challenge the static, non-evolutionary theory of a divinely ordained caste system but it is significant also because evolution is guided by the growth of craving and individualism.
The whole sutta turns on the individual and his craving as the root of violence.
It depicts a situation before state power is established.
Craving first enters when the beings taste the crust of the earth:
The craving develops.
The natural world evolves to accommodate the beings, becoming ever less easy to manage.
The bodies of the beings become gross and individually differentiated into male and female, comely and unlovely.
Jealousy and competition enter.
The savory crust disappears.
Vegetables and plant life evolve.
An important point is reached when the beings establish boundaries around their individually owned rice plots.
Individualism is therefore institutionally consolidated and the consequence is violence:
The sutta illustrates that tanha coupled with individualism nourishes violence and conditions the necessity for state power to curb excesses.
As such, its teaching is directly in the mainstream of Buddhist thought: craving and grasping lie at the root of negative and unwholesome states in society.
However, more needs to be said about the causes and consequences of individualism.
The term “puthujjana” is used to describe the ordinary, average person:
The term “puthu” has two main meanings: “several, many, numerous,” on one hand, and “separate, individual,” on the other.
The usual definition of puthujjana is “one of the many folk,” linking it with the first of the above-mentioned meanings.
However, a case can be made for the second meaning also.
In this analysis, the puthujjana is one who believes himself to be separate from the rest of humankind; one who believes he has a self to be protected, promoted and pampered.
It is this assumption which leads to so much that is disruptive in society.
Violent tendencies link, at this point, with the defilement of moha: delusion in terms of a misunderstanding of anicca and anatta.
The latter states that there is no abiding, unchanging substance within the human being.
Men and women are verbs rather than nouns, causal processes rather than unchanging souls.
Buddhism does not deny that there is a person, but it reformulates the definition of what constitutes a person to embrace continuity rather than static entity.
As the sound of the lute cannot be found within the lute as it is taken apart, so the “I am” cannot be found in the human personality when it is dissected into the five khandhas.
Much anger and violence stem from the felt need to defend what is seen to be one's own or to grasp personal gain.
It is a need which sees the gain of others as a threat to personal power and the rights of others as an attack on personal prestige.
This is none other than the fault of the puthujjana, a failure to see the truth of anatta and the interdependence of all phenomena.
It is this failure which leads to the self becoming the touchstone and measuring rule for every perception and judgment.
It is the failure which leads to the urge to be violent in defense of needs and seeming rights.
The Aggañña Sutta shows this ego illusion manifesting itself in the form of competitive individualism.
That the ego illusion and tanha feed on one another is a theme found in many texts:
Monks, when there is the thought: “I am” — there come to be the thoughts: “I am in this world; I am thus; I am otherwise; I am not eternal; I am eternal; Should I be?
Should I be in this world?
Should I be thus?
Should I be otherwise?
May I become.
May I become in this world.
May I become thus.
May I become otherwise.
I shall become.
I shall become otherwise.” These are the eighteen thoughts which are haunted by craving concerning the inner self.
One result of this interdependent feeding, the Buddhist texts assert, is disruption in society.
Another important area of study is the mechanism through which the “I” notion helps to generate unwholesome states.
Buddhism sees a danger in the view of some schools of psychology that there is a creative use of the concept of self.
In this respect, the Pali term “papañca,” commonly translated as proliferation, is important.
The Madhupindika Sutta declares papañca to be the root of taking up weapons, and the defeat of papañca is the way to end such violence:
As the previous analysis in this paper points out, discrimination is central to the Buddhist approach and therefore generalizations such as the above need to be studied carefully.
There is no doubt, however, that papañca is central to a Buddhist psychology of violence and to an understanding of the danger in the “I am” notion.
A study by Bhikkhu Nanananda, Concept and Reality, gives extensive coverage to the term “papañca”.
He puts forward the view that it is linked with the final stage of sense cognition and that it signifies a “a spreading out, a proliferation” in the realm of concepts, a tendency for the conceptual process to run riot and obscure the true reality of things.
He makes much use of the above-quoted Madhupindika Sutta and quotes the following:
The same is said of the other senses.
Nanananda points out that a grammatical analysis of the above reveals that the process of perception involves deliberate activity up until papañceti.
After this, deliberation vanishes.
The subject becomes the object.
The person who reasons conceptually becomes the victim of his own perceptions and thought constructions.
So Nanananda writes:
His analysis is of immense significance to the study of how certain negative and destructive tendencies can grow in society; how objective perception and reason can seem to fade before the force of what might be irrational and obsessive.
He roots the cause in the nature of language in the minds of persons governed by tanha, mana and ditthi — craving, conceit, and views — which in themselves flow from ego-consciousness.
Papañca, according to this analysis, manifests itself through tanha, mana and ditthi.
It underlies each of these qualities and breeds conflict in society.
To look at the process in more detail: The conventions of language enter near the beginning of the process of sense perception, at the point where feeling gives rise to mental activity and concepts.
The mind, if unchecked, will attempt to place order on its feelings through language.
This language immediately introduces the duality of subject and object, subject and feeling.
The “I” enters with “I feel aversion” or “I feel attraction” or “I like this” or” I don't like this.” This emphasis on the “I” is predetermined by the very nature of language and reinforces the strength of the feeling and the tendency for the person to identify completely with what is felt.
What seems to happen after that is that language takes on a dynamism of its own.
Concepts proliferate and leave the empirical behind, under the driving force of tanha, mana and ditthi.
For instance, the observation, “I feel aversion” might lead to further thoughts such as:
Thus the entrance of “I” leads to the urge to protect the wishes of the ego and what is ego-based becomes a seemingly rational decision about duty.
The above is a purely hypothetical progression, yet it is not an implausible one.
It illustrates the way in which thought progresses further and further away from what is empirically observed.
Speculation enters as the mind attempts to reason.
Eventually, as the thought process develops further, what might appear to be reason cloaks obsession which, in turn, can make the person a victim of the apparent logic of language.
Kant in his Critique of Pure Reason seems to adopt a similar point of view.
He challenged the view that speculative metaphysics using the categories of pure reason could extend our knowledge of reality.
He attacked particularly those theologians who believed that the existence of God could be proved through logic alone.
There was, he claimed, an irresistible impulse of the mind towards seeking unification and synthesis which led to the illegitimate use of language.
It is this which is particularly relevant to this study.
For instance, he posited that the mind assumed an unconditional personal ego just because all representations were unified by the “I think” construction.
It also assumed a concept of God because of the drive to find an unconditioned unity.
Such concepts, Kant felt, arose through the impulse of the mind and passed beyond the legitimate purview of language.
It passed beyond the perceptions which could add knowledge and were not based on truly empirical data.
Therefore, they could not give statements with any factual reality.
Kant grasped that there was an irresistible impulse which led to concepts taking on an unwarranted life of their own.
Buddhism says that these concepts can generate obsessions, victimize the person who believes he or she is thinking logically, and lead to disruption in society.
What is lost in the process is the ability to see objectively and value the empirical through senses unclouded by craving, conceit and views, or by greed, hatred and delusion.
Papañca, fed and generated by tanha, is therefore central to the theme of violence in the thoughts and actions of human beings.
Buddhism suggests that the human person can become the victim of obsessive actions, thoughts and inclinations.
It holds that the drift towards violence within one person or within society, especially if a communal or cultural obsession has arisen, may become an inevitable causal process unless the inner mechanism is discovered.
Related to this is the danger and motivating force of dogmatic and speculative views as one of the roots of violence — the ditthi, connected in the above analysis with papañca.
In his advice to the Kalamas and to Bhaddiya, the Buddha said:
Here, logic and inference are deemed to be as dangerous as what is passed on by doubtful report and tradition.
The same approach is seen in the Brahmajala Sutta where a number of mistaken views, according to Buddhist analysis, are discussed.
Tanha is seen as the root of these but logic and inference are also mentioned.
In the following, the question of conflict in relation to dogmatic views is more clearly expressed.
The Buddha points out the danger of saying, “This is indeed the truth, all else is falsehood”.
For dispute is the result and: “If there is dispute, there is contention; if there is contention, there is trouble; if there is trouble there is vexation.” Adhering dogmatically to views is a form of papañca, a particularly dangerous form.
Several suttas in the Sutta Nipata take up this theme: the Pasura Sutta and the Kalahavivada Sutta, for instance.
The former speaks of the person who goes forth roaring, looking for a rival to contest with, filled with pride and arrogance over his theories.
A battle-like situation is implied, an attitude closely allied to that which actually results in warfare and armed struggle.
Contemporary struggles in the world give ample evidence to prove that war and struggle are caused by the conflict of ideas, ideologies and concepts.
They show how powerful and charismatic a force ideas can be.
Whether it is nationalism, ethnicity or religion, groups can be pushed towards violence in defense of them.
Buddhist analysis points out that some ideologies which might appear logical could, in fact, be the fruit of papañca.
Adherents may be convinced of their truth but they might have progressed far from analysis based on empirical data.
In the above analysis of the roots of violence, two broad areas have been studied: the external and the internal, the environmental and psychological.
Yet the two are not separate.
They interconnect and feed one another, just as external sense objects interconnect with the senses, giving rise to consciousness and psychological processes.
If a people's environment is unhealthy, corrupt or unjust, the seeds are sown for violent resistance, through the growth of motivating ideologies which take on a life of their own as they grip the minds of those who are being oppressed.
If the environment is excessively competitive, consumer-oriented and materialistic, tanha will quickly arise, develop and expand into obsessive patterns of greed, taking over and dominating the perception of people who find themselves victims of craving rather than masters of their own perceptual processes.
The step to violence is then small.
If other elements are present, such as a group without access to the wealth visible in others, discrimination against minorities or racism, then the drive towards violence will be more rapid.
There is an optimism at the heart of Buddhism.
The Four Noble Truths and paticca samuppada present a doctrine of hope because they affirm change and evolution.
Men and women are not pawns of fate, chance or a capricious metaphysical being.
They can be makers of their own future.
Applied to the issue of violence and disruption, this means that violence within the individual and in society is not intransigent, although the Buddhist texts make it quite clear that the obstacles to transformation are large.
Buddhism has no concept of a worldly utopia.
Samsara is samsara, characterized by dukkha.
Nibbana is a victory over samsara, not a destruction of samsara.
The doctrine of anicca, in fact, undermines any dream of a golden future or a straight road of development towards harmony and peace.
Yet the worth of working for conditions for concord is never denied.
The important questions which emerge are: How feasible is the lessening of violent tendencies in society?
Can changes in the individual affect society as a whole?
When there is violence inherent in the structures of society, what steps can be taken?
To take the possibility for change within the individual first, certain passages from the texts suggest that the Buddha had rather a low opinion of the puthujjana and his or her ability to change.
Verse of the Dhammapada reads:
His sermons show that he recognizes that reaching people set on material things with a new message is difficult because their perception and ability to hear has been conditioned by the pattern of their craving:
A bad man, monks, is possessed of bad states of mind, he consorts with bad men, he thinks as do bad men, he advises as do bad men, he speaks as do bad men, he acts as do bad men, he has the views of bad men, he gives gifts as do bad men…
And how, monks, does a bad man act as do bad men?
As to this monks, a bad man is one to make onslaught on creatures, to take what has not been given, to enjoy himself wrongly…
In one passage, a prince, Prince Jayasena, is pictured in conversation with a novice monk who speaks about aloofness and one-pointedness of mind.
On the evidence given, the prince declares such an achievement to be impossible.
Confused, the novice goes to the Buddha, who says that such direct teaching could not possibly have been understood by one of such a lifestyle as the prince:
The above passages might seem to imply the reverse of hope on the very same ground as hope was confirmed in the introduction to this section — paticca samuppada.
If perception is conditioned by a person's lifestyle, the friends he or she chooses, and greed for material objects, then appreciation of another set of values will not arise from that nourishment.
Such an argument would seem to be realistic given the framework of conditionality.
However, this realism must be balanced with instances in the texts where change does take place in the lives of individuals.
The case of Angulimala is one of the best known and most frequently quoted.
Angulimala is a multiple murderer, the terror of Savatthi.
He is described as having depopulated villages and districts through his urge to kill.
The Angulimala Sutta describes the story.
The Buddha, ignoring the fear of the people, sets out by himself toward where Angulimala is said to be.
Angulimala, on seeing him, decides to give him the same fate as others who had dared to walk the roads.
However, at this point, the Buddha uses a technique which slaps Angulimala so hard that he gains sudden insight into the futility of the path he had been taking.
The Buddha uses his psychic power to ensure that Angulimala cannot catch up with him, however much effort he applies.
This opens up the opportunity for the question of walking and standing still to be raised.
Angulimala is forced into the realization that his life has been a futile chase, a fretful searching, without peace or fulfillment.
The tranquillity of the Buddha contrasts sharply with his own turbulence and the destructive state of his mind.
The contrast makes him see the nature of his mind.
A revolution — in its true sense of a complete turning around — takes place.
Angulimala, the murderer, becomes a completely changed person.
He asks the Buddha for ordination as a monk, and soon becomes an arahant, a saint.
Some interpretations have attempted to explain this in terms of a form of grace coming from the Buddha to the murderer.
No doubt the person of the Buddha had a profound effect on the man.
The sheer contrast between the states of mind and consequent physical appearance and bearing of the two would have shaped the event.
Yet it is perhaps more helpful to think of Angulimala as being ready to change, ready to face what he was doing to his life.
The Buddha's words acted as a sudden jolt to shock him into realization and change.
A similar transformation can be seen at the end of the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta, mentioned earlier, when bestiality has overtaken society to the point that a reaction takes place.
At the point when beings think of one another as wild beasts, some begin to think:
The depth of barbarism causes a reversal, a disgust with the nourishment on which violent thoughts were feeding.
Something new seems to enter but it is nevertheless part of the ongoing causal process.
The important point is that there can be a stage at which the unwholesome is recognized as such by those who are perpetrating it.
The process through which those who followed the Buddha saw the household life as a fetter, a state in which it was difficult to avoid greed, materialism and competitiveness, to a certain extent parallels this.
That it is possible for people to change accords with human experience.
It is also worth going back to the advice given to the novice who had tried to instruct Prince Jayasena.
The story does not end with the Buddha's words about the impossibility of reaching the mind of the prince.
An alternative method is stressed — gradual training.
The Buddha explains that the prince might have understood if told that the process of understanding was gradual.
The simile of the training of an elephant is used: At first, the elephant is brought from the forest into the open; he is addressed with kindly words and fed; then tasks are given to him, progressing from the simple to the more complex up to the point where the animal can endure blows of the sword and the din of war without flinching.
The stress on a gradual process of change and training, beginning with moral habit, stretches like a thread across the Buddhist texts.
There is a firm belief that discipline, education and the taking of one step at a time can lead people from a state of relative ignorance to greater wisdom.
The possibility of gradual change must be admitted alongside the sudden change of Angulimala.
The two are complementary.
In the Kevaddha Sutta, Kevaddha, a young householder, comes to the Buddha and pleads with him to perform a mystic wonder.
The Buddha names three wonders of which he has knowledge: the mystic, the wonder of manifestation, and the wonder of education.
The first two are to be feared and abhorred.
It was the latter which was to be praised as the most worthy — the wonder of education.
Change through a gradual process is, therefore, deemed possible but it is also recognized as something of a wonder, given the strength of craving and grasping.
Evidence that groups of both lay and ordained people were following the gradual training comes from the Maha-parinibbana Sutta.
The sutta speaks of the fourfold society being a reality — the fourfold society as composed of monks, nuns, laymen and laywomen.
Mara is seen to approach the Buddha, urging him to die because the task he had set himself earlier had been completed:
In the above description, both lay and ordained are described with the same adjectives.
Lay people as well as ordained are credited with considerable knowledge.
There are grounds of hope here, since the first stage of gradual training is morality, the foundation of which is the Five Precepts.
All of these are linked with abstaining from different forms of violence: direct and indirect killing; theft; the exploitation of women; the violence connected with speech; violence to oneself through the use of drugs.
The Early Buddhist texts are replete with exhortations to keep the precepts.
Heaven and hell, bliss and torture, are held up and paeans of praise are given to those who follow them:
There are examples, however, of lay people going beyond morality.
Pessa, the son of an elephant trainer, claims:
Pessa receives the recognition and praise of the Buddha for this.
It is significant that mindfulness is crucial in halting the flow of mind, in halting papañca, as described earlier, and the violent thoughts which might consequently flow.
The key to mindfulness is the development of the ability to stand aside, detached from what is happening to the body, to feeling, to thought processes and mental objects, so that ever arising and passing movement, feelings and thoughts are carefully charted.
It is an approach which recognizes both anicca and anatta: anicca because what is attended to is seen as an ever-changing process; anatta, because the elements of the process are not assumed to belong to the person and therefore are not clung to as unchanging truths.
Mindfulness in fact can stop the mind before obsessions based on tanha, mana and ditthi can grow.
Guarding the doors of the senses is one form of practice of mindfulness, frequently mentioned as the second step in the gradual training.
The traditional way of describing this is:
The same is said of the other sense organs.
A guard is placed at the point where contact between the sense and the sense object results in feeling.
Knowledge of how the mind works is gained.
Mindfulness is thus an antidote to papañca and stops the mechanism through which papañca develops.
It demands effort and discipline.
The texts show that such mind-culture is possible and suggest that it would lead to the lessening of violence as an expression of personal greed.
The example of the Sangha, the Order of Monks, must also be looked at.
No compromises were made concerning violence when it came to the monk.
The Sangha was intended to be a model of harmonious interpersonal relationships.
It was to provide an alternative set of values to lay people, to present a pattern of sharing rather than of competitive individualism.
If the Sangha had been able to carry out successfully this role, a disturbing challenge would have been presented to the communities among which the monks walked.
The Kakacupama Sutta is one of the best examples of the extent to which violent retaliation was condemned for the monk.
The key sentence, repeated many times, speaks of the attitude to be cultivated in the face of abuse or violence:
What is significant is the extent to which this is to be taken:
The Punnovada Sutta describes a monk who took this teaching to heart.
He intends to travel to a district where the people are known to be hostile.
The Buddha questions him about how he will deal with abuse and violence.
Possibilities are mentioned, increasing each time in intensity from verbal abuse to loss of life.
After each one, Punna responds by saying that he would be thankful that the abuse was not even more serious.
When the Buddha finally mentions murder, he says:
He is said to have made a thousand followers, suggesting that his attitude became a true inspiration to a people who were characterized by violence.
In contrast to the above, there are examples of monks presenting a harmful example to lay people.
As the Sangha grew in number and in reputation, the initial enthusiasm of the first disciples became diffused.
Evidence in suttas such as the Bhaddali Sutta, the Kakacupama Sutta, the Kitagiri Sutta and the Anumana Sutta shows that there were forces of deterioration.
Some monks were difficult to exhort; some were rebellious towards the rules; some were incapable of taking correction from others.
In this way, their ability to provide an example to lay people would have been weakened.
Yet it would be wrong to place too much emphasis on this weakness.
Other suttas can be quoted to show what an impact the Buddha's followers had on other groups of wanderers and even on kings.
The important point here is that hope for change in the Early Buddhist texts also lies in the Sangha as example and educator.
Lay people were encouraged to show devotion to the Sangha and to listen to its teaching.
As outlined above, there is evidence that there was a body of lay people who were very serious in their striving to undertake the precepts and to train their mind so that tanha could be reduced.
That change in the individual is possible is confirmed by a study of the early followers.
The above picture combines hope with realism.
The obstacles mentioned at the beginning of the section must not be overlooked; the barriers to change are great.
According to Buddhism the average person will often need the threat of punishment, either in the present or in a future life, to be deterred from socially disruptive activities.
It has also been pointed out that it is not enough to concentrate on the individual.
A society is more than the sum of its individuals.
Just as the human person is such because of the specific relationship between the five khandhas, so a society takes on its character because of the way in which its parts are organized through institutions, traditions and external influences.
The next question which must be looked at is how the individual can affect society as a whole or, more exactly, what the consequences are when a person follows the gradual training of Buddhism.
As with the other questions raised, the method of this paper is to discover what the texts say, to uncover the guidelines or resources they provide for the analysis of contemporary issues.
In a previous section it was suggested that one of the causes of violence was the proliferation of concepts and ideas flowing from the perceptual process when governed by tanha, mana and ditthi.
Is the answer, then, a retreat into silence and inaction away from all concepts?
The evidence suggests not.
The Buddha was quick to condemn any inference that he taught a doctrine of either inaction or apathy.
One example will illustrate this.
The Buddha is seen in conversation with a person called Potaliya.
Potaliya declares that the most worthy person is the one who speaks neither in dispraise of what deserves not praise nor in praise of the praiseworthy.
He advocates what would seem a complete withdrawal from judgment and a supreme detachment from the issues governing society.
And the term Potaliya uses to describe the frame of mind he is talking about is upekkha — equanimity.
The Buddha, however, disagrees with him.
Far better is the person of discrimination who speaks in dispraise of the unworthy and in praise of the praiseworthy, saying seasonably what is factual and the truth.
In other words, he challenges the view that upekkha means the quality Potaliya advocates.
The Buddha puts forward another quality:
The Buddha mentions the quality of kalaññuta, in place of the word used by Potaliya — upekkha.
The translation given by the Pali Text Society is “discrimination of proper occasions.” The ability to discriminate and make objective evaluations, not indifference, is the consequence of curbing papañca.
A certain silence of the mind is indicated but it is not the silence of apathy.
The proliferation of concepts which is papañca results in an obscuring of the empirical, since this proliferation moves one further and further away from the empirical because of the linguistic edifice of “therefore” and “therein” erected on top of the initial emotion of like or aversion.
Preventing the erection of this edifice on the foundation of tanha leads to a clearer perception of the empirical and to judgments and analyses being made with greater validity.
The conclusions reached through papañca may seem to be analytical.
They are not.
Resisting papañca is not a moving away from analysis but a moving towards objective analysis unclouded by emotional responses.
It is this kind of analysis which is so often lacking when there is violence and conflict in society.
When perceptions, judgments and consequent action are governed by the roots of papañca, there will be no objectivity but a danger that obsessions will grow.
When papañca is allayed, what is good and bad, kusala and akusala, praiseworthy and blameworthy, will be more clearly visible.
The injustices in society, for instance, will be more apparent.
Judgments about those who are oppressed in society or about those who gain wealth illegally through violence and extortion will not be clouded either by the tendency to look down on those who suffer or the wish to gain patronage from the wealthy.
What is wrong and what is right, what harms and what promotes happiness, will stand out untouched by personal wishes or personal greed.
This clarity of judgment can be seen in the words of the Buddha.
In the Assalayana Sutta, the Aggañña Sutta and the Madhura Sutta the caste system is vigorously opposed.
The Esukari Sutta condemns the kind of service which becomes slavery.
Meaningless ritual is attacked in the Sigalovada Sutta.
Brahmanical excesses are uncovered in the Brahmajala Sutta, the Ambattha Sutta and the Tevijja Sutta.
The violence and shame of sacrifices is condemned in the Kutadanta Sutta.
These are not the only examples.
The Buddha is revealed as a person who was unafraid to point out wrong when he saw it and to use uncompromising words.
It is this kind of effective speech and action which should flow when tanha, mana and ditthi are reduced.
Abstention from the harmful or violent is not enough by itself.
The texts stress that the active cultivation of the opposite is necessary.
A replacement is needed as well as an annihilation.
This is seen at lay level as well as among the ordained.
For instance, in the Saleyyaka Sutta, addressed specifically to lay people, the two courses of faring by Dhamma and not-Dhamma are explained.
Malevolence is explained by reference to the wish to kill:
Faring by Dhamma is explained in opposite terms and yet the effect is not merely a negation of or a restraining from not-Dhamma but the practice of positive virtue.
So, the one who abandons slanderous speech becomes “a reconciler of those who are at variance and one who combines those who are friends.” The one who restrains himself from malevolent thought is the one who thinks: “Let those beings, friendly, peaceful, secure, happy, look after self.” Similarly, during meditation, positive qualities are to be cultivated to replace the five hindrances.
For instance:
The Early Buddhist emphasis, therefore, indicates that the eradication of the tendencies which cause violence leads to greater realism, the growth of positive, wholesome qualities and more effective speech and action against what is unjust and exploitative.
An important question, however, remains unanswered, the third question mentioned at the beginning of this section: When there is violence inherent in the structures of society as a whole, what steps can be taken?
In many societies, violence is institutionalized in structures which oppress certain sections of the people.
Some would mention the caste system in India in this context, corrupt trading practices, or the forces which keep some groups of people poor.
On the other hand, violence can flow from the monarchy or state, from internal terrorist groups or an outside threat.
In these situations, violence is rarely lessened by changes in a few individuals, unless these individuals have considerable power.
What strategies should be used to oppose such violence?
Is there any situation where violence should be met with violence?
Is there a different path for the lay person than for the monk?
Is there a situation where it might be justifiable to overthrow the state?
If so, could this lead to a changed society?
If undeserved suffering occurs because of the greed of others, do the demands of compassion ever involve what could be called violent resistance to the perpetrators?
These are crucial questions in the light of current world tensions such as racial injustice, capitalistic monopolies, terrorism and fascism.
The question here is whether any guidelines can be gained from the Buddhist texts themselves.
There is no doubt that the person who renounces the household life is called to abstain from violence completely.
It is one of the hallmarks of the bhikkhu.
Not to react in violent retaliation to abuse was part of the training of the disciple.
Where there was state-instigated violence, the Early Buddhist position seems to have been that the Sangha could act as advisers to rulers and, in this capacity, could raise issues connected with righteous government, but it could not become involved in violent resistance.
As for the lay follower of the Buddha, he or she undertakes to desist from harming others through the first precept.
To break this intentionally is to risk serious kammic consequences.
For the lay person, as for the monk, the approved line of action would seem to be advice and non-violent pressure or resistance towards those in a position to change violent structures.
A different set of responsibilities, however, is laid on the state itself.
As previously discussed, rulers with the protection of their citizens at heart were inevitably drawn into conflict when threatened by aggression.
The question can therefore be raised as to whether non-violence is an absolute value in Buddhism.
For instance, is a father, as head and protector of the family, justified in using violence against a person forcefully entering his house with the intention to kill?
Has an elder sister the duty to protect a younger brother if he is attacked violently, by using similar violence?
Has a group of citizens the right to kill a dictator if, by doing so, they might save the lives of oppressed minorities to whom the citizens feel a duty?
Should the terrorist gun be challenged with similar methods?
These are areas where absolutes seem to break down.
As a ruler might realize that some aggressor cannot be deterred by persuasion, so some citizens might feel that violence or injustice in society cannot be stopped merely by giving advice to those in power.
That lay people should never initiate violence where there is harmony or use it against the innocent is very clear.
That they should not attempt to protect those under their care if the only way of doing so is to use defensive violence is not so clear.
Guidelines about the consequences of violence, however, are laid down.
The danger of violence, even if it is defensive, is that it will generate further violence.
Non-hatred and loving kindness are the powers which halt it.
Metta is shown to have great power: it can turn away the poison of a snake or the charge of an elephant; it can render burning ghee harmless.
The latter story concerns a wife, Uttara, who is married to an unbeliever.
A courtesan, Sirima, is given to her husband so that Uttara can be released to attend on religious duties.
A quarrel arises between the two women which ends in Sirima pouring boiling ghee over Uttara.
As she prepares to do this, Uttara thinks: “My companion has done me a favor.
The circle of the earth is too narrow, the world of the devas is too low, but the virtue of my compassion is great because by her help, I have become able to give alms and listen to Dhamma.
If I am angry with her may this ghee burn me; if not, let it not burn me.” The ghee does not burn.
Sirima tries again.
Then the other women present attack Sirima and throw her to the ground.
Uttara continues to show compassion by coming to her rescue, by preventing her from being hurt.
Responding to violence with metta and non-anger is deemed superior to any other path.
Non-violent resistance is clearly the best path.
Yet Buddhism cannot claim to be completely pacifistic.
Absolutes of that kind cannot be found and perhaps should not be sought for in a teaching which spoke of the danger of claiming of a view, “this alone is truth, all else is falsehood.” The person who feels violence is justified to protect the lives of others has indeed to take the consequences into account.
He has to remember that he is risking grave consequences for himself in that his actions will inevitably bear fruit.
He or she has to be aware that there is a dynamism within hatred and violence when the causal chain has not had its nourishment removed.
Such a person needs to evaluate motives in the knowledge that violent tendencies are rooted in the defilements of lobha, dosa and moha, and in the obsessions generated by papañca.
Yet that person might still judge that the risks are worth facing to prevent a greater evil.
Whether the assassination of Hitler would have prevented numerous innocent deaths is still an open question.
In conclusion, it can be said that Buddhism lays down a form of mental culture to lessen the mind's tendency to veer towards violence.
However, it is a culture which involves qualities of faith and effort that many in society are unable to cultivate.
Therefore punishment either by the state or in an after-life is seen as a valid deterrent for extremes of violence.
However, where violence flows directly and unjustifiably from the state or from other groups or institutions, questions are raised which are not dealt with directly by the texts.
The drawing of conclusions is therefore fraught with difficulty.
Yet these questions must be tackled if Buddhism is to provide guidelines in a violent world.
What seems to emerge from the above analysis is that non-violence in the face of violence, although preferable for all and incumbent on the monk, is not a moral absolute in all circumstances.
It was claimed at the beginning that the advent of the nuclear bomb had issued in a new era of violence and that Buddhism should be able to address this development.
The foregoing analysis started from a study of the Buddha's awareness of violence in his own society and passed to questions concerning the condemnation of violence, the roots of violence, and the possibilities for its eradication or reduction.
Each of these issues has relevance for the present age, although it has been pointed out that many conditions have changed between the sixth century B.and the twentieth century A.D.
One area in which difference can be seen is in the nature of warfare.
In the Buddha's time, professional armies were used to settle conflicts.
Although civilians were no doubt killed as victorious armies took their plunder, it was the army itself which bore the brunt of the slaughter.
Today the cost in civilian, animal and plant life in any future nuclear war is thinkable only in terms of the most horrific nightmare.
The duty of the Cakkavatti King might be to defend his people.
Yet no nuclear weapon can be used in defense.
If it was, it would prove the Buddhist view that the use of violence leads to escalation.
The slim, ever-shaky defense that nuclear weapons provide is MAD — Mutually Assured Destruction — an uneasy, computer-controlled peace feeding on fear and the willingness to annihilate millions in retaliation, if the other side dares to be the aggressor.
It would seem that, in nuclear weapons, man has created something out of his greed which now makes him victim.
The analysis given earlier about the effects of papañca and the process of perception is relevant here.
Some people might see the development of ever more sophisticated weapons of destruction as the result of objective, scientific probing into the nature of reality, in this case the use of the atom.
An approach more in accordance with Buddhism would be to see the root as tanha, mana and ditthi: the craving for power over the material world and over other people; the wish to protect self and judge other groups as inferior; the clinging to one ideology whilst condemning all others.
The result of tanha, mana and ditthi is papañca, the proliferation of ideas which turn the so-called perceiver into the victim of obsessions bearing little relation to the empirical.
Nuclear and chemical weapons are horrific projections of the human mind.
It has come to the point where they possess the mind rather than the mind the weapons.
Humanity is now the victim.
Within this atmosphere, one may ask how effective change in the individual is and whether the few who work to conquer tanha, mana and ditthi can act as leaven within the whole.
The obstacles are great today as they were in the Buddha's time.
The Buddha saw the puthujjana as a person hard to convince or change, given the strength of craving and views.
Today, ideas have a charismatic force.
Nationalism, ethnicity and religion, for instance, push groups towards violence.
They form ego-feeding, identity-creating creeds which are hard to break down.
In such situations, empirical evidence shows that some who try to show the alternative force of metta become the victims of violence, at least in the frame of their present life.
Two insights from the foregoing study are relevant here: the reaction which took place in the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta and the interdependent nature of the environmental and the psychological.
In the Cakkavatti Sihanada Sutta, the truth that violence leads to greater violence and crime to ever-deepening bestiality eventually pierces the consciousness of some members of society as they see what is happening around them.
Some realize that change is possible through a change in thought patterns.
A reaction takes place after the trough of bestiality has been reached.
Today, there are those who are “turning around,” who are realizing how destructive and bestial is the present and potential violence in the world.
However, for just as long as the external environment remains tension-creating, the rise of violent tendencies will continue.
Similar injustices exist today as are mentioned in the Kutadanta Sutta, but their scope has altered and widened to include relationships between blocks of countries as well as within countries.
In most countries of the world, the poor are becoming poorer.
Between countries, the richer nations are becoming richer at the expense of the poorer.
The warning which the Buddhist texts give is that such conditions breed violence and that the arm of the law or the gun will not curb it.
Only change at the level of the root causes will create more peaceful conditions.
This is one of the gravest challenges which the world faces, since it points to a complete re-drawing of the world economic system.
The formidable obstacle in the way of such change is tanha in those with power or economic might — for profit, influence and a luxurious lifestyle.
One reaction of the individual to the above tension is complete withdrawal into a life of inaction.
This was evidently a temptation in the sixth century B.It has been a temptation across all religions throughout the centuries.
The mistake is to confuse renunciation and inaction, detachment and apathy.
The life of renunciation aims at detachment from raga, dosa and moha, but the result should not be apathy but rather greater compassion and loving kindness.
In the Samanamandika Sutta, a wanderer, Uggahamana, declares that the one who does no evil deed with his body, speaks no evil speech, intends no evil intention and leads no evil livelihood is the recluse who has obtained the most worthy end.
The Buddha responds:
In contrast, the Buddha lays down the importance of developing wholesome qualities, not merely abstaining from what is unwholesome.
The demands of the Eightfold Path are stressed, demands incumbent not only on the monk but on all followers:
In a violent world, therefore, the duty of the Buddhist disciple is not inactive withdrawal or apathy but culture of the mind to root out personal defilements so that perception and judgment can be unbiased and objective; cultivation of positive qualities which will create harmony and peace; and, most important, a readiness to speak out and act against what is blameworthy and in praise of what is worthy of praise.
Textual references have been taken from the Pali Text Society's editions of the Nikayas.
Unless specified otherwise, English translations have been taken from the PTS versions, though some have been slightly altered.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The original translations of the two suttas included in this booklet were made by Ven.
Bhikkhu Ñanamoli.
They are taken from his complete translation of the Majjhima Nikaya, which I have edited and revised for publication by Wisdom Publications, Boston.
The numbers enclosed in square brackets are the page numbers of the Pali Text Society edition of the Pali text.
The introductions and notes are my own.
In these the following abbreviations are employed:
Bhikkhu Bodhi
Among the hordes of animals that roam the wild, whether the jungle, the mountains or the plain, the lion is universally recognized to be their chief.
The living embodiment of self-possessed power, he is the most regal in manner and deportment, the mightiest, the foremost with respect to speed, courage and dominion.
The expression of the lion's supremacy is its roar — a roar which reduces to silence the cries, howls, bellows, shrieks, barks and growls of lesser creatures.
When the lion steps forth from his den and sounds his roar, all the other animals stop and listen.
On such an occasion none dares even to sound its own cry, let alone to come into the open and challenge the fearless, unsurpassable roar of the golden-maned king of beasts.
The Buddha's discourses, as found in the ancient Pali canon, frequently draw their imagery from the rich and varied animal life of the luxuriant Indian jungle.
It is thus not surprising that when the Buddha has occasion to refer to himself, he chooses to represent himself as the stately lion and to describe his proclamation of the Dhamma, bold and thunderous, as a veritable lion's roar in the spiritual domain.
The Majjhima Nikaya, the Collection of Middle Length Discourses, contains two suttas which bear this metaphor in their title.
These two — No.
and No.
in the collection — are called respectively the Shorter Discourse on the Lion's Roar and the Great Discourse on the Lion's Roar.
The variation in their titles, signalled by the Pali words cula, “minor,” and maha, “great,” evidently refers at one level to their different lengths, the one being four pages in the Pali, the other sixteen.
At another level, these different designations may allude to the relative weight of the subject matter with which they deal, the “great” discourse being a rare revelation by the Buddha of his exalted spiritual endowments and all-encompassing knowledge, which entitle him to “roar his lion's roar” in the assemblies of human beings and gods.
Still, both suttas, as their controlling image suggests, are of paramount importance.
Each delivers in its own way an eloquent and inspiring testimony to the uniquely emancipating nature of the Buddha's Teaching and the peerless stature of the Teacher among the spiritual guides of humanity.
The Pali Commentaries explain that there are two kinds of lion's roar: that of the Buddha himself and that of his disciples.
The former is sounded when the Buddha extols his own attainments or proclaims the potency of the doctrine he has realized; the latter, when accomplished disciples testify to their own achievement of the final goal, the fruit of arahantship.
Viewed in the light of this distinction, the Shorter Discourse on the Lion's Roar exhibits a hybrid character, being a sutta spoken by the Buddha to instruct his disciples how they should affirm, in discussions with others who hold different convictions, the singular greatness of the Teaching.
Section.
The Buddha opens the discourse by disclosing the content of this roar.
He tells his monks that they can boldly declare that “only here” — i.e., in the Dispensation of the Enlightened One — is it possible to find true recluses of the first, second, third and fourth degrees.
The expression “recluse” here refers elliptically to the four grades of noble disciples who have reached the stages of realization at which final deliverance from suffering is irrevocably assured: the stream-enterer, the once-returner, the non-returner and the arahant.
The “doctrines of others”, the Buddha says, are devoid of true recluses, of those who stand on these elevated planes.
In order to understand this statement properly, it is important to distinguish exactly what the words imply and what they do not imply.
The words do not mean that other religions are destitute of persons of saintly stature.
Such religions may well engender individuals who have attained to a high degree of spiritual purity — beings of noble character, lofty virtue, deep contemplative experience, and rich endowment with love and compassion.
These religions, however, would not be capable of giving rise to ariyan individuals, those equipped with the penetrative wisdom that can cut through the bonds that fetter living beings to samsara, the round of repeated birth and death.
For such wisdom can only be engendered on a basis of right view — the view of the three characteristics of all conditioned phenomena, of dependent arising, and of the Four Noble Truths — and that view is promulgated exclusively in the fold of the Buddha's Dispensation.
Admittedly, this claim poses an unmistakable challenge to eclectic and universalist approaches to understanding the diversity of humankind's religious beliefs, but it in no way implies a lack of tolerance or good will.
During the time of the Buddha himself, in the Ganges Valley, there thrived a whole panoply of religious teachings, all of which proposed, with a dazzling diversity of doctrines and practices, to show seekers of truth the path to liberating knowledge and to spiritual perfection.
In his frequent meetings with uncommitted inquirers and with convinced followers of other creeds, the Buddha displayed the most complete tolerance and gracious cordiality.
But though he was always ready to allow each individual to form his or her own convictions without the least constraint or coercion, he clearly did not subscribe to the universalist thesis that all religions teach essentially the same message, nor did he allow that the attainment of final release from suffering, Nibbana, was accessible to those who stood outside the fold of his own Dispensation.
While this position may seem narrow and parochial to many today, when reaction against the presumptions of dogmatic religion has become so prevalent, it is not maintained by the Buddha as a hidebound dogma or from motives of self-exalting pride, but from a clear and accurate discernment of the precise conditions required for the attainment of deliverance.
The Buddha's statement on this issue emerges in at least two important passages in the Canon, each of which reveals, from a slightly different angle, exactly what those conditions are.
One is found in the Maha-parinibbana Sutta.
While the Buddha was lying between the twin sal trees on the eve of his demise, a wandering ascetic named Subhadda came into his presence to resolve a doubt: he wished to know whether or not the other great religious teachers contemporary with the Buddha, who were regarded as saints by the multitude, had actually attained spiritual realization, as they claimed to have done.
The Buddha shifted the burden of the discussion away from a question aimed at assessing particular individuals and rephrased it in terms of a general evaluative principle.
He declared: “In whatsoever Dhamma and Discipline the Noble Eightfold Path is not found, there one cannot find true recluses of the four degrees of liberation.
But in whatever Dhamma and Discipline the Noble Eightfold Path is found, there one can find the four types of true recluses.” Then the Buddha imparted to Subhadda the information that was important for him to know: “In this Dhamma and Discipline the Noble Eightfold Path is found, and in it alone are found also the true recluses of the four degrees.
Outside this Dispensation the four types of enlightened individuals are not to be found.
The doctrines of others are devoid of true recluses.” In this passage the thrust of the Buddha's explanation points to a particular method of practice as essential to the attainment of true realization.
That method of practice is the training in the Noble Eightfold Path, and because this path, in its fullness and perfection, is unique to the Dispensation of a Fully Enlightened One, it follows that persons who have reached the planes of deliverance are unique to his Dispensation as well.
In the Shorter Discourse on the Lion's Roar the reason for the Buddha's exclusivistic claim does not focus upon practice but upon doctrine, upon the understanding of the nature of reality that separates his own Dhamma from all other attempts to comprehend the human situation.
As the argument unfolds, the Buddha will show that the essential key to liberation, the key that he alone makes available, is the teaching of anatta, of non-self or egolessness, which is at the same time the boundary line that marks the difference between his own doctrine and the doctrines of other teachers.
Sections -.
After announcing the “lion's roar” in Section, in the next section the Buddha begins to construct an imaginary dialogue between “the wanderers of other sects,” i.e., the proponents of the rival religious systems, and his own ordained disciples, the bhikkhus.
In the first stage of the discussion, the wanderers ask the bhikkhus about the grounds on which they advance their seemingly sweeping claim.
The Buddha advises the monks that they should answer by mentioning four reasons: that they have confidence in the Teacher, they have confidence in his Teaching, they have fulfilled the precepts of training, and their co-religionists, both monastic and lay, live together in cordial harmony.
The wanderers, however, do not remain satisfied with this answer, but join issue with the bhikkhus by pointing out that the four reasons that the Buddhists have offered are also found in their own sects.
Thus there seems to be no essential distinction between them that the bhikkhus can appeal to as the basis for their thesis.
Section.
The Buddha does not meet this challenge with a direct reply, but instead approaches it via an indirect route.
He enters upon this route by first clarifying, through questioning of the wanderers, the criteria of a truly emancipating teaching.
As a matter of mutual consensus both the bhikkhus and the wanderers agree that such a teaching must posit a goal that can be attained only by those who have achieved complete purification: freedom from lust, hate and delusion, from craving and clinging, from arbitrary prejudices, and from the coils of “proliferation”, i.e., thought constructions born of craving and groundless speculation.
Although the bhikkhus and the wanderers both agree on these criteria, this does not suffice to establish that they are shared equally by the different spiritual systems, nor does this imply that they are capable of being fulfilled regardless of the specific doctrine to which one subscribes or the discipline in which one trains.
To show, again in an indirect manner, that the outside systems are not capable of leading to final liberation, the Buddha points out that there are two broad “families” of views, diametrically opposed to each other, under which the wide diversity of speculative systems can be subsumed.
These two views are called, in the sutta, the view of being and the view of non-being.
The view of being is identical with eternalism, the positing of some eternal entity or spiritual principle, i.e., a substantial self or soul, as the essence of the individual, and the positing of an eternal entity, such as a creator God or metaphysical Absolute, as the ground or source of the objective universe.
The view of non-being is identical with annihilationism, the repudiation of any principle of continuity beyond death and the denial of an objective, transpersonal foundation for morality.
While those who adhere to the former view do concur with the Buddhists in accepting the efficacy of spiritual practice, their teachings, according to the Buddha, are not free of an erroneous grasp of actuality.
They spring from a deep clinging to the notion of a permanent self, which issues in an edifice of doctrine designed to substantiate that idea and guarantee the immortality of the imagined self.
Hence the Buddha traces this view to its root in the craving for being, and he maintains that those who adopt such a view are for that very reason the victims, even though unwittingly, of craving and attachment.
The view of non-being, on the other hand, arises from an attitude of contempt towards existence, and finds its root in the craving for non-being.
The thinkers who adopt this view generally begin, as the Buddha does, by recognizing the pervasive nature of suffering; but instead of pursuing this suffering back to its true causes, they rush to an unwarranted extreme by declaring that the entire life-process comes to an absolute end with the breakup of the body at death, so that at death a being is annihilated and exists no more in any way.
Having isolated these two views and shown them in their mutual opposition, the Buddha then states that any “recluses or brahmans,” i.e., spiritual teachers, who do not understand these views as they really are fail to measure up to the criteria of those who have achieved the final goal.
They are still subject to lust, hatred and delusion, to craving and clinging, etc., and thus they cannot claim to be freed from the cycle of repeated birth and death.
Only those who have comprehended these views, who see their dangers and have relinquished them, are accessible to the right view that leads beyond all erroneous extremes, and it is by the instrumentality of that view that they are capable of cutting off the defilements and arriving at release from the samsaric round.
Sections -.
Even at this point, however, the Buddha has not yet explicitly shown that liberation from cyclic existence is an exclusive prerogative of his own Dispensation.
He has only left this conclusion as an inference for those who are already aware that his Dhamma makes known the middle way that transcends extremist views.
In the present sequence, however, he will bring his argument to its conclusion by homing in on the crucial point that separates his own teaching from all other religious and philosophical systems.
He takes up this task by way of an examination of the mental activity of clinging.
He states that there are four kinds of clinging: clinging to sense pleasures; clinging to speculative views regarding the self and the world; clinging to rules and observances, i.e., to external rules, rituals and austerities in the belief that they lead to liberation; and clinging to a doctrine of self, i.e., to a view of a truly existent self.
The last type of clinging, the subtlest and most elusive of the group, is tantamount to what the texts refer to as “personality view”: the view of a substantial self taken to be either identical in some way to the five aggregates that constitute the personality, or to stand in some relationship to those aggregates.
The Buddha next points out that the recluses and brahmans who propose a path to liberation all declare that they propound “the full understanding of all kinds of clinging,” a phrase the commentary to the sutta glosses as meaning the overcoming of all kinds of clinging.
However, the Buddha says, in spite of this claim, the other spiritual teachers recognize and attack only a limited number of the forms of clinging; at best, they might teach the overcoming of the first three forms of clinging.
What they cannot teach, because they have not comprehended this for themselves, is the overcoming of clinging to a doctrine of self, and it is this fourth type of clinging that vitiates even the aspects of their teachings that are wholesome and praiseworthy.
Because they perceive the dangers in the grosser types of clinging, they might urge their disciples to relinquish them, to give up sensuality, dogmatism and ritualism, and to cultivate in their place renunciation, detachment and equanimity.
Thereby they can enjoin their disciples to engage in virtuous courses of spiritual practice, courses which have the potency to generate superior states of rebirth within the round of samsara.
However, what they have not discovered, because of the insurmountable limits to their range of understanding, is the buried root of the entire cycle of repeated existence, which consists precisely in that adherence to the notion of self.
For this reason, the Buddha maintains, such a Dhamma and Discipline cannot show the way to the uprooting of the belief in self, and he therefore concludes that it is “unemancipating, unconducive to peace” — the final peace of Nibbana.
Being taught by one who is not a Fully Enlightened Buddha, such a system does not merit the confidence of those who can be satisfied with nothing less than complete release from all samsaric suffering.
In contrast to other spiritual teachers, the Buddha continues, he himself, the Tathagata, describes the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, inclusive of the clinging to a doctrine of self.
Recognizing the danger in views of self, aware that all such views, no matter how lofty, are undermined by a fundamental cognitive error, he proclaims a path that leads to the eradication of views of self in all their bewildering variety.
Hence, the Buddha says, his Dhamma and Discipline is truly emancipating, truly capable of leading to final peace, promulgated by a Fully Enlightened One, the proper field of confidence for seekers of liberation.
Sections -.
In the final sections of the discourse, the Buddha will validate his claim regarding the emancipating quality of his Dispensation by showing how a disciple who undertakes the practice of his teaching can reach the fruit of final deliverance.
He first takes up the four kinds of clinging, the subject around which the preceding portion of the exposition revolved, and connects this topic with another major principle of his doctrine, dependent arising.
By applying the principle of dependent arising, he traces clinging to its source in craving, and then, continuing this line of inquiry, he pursues the entire sequence of conditional factors at the base of samsara back to its deepest and most pernicious root, ignorance.
In the final paragraph he introduces a bhikkhu who arrives at the culmination of the path: one who develops wisdom to the fullest extent, abandons all ignorance, and arouses the liberating knowledge.
Such a one no longer clings through any kind of clinging: he has eradicated all four types of clinging, including the clinging to a doctrine of self, and with their eradication has attained the final goal, the personal realization of Nibbana right in this very life.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Park.
There he addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Bhikkhus.” — “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Bhikkhus, only here is there a recluse, only here a second recluse, only here a third recluse, only here a fourth recluse.
The doctrines of others are devoid of recluses: that is how you should rightly roar your lion's roar.
“It is possible, bhikkhus, that wanderers of other sects might ask: 'But on the strength of what or with the support of what do the venerable ones say thus?' Wanderers of other sects who ask thus may be answered in this way: 'Friends, four things have been declared to us by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened; on seeing these in ourselves we say thus: “Only here is there a recluse, only here a second recluse, only here a third recluse, only here a fourth recluse.
The doctrines of others are devoid of recluses.” What are the four?
We have confidence in the Teacher, we have confidence in the Dhamma, we have fulfilled the precepts, and our companions in the Dhamma are dear and agreeable to us whether they are layfolk or those gone forth.
These are the four things declared to us by the Blessed One who knows and sees, accomplished and fully enlightened, on seeing which in ourselves we say as we do.'
“It is possible, bhikkhus, that wanderers of other sects might say thus: 'Friends, we too have confidence in the Teacher, that is, in our Teacher; we too have confidence in the Dhamma, that is, in our Dhamma; we too have fulfilled the precepts, that is, our precepts; our companions in the Dhamma are dear and agreeable to us too whether they are layfolk or those gone forth.
What is the distinction here, friends, what is the variance, what is the difference between you and us?'
“Wanderers of other sects who ask thus may be answered in this way: 'How then, friends, is the goal one or many?' Answering rightly, the wanderers of other sects would answer thus: 'Friends, the goal is one, not many.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one affected by lust or free from lust?' Answering rightly, the wanderers of other sects would answer thus: 'Friends, that goal is for one free from lust, not for one affected by lust.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one affected by hate or free from hate?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one free from hate, not for one affected by hate.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one affected by delusion or free from delusion?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one free from delusion, not for one affected by delusion.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one affected by craving or free from craving?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one free from craving, not for one affected by craving.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one affected by clinging or free from clinging?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one free from clinging, not for one affected by clinging.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one who has vision or for one without vision?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one with vision, not for one without vision.' — 'But, friends, is that goal for one who favors and opposes, or for one who does not favor and oppose?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one who does not favor and oppose, not for one who favors and opposes.' — 'But, friends is that goal for one who delights in and enjoys proliferation, or for one who does not delight in and enjoy proliferation?' Answering rightly, they would answer: 'Friends, that goal is for one who does not delight in and enjoy proliferation, not for one who delights in and enjoys proliferation.'
“Bhikkhus, there are these two views: the view of being and the view of non-being.
Any recluses or brahmans who rely on the view of being, adopt the view of being, accept the view of being, are opposed to the view of non-being.
Any recluses or brahmans who rely on the view of non-being, adopt the view of non-being, accept the view of non-being, are opposed to the view of being.
“Any recluses or brahmans who do not understand as they actually are the origin, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger and the escape in the case of these two views are affected by lust, affected by hate, affected by delusion, affected by craving, affected by clinging, without vision, given to favoring and opposing, and they delight in and enjoy proliferation.
They are not freed from birth, aging and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair; they are not freed from suffering, I say.
“Any recluses or brahmans who understand as they actually are the origin, the disappearance, the gratification, the danger and the escape in the case of these two views are without lust, without hate, without delusion, without craving, without clinging, with vision, not given to favoring and opposing, and they do not delight in and enjoy proliferation.
They are freed from birth, aging and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair; they are freed from suffering, I say.

“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of clinging.
What four?
Clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, clinging to rules and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Though certain recluses and brahmans claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, they do not completely describe the full understanding of all kinds of clinging.
They describe the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures without describing the full understanding of clinging to views, clinging to rules and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
Why is that?
Those good recluses and brahmans do not understand these three instances of clinging as they actually are.
Therefore, though they claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, they describe only the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures without describing the full understanding of clinging to views, clinging to rules and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Though certain recluses and brahmans claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging… they describe the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures and clinging to views without describing the full understanding of clinging to rules and observances and clinging to a doctrine of self.
Why is that?
They do not understand two instances… therefore they describe only the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures and clinging to views without describing the full understanding of clinging to rules and observances and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Though certain recluses and brahmans claim to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging… they describe the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, and clinging to rules and observances without describing the full understanding of clinging to a doctrine of self.
They do not understand one instance… therefore they describe only the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, and clinging to rules and observances without describing the full understanding of clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Bhikkhus, in such a Dhamma and Discipline as that it is plain that confidence in the Teacher is not rightly directed, that confidence in the Dhamma is not rightly directed, that fulfillment of the precepts is not rightly directed, and that the affection among companions in the Dhamma is not rightly directed.
Why is that?
Because that is how it is when the Dhamma and Discipline is badly proclaimed and badly expounded, unemancipating, unconducive to peace, expounded by one who is not fully enlightened.
“Bhikkhus, when a Tathagata, accomplished and fully enlightened, claims to propound the full understanding of all kinds of clinging, he completely describes the full understanding of all kinds of clinging: he describes the full understanding of clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, clinging to rules and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
“Bhikkhus, in such a Dhamma and Discipline as that it is plain that confidence in the Teacher is rightly directed, that confidence in the Dhamma is rightly directed, that fulfillment of the precepts is rightly directed, and that the affection among companions in the Dhamma is rightly directed.
Why is that?
Because that is how it is when the Dhamma and Discipline is well proclaimed and well expounded, emancipating, conducive to peace, expounded by one who is fully enlightened.
“Now these four kinds of clinging have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
These four kinds of clinging have craving as their source, craving as their origin, they are born and produced from craving.
Craving has what as its source…?
Craving has feeling as its source… Feeling has what as its source…?
Feeling has contact as its source… Contact has what as its source…?
Contact has the sixfold base as its source… The sixfold base has what as its source…?
The sixfold base has mentality-materiality as its source… Mentality-materiality has what as its source…?
Mentality-materiality has consciousness as its source… Consciousness has what as its source…?
Consciousness has formations as its source… Formations have what as their source…?
Formations have ignorance as their source, ignorance as their origin; they are born and produced from ignorance.
“Bhikkhus, when ignorance is abandoned and true knowledge has arisen in a bhikkhu, then with the fading away of ignorance and the arising of true knowledge he no longer clings to sensual pleasures, no longer clings to views, no longer clings to rules and observances, no longer clings to a doctrine of self.
When he does not cling, he is not agitated.
When he is not agitated, he personally attains Nibbana.
He understands: 'Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.'” 
That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One's words.
The page numbers enclosed in square brackets in the above text are the page numbers of the Pali Text Society edition of the Pali text.
The Maha-sihanada Sutta, the Great Discourse on the Lion's Roar, is a text of awesome scope and power, one of those rare suttas in which the Buddha discloses the greatness and loftiness of his own spiritual endowments.
Towards the end of the sutta, the Buddha says that he has reached his eightieth year, which allows us to place the discourse in the final year of his life.
Thus the sutta serves as a convenient summation of the exalted qualities that enabled the Buddha to function so effectively as teacher and spiritual guide through the forty-five years of his mission.
It is not typical of the Buddha to extol himself, for he did not intend his Dispensation to evolve into a personality cult centered around himself as a charismatic and powerful leader.
Throughout his ministry he constantly emphasized the primacy of his role as guide, as the discoverer and proclaimer of the path.
His task is not to command reverence, but to steer his disciples onto and along the path, for it is only the practice of the path, the cultivation of the training, that can effect the deep interior purification by which one can reach the extinction of the defilements and liberation from suffering.
However, while the Buddha functions primarily as the revealer of the path, confidence in him as the Supreme Teacher remains an essential element of the training.
It is this confidence, freshly arisen, that induces the curious inquirer to cross the great divide that separates the admirer of the Dhamma from the practitioner, and it is this same confidence that drives the aspirant forward until the task of self-cultivation has been completed.
Frequent reflection on the greatness of the Master inspires joy and courage, sustaining one's commitment during those dark periods when prospects for progress appear bleak, and desire and doubt — those twin conspirators — combine forces to attempt to persuade one of the futility of one's efforts.
Hence, in order to provide a spur to awaken and nurture the confidence necessary to tread the path through its downward turns as well as its ascents, the Buddha on occasion offers us revelations of his “Buddha-gunas,” the excellent qualities of a Fully Enlightened One that entitle him to serve as the first of the Three Gems and Three Refuges.
One of the most impressive of these rare disclosures is the Great Discourse on the Lion's Roar.
Spoken as a rebuttal to the charges of a renegade disciple who, in the midst of the populous city of Vesali, had been denouncing the Buddha and attempting to dissuade others from following his teaching, the sutta recapitulates the various distinguished qualities of the Blessed One, with special emphasis upon his “ten Tathagata powers” and “four intrepidities”; the sutta also affords us a glimpse of the demanding ordeal he underwent over many past aeons seeking the path to deliverance.
When it was first spoken, the sutta had such a powerful impact on one monk in the assembly that his bodily hairs stood on end, and thus, during an early period, the sutta was known by the alternative title “The Hair-raising Discourse.” Even today, centuries later, the Great Discourse on the Lion's Roar can continue to serve as a fecund source of inspiration.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Vesali in the grove outside the city to the west.
Now on that occasion Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, had recently left this Dhamma and Discipline.
He was making this statement before the Vesali assembly: “The recluse Gotama does not have any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
The recluse Gotama teaches a Dhamma hammered out by reasoning, following his own line of inquiry as it occurs to him, and when he teaches the Dhamma to anyone, it leads him when he practices it to the complete destruction of suffering.
Then, when it was morning, the Venerable Sariputta dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Vesali for alms.
Then he heard Sunakkhatta, son of the Licchavis, making this statement before the Vesali assembly.
When he had wandered for alms in Vesali and had returned from his almsround, after his meal he went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, he sat down at one side and told the Blessed One what Sunakkhatta was saying.
“Sariputta, the misguided man Sunakkhatta is angry, and his words are spoken out of anger.
Thinking to discredit the Tathagata, he actually praises him; for it is a praise of the Tathagata to say of him: 'When he teaches the Dhamma to anyone, it leads him when he practices it to the complete destruction of suffering.'
“Sariputta, this misguided man Sunakkhatta will never infer of me according to Dhamma: 'That Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.'
“And he will never infer of me according to Dhamma: 'That Blessed One enjoys the various kinds of supernormal power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; he appears and vanishes; he goes unhindered through a wall, through an enclosure, through a mountain, as though through space; he dives in and out of the earth as though it were water; he walks on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, he travels in space like a bird; with his hand he touches and strokes the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; he wields bodily mastery even as far as the Brahma-world.'
“And he will never infer of me according to Dhamma: 'With the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, that Blessed One hears both kinds of sounds, the heavenly and the human, those that are far as well as near.'
“And he will never infer of me according to Dhamma: 'That Blessed One encompasses with his own mind the minds of other beings, other persons.
He understands a mind affected by lust as affected by lust and a mind unaffected by lust as unaffected by lust; he understands a mind affected by hate as affected by hate and a mind unaffected by hate as unaffected by hate; he understands a mind affected by delusion as affected by delusion and a mind unaffected by delusion as unaffected by delusion; he understands a contracted mind as contracted and a distracted mind as distracted; he understands an exalted mind as exalted and an unexalted mind as unexalted; he understands a surpassed mind as surpassed and an unsurpassed mind as unsurpassed; he understands a concentrated mind as concentrated and an unconcentrated mind as unconcentrated; he understands a liberated mind as liberated and an unliberated mind as unliberated.'
“Sariputta, the Tathagata has these ten Tathagata's powers, possessing which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
What are the ten?
“Here, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the possible as possible and the impossible as impossible.
And that is a Tathagata's power that the Tathagata has, by virtue of which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the results of actions undertaken, past, future and present, with possibilities and with causes.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the ways leading to all destinations.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the world with its many and different elements.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is how beings have different inclinations.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the disposition of the faculties of other beings, other persons.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata understands as it actually is the defilement, the cleansing and the emergence in regard to the jhanas, liberations, concentrations and attainments.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, the Tathagata recollects his manifold past lives, that is, one birth, two births, three births, four births, five births, ten births, twenty births, thirty births, forty births, fifty births, a hundred births, a thousand births, a hundred thousand births, many aeons of world-contraction, many aeons of world-expansion, many aeons of world-contraction and expansion: 'There I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my nutriment, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life-term; and passing away from there, I reappeared elsewhere; and there too I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my nutriment, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life-term; and passing away from there, I reappeared here.' Thus with their aspects and particulars he recollects his manifold past lives.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, the Tathagata sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions thus: 'These worthy beings who were ill-conducted in body, speech and mind, revilers of noble ones, wrong in their views, giving effect to wrong view in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a state of deprivation, in a bad destination, in perdition, even in hell; but these worthy beings who were well-conducted in body, speech and mind, not revilers of noble ones, right in their views, giving effect to right view in their actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, have reappeared in a good destination, even in the heavenly world.' Thus with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, he sees beings passing away and reappearing, inferior and superior, fair and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings pass on according to their actions.
That too is a Tathagata's power…
“Again, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, the Tathagata here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
That too is a Tathagata's power that a Tathagata has, by virtue of which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
“The Tathagata has these ten Tathagata's powers, possessing which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
“Sariputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me: 'The recluse Gotama does not have any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
The recluse Gotama teaches a Dhamma hammered out by reasoning, following his own line of inquiry as it occurs to him' — unless he abandons that assertion and that state of mind and relinquishes that view, then as carried off and put there he will wind up in hell.
Just as a bhikkhu possessed of virtue, concentration and wisdom would here and now enjoy final knowledge, so it will happen in this case, I say, that unless he abandons that assertion and that state of mind and relinquishes that view, then as carried off and put there he will wind up in hell.
“Sariputta, the Tathagata has these four kinds of intrepidity, possessing which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
What are the four?
“Here, I see no ground on which any recluse or brahman or god or Mara or Brahma or anyone at all in the world could, in accordance with the Dhamma, accuse me thus: 'While you claim full enlightenment, you are not fully enlightened in regard to certain things.' And seeing no ground for that, I abide in safety, fearlessness and intrepidity.
“I see no ground on which any recluse… or anyone at all could accuse me thus: 'While you claim to have destroyed the taints, these taints are undestroyed by you.' And seeing no ground for that, I abide in safety, fearlessness and intrepidity.
“I see no ground on which any recluse… or anyone at all could accuse me thus: 'Those things called obstructions by you are not able to obstruct one who engages in them.' And seeing no ground for that, I abide in safety, fearlessness and intrepidity.
“I see no ground on which any recluse… or anyone at all could accuse me thus: 'When you teach the Dhamma to someone, it does not lead him when he practices it to the complete destruction of suffering.' And seeing no ground for that, I abide in safety, fearlessness and intrepidity.
“A Tathagata has these four kinds of intrepidity, possessing which he claims the herd-leader's place, roars his lion's roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Wheel of Brahma.
“Sariputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me… he will wind up in hell.
“Sariputta, there are these eight assemblies.
What are the eight?
An assembly of nobles, an assembly of brahmans, an assembly of householders, an assembly of recluses, an assembly of gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings, an assembly of gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three, an assembly of Mara's retinue, an assembly of Brahmas.
Possessing these four kinds of intrepidity, the Tathagata approaches and enters these eight assemblies.
“I recall having approached many hundred assemblies of nobles… many hundred assemblies of brahmans… many hundred assemblies of householders… many hundred assemblies of recluses… many hundred assemblies of gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings… many hundred assemblies of gods of the heaven of the Thirty-three… many hundred assemblies of Mara's retinue… many hundred assemblies of Brahmas.
And formerly I had sat with them there and talked with them and held conversations with them, yet I see no ground for thinking that fear or timidity might come upon me there.
And seeing no ground for that, I abide in safety, fearlessness and intrepidity.

“Sariputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me… he will wind up in hell.
“Sariputta, there are these four kinds of generation.
What are the four?
Egg-born generation, womb-born generation, moisture-born generation and spontaneous generation.
“What is egg-born generation?
There are these beings born by breaking out of the shell of an egg; this is called egg-born generation.
What is womb-born generation?
There are these beings born by breaking out from the caul; this is called womb-born generation.
What is moisture-born generation?
There are these beings born in a rotten fish, in a rotten corpse, in rotten dough, in a cesspit, or in a sewer; this is called moisture-born generation.
What is spontaneous generation?
There are gods and denizens of hell and certain human beings and some beings in the lower worlds; this is called spontaneous generation.
These are the four kinds of generation.
“Sariputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me… he will wind up in hell.
“Sariputta, there are these five destinations.
What are the five?
Hell, the animal realm, the realm of ghosts, human beings and gods.
“I understand hell, and the path and way leading to hell.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
“I understand the animal realm, and the path and way leading to the animal realm.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the animal realm.
“I understand the realm of ghosts, and the path and way leading to the realm of ghosts.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the realm of ghosts.
“I understand human beings, and the path and way leading to the human world.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear among human beings.
“I understand the gods, and the path and way leading to the world of the gods.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
“I understand Nibbana, and the path and way leading to Nibbana.
And I also understand how one who has entered this path will, by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, here and now enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.' And then later on, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell, and is experiencing extremely painful, racking, piercing feelings.
Suppose there were a charcoal pit deeper than a man's height full of glowing coals without flame or smoke; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed to that same charcoal pit.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path, that he will come to this same charcoal pit'; and then later on he sees that he has fallen into that charcoal pit and is experiencing extremely painful, racking, piercing feelings.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… piercing feelings.
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the animal realm.' And then later on, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in the animal realm and is experiencing painful, racking, piercing feelings.
Suppose there were a cesspit deeper than a man's height full of filth; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed to that same cesspit.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves… that he will come to this same cesspit'; and then later on he sees that he has fallen into that cesspit and is experiencing painful, racking, piercing feelings.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… piercing feelings.
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in the realm of ghosts.' And then later on… I see that… he has reappeared in the realm of ghosts and is experiencing much painful feeling.
Suppose there were a tree growing on uneven ground with scanty foliage casting a dappled shade; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed to that same tree.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves… that he will come to this same tree'; and then later on he sees that he is sitting or lying in the shade of that tree experiencing much painful feeling.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… much painful feeling.
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear among human beings.' And then later on… I see that… he has reappeared among human beings and is experiencing much pleasant feeling.
Suppose there were a tree growing on even ground with thick foliage casting a deep shade; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed to that same tree.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves… that he will come to this same tree'; and then later on he sees that he is sitting or lying in the shade of that tree experiencing much pleasant feeling.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… much pleasant feeling 
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he will reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.' And then later on… I see that… he has reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world and is experiencing extremely pleasant feelings.
Suppose there were a mansion, and it had an upper chamber plastered within and without, shut off, secured by bars, with shuttered windows, and in it there was a couch spread with rugs, blankets and sheets, with a deerskin coverlet, with a canopy as well as crimson pillows for both; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed to that same mansion.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves… that he will come to this same mansion'; and later on he sees that he is sitting or lying in that upper chamber in that mansion experiencing extremely pleasant feelings.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… extremely pleasant feelings.
“By encompassing mind with mind I understand a certain person thus: 'This person so behaves, so conducts himself, has taken such a path that by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now will enter upon and abide in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints.' And then later on I see that by realizing it for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in the deliverance of mind and deliverance by wisdom that are taintless with the destruction of the taints, and is experiencing extremely pleasant feelings.
Suppose there were a pond with clean, agreeable, cool water, transparent, with smooth banks, delightful, and nearby a dense wood; and then a man scorched and exhausted by hot weather, weary, parched and thirsty, came by a path going in one way only and directed towards that same pond.
Then a man with good sight on seeing him would say: 'This person so behaves… that he will come to this same pond'; and then later on he sees that he has plunged into the pond, bathed, drunk and relieved all his distress, fatigue and fever and has come out again and is sitting or lying in the wood experiencing extremely pleasant feelings.
So too, by encompassing mind with mind… extremely pleasant feelings.
These are the five destinations.
“Sariputta, when I know and see thus, should anyone say of me: 'The recluse Gotama does not have any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
The recluse Gotama teaches a Dhamma hammered out by reasoning, following his own line of inquiry as it occurs to him' — unless he abandons that assertion and that state of mind and relinquishes that view, then as carried off and put there he will wind up in hell.
Just as a bhikkhu possessed of virtue, concentration and wisdom would here and now enjoy final knowledge, so it will happen in this case, I say, that unless he abandons that assertion and that state of mind and relinquishes that view, then as carried off and put there he will wind up in hell.
“Sariputta, I recall having lived a holy life possessing four factors.
I have practiced asceticism — the extreme of asceticism; I have practiced coarseness — the extreme of coarseness; I have practiced scrupulousness — the extreme of scrupulousness; I have practiced seclusion — the extreme of seclusion.
“Such was my asceticism, Sariputta, that I went naked, rejecting conventions, licking my hands, not coming when asked, not stopping when asked; I did not accept food brought or food specially made or an invitation to a meal; I received nothing from a pot, from a bowl, across a threshold, across a stick, across a pestle, from two eating together, from a pregnant woman, from a woman giving suck, from a woman lying with a man, from where food was advertised to be distributed, from where a dog was waiting, from where flies were buzzing; I accepted no fish or meat, I drank no liquor, wine or fermented brew.
I kept to one house, to one morsel; I kept to two houses, to two morsels;… I kept to seven houses, to seven morsels.
I lived on one saucerful a day, on two saucerfuls a day… on seven saucerfuls a day; I took food once a day, once every two days… once every seven days, and so on up to once every fortnight; I dwelt pursuing the practice of taking food at stated intervals.
I was an eater of greens or millet or wild rice or hide-parings or moss or ricebran or rice-scum or sesamum flour or grass or cowdung.
I lived on forest roots and fruits, I fed on fallen fruits.
I clothed myself in hemp, in hemp-mixed cloth, in shrouds, in refuse rags, in tree bark, in antelope hide, in strips of antelope hide, in kusa-grass fabric, in bark fabric, in wood-shavings fabric, in head-hair wool, in animal wool, in owls' wings.
I was one who pulled out hair and beard, pursuing the practice of pulling out hair and beard.
I was one who stood continuously, rejecting seats.
I was one who squatted continuously, devoted to maintaining the squatting position.
I was one who used a mattress of spikes; I made a mattress of spikes my bed.
I dwelt pursuing the practice of bathing in water three times daily including the evening.
Thus in such a variety of ways I dwelt pursuing the practice of tormenting and mortifying the body.
Such was my asceticism.
“Such was my coarseness, Sariputta, that just as the bole of a tinduka tree, accumulating over the years, cakes and flakes off, so too, dust and dirt, accumulating over the years, caked off my body and flaked off.
It never occurred to me: 'Oh, let me rub this dust and dirt off with my hand, or let another rub this dust and dirt off with his hand' — it never occurred to me thus.
Such was my coarseness.
“Such was my scrupulousness, Sariputta, that I was always mindful in stepping forwards and stepping backwards.
I was full of pity even for a drop of water thus: 'Let me not hurt the tiny creatures in the crevices of the ground.' Such was my scrupulousness.
“Such was my seclusion, Sariputta, that I would plunge into some forest and dwell there.
And when I saw a cowherd or a shepherd or someone gathering grass or sticks, or a woodsman, I would flee from grove to grove, from thicket to thicket, from hollow to hollow, from hillock to hillock.
Why was that?
So that they should not see me or I see them.
Just as a forest-bred deer, on seeing human beings, flees from grove to grove, from thicket to thicket, from hollow to hollow, from hillock to hillock, so too, when I saw a cowherd or a shepherd… Such was my seclusion.
“I would go on all fours to the cow-pens when the cattle had gone out and the cowherd had left them, and I would feed on the dung of the young suckling calves.
As long as my own excrement and urine lasted, I fed on my own excrement and urine.
Such was my great distortion in feeding.
“I would plunge into some awe-inspiring grove and dwell there — a grove so awe-inspiring that normally it would make a man's hair stand up if he were not free from lust.
When those cold wintry nights came during the 'eight-days interval of frost,' I would dwell by night in the open and by day in the grove.
In the last month of the hot season I would dwell by day in the open and by night in the grove.
And there came to me spontaneously this stanza never heard before:
“I would make my bed in a charnel ground with the bones of the dead for a pillow.
And cowherd boys came up and spat on me, urinated on me, threw dirt at me, and poked sticks into my ears.
Yet I do not recall that I ever aroused an evil mind against them.
Such was my abiding in equanimity.

“Sariputta, there are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through food.' They say: 'Let us live on kola-fruits,' and they eat kola-fruits, they eat kola-fruit powder, they drink kola-fruit water, and they make many kinds of kola-fruit concoctions.
Now I recall having eaten a single kola-fruit a day.
Sariputta, you may think that the kola-fruit was bigger at that time, yet you should not regard it so: the kola-fruit was then at most the same size as now.
Through feeding on a single kola-fruit a day, my body reached a state of extreme emaciation.
Because of eating so little my limbs became like the jointed segments of vine stems or bamboo stems.
Because of eating so little my backside became like a camel's hoof.
Because of eating so little the projections on my spine stood forth like corded beads.
Because of eating so little my ribs jutted out as gaunt as the crazy rafters of an old roofless barn.
Because of eating so little the gleam of my eyes sank far down in their sockets, looking like a gleam of water which has sunk far down in a deep well.
Because of eating so little my scalp shrivelled and withered as a green bitter gourd shrivels and withers in the wind and sun.
Because of eating so little my belly skin adhered to my backbone; thus if I touched my belly skin I encountered my backbone, and if I touched my backbone I encountered my belly skin.
Because of eating so little, if I tried to ease my body by rubbing my limbs with my hands, the hair, rotted at its roots, fell from my body as I rubbed.
-.
“Sariputta, there are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through food.' They say: 'Let us live on beans'… 'Let us live on sesamum'… 'Let us live on rice,' and they eat rice, they eat rice powder, they drink rice water, and they make various kinds of rice concoctions.
Now I recall having eaten a single rice grain a day.
Sariputta, you may think that the rice grain was bigger at that time, yet you should not regard it so: the rice grain was then at most the same size as now.
Through feeding on a single rice grain a day, my body reached a state of extreme emaciation.
Because of eating so little… the hair, rotted at its roots, fell from my body as I rubbed.
“Yet, Sariputta, by such conduct, by such practice, by such performance of austerities, I did not attain any superhuman states, any distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.
Why was that?
Because I did not attain that noble wisdom which when attained is noble and emancipating and leads the one who practices in accordance with it to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Sariputta, there are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through the round of rebirths.' But it is impossible to find a realm in the round that I have not already passed through in this long journey, except for the gods of the Pure Abodes; and had I passed through the round as a god in the Pure Abodes, I would never have returned to this world.
“There are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through rebirth.' But it is impossible to find a kind of rebirth that I have not been reborn in already in this long journey, except for the gods of the Pure Abodes…
“There are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through abode.' But it is impossible to find a kind of abode that I have not already dwelt in… except for the gods of the Pure Abodes…
“There are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through sacrifice.' But it is impossible to find a kind of sacrifice that has not already been offered up by me in this long journey, when I was either a head-anointed noble king or a well-to-do-brahman.
“There are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'Purification comes about through fire-worship.' But it is impossible to find a kind of fire that has not already been worshipped by me in this long journey, when I was either a head-anointed noble king or a well-to-do brahman.
“Sariputta, there are certain recluses and brahmans whose doctrine and view is this: 'As long as this good man is still young, a black-haired young man endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life, so long is he perfect in his lucid wisdom.
But when this good man is old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, and come to the last stage, being eighty, ninety or a hundred years old, then the lucidity of his wisdom is lost.' But it should not be regarded so.
I am now old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, and come to the last stage: my years have turned eighty.
Now suppose that I had four disciples with a hundred years' lifespan, perfect in mindfulness, retentiveness, memory and lucidity of wisdom.
Just as a skilled archer, trained, practiced and tested, could easily shoot a light arrow across the shadow of a palm tree, suppose that they were even to that extent perfect in mindfulness, retentiveness, memory and lucidity of wisdom.
Suppose that they continuously asked me about the four foundations of mindfulness and that I answered them when asked and that they remembered each answer of mine and never asked a subsidiary question or paused except to eat, drink, consume food, taste, urinate, defecate and rest in order to remove sleepiness and tiredness.
Still the Tathagata's exposition of the Dhamma, his explanations of factors of the Dhamma, and his replies to questions would not yet come to an end, but meanwhile those four disciples of mine with their hundred years' lifespan would have died at the end of those hundred years.
Sariputta, even if you have to carry me about on a bed, still there will be no change in the lucidity of the Tathagata's wisdom.
“Rightly speaking, were it to be said of anyone: 'A being not subject to delusion has appeared in the world for the welfare and happiness of many, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare and happiness of gods and humans,' it is of me indeed that rightly speaking this should be said.
Now on that occasion the Venerable Nagasamala was standing behind the Blessed One fanning him.
Then he said to the Blessed One: “It is wonderful, venerable sir, it is marvellous!
As I listened to this discourse on the Dhamma, the hairs of my body stood up.
Venerable sir, what is the name of this discourse on the Dhamma?
“As to that, Nagasamala, you may remember this discourse on the Dhamma as 'The Hair-raising Discourse.' “
That is what the Blessed One said.
The Venerable Nagasamala was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One's words.
The page numbers enclosed in square brackets in the above text are the page numbers of the Pali Text Society edition of the Pali text.
Vbh.
Section explains this knowledge with reference to MN as the Buddha's knowledge of what is possible and what is impossible, e.g., it is impossible that a person possessed of right view should regard any formations as permanent or as pleasurable, or anything whatever as self, while it is possible that a worldling will regard things in such an erroneous way.
It is impossible for a person possessed of right view to commit the five heinous crimes, while it is possible for a worldling to commit such crimes, etc.
etc.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In the canonical formula for contemplation of the Buddha, nine epithets of the Awakened One are mentioned.
One of these, likely to be overlooked, is sattha devamanussanam, “teacher of gods and humans.” The present essay focuses on one aspect of this epithet: the Buddha's role as teacher of the devas or gods.
In the pages to follow we will carefully consider the instructions and techniques he used when teaching beings of divine stature.
If we study these teachings we will gain deeper understanding of how we should purify our own minds, and by studying the responses of the gods we can find models for our own behavior in relation to the Master and his teaching.
Many religious leaders consider themselves prophets whose authority stems from an Almighty God, but as our epithet implies, the Buddha's relationship to divinity was very different.
He instructed deities, as well as humans, on how to end all suffering by eradicating ignorance and other unwholesome states.
The gods came to the Buddha to request instruction and clarification, to support his Sasana or Dispensation, to praise his incomparable qualities, and to pay homage at his feet.
Devas and brahmas are often mentioned throughout the Pali canon.
They regularly manifest themselves on the human plane and participate in many episodes of the Buddha's career.
Some of these higher beings are foolish, some exceedingly wise; some are barely distinguishable from well-off people, others are extremely powerful, long-lived, and magnificent.
The multiple connections between the Buddha and beings of the higher planes can inspire meditators to develop the Noble Eightfold Path that leads to the end of suffering.
This essay will explore: the Buddha's direct instructions to devas and how they can help human meditators practice the Dhamma; how devas, out of gratitude and faith, honor the Buddha and support his Dispensation; and the process of attaining liberation for devas, brahmas, and humans.
The Buddhist universe consists of thirty-one planes of existence.
Every being lives on one or another of these planes.
After death all beings, except the arahants, will be reborn in a realm and under circumstances that accords with their kamma — their volitional actions of body, speech, and mind made in that existence or in any previous one.
We will often refer to this chart to indicate where, in the cosmic hierarchy, the deities we meet come from.
The lowest area is called the sensuous realm; here sense experience predominates.
Next comes the fine-material realm attained by practicing the fine-material absorptions.
Above that is the immaterial realm attained by practicing the immaterial absorptions.
Although humans appear to be rather low on the scale, many intelligent deities long for rebirth on the human plane.
Why?
Because the best opportunity to practice the Dhamma and attain liberation is right here on earth.
On the lower four planes, little progress can be made as suffering is gross and unrelenting and the opportunity to perform deeds of merit is rarely gained.
The very bliss of the higher planes beclouds the universal characteristics of all phenomena: impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and the lack of any lasting, controlling self.
And without fully comprehending these principles, there is no motivation to develop the detachment from the world that is essential to liberation.
Before examining the chart in detail, a few notes on terminology are in order.
We will use the word “deva” to include deva, devata, and devaputta referred to in the Suttas, as all three terms are almost synonymous.
Although “deva” is often used in the Pali texts to refer to all super-human beings, “deva” and “brahma” can generally be distinguished.
“Deva” in its more limited sense refers to beings in the six planes immediately above the human one, the sensuous heavens.
When “deva” refers specifically to these sense-sphere beings, the term “brahma” is used for those residing in the fine-material planes and immaterial planes.
If in a particular discourse “deva” is used for a being who clearly fits into the category of brahmas, we will call him a brahma; if the deva is actually a sense-sphere being we will retain “deva.” For variety, we occasionally use “deity” and “god” as translations for deva in all its senses.
Let us now study some features of the chart.
The lower beings and humans do not have fixed lifespans, but higher beings do.
As you go up the chart from the sixth plane to the thirty-first, each successive group of deities lives longer than the group below it.
The lifespans of devas are measured in multiple centuries.
The duration of a brahma's existence can only be expressed in aeons.
The Buddha defines these extremely long periods of time by analogy.
An aeon is the length of time it would take to wear away a mountain of solid rock six miles high and six miles wide, rubbing over it with a fine piece of muslin once every hundred years.
The highest brahmas of the immaterial sphere live for, aeons.
All beings — human, sub-human, devas, and brahmas — die.
All except arahants are reborn in one or another of the thirty-one planes.
No being lasts forever.
Arahants have eradicated all mental defilements and have thereby eliminated the causes for rebirth with its attendant suffering.
They are not reborn after death.
Instead, they attain Parinibbana, the complete, permanent cessation of every form of existence.
For all non-arahants, death is immediately followed by rebirth.
The plane of birth is determined by the kamma that becomes operative at the moment of death.
This could be any volition created in the present life or in any previous existence.
Even the three lower kinds of noble ones must be reborn.
They have effaced some of the mental defilements, are assured of eventually attaining Nibbana, and will never again be reborn in the lower planes.
Noble ones of the two lower kinds — stream-enterers and once-returners — can be reborn in the deva planes.
For anyone who is not an ariya — and this includes most devas and brahmas — the destination of rebirth is uncertain.
It may be on the same plane or on a higher one; but most often it is on a lower plane.
Rebirth is neither arbitrary nor controlled by a God.
It takes place strictly due to kamma, the deeds we have performed and continue to perform all our lives.
Brahmas too die and are reborn, and also suffer, even though their lives are so extremely long that they may be deluded into believing they are permanent.
The devas of the sensuous sphere are said to enjoy sense pleasures in far greater abundance than can be found in the human world.
Their bodies emit light and they have subtle sense organs, similar to ours but far more powerful and acute.
That is why the supernormal powers of seeing various realms and hearing at great distances are referred to as deva vision and deva hearing.
On the deva planes there are stream-enterers and once-returners.
For example, Sakka, king of the gods in the heaven of the Thirty-three, became a stream-enterer while discussing the Dhamma with the Buddha, as we will see below.
However, only few among the devas have any understanding of the Dhamma.
In fact, all that is needed to be reborn in these heavens is the meritorious kamma of generosity and good morality.
Mental development through meditation is not a prerequisite for rebirth on the higher sensuous planes.
The fine-material brahmas have extremely subtle bodies of light; their powers are great but not unlimited.
A being is reborn among these brahmas by cultivating the appropriate jhana, perfecting it, and retaining it at the moment of death.
Jhanas are states of deep concentration that can be attained by unifying the mind through meditation.
They are all wholesome states of a very lofty and sublime nature.
But one can get “stuck internally” in any of the jhanas and thereby block one's progress towards awakening.
There are four fine-material jhanas.
The beings in the brahma planes spend most of their time enjoying their respective jhanas.
Brahmas experience no ill will or hatred, but only because they have suppressed it by their jhana, not because they have uprooted it from their mental continuum.
Thus when a brahma is eventually reborn as a deva or human being he or she can again be beset by hatred.
The brahmas also are prone to conceit and belief in a permanent self, as well as to attachment to the bliss of meditation.
Fine-material brahmas can interact with the human plane if they so choose, but to appear to humans they must, like the devas, deliberately assume a grosser form.
Later we will meet a number of brahmas who converse with the Buddha.
The immaterial brahmas of the four highest planes have no material bodies whatsoever.
They consist entirely of mind.
They attained this kind of birth by achieving and maintaining the immaterial jhanas, four kinds of absorption taking non-material objects, and it is this kamma that became operative at their death.
These brahmas can have no contact with the human or deva planes, for they have no physical bodies; thus we will rarely mention them.
They spend countless aeons in the perfect equanimity of meditation until their lifespan ends.
Then they are reborn in the same plane, a higher immaterial plane, or as devas.
After that they too can be reborn on any plane at all.
So even existence without a body is not the way to permanently eliminate suffering.
Only practicing the Noble Eightfold Path can bring suffering to an end.
In fact, immaterial brahmas are in the unfortunate position of being unable to start on the path.
This is because one has to learn the Dhamma from the Buddha or one of his disciples to attain the first stage of awakening, to become a stream-enterer.
That is why the sage Asita, called by the Buddha's father to examine the newborn Bodhisatta, wept after predicting that Prince Siddhattha would become a Buddha.
The sage knew he was going to die before the prince attained Buddhahood.
He had cultivated these immaterial absorptions so he would have to be reborn in the immaterial realm and would thereby lose all contact with the human plane.
This meant he would not be able to escape samsara under Gotama Buddha.
He was sorely distressed to realize that he would miss this rare opportunity to gain deliverance and would have to remain in the round of rebirth until another Buddha appears in the remote future.
He could see into the future and thus understood the precious opportunity a Buddha offers, but he could neither postpone his death nor avoid rebirth into the immaterial realm.
The Buddha teaches deities when they visit the human plane where he normally resides, and sometimes too by visiting them on the higher planes.
On some occasions devas and brahmas come to the Buddha for clarification of Dhamma problems.
On other occasions the Buddha becomes aware, through his supernormal knowledge, that a god needs some instruction to correct a wrong view or to goad him further on the path to awakening.
Then the Buddha travels to the higher plane and gives the deity a personal discourse.
Once a brahman admirer of the Buddha recounted as best as he could evidence of the greatness of the Buddha.
He was trying to convince other brahmans to meet the Buddha.
His proof included the fact that “many thousands of deities have gone for refuge for life to the recluse Gotama”.
Devas, like humans, develop faith in the Buddha by practicing his teachings.
In Chapter III we will see how grateful devas express this confidence.
When devas come to visit the Buddha late at night, their luminous bodies light up the monastery as they pay respects to the Exalted One and ask their questions.
We will start with a god who was agitated by fear arisen from his sensual desire, and conclude with one who becomes a stream-enterer during his conversation with the Buddha.
Subrahma deva was not a very sophisticated god; he delighted in sensuality, like many other devas of the sensuous sphere.
He had been playing in sport with his thousand nymphs when half of them suddenly vanished.
Subrahma used his deva vision to find where they had gone and he saw that they had died and been reborn in a hell realm.
Anxious that he and his remaining nymphs might soon suffer the same fate, he came to the Buddha looking for a way to end his fear:
The Buddha does not offer simplistic short-term solutions to the suffering beings go through when their loved ones die; he did not console the deva.
Instead, he told Subrahma that only by developing wholesome mental states through meditation and by giving up all attachments can anyone find security:
The deva and his remaining nymphs apparently comprehended these words, as the commentary says that at the end of this discourse they all became stream-enterers.
One deva who came to visit the Buddha seemed to be already trying to practice the Dhamma, for he was concerned about how beings can eliminate their internal and external bondage:
The Buddha replied that to untie these knots of misery one must cultivate morality, mindfulness, concentration, and insight.
He added that the arahants are indeed freed from the twists and bonds of rebirth:
A second deva concerned with liberation spoke a verse which is partly praise of the Buddha and partly a request for teaching.
Using various similes from the animal world, this god showed his admiration and reverence for the Exalted One.
In the last line, with all humility, he posed the question that the Buddha's teachings are designed to answer:
The Buddha treated this deva's serious query directly and with a minimum of words.
He replied that the way out of suffering is to cultivate detachment from the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind:
These two gods apparently had already prepared themselves for the Dhamma and did not need the kind of graduated discourse usually given to human beings, which begins with the benefits of generosity and ethics.
We can contemplate and practice the Buddha's advice to the deities to cultivate the detachment and insight that lead to liberation.
Once a group of six devas came to visit the Buddha at Savatthi, while he was residing in Jetavana, the monastery offered by Anathapindika.
The first deva spoke the following verse:
The other five concurred and spoke verses that differed only in their point of emphasis.
One said association with the good brings wisdom, another that friends dry our tears, another that wise friendship brings one a good reputation, another that it leads to a happy rebirth.
The last stated that a good friend is a source of bliss.
The Buddha approved their verses and then added one of his own:
The popular Maha-mangala Sutta — the Great Discourse on Blessings — originated when a radiant deva approached the Blessed One at Jetavana and respectfully requested a teaching on the highest good: “Many gods and men, wishing for well-being, have pondered over those things that constitute blessings.
Tell us what is the highest blessing.” When gods cannot concur among themselves they go to the Fully Self-Awakened One, “the light of the triple world,” the source of all wisdom.
The Buddha enumerated thirty-eight “blessings,” among them: rebirth in a good location, supporting one's parents, avoiding intoxicants, hearing the Dhamma, and knowing the Four Noble Truths.
This sutta to a deva is one of the select number of parittas, suttas recited for protection from harm, and is popular among Buddhists even to this day.
A deva named Kamada had been trying to follow the Buddha's teachings but found the task too demanding.
He sounds depressed, as we human meditators feel when we cannot see any “progress” in our practice and lose sight of the long-term perspective.
Discouraged, Kamada complained to the Buddha about how difficult it is to practice the Dhamma.
The Buddha took a positive approach.
He did not coddle or comfort the deva, but praised those bhikkhus who leave the household life to work steadfastly towards the goal:
Kamada remained disconsolate, insisting on the difficulties: “It is hard to win this serene contentment, Blessed One.” The Buddha repeated that some beings do it, those “who love to achieve the mastery of the heart, whose minds both day and night, love to meditate.” Meditation on the universal characteristics of change, unsatisfactoriness, and non-self is the way to ultimate contentment because it leads to detachment from all worldly concerns.
Kamada, however, complained that it is hard to compose the mind.
The Buddha agreed the task is not easy, but added: “Yet that which is hard to compose, they do compose it” and, calming their restless minds, they attain the stages of awakening.
“The path is impassable and uneven, Blessed One,” the deva complained.
He seems to crave some magic to make everything easy.
But that is not how the Buddhas teach: they only show the way, and we ourselves must put forth the energy to walk on.
Liberation takes consistent, persistent, diligent effort.
To Kamada, not yet a noble one, training the mind seemed to be an endless task:
Other devas had more sophisticated queries.
One deva, for example, asked the Buddha if an arahant could use words that refer to a self:
This deva realized that arahantship means the end of rebirth and suffering by uprooting mental defilements; he knew that arahants have no belief in any self or soul.
But he was puzzled to hear monks reputed to be arahants continuing to use such self-referential expressions.
The Buddha replied that an arahant might say “I” always aware of the merely pragmatic value of common terms:
The deva, trying to grasp the Buddha's meaning, asked whether an arahant would use such expressions because he is still prone to conceit.
The Buddha made it clear that the arahant has no delusions about his true nature.
He has uprooted all notions of self and removed all traces of pride and conceit:
Once late at night a deva came into the Buddha's presence, shedding bright light over the whole of Jetavana.
He saluted the Lord, stood to one side, and asked: “How, dear sir, did you cross the flood?” This god knew that the Buddha had gone beyond samsara's deluge of misery and wanted to learn how he had achieved this.
The Buddha replied: “By not standing still, friend, and by not struggling I crossed the flood.” The deva, perplexed by this paradox, asked for clarification.
To clear up the analogy, the Exalted One told him: “When I came to a standstill, friend, then I sank; but when I struggled, then I got swept away.
It is in this way, friend, that by not standing still and by not struggling I crossed the flood.” The metaphor describes balanced effort.
He “sank” when he did not work hard enough, but if he strained too hard he became agitated and got “swept away.” When he discerned how to cross over with just the right balance between energy and calm, he transcended the flood of suffering fully and permanently.
This deva rejoiced that at long last he had met a real arahant, a true holy man:
The delighted deva had correctly perceived what set the Buddha apart from others: he had transcended death, rebirth, and all suffering by eliminating all the mental impurities.
The deva began with a modicum of faith in the Buddha and received personal instruction from him.
As a result, the commentary indicates, he became a stream-enterer.
After the Buddha approved the deva's verse, he paid respects and departed.
On a similar occasion a deva asked the Buddha to explain the causes of the downfall, or moral decline, of beings.
In reply, the Buddha first gave a summary: “He who loves Dhamma progresses, he who hates it declines.” Then he named ten specific dangers to avoid: the company and teachings of the vicious, excessive sleep and talk, being irritable, not supporting aged parents if one has the resources to do so, lying to a monk or Dhamma teacher, being stingy, being conceited about birth, wealth, or community, running around with many women, drinking, gambling, and adultery, and marrying a woman many years younger than oneself.
The Buddha concluded, “Reflecting thoroughly on those causes of downfall in the world, the wise one, endowed with insight, enjoys bliss in a happy state.” Meditation on this negative subject makes wisdom grow, through avoidance, while encouraging insight and bringing pure happiness.
Sakka, king of the devas in the heaven of the Thirty-three, played many roles in the Buddha's mission.
He attended on the Bodhisatta at his final birth and at the Great Renunciation, visited the Buddha under the Bodhi Tree, and several times proclaimed his confidence in his unique qualities.
A discourse called Sakka's Questions took place after he had been a serious disciple of the Buddha for some time.
The sutta records a long audience he had with the Blessed One which culminated in his attainment of stream-entry.
Their conversation is an excellent example of the Buddha as “teacher of devas,” and shows all beings how to work for Nibbana.
For these reasons we will study Sakka's Questions in depth to see what message it has for us today.
From his vantage point in the Tavatimsa plane, Sakka was a keen observer of the behavior of humans and other beings.
He saw that while beings would like to live with each other peacefully, they rarely succeed.
Thus his opening question to the Buddha attempted to unravel this contradiction:
The Buddha explained that two mental factors — jealousy and avarice — cause all this trouble; from these two qualities almost all the aggression in the world arises.
In this way the Buddha began a step-by-step lesson in Buddhist psychology: causes and conditions govern everything that happens in the universe.
Sakka next asked about the origin of jealousy and avarice.
Behind jealousy and avarice, the Buddha said, lie liking and disliking, and the source of both liking and disliking is desire.
As this is such a basic problem, Sakka wanted to understand even more deeply the causes of desire.
The Buddha told him that desire is triggered by thinking.
Although he did not specify what sort of thinking, he must have been referring to unsystematic mental activity, the random thoughts in which the untrained mind indulges.
When Sakka asked about the cause of thinking, the Buddha said it is the “tendency to mental proliferation.” This is what brings about random thinking, which leads to desire, which in turn culminates in like and dislike.
These in turn condition jealousy and avarice, from which arise the conflicts in our daily lives.
Sakka next shifted to a more directly practical issue: “How does one destroy this sequence that leads to so much misery?” He requested the Buddha to explain what should be done to eliminate this tendency to endless proliferation of mental activity.
The Buddha replied that one should not blindly follow after every feeling that arises in the mind.
Rather, meditators should pursue a feeling — whether it be a pleasant, painful, or neutral one — only if doing so contributes to the growth of wholesome qualities.
If we are alert to our reactions and see that pursuing a feeling strengthens unwholesome tendencies, then we should relinquish that feeling.
We will not get carried away by desire for more enjoyable feelings or by aversion towards pain and unhappiness.
Sakka once again was very appreciative of the Buddha's words and he next asked more specifically about the practice of bhikkhus.
The deva knew that monks practice the Dhamma to the highest degree, in the purest form.
As a god he could not become a monk, but he wanted to discover how monks acquire the restraint required by the monastic disciplinary code.
The Buddha replied that the good bhikkhu pursues only bodily conduct, conversation, and goals which are conducive to the growth of wholesome qualities, to the attainment of Nibbana.
He rigorously restrains himself from everything detrimental to these aims.
Sakka had one more question about mind training: “How do bhikkhus control their senses?” Again the Buddha spoke of avoiding whatever leads to evil while cultivating the positive, this time referring to all kinds of objects — forms, sounds, odors, tastes, tactile objects, and ideas.
This is a basic Dhamma theme: always avoid unwholesome actions while one works to create wholesome kamma.
Sakka wanted to take full advantage of his lengthy audience with the Blessed One, so he embarked on another series of queries.
These deal with the variety of religious teachers he had seen in the world.
Even a deva can be confused by the range of doctrines taught by “holy” people.
He genuinely sought to learn: if these teachers all taught the same thing, and if they are all liberated.
How often do we hear today, “All paths lead to the same goal,” or “All spiritual teachings are the same beneath their superficial differences.” But the Buddha, the Fully Self-Awakened One, replied negatively to both of Sakka's questions.
He explained that spiritual teachers do not all teach the same thing because they have different perceptions of the truth.
From this it logically follows that they cannot all be fully liberated.
Proclaiming where true liberation lies, the Buddha instructed Sakka that only those “who are liberated by the destruction of craving are fully proficient, freed from the bonds, perfect in the holy life.” When evaluating spiritual teachers, bear in mind that liberation means destroying desire.
Sakka approved of the Buddha's statement and remarked that passion pulls beings to repeated rebirth in happy or unhappy circumstances.
Sakka was so at ease with his Teacher that he then related a story which shows an unexpected aspect of deity-human relationships.
Long ago he had gone to various human ascetics for advice on these matters with utterly unilluminating results.
None of the yogis that Sakka had hoped to learn from had told him anything.
In fact, as soon as they realized he was the king of the devas, one and all decided to become his disciples.
Ironically, Sakka found himself in the awkward position of having to tell them what little Dhamma he understood at the time.
They had no teachings to give him.
Sakka had been delighted with this whole conversation.
He declared that it had given him a unique happiness and satisfaction “conducive to dispassion, detachment, cessation, peace, higher knowledge, enlightenment, Nibbana.” This was the direction he had longed to travel, literally for ages.
He had at last made substantial progress with the guidance of the Blessed One.
Inviting Sakka to delve further into his mental processes, the Buddha then asked him what thoughts contribute to this great satisfaction.
In his final reply, Sakka declared he was joyful because he foresaw six facts about his future: As king of the devas he had gained “fresh potency of life.” At the end of this life, he would mindfully choose where to be reborn, in a human or higher realm.
In that future life too, he would follow the Buddha-Dhamma with wisdom, clear comprehension, and mindfulness.
He might attain arahantship in that existence.
But if not, he would become a non-returner and, after dying there, be reborn in the highest Pure Abode.
Finally Sakka knew that that existence would be his last; before it ended he would become an arahant.
The king of the devas then spoke a verse in gratitude to the Buddha:
The sutta then indicates that Sakka gained the stainless “vision of the Dhamma” by which he became a stream-enterer.
All his uncertainties about the path to final awakening had been dispelled by the Buddha's masterly replies to his questions, and his own past merits bore their proper fruit.
There is another discourse with Sakka as questioner.
It is set later on, at the monastery built by the woman lay devotee Visakha for the Buddha in Savatthi.
This time Sakka asked the Buddha: “How in brief is a bhikkhu liberated by the destruction of craving… one who is foremost among gods and humans?
In reply, the Buddha summarized the sequence that leads a bhikkhu to liberation:
The cycle of dependent origination explains that contact leads to feeling which in turn conditions craving, and craving causes clinging, which leads to rebirth and suffering.
So by contemplating feeling and by seeing it as impermanent, unsatisfactory, and non-self, the bhikkhu gives up all craving and clinging.
That is Nibbana here and now.
Delighted, Sakka paid respects to the Buddha and returned to the Tavatimsa deva plane.
In several episodes the Buddha travels to higher planes to teach the beings dwelling there.
While he generally visited the lower brahma planes for this purpose, his most important course of instruction to the gods took place on the Tavatimsa deva plane.
The Pali commentaries report that during the seventh rains retreat after his Enlightenment, the Buddha spent three months in the Tavatimsa heaven teaching the entire Abhidhamma to his mother along with numerous other devas and brahmas.
They had gathered there from the various deva planes of ten thousand world systems in order to listen to his exposition of this extremely precise philosophical psychology.
Only higher beings could have remained sitting in a single posture this long, and continuity of attention is essential for properly grasping the Abhidhamma.
“Infinite and immeasurable was the discourse, which went on ceaselessly for three months with the velocity of a waterfall”.
But as the Buddha was a human being, his body required normal food.
Thus everyday, in the terrestrial forenoon, he created an image of himself to continue preaching in Tavatimsa, while in his natural body he came to earth to collect almsfood and partake of a meal.
Venerable Sariputta met him daily at the Anotatta Lake, and there the Buddha summarized for him what he had taught the deities the previous day.
Sariputta gradually passed all this material on to his own group of five hundred bhikkhu pupils, elaborating and organizing it to make it easier to comprehend.
The Buddha gave this profound teaching in a higher plane as it demanded super-human attentiveness.
His chief student there was his mother, who had died a few days after his birth and was reborn in the Tusita deva-world.
By teaching her the most subtle aspects of the Dhamma, the seven sections of the Abhidhamma Pitaka, the Buddha expressed his gratitude to his mother for having carried him in her womb and bringing him into this world.
The stories of a Buddha going to teach a brahma take place on the plane of Maha Brahma, the third of the fine-material planes.
Many people worship Maha Brahma as the supreme and eternal creator God, but for the Buddha he is merely a powerful deity still caught within the cycle of repeated existence.
In point of fact, “Maha Brahma” is a role or office filled by different individuals at different periods.
The Buddha has directly seen the origins of Maha Brahma and understands what it requires to be reborn in his world.
In the Brahmajala Sutta the Buddha describes how a supposed Creator God came to believe himself omnipotent and how others came to rely on his sovereignty.
His description was based, not on speculation or hearsay, but on his own direct knowledge.
The Buddha explains that when our world system disintegrates, as it regularly does after extremely long periods of time, the lower sixteen planes are all destroyed.
Beings disappear from all planes below the seventeenth, the plane of the Abhassara gods.
Whatever beings cannot be born on the seventeenth or a higher brahma plane then must take birth on the lower planes in other remote world systems.
Eventually the world starts to re-form.
Then a solitary being passes away from the Abhassara plane and takes rebirth on the plane of Maha Brahma.
A palace created by his kamma awaits him there: “There he dwells, mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the air, abiding in glory.
And he continues thus for a long, long time.” After ages pass, he becomes lonely and longs for other beings to join him.
It just so happens that shortly after the brahma starts craving for company, other beings from the Abhassara plane, who have exhausted their lifespans there, pass away and are reborn in the palace of Brahma, in companionship with him.
Because these beings seemed to arise in accordance with the first brahma's wish, he becomes convinced that he is the almighty God: “I am the Great Brahma, the Vanquisher… the Lord, the Maker and Creator, the Supreme Being.” The other brahmas, seeing that he was already present when they took birth in his world, accept his claim and revere him as their creator.
Eventually this misconception of a Creator God spreads to the human plane.
One of the other brahmas passes away and is reborn here.
He develops concentration and learns to recollect his previous life with Maha Brahma, but none of his lives before that.
Recollecting that existence he recalls that Maha Brahma was considered the “father of all that are and are to be… permanent, stable, eternal.” As he is unable to remember further back, he believes this to be absolute truth and propounds a theistic doctrine of an omnipotent Creator God.
The Venerable Ledi Sayadaw, a highly renowned Myanmar scholar-monk of the first part of this century, gave a careful analysis of the powers of Maha Brahma in his Niyama Dipani.
He states that although Maha Brahma can perform all sorts of transformations, he cannot actually create independent creatures, change the kammic law of cause and effect, or keep anyone from growing old or dying.
Brahma can use his special powers to transport a man to the brahma plane for a short visit, but he cannot ensure that someone will be reborn there.
This story of a former Buddha's encounter with brahmas was recounted by Gotama Buddha to his disciples as follows.
Buddha Sikhin took his chief disciple, Abhibhu, along on a visit to a brahma world where he told him to give a discourse to the brahma, his ministers, and his retinue.
Venerable Abhibhu then “instructed, enlightened, incited, and inspired” the audience with a talk on Dhamma.
But the great brahma and his cohorts did not appreciate what they heard.
Instead of paying careful heed to the chief disciple's words, they felt insulted that a disciple should preach in the presence of the Master.
In their pride, they considered themselves worthy of the direct attention of the Buddha himself.
Sikhin of course knew the brahmas' unwholesome thoughts.
Without addressing them directly, he urged Abhibhu to continue and “agitate them exceedingly” in order to force them to acknowledge that they were not all-powerful, permanent, or superior to this arahant.
Abhibhu followed his master's instructions by working supernormal feats while continuing his discourse.
Only rarely does a Buddha himself perform supernormal acts or permit one of his disciples to do so in the human plane.
But in a brahma world, where deeds that seem impossible to us are the norm, these tactics are appropriate.
At times Abhibhu made his body invisible while speaking to the brahmas, at times half visible, at times fully visible.
This masterful performance did humble those brahmas.
They became more receptive, and realizing the monk was no ordinary human being, they exclaimed, “This is a marvellous thing: the great magic power and might of the recluse!
Abhibhu then remarked to the Lord that while speaking in a normal voice in the Brahma world, he could make the beings in the surrounding thousand realms hear what he said.
The Buddha, deeming this relevant to the occasion, urged him to show his prowess.
By projecting and broadcasting his speech, the disciple strove further to stimulate a sense of urgency in the brahmas so they would realize the need to stop the cycle of birth and death.
Although the lives of brahmas are full of the bliss of jhana, they remain subject to continual subtle change, to death and rebirth, and to suffering.
Abhibhu declaimed:
Then Buddha Sikhin and his chief disciple left that brahma realm.
They had done everything they could to make the brahmas see their own limitations and encourage them to practice the Dhamma.
A brahma known as Baka once reflected privately that he and his plane of existence were everlasting.
He thought that there could be no higher plane of rebirth and was convinced he had overcome suffering.
The Buddha discerned his deep-seated wrong view and decided to pay him a visit.
When he appeared in that brahma world, Baka Brahma welcomed him formally but immediately announced:
The Buddha, however, contradicted him, pointing out that every one of his claims was wrong.
Just then Mara the Evil One joined the conversation.
Mara's task is to prevent beings from being won over to the Dhamma, to keep them trapped in the cycle of birth and death, his own personal domain.
Taking possession of one of the brahma's attendants, Mara urged the Buddha, with a display of sympathy, to accept this brahma as God, the creator of all beings.
He told the Buddha that recluses of the past who delighted in things of this life and “who lauded Brahma” won happy births afterwards, while those who rejected Brahma had to endure terrible punishment.
The Exalted One let him have his say and then called his number:
All beings subject to craving — humans, subhumans, devas, or brahmas — are said to be in Mara's power because they can all be moved by defilements and must drift along in the current of birth and death.
But the Buddha and the arahants have permanently and completely escaped Mara's ken and power, for they have eliminated all defilements.
They have exhausted the fuel of rebirth and thus have vanquished the Lord of Death.
Baka Brahma next speaks up on his own behalf.
He reminds the Buddha of his opening statement on permanence.
He warns him that it is futile to seek “an escape beyond” his own realm, then he cajoles and threatens him in the same breath: “If you will hold to earth… beings… gods… you will be close to me, within my domain, for me to work my will upon and punish.” The Buddha agrees that if he clung to earth he would remain under the control of Maha Brahma, but he adds: “I understand your reach and your sway to extend thus: Baka the Brahma has this much power, this much might, this much influence.” The Buddha points out that beyond the thousandfold world system over which Baka reigns there are planes of existence of which he is totally unaware, and beyond all conditioned phenomena there is a reality that transcends even “the allness of the all” — a consciousness without manifestation, boundless, luminous on all sides — to which Baka has no access.
Demonstrating his superiority in knowledge and power, the Buddha uses his psychic powers to humble Baka and his entire assembly.
By the end of the discourse, these once haughty beings marvel at the might of the recluse Gotama: “Though living in a generation that delights in being… he has extirpated being together with its root.
Once an unnamed brahma gave rise to the deluded thought, “No recluse is powerful enough to reach my realm.” The Buddha read his mind and proved him wrong by simply appearing before him and sitting at ease in the air above his head, while radiating flames from his body in a dramatic display of supernormal powers.
Four great arahant disciples — Mahamoggallana, Kassapa, Kappina, and Anuruddha — independently realized what had happened and decided to join their Master on this brahma plane.
Each disciple sat in the air respectfully below the Buddha — but above the brahma — in one of the cardinal directions, shedding fire around himself.
A short dialogue in verse took place between Mahamoggallana, the Buddha's second chief disciple, and the brahma:
According to the commentary to this story, the brahma gave up his belief in his own superiority when he observed the magnificence of the Buddha and the arahants.
When the Buddha preached the Dhamma to him, he was established in the fruit of stream-entry and stopped thinking of himself as permanent.
When this brahma saw his own impermanence clearly and distinctly for himself, his former tenacious opinion that his world and life were immortal was uprooted.
Many aeons of preparation, the brahma's quick intellect, the Buddha's perfect timing, and the support of the four arahants bore fruit in the deity becoming a stream-enterer.
After the Buddha and his arahants left and returned to Jetavana, the great brahma wanted to learn more about the powers of bhikkhus.
He sent a member of his retinue to ask Mahamoggallana whether there are even more bhikkhus who can perform such feats.
Moggallana replied:
Not only do large numbers of bhikkhus have such special powers and the ability to know other people's minds, but there are numerous fully purified arahant disciples of the Buddha as well.
The emissary was glad to hear this answer, as was the brahma when he received the report.
Once a bhikkhu with psychic powers visited the various celestial realms seeking an answer to the question, “Where do the great elements — earth, water, fire, and air — cease without remainder?” An exhaustive inquiry led him from one realm to the next, until he finally came to Maha Brahma.
The first three times the monk asked his question, Brahma replied evasively: “Monk, I am Brahma, Great Brahma, the Conqueror, the Unconquered, the All-seeing.” Exasperated, the bhikkhu demanded a decent reply, “Friend, I did not ask if you are Brahma… I asked you where the four great elements cease without remainder.
At this point Maha Brahma took the monk by the arm, led him aside, and told him, “The brahmas of my entourage believe there is nothing Maha Brahma does not see, there is nothing he does not know, there is nothing he is unaware of.
That is why I did not speak in front of them.” Admitting his ignorance, he advised the monk to return to his Master, the Awakened One, who rephrased the question and gave the appropriate answer.
In this discourse we have more evidence that a Buddha is far beyond Maha Brahma in power, teaching skill, and understanding, and much of the proof is volunteered by the Great Brahma himself.
We have observed devas and brahmas approach the Buddha and ask him questions and we have followed the Buddha on his journeys to fine-material planes to uproot the delusions of brahmas.
The Buddha also instructs gods indirectly, when they overhear him teaching humans.
In such situations, devas with the requisite supporting conditions from previous lives can attain awakening along with the human auditors.
A number of suttas conclude with a statement that the discourse was applauded by many devas and brahmas who attained one or more of the stages of awakening while listening in.
One example is a discourse the Buddha gave to his son Rahula.
The Buddha had been instructing Rahula gradually from the time he was ordained as a novice at seven years of age.
The training became more profound as he grew in years and powers of discretion.
By the time Rahula was twenty-one, the Buddha decided it was time to lead him towards arahantship.
So one day, after the Blessed One had finished his meal, he told the young monk to come along with him to the Blind Men's Grove near Savatthi for the afternoon.
Rahula agreed and followed.
But they were not alone, for the text tells us that “many thousands of deities followed the Blessed One, thinking: 'Today the Blessed One will lead the Venerable Rahula further to the destruction of the taints.'” The commentary says that these gods had been companions of Rahula's during a previous life in which he first made the aspiration to attain arahantship as the son of a Buddha.
The Buddha sat down at the root of a tree and Rahula also took a seat.
The Buddha asked Rahula if each sense organ, each sense object, each kind of sense consciousness, and each kind of contact is permanent or impermanent.
Rahula stated that they are all impermanent.
We can deduce that the devas, invisibly present, were listening and simultaneously meditating on the appropriate answers.
The Buddha asked: “Is what is impermanent pleasant or suffering?” Rahula acknowledged that anything that is impermanent must be unsatisfactory or suffering.
Then the Teacher queried: “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?” “No” came the reply.
The invisible audience too must have drawn the same conclusion.
Next the Buddha asked Rahula if the feeling, perception, mental formations, and consciousness that arise through the contact of the six sense organs with their objects are permanent or not.
These are the four mental aggregates that — along with material form — constitute a being.
Rahula again said that they are impermanent.
He must have deduced that since the contact between the sense organs and their objects changes every instant, the aggregates that derive from them must also be transitory.
And again he recognized that whatever is impermanent is unsatisfactory.
He also understood that it is untenable to consider anything impermanent and unsatisfactory as “I, mine, or myself,” as the concept of control is at the heart of our ideas of “I” and “mine.
The Buddha then concluded that once one understands these facts fully, and sees how all these things are causally connected, one becomes disenchanted with all conditioned things:
That is, he attains full awakening, arahantship, and is no longer subject to rebirth.
As Rahula listened to his father's words, his mind was released from the taints through non-clinging.
By fully penetrating the discourse he had become an arahant, fully liberated from suffering.
All the deva and brahma spectators listening to the discourse attained the paths and fruits: “And in those many thousands of deities there arose the spotless immaculate vision of the Dhamma: 'All that is subject to arising is subject to cessation.'” Some of them, according to the commentary, became stream-enterers, some once-returners, some non-returners, and some arahants.
This variety was due to the differences in their prior preparation and present effort at the time of the sutta.
Even though this discourse was geared to a young monk, while the Buddha spoke higher beings developed their own insight through hearing it and purified their minds.
Everyone who has even glimpsed the magnificence of the Dhamma feels tremendous esteem for the Buddha.
Deities realize that he had dedicated innumerable lifetimes to perfecting himself so that he could teach others the way beyond suffering.
Because of their devotion to the Exalted One, devas gratefully come down to the human plane — though the earth is said to be repulsive to their refined senses — to express their homage and affirm their devotion to the Supreme Teacher.
This is the reciprocal aspect of the Buddha as “teacher of devas”: his deva and brahma disciples acknowledge their debt to their incomparable master.
They venerate him for his extraordinary purity and unique capacity to train others.
These Dhamma beneficiaries from the higher planes rejoice and offer profound homage to the Buddha because they see, over a broader temporal range than is perceptible to ordinary humans, how he offers beings the way out of the misery of samsara.
We will look at several examples of how the gods paid respect to the Buddha, finishing with the Great Occasion.
Not only do these incidents help illuminate the relationship between gods and the Buddha, but they can also serve as sustenance for our own Buddhanussati, meditation on the qualities of the Buddha.
This kind of contemplation creates wholesome kamma by increasing our confidence in the Teacher and prepares the mind for deeper concentration and insight.
Once Pañcasikha, a celestial musician, messenger, and attendant on the deva planes, appeared before the Buddha.
He reported that Sakka, king of the gods of the Thirty-three, especially honored the following qualities of the Buddha and his teaching:
The doctrine he teaches is “well proclaimed by the Blessed One, visible here and now, immediately effective, inviting inspection, onward leading, to be experienced by the wise for themselves.
He distinguishes and proclaims what is good and what is bad.
He explains the path to Nibbana.
He has taught beings to become learners and arahants.
Gifts to the Buddha are well-given and are accepted by him without any conceit.
He practices what he teaches and teaches what he practices.
There are absolutely no contradictions between his verbal and physical actions.
The Lord has gone beyond all doubt and accomplished his aim in regard to the goal and the supreme holy life.
Pañcasikha reported that when Sakka had said all this, the gods of the realm of the Thirty-three were delighted.
Sakka then concluded by telling them to cultivate the wish: “May this Blessed Lord continue to live long… free from sickness…” as that would benefit devas and humans.
What Sakka recommends is a simple form of meditation on universal love.
His audience must have been a group with mixed potential for Dhamma comprehension and he showed them a simple way to create wholesome mental kamma.
Since they all agreed that the Buddha was a very great being, they were happy to listen to his praises from Sakka.
This induced them to wish him good health so that he could teach more beings the way to Nibbana.
Sakka is often shown leading his fellow devas in some Dhamma activity.
Here he praises human beings who became noble ones and took rebirth on the plane of the Thirty-three, where they outshine the other gods in fame and splendor:
For Sakka and his cohorts, the great renown and beauty of the new devas confirm the value of the Buddha's teachings.
They are glad and therefore honor the Buddha and the Dhamma.
This verse comes at the beginning of a complex sutta which makes a number of interesting points about gods.
Ven.
Ananda had asked the Buddha where many deceased disciples of the Magadha area had been reborn.
Before answering, the Buddha directed his mind to find their plane of rebirth.
While he was investigating in this way, a deva came to him and announced that he was the former King Bimbisara, a stream-enterer.
As a man, he had been a devoted lay disciple for many years and had now been reborn among the Four Great Kings.
This deva related to the Buddha a long incident from the past that began with Sakka's remarks about newly arrived devas.
The episode provided the answer to Ananda's original question.
After Sakka finished speaking, the gods noticed that an unusually brilliant light shone on the assembly.
Then its source, Brahma Sanankumara, approached the gathering.
The former Bimbisara explained that whenever a brahma descends to a deva plane he assumes a grosser form “because his natural appearance is not such as to be perceptible to their eyes.” Brahma Sanankumara then gave the devas a Dhamma talk in which he surveyed the central teachings of the Buddha.
He began by praising the Blessed One's compassion:
Sanankumara concluded his discourse with words of great homage for the Buddha and the Dhamma.
He said that if one were to praise the Dhamma as well proclaimed, etc., and then to add “Open are the doors of the Deathless!” one would be speaking in accordance with the highest truth.
In the final portion of Brahma Sanankumara's speech, he numbered the stream-enterers and once-returners who had recently been born in the deva planes.
But he did not venture to comment on the number of worldlings who had acquired merit:
Sanankumara appears in several other suttas, where he always reveres the Buddha and the noble Sangha.
One of his stanzas, in which he extols the Buddha, is quoted several times in the Pali canon:
In the next story a brahma intervenes to help a human being receive the Dhamma.
Bahiya Daruciriya was a non-Buddhist ascetic.
The brahma, a non-returner from the Pure Abodes, had been one of Bahiya's companions at the time of the previous Buddha Kassapa, when they were members of a group of monks who had made a determined effort to win arahantship.
Bahiya had then failed in the attempt and was now reborn at the time of Gotama Buddha.
Bahiya had lived as a recluse for many years and he was respected by the multitude as a saint, even to such a degree that Bahiya himself almost came to believe this.
But one day, out of compassion for him, his old friend in the Pure Abodes appeared to him in a visible body and shocked him out of his complacency: “You, Bahiya, are neither an arahant nor have you entered the path to arahantship.
You do not follow the practice whereby you could be an arahant or enter the path to arahantship.
This had the desired effect, and Bahiya begged his benefactor, “Then, in the world including the devas, who are arahants or have entered the path to arahantship?” His desire for release from the world was so sincere that he had the humility to admit his limitations and ask for a teacher to show him the true path to holiness.
The brahma replied that a Buddha had arisen in the world and was living at Savatthi: “There the Lord now lives who is the arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
That Lord, Bahiya, is indeed an arahant and he teaches the Dhamma for the realization of arahantship.” As a non-returner since the time of the previous Buddha, the brahma knew precisely what Bahiya needed and he spoke the succinct truth about Buddha Gotama and his teaching.
Thanks to the intervention and the guidance of his lofty benefactor, Bahiya Daruciriya was directed to the Blessed One, whose brief and cryptic discourse had such a powerful impact that Bahiya achieved arahantship right on the spot.
After his death, the Buddha declared Bahiya the foremost bhikkhu with respect to quickness of understanding.
Once a devata, a goddess named Kokanada, visited the Blessed One at Vesali and recited verses in his praise:
Although this was apparently her first direct encounter with the Buddha, Kokanada understood a great deal about kamma and rebirth.
She saw that people are reborn in lower realms because they lack insight and disparage the Dhamma.
She also perceived that humans can attain deva or brahma births by discerning the Four Noble Truths: suffering, its cause, its cessation, and the Noble Eightfold Path leading to its cessation.
Her knowledge of Dhamma does not seem to go beyond this.
The Maha-samaya Sutta, or Discourse on the Great Assembly, is the most stunning illustration of higher beings coming to the human plane expressly to pay respects to the Buddha along with the arahants.
This “mighty gathering” took place when the Lord returned to the land of his ancestors, near Kapilavatthu.
Five hundred recently ordained bhikkhus, from the Sakyan and Koliyan clans, came to him to declare their attainment of arahantship.
Devas from many thousands of world systems approached to observe the occasion.
Four brahmas from the Pure Abodes, noticing that most of the other devas had gathered in the Great Wood to see the Buddha and arahants, decided to visit too.
So they assumed grosser form, appeared before the Buddha, saluted him, and stood respectfully to one side.
The first one announced why they had come:
Although “Sangha” can refer either to the community of monks or to all noble disciples, the adjective “unconquered” implies that the brahmas were admiring the arahant monks led by the Buddha.
The second brahma said:
The third used more similes to describe the achievement of arahants:
The last one spoke these lines:
This brahma knew that anyone who has genuine faith in the Buddha will not create kamma that could lead to a lower plane of existence.
That is how taking refuge in the Buddha assures us of a deva birth, not some magical power of his.
The Buddha then told the monks that devas and brahmas from the surrounding world systems come frequently to see the Tathagata and the Sangha.
It is not Gotama the Sakyan prince that they honor, but Gotama the Buddha and the community of noble ones.
The Buddha indicates that this is a general rule.
Wise deities used to come to pay obeisance to past Buddhas and will do the same for future ones too.
Then, so the monks could learn their identities, the Buddha announced the names of the groups of devas and brahmas as they presented themselves before him.
The list included earth-bound devas, the Four Great Kings with their retinues, asuras, Sakka, residents of the Tusita and Yama planes, occupants of the sun and moon, denizens of the two highest deva planes, and Maha Brahma “shining bright with all his train.” The Buddha related that the devas were saying:
This discourse illustrates another aspect of the relationship between the Buddha, the Supreme Teacher, and heavenly beings.
Some of them only yearn for an audience so they can express their confidence in him, acclaiming him in public.
At pivotal moments in the Buddha's career, deities often played supporting roles.
We read of devas showing respect at these turning points, helping him to overcome obstacles, and frequently proclaiming his feats far and wide.
At the moment of the Bodhisatta's final conception the gods rejoiced.
They knew that such a special being was arising after the long “darkness of ignorance” that set in when the Buddha Kassapa's Dispensation disappeared.
After having perfected all the paramis, every Bodhisatta is born on the Tusita deva plane in his next to last existence.
There he waits until all the requisite conditions on earth are ripe for the rekindling of the Dhamma.
Then the Bodhisatta passes away and enters his mother's womb, and after ten months he is born.
The attainment of Buddhahood requires a human existence with its characteristic combination of suffering and pleasure.
From the Venerable Ananda, the Buddha's personal attendant, we learn about “the Tathagata's wonderful and marvellous qualities,” which he himself had heard directly from the Buddha:
The conception of a Buddha-to-be in his final body causes unusual physical phenomena in various realms.
In fact, certain natural laws govern the major events in the careers of all Buddhas, past, present, and future: “It is the rule, monks, that when a Bodhisatta descends from Tusita into his mother's womb,” such a light appears and all these special phenomena occur.
The devas protect the Bodhisatta's foetus inside his mother so he can grow perfectly.
They shelter the mother so she is at peace, free from sensual desire, and relaxed, enabling the baby to develop in ideal conditions.
The description of his final birth in this discourse shows how important the devas are to this unique baby.
Queen Mahamaya gave birth standing under a tree in the woods near the village of Lumbini:
The recluse Asita, who was associated with the court of the Bodhisatta's father, witnessed these heavenly celebrations.
Asita was visiting the deva worlds at the time so he asked them, “Why are you all so happy and joyful?… I've never seen such excitement as this.” The devas explained to him:
Some of these devas were probably ariyas themselves, and others would have been aware of the infant's future destiny.
They rejoiced that the way to the end of suffering would soon be expounded, and Asita, stirred by their revelation, went to see the new-born child with his own eyes.
After living a refined life as a prince for many years, the Bodhisatta gradually became dissatisfied with this tedious round of hollow sense pleasures.
His paramis, built up for aeons, came to the fore, ripe for the attainment of Buddhahood.
He knew he had to find the way to release from suffering, so on the very night his wife gave birth to their only child he renounced the home life to become a recluse.
Over the next six years he mastered the stages of concentration under various gurus and tormented his flesh with the most severe ascetic practices.
Deities observed his progress from the deva planes and occasionally intervened.
For example, when the Bodhisatta considered abstaining from all food, deities came and offered to infuse heavenly food through the pores of his skin, but the Bodhisatta refused:
The gods, observing the Great Being, would not let him kill himself through voluntary starvation, but he on his part would not allow himself to speak untruth even by implication; thus he would not accept their offer.
Although the Bodhisatta undertook long grueling fasts, he still did not come any closer to what he really sought: the way to uproot all the causes of suffering and so end rebirth once and for all.
After the Bodhisatta spent six years pursuing ascetic practices to their limit, he finally set out alone to discover another method to fulfill his aim.
He had realized that self-torture was not the solution, so he started to consume normal food again.
He walked to the place now known as Bodh Gaya in Bihar, India.
There he began to meditate under a tree, using a method he recalled from a spontaneous childhood experience of meditation.
He was determined either to attain full liberation then and there or else to die in the attempt.
According to tradition, as the Bodhisatta struggled against Mara beneath the Bodhi Tree, when Mara challenged his right to attain awakening, he asked the earth to witness how he had perfected himself for so long to reach Buddhahood.
Many devas and brahmas joined the battle, vouching for his completed paramis.
Thereupon Mara, along with his evil troops, was routed and fled the scene.
This “calling the earth to witness” is memorialized in innumerable paintings and statues: the Bodhisatta, seated cross-legged in meditation posture, touches the ground by his knee with his right hand, a gesture intended to draw forth its testimony.
In the eighth week following the awakening, while the newly enlightened Buddha was still near the Bodhi Tree, he hesitated to teach the Dhamma, apprehensive that it would be too profound for human comprehension.
Brahma Sahampati then became aware of what was going on in the Buddha's mind.
This brahma, according to the commentaries, had become a non-returner under a previous Buddha and resided in one of the Pure Abodes.
Distressed at the Buddha's hesitancy, he thought: “The world will be lost, utterly perish since the mind of the Tathagata, Arahant, Supreme Buddha inclines to inaction and not towards preaching the Dhamma!” So he appeared before the Buddha, respectfully stooped with his right knee to the ground, paid homage and appealed to him to teach:
The Buddha then gazed out upon the world with his “eye of a Buddha,” and having seen that there are beings “with little dust in their eyes” who would be capable of understanding the truth, he announced, “Open for them are the doors to the Deathless” — a gift that has come down to us through the centuries.
Brahma Sahampati was gratified and joyously thought, “Now I am one who has given an opening for the Buddha to teach the Dhamma to beings.” The Brahma then bowed to the Buddha and vanished.
One might wonder why the Buddha, who had prepared himself for numerous lifetimes just to teach the Dhamma to other beings, needed the prompting of Brahma Sahampati to set out on his mission.
The commentary offers two explanations: only after he had attained Buddhahood could the Buddha fully comprehend the actual scope of the defilements saturating the minds of beings and the profundity of the Dhamma; and he wanted a brahma to request him to teach so the numerous followers of Maha Brahma would be inclined to listen to the Dhamma.
Now that he was committed to transmit the Dhamma, the Lord had to find his first students.
He determined that the five ascetics who had assisted him in his struggle for the last few years would be the appropriate auditors.
Aware that the group was staying at Isipatana, a royal deer reserve not far from Varanasi, he made his way there in stages.
When the ascetics first caught sight of him in the distance, they decided not to greet him, for they believed he had reverted to a comfortable life and had abandoned the search for truth.
However, as the Buddha approached, his unique demeanour dispelled this assumption and they listened keenly when he spoke.
He taught them the Middle Way between the extremes of asceticism and immersion in sense pleasures, the path which he himself had followed when he abandoned futile austerities.
The Buddha next explained the Four Noble Truths and the Noble Eightfold Path.
While he spoke devas and brahmas paid close attention, and at the conclusion they sounded their applause upwards from the lowest plane of the earth-bound devas, through each of the six sense-sphere deva planes, even up through the Brahma-world:
Under the impact of this momentous event, the entire ten-thousandfold world system shook and reverberated, and a brilliant light appeared, far superior to that of all the devas and brahmas, matched only by wisdom illuminating the Truth.
The gods were messengers conveying this wonderful news throughout the universe.
Devas came to the Buddha several times when he was physically unwell.
Once the renegade monk Devadatta, who wanted to take over the Sangha by force, hurled a massive boulder at the Buddha.
The stone splintered before it hit the Lord, but a small fragment lodged in his foot, causing severe pain.
So for some time, the Buddha lay down “mindful and discerning,” observing the painful sensations.
Then a large group of devas came to see the Teacher, anxious for his welfare.
Impressed by the perfect equanimity he displayed despite the wound, they spoke in turn, praising him as a bull elephant, a lion, a thoroughbred, a bull, an ox, for his ability to patiently endure painful bodily feelings — “racking, sharp, piercing, harrowing, disagreeable” — mindful and clearly comprehending, without becoming distressed.
A few months before the Parinibbana, the Buddha spent the rains retreat near Vesali, where he suffered from dysentery.
According to the Dhammapada Commentary Sakka, king of the devas, found out the Blessed One was ill and came to nurse him.
The Buddha told him not to bother as there were many monks to handle this task, but Sakka stayed on and looked after the Buddha's physical needs until he had recovered.
Some monks were surprised to see the great deva doing such menial chores.
The Buddha explained to them that Sakka was so devoted to the Tathagata because he had gained stream-entry by learning the Dhamma from him.
The Buddha then pointed out that it is always good to associate with the wise, to be in their presence and learn from the example of their actions as well as from their verbal teachings.
Devas and brahmas were active at several phases of the Maha Parinibbana — the Buddha's final passing away at Kusinara — as recorded in the Maha Parinibbana Suttanta.
This event was not just the demise of a greatly revered being but it also represented the personal consummation of his teachings.
It was the utter, permanent cessation of the aggregates of the one who discovered and taught the way to the end of suffering.
A short while before the Buddha attained final Nibbana, he lay down to rest between two sal-trees.
They began flowering profusely, out of season.
After some time, the Buddha told the monk who had been fanning him to go away.
Then the Venerable Ananda, his devoted attendant, asked him why he had dismissed that monk.
The Buddha replied:
The indomitable Ananda, who had permission to ask the Buddha any question, next wanted to know what kinds of devas were around them.
The Buddha said he saw lower devas who are “weeping and tearing their hair” in distress, moaning, “All too soon the Blessed Lord is passing away, all too soon the Well-Farer is passing away, all too soon the Eye of the World is disappearing!” But there were devas free from craving who endured this patiently, saying.
“All compounded things are impermanent — what is the use of this?”.
After passing through the successive jhanas, the Buddha finally expired, attaining Parinibbana, the immutable cessation of rebirth.
At that moment the earth quaked, as it does whenever Buddhas pass away.
Brahma Sahampati, who had entreated the Buddha to teach forty-five years earlier, spoke a verse as a short eulogy:
Sakka repeated a verse of the Buddha's on the theme of impermanence.
While Sahampati used conventional speech adoring the deceased Lord, Sakka spoke in impersonal and universal terms.
His verse makes an excellent theme for meditation and is often chanted at Buddhist funerals:
All the “compounded things,” which make up everyone and everything in all the world, come into being and perish.
Only when they cease utterly never to rearise can there be the perfect bliss, Nibbana.
These stanzas by the renowned brahma and the king of the devas show how the beings on the higher planes applied their insight into impermanence and suffering, even to the Parinibbana of their Lord and Master.
After they had honored the Buddha's body for a full week, the Mallas of Kusinara decided it was time for the funeral.
They began to prepare for the cremation but could not lift the body and carry it out the southern gate of the city.
Puzzled, they asked the Venerable Anuruddha what was wrong.
This great elder, renowned for his “divine eye,” told the devotees that the devas had their own ideas of how to arrange the funeral.
The deities, he said, planned first to pay “homage to the Lord's body with heavenly dance and song” and then take it in procession through the city of Kusinara to the cremation site.
The devas intended the cremation to be at the Mallas' shrine known as Makuta-Bandhana.
The Mallas were happy to change their plans and proceeded unhindered to arrange the funeral as the devas wished.
Out of respect the gods participated in all phases of the funerary proceedings.
It is said that “even the sewers and rubbish-heaps of Kusinara were covered knee-high with coral tree flowers.
And the devas as well as the Mallas… honored the Lord's body with divine and human dancing and song.
They transported the body to the Makuta-Bandhana shrine and placed it there.
They wrapt it many times in layers of finest cloth, built the pyre of scented wood, and placed the bier bearing the Buddha's body on top.
But when the men tried to light the fire it would not ignite.
Again the reason lay with the devas.
Anuruddha explained that the devas would not allow the pyre to be lit until the Venerable Maha Kassapa arrived for the cremation.
Once Maha Kassapa and his group of bhikkhus had arrived and paid their last respects to the Exalted One's body, the pyre blazed up spontaneously, burning until almost nothing remained behind.

Human beings, devas, and brahmas are the broad categories of beings in the “happy realms of existence.” The human world is marked by a pervasive admixture of happiness and suffering.
This dual nature is the main reason why Buddhas are born here.
The uneven quality of human life enables us to realize the unreliable nature of happiness and inspires in us a sense of urgency about the need to win deliverance from suffering.
Unlike the beings in the lower planes, few humans are overwhelmed by unmitigated and excruciating pain.
We do, of course, experience physical pain and mental stress, but such experience is generally intermittent.
For the most part our suffering is of a more subtle character.
We can observe that every pleasure brings along some measure of dissatisfaction.
Our contentment is unsteady and secured with difficulty.
We must struggle to satisfy our needs and desires, but become anxious the moment we succeed.
Even when we are relatively happy we are beset by a deep, subtle kind of suffering.
This suffering, which lies below the threshold of painful feeling, stems from the momentary vanishing of all the conditioned formations of body and mind.
In spite of our pain, human beings with an inclination for the Dhamma can make the effort to live by the Five Precepts of morality.
We can find the energy to train our minds towards the concentration and insight required for awakening.
In contrast, devas see far less of the evident kinds of misery in their daily existence.
Some brahmas meet no gross suffering except when they look down at beings on lower planes.
Many devas instantly obtain whatever sense object they wish for.
Brahmas dwell in sublime bliss and equanimity.
In the fine-material and immaterial spheres ill will is suppressed, and without it there is no mental unhappiness.
It is difficult for deities to appreciate that everything changes and to recognize that their present pleasure and bliss do not last forever.
Like Baka Brahma, many imagine that they are eternal.
The subtler forms of suffering tend to escape them as well.
Without help from a Buddha or one of his disciples, they do not understand that the impersonal conditions that will terminate their felicity are already in operation.
Many of the higher beings, as we have seen, have no idea that they will die, that their worlds and lives are in flux, that they are not fully in control, but are decaying at every instant.
So in spite of their excellent concentration and present opulence, they are even at a disadvantage compared to human beings, who are driven by pain and frustration to seek the path to deliverance.
How then can such beings be induced to meditate?
Why should they become concerned with suffering and its cessation?
We have indicated the answers to those questions in preceding chapters.
This is the job of the Buddha as “teacher of the gods.
Some devas long to be reborn as human beings because they are aware of the greater possibility of comprehending impermanence, suffering, and non-self on the human plane.
There is no real illness on the deva planes.
When a deva faces death, his aura begins to fade and dirt appears on his clothes for the first time.
When the gods see these indications of impending death, they tell their friend:
The Buddha then explained the devas' concept of a good birth and of what is “good to gain”:
The last sentence refers to a stream-enterer.
Only stream-enterers have such steadfast confidence in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
They will definitely attain final awakening and release, and until then will never be reborn on a plane below the human one.
To become an ariya is the greatest achievement for any being lost in the round of rebirth.
Only by entering the stream to awakening can beings proceed to eliminate all the causes of suffering.
The Buddha explained that the devas view a human existence as an excellent opportunity for growth in morality, giving, faith, and understanding.
With compassionate concern for their dying cohort, they say:
The devas urge their friend to become a morally upright human being.
He should give up everything unwholesome, be generous, and, once established in faith and meritorious deeds, help spread the Buddha's message.
Not only do wise gods long for human birth to practice the Dhamma, they also rejoice when they observe people establishing themselves in the way to the cessation of suffering.
Such deities are convinced that human beings like these are greater than themselves.
In spite of all the magnificent sights, appealing perfumes and tastes, melodious music, and other sensual pleasures they have at their beck and call, these devas understand the unsatisfactory nature of existence sufficiently to value the effort to put an end to samsaric wandering.
In the sutta preceding the one quoted above, the Buddha spoke of “joyous utterances” devas give forth in three situations: when a man is preparing to ordain as a bhikkhu; when a person is “engaged in cultivating the… requisites of enlightenment”; and when someone attains the goal, utterly destroying the mental defilements.
Whenever devas notice people engaged in the first two deeds, they rejoice saying, “A noble disciple is doing battle with Mara.” When the devas see that someone on the human plane has become fully awakened, they declare: “A noble disciple has won the battle.
He was in the forefront of the fight and now dwells victorious.” They commend and extol the arahant in verse.
The Buddha has explained in many ways that liberation is infinitely more valuable than any state of existence.
Even blissful lives in the deva and brahma planes invariably include subtle suffering, end in death, and are followed by uncertain rebirth.
In a discourse called “Reappearance according to one's Aspiration,” he said:
The Buddha repeated the same statement in regard to every happy plane as far as the highest realm of existence.
The good kamma generated by positive mental qualities, conjoined with the aspiration for a particular birth, can bring about rebirth on that plane.
So by cultivating these traits one can be reborn in any of the six deva planes.
With the support of the requisite jhana, one can take birth in any of the fine-material or immaterial planes.
If, additionally, one has destroyed the five lower fetters and become a non-returner, one can be reborn spontaneously in the Pure Abodes.
The supreme aim, however, is arahantship.
If one has purified one's mind totally of greed, hate, and delusion, one would experience “the destruction of the taints.” Hence the discourse culminates with a monk aspiring for arahantship:
That bhikkhu's demise is parinibbana, the end of all possible forms of suffering forever.
Although devas and brahmas have very long lives pervaded by inconceivable bliss, they are not inherently greater than human beings.
As we have seen, they are all subject to repeated becoming.
A deva may well be reborn on one of the lower planes.
Brahmas can fall to a ghostly or hellish existence after one intermediate life as a deva or human.
The Buddha states that even lives lasting many aeons in the highest formless planes can end in lower births.
Therefore such lives provide no security, but only temporary remission of the underlying disease, and if they are not dedicated to progress towards Nibbana their value is virtually nil.
One who has understood the noble Dhamma will look upon such modes of existence with revulsion and dispassion.
Only by becoming an ariya can one be sure that one faces no more lower rebirths and is headed for the complete cessation of samsara.
To become a stream-enterer requires three things.
One has to develop confidence in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, relinquish any idea that rituals lead to liberation, and most important, eliminate the deep-seated view “I am real and lasting” that characterizes all worldlings.
By uprooting that deluded view, noble ones remove their tendency to create the heavy bad kamma that leads to birth in the realms of woe.
Sometimes lay people, not yet ripe enough to desire liberation, asked the Buddha how to be successful in their mundane endeavors or how to be reborn on a celestial plane after death.
The Master would reply with a discourse suited to their limited ability and inclination.
He would tell them to give generously and live a moral life.
He would specifically urge them to observe the Five Precepts without a breach and to undertake the Eight Precepts on special occasions.
Generating such good kamma is the way to general well-being, now and after death.
These basic steps form the starting point of the gradual training that leads all the way to arahantship.
The Dhamma is consistent from start to finish.
When the Buddha describes the entire course of a bhikkhu's training, from leaving home to arahantship, he devotes considerable attention to the jhanas, the highest form of concentration.
One who can keep the mind absorbed on a single object can apply this capacity for attention to insight, the wisdom section of the path.
One skilled in jhana can easily discern the impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and selfless nature of the aggregates for extended periods.
The jhanas also create strong wholesome kamma, as they are all associated with some form of wisdom.
Individuals who practice the jhanas but do not reflect on them with insight may think the jhanas permanently efface their unwholesome tendencies.
The Buddha found, however, that mental defilements are only suppressed — perhaps for a very long time — by these meditative states.
Such absorptions bring bliss and peace here and now, generate wholesome kamma, and may bring rebirth in a plane of the brahma world.
However, they do not uproot the latent defilements and thus cannot cut off the root causes of samsara.
For this one needs insight-wisdom, the discernment of the three universal marks of impermanence, suffering, and non-self.
Let us human beings apply ourselves wholeheartedly and take up the unique opportunity given by our present birth.
In the round of samsara it is extremely rare to rise above the realms of woe, where the way out of suffering cannot be followed, and a human birth is even more favorable to awakening than birth in the realm of the gods.
Devas envy us our place, ostensibly so low on the cosmic scale, and wish to be reborn as humans.
The Buddha Sasana still thrives, the Dhamma is available in full, there are excellent teachers who are true disciples of the Master, and we are on the best plane for striving.
Final awakening does not bring “eternal life” in some heaven as many religions promise.
Nibbana means letting go of everything — relinquishing every state of being anywhere in the cosmos.
It is our attachments and cravings, rooted in ignorance, that keep us revolving in samsara's misery.
Wisdom shows how all existence is bound up with suffering and thereby illuminates the futility of all craving for being.
Then all old kamma is burnt up and no new fuel for birth is created.
The process of birth and death just stops, once and for all.
This is not the end of an existing being, as no such being ever was.
It is only the end of a process, of the flux of physical and mental phenomena arising and vanishing due to complex networks of causes and conditions.
There is no controlling or enduring self of any sort at any time.
What the Buddha taught deities, he taught people; what he taught people, he taught devas and brahmas: just the universal fact of suffering, and the way to the cessation of suffering — morality, concentration, and wisdom.
In some cases my quotations from existing translations have been modified, especially when quoting from GS.
Quotations from MLDB invariably, and from Ud, It, and LDB usually, are exactly as they occur in these contemporary translations.
Bhikkhu Bodhi's draft translation of SN is quoted verbatim.
References to MN and DN are by sutta and section number of MLDB and LDB respectively; to SN, by chapter and sutta number, with page numbers of KS; to AN, by nipata and sutta number, with page numbers of GS; to the Udana, by chapter and section; to It, by sutta number.
Verses of SN are from a draft translation by Bhikkhu Bodhi.
Pali Text Society:
Buddhist Publication Society:
Wisdom Publications:
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The theme of this study, Buddhist ceremonies and rituals, may not appeal to the self-styled Buddhist purist who wishes to restrict the designation “Buddhism” exclusively to the teachings of the Buddhist scriptures, which he usually interprets in a narrowly intellectualist manner.
The fact remains, however, that the practices and observances to be described here justly claim an integral place within the stream of living Buddhism as practiced by its adherents.
Because these practices form an intimate part of the religious life for the vast majority of devout Buddhist followers, they cannot be lightly dismissed as mere secondary appendages of a “pristine” canonical Buddhism.
It has been an inevitable phenomenon in the history of religion that whenever a religion was newly introduced to a culture, its adherents assimilated it and adapted it in ways that harmonized with their own social and cultural needs.
In the case of Buddhism this has happened in every country to which it spread, and Sri Lanka is no exception.
The core doctrines of Buddhism, such as the Four Noble Truths, the Noble Eightfold Path, dependent arising, etc., often proved too abstruse and elevated for the ordinary populace to apply to their own religious lives.
To satisfy their devotional and emotional needs, they required a system of outward acts, communally shared, by which they could express their devotion to the ideals represented by the Dhamma and absorb these ideals into the texture of their daily experience.
This was how the “great tradition” of canonical Buddhism came to be complemented by the “small tradition” of popular Buddhism consisting of the rituals and ceremonies discussed in this booklet.
The purpose of the present study is to highlight this often neglected face of popular Buddhism.
Though the study focuses on Buddhism as practiced in Sri Lanka, the same basic round of rituals and ceremonies, with minor variations, can be found in the other countries following Theravada Buddhism, such as Burma and Thailand.
I also hope that this survey will demonstrate that the expression of Buddhist piety in devotional forms is a necessity if Buddhism is to survive at the popular level as a vital and vibrant force in the daily life of its adherents.
Thus the votaries of a “pristine pure Buddhism” posited on the basis of the canonical texts should not ignore or devalue this aspect of Buddhism as an alien encroachment on the Buddha's original doctrine.
Rather, they should come to recognize the devotional manifestation of Buddhism as an essential feature of the tradition, needed to mediate between its exalted ideals and the everyday concerns of the vast majority of its followers.
A.G.S.
Kariyawasam
Sri Lanka is generally regarded as the home of the pure Theravada form of Buddhism, which is based on the Pali canon.
This school of Buddhism emphasizes the Four Noble Truths as the framework of Buddhist doctrine and the Noble Eightfold Path as the direct route to Nibbana, the final goal of the Teaching.
However, side by side with this austere, intellectually sophisticated Buddhism of the texts, we find in Sri Lanka a warm current of devotional Buddhism practiced by the general Buddhist populace, who may have only a hazy idea of the Buddhist doctrine.
Thus in practical life the gap between the “great tradition” of canonical Buddhism and the average person's world of everyday experience is bridged by a complex round of ceremonies, rituals, and devotional practices that are hardly visible within the canonical texts themselves.
While the specific forms of ritual and ceremony in Sri Lankan popular Buddhism doubtlessly evolved over the centuries, it seems likely that this devotional approach to the Dhamma has its roots in lay Buddhist practice even during the time of the Buddha himself.
Devotion being the intimate inner side of religious worship, it must have had a place in early Buddhism.
For Buddhism, devotion does not mean submitting oneself to the will of a God or taking refuge in an external Saviour, but an ardent feeling of love and affection directed towards the Teacher who shows the way to freedom from suffering.
Such an attitude inspires the devotee to follow the Master's teaching faithfully and earnestly through all the hurdles that lie along the way to Nibbana.
The Buddha often stressed the importance of saddha, faith or confidence in him as the Perfect Teacher and in his Teaching as the vehicle to liberation from the cycle of rebirth.
Unshakeable confidence in the Triple Gem — the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha — is a mark of the noble disciple, while the Buddha once stated that those who have sufficient confidence in him, sufficient affection for him are bound for heaven.
Many verses of the Theragatha and Therigatha, poems of the ancient monks and nuns, convey feelings of deep devotion and a high level of emotional elation.
Although the canonical texts do not indicate that this devotional sensibility had yet come to expression in fully formed rituals, it seems plausible that simple ritualistic observances giving vent to feelings of devotion had already begun to take shape even during the Buddha's lifetime.
Certainly they would have done so shortly after the Parinibbana, as is amply demonstrated by the funeral rites themselves, according to the testimony of the Maha-parinibbana Sutta.
The Buddha also encouraged a devotional attitude when he recommended pilgrimages to the four places that can inspire a faithful devotee: the places where he was born, attained Enlightenment, preached the first sermon, and attained Parinibbana.
The Buddha did discourage the wrong kind of emotional attachment to himself, as evidenced by the case of Vakkali Thera, who was reprimanded for his obsession with the beauty of the Buddha's physical presence: his was a case of misplaced devotion.
Ritualistic observances also pose a danger that they might be misapprehended as ends in themselves instead of being employed as means for channelling the devotional emotions into the correct path.
It is when they are wrongly practiced that they become impediments rather than aids to the spiritual life.
It is to warn against this that the Buddha has categorized them, under the term silabbata-paramasa, as one of the ten fetters and one of the four types of clinging.
Correctly observed, as means and not as ends, ritualistic practices can serve to generate wholesome states of mind, while certain other rituals collectively performed can serve as a means of strengthening the social solidarity among those who share the same spiritual ideals.
Thus ceremonies and rituals, as external acts which complement inward contemplative exercises, cannot be called alien to or incompatible with canonical Buddhism.
To the contrary, they are an integral part of the living tradition of all schools of Buddhism, including the Theravada.
A ritual may be defined here as an outward act performed regularly and consistently in a context that confers upon it a religious significance not immediately evident in the act itself.
A composite unity consisting of a number of subordinate ritualistic acts may be called a ceremony.
Such observances have become inseparable from all organized religions.
And owing to the fear, awe, and respect that characterize man's religious psychology, such acts assume a solemnity and a sanctity of their own.
Ritual acts undertaken and performed by the Buddhists of Sri Lanka may be broadly classified under three heads:
Acts performed for the acquisition of merit calculated to provide a basis for achieving Nibbana, release from the cycle of becoming; such acts of merit are, at the same time, expected to offer semi-temporal rewards of comfort and happiness here and in the heavenly worlds in future lives.
These supplementary forms of religious activity have arisen out of a natural need to augment the more austere way followed by the world-renouncing disciples.
Acts directed towards securing worldly prosperity and averting calamities through disease and unseen forces of evil, e.g., pirit chanting, bodhi-puja, etc.
Those rituals that have been adopted from folk religion.
Hence these are mainly semi-religious in character like the tovil ceremonies.
They derive their power and authority primarily through the superhuman power of the Buddha and also through the hosts of spirits, who are, as it were, commanded by invoking the power of the Buddha or of the Three Refuges — the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha — as a whole.
Almost all the religious activities that have a ceremonial and a ritualistic significance are regarded as acts for the acquisition of merit.
In this sense, all the religious activities of lay Buddhism can be explained as being oriented towards that end.
Accordingly, the first two types of rituals basically have a merit-generating character and thereby receive religious sanction.
For instance, the idea of acquisition of merit through a religious act and its transference to the deities and soliciting their help has the scriptural sanction of the Maha-parinibbana Sutta itself.
Here the Buddha says that wise men, when residing in a particular area, first offer alms to religious recluses and then transfer the merits to the deities of the area, who help them in return.
This seems to indicate the early beginning of adoring vatthu-devata or local deities in Buddhism.
Merit earned by the performance of a wholesome act is regarded as a sure way of obtaining a better life in the future.
The performance of these is also a means of expiation in the sense that the meritorious deeds have the effect of countering and hindering the operation of unwholesome kamma previously acquired and inherited.
Thus the range of merit is very wide.
For the ordinary householder, Nibbana is a goal to be achieved through a gradual process of evolution extending over many lives, and therefore until he achieves that sublime state at some future date he continues to perform these acts in order to lead a happy life.
All merit-generating rituals are performed mainly with this end in view.
Buddhism lacks any ceremony or ritual of initiation or admission like the upanayana in Hinduism or baptism in Christianity.
The traditional method of becoming a Buddhist is to repeat the formula of the Three Refuges and the Five Precepts, when they are formally administered by a Buddhist monk.
The formula of refuge is as follows:
This avowal of confidence in the Triple Gem is repeated for a second time, and a third time.
Next, the convert repeats in the following manner the Five Precepts which are meant to regulate his moral life:
Adinnadana veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami.
I undertake the precept to abstain from taking things not given.
Kamesu micchacara veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami.
I undertake the precept to abstain from sexual misconduct.
Musavada veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami.
I undertake the precept to abstain from false speech.
Suramerayamajjapamadatthana veramani sikkhapadam samadiyami.
I undertake the precept to abstain from taking distilled and fermented liquors that cause intoxication and heedlessness.
By this method a hitherto non-Buddhist lay person becomes a lay disciple of the Buddha.
It has to be noted here that what is meant by taking refuge in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha is the placing of confidence in the attainments of the Buddha as a Teacher and in the efficacy of the Dhamma as a reliable means to liberation.
The term “Sangha” here refers to the Ariya Sangha, comprising the four pairs of noble ones, i.e., the four practicing for the fruits and the four established in the fruits.
In this ceremony of initiation there is no recognition of salvation through the grace of a god or saviour as in theistic religions.
One goes for refuge as a way of expressing one's determination to follow the Buddha's path to liberation, but one must also realize that the task of walking the path is one's own responsibility.
While this is the method of formal admission of a new entrant into Buddhism, there are also certain ritualistic practices observed when a child is born to Buddhist parents.
The baby's first outing would be to a temple.
When the baby is fit to be taken out of doors the parents would select an auspicious day or a full-moon day and take the child to the nearest temple.
They would first place the child on the floor of the shrine room or in front of a statue of the Buddha for the purpose of obtaining the blessings of the Triple Gem.
This is a common sight at the Dalada Maligawa — the Temple of the Sacred Tooth Relic — in Kandy.
At the time of the daily religious ceremony of the temple, one can observe how mothers hand over their babies to an officiating layman inside the shrine room, who in turn keeps it for a few seconds on the floor near the Relic Chamber and hands it back to the mother.
The mother accepts the child and gives a small fee to the kapuva for the service rendered.
This practice too could be described as a ritual of initiation.
For the adherent of Buddhism, the ritual of worship is essentially a respectful recognition of the greatness of the Buddha as a spiritual teacher.
The ritual also implies an expression of gratitude to the Buddha for having discovered and revealed to humankind the path leading out of the mass of worldly suffering.
Both these factors in combination make this ritual an expression of devotion as well.
The most common daily ritual of the Buddhist is that of personal worship, which many devout Buddhists perform daily in their homes.
On the communal level the ritual is observed on the poya days at a temple or a monastery.
A distinction may be made between simple respectful salutation and the ritualistic worship accompanied by offerings of increasing complexity including food, drink, and clothing.
The former type is only an expression of respect and reverence as when a person clasps his hands in the gesture of worship in front of a religious symbol and recites a simple phrase like the well-known Namo tassa formula; nowadays the term sadhu has become quite popular with the Sinhala Buddhists for this purpose.
In the ritualistic form of worship the articles of offering are first respectfully placed on the altar in front of a statue of the Buddha or a dagaba or any other place of religious significance where such worship is performed.
Next, the devotee clasps his hands in the gesture of worship and solemnly recites various stanzas and formulas, thereby making the offerings formally valid.
Every act of Buddhist worship begins with the well-known formula of homage to the Buddha, Namo tassa bhagavato arahato sammasambuddhassa, which is repeated thrice.
This is followed by the Refuge formula and the Five Precepts given earlier.
The next step is paying homage to the Three Gems in three separate formulas, which recount nine virtues of the Buddha, six virtues of the Dhamma, and nine virtues of the Sangha.
These formulas are extracted from the Pali Nikayas and have become the standard formulas with which the Three Gems are worshipped.
The physical posture adopted by the devotees when performing these acts of worship may vary according to the solemnity of the occasion or the degree of the devotion of the worshipper.
In the most respectful form of worship, e.g., when worshipping a dagaba in which the relics — a bone, hair, bowl, etc., of the Buddha — are enshrined, one touches the ground with five parts of the body.
The two postures of squatting and kneeling are also popular.
The cross-legged posture and the standing position are also sometimes adopted.
Whatever be the posture taken, it should be accompanied with hands clasped together in adoration.
Of the many articles of offering used at present in this kind of worship in Sri Lanka, flowers have become the most important and popular.
They constitute the minimum requirement at any form of Buddhist worship.
One can observe how the devotees arrange the flowers in various patterns on the altar.
The color, smell, and quality of the flowers are taken into account when selecting them for offering.
Before being offered, the flowers are “bathed” with filtered water.
Sometimes they are arranged in a tray and offered.
A flower's blooming upon contact with light is regarded as symbolic of the attainment of Enlightenment, hence flowers become quite a fitting article for offering to the Buddha, the Enlightened One.
As was mentioned earlier, an essential part of the ritual of offering flowers is the recital of the following Pali stanza, whereby the offering is made valid:
“This mass of flowers endowed with color, fragrance, and quality I offer at the lotus-like feet of the King of Sages.
I worship the Buddha with these flowers: by the merit of this may I attain freedom.
Even as these flowers do fade, so does my body come to destruction.
It is of interest to note that this stanza incorporates the Buddhist idea of the impermanence of all phenomena.
Merit-acquisition is also regarded as contributing towards the attainment of Nibbanic freedom.
Another popular offering of much importance is that of lighted lamps, usually of coconut oil.
As the Buddha is regarded as the dispeller of the darkness of ignorance, when lighted lamps are offered in his name this metaphorical contrast between the light of knowledge and the darkness of ignorance is taken as the theoretical basis for the ritual.
This kind of symbolism being too deep for the vast majority of ordinary people, their motive for this ritual is usually the desire to acquire merit or to avert the evil influence of a bad planetary conjunction.
However, it is the former idea that is implied in the traditional stanza used by the Buddhists of Sri Lanka for this offering:
“With this lamp lit with camphor that dispels all darkness, I worship the Perfectly Enlightened One who is a lamp unto the three worlds and is the dispeller of darkness.
The epithets tilokadipa and tamonuda as applied to the Buddha are significant in this context.
The stanza itself seems to testify to the popularity of the offering of camphor in early times.
But nowadays, even when coconut oil has replaced camphor, the stanza has survived without change.
The offering of lighted lamps had been a popular ritual even in ancient times.
The Bodhi-tree and the dagaba are the two main objects or places where the ritual is usually performed.
The offering of lamps is one of the main aspects of the worship of the Bodhi-tree.
As it was under a Bodhi-tree that the Buddha attained Enlightenment, it is quite natural that lamps be lit under that tree, not only in memory of the great event, but also as a ritual whereby the devotee could expect to obtain a ray of that light of wisdom attained by the Great Sage.
Thus the entire ritual becomes a spiritual exercise, the merits of which are transferred to all other beings, gods, humans, and spirits.
Dagabas constitute another place where this popular offering is made.
Consequently, along with the flower-altar, the lamp-stand too has become a necessary adjunct of the dagabas.
One can also see that the Bodhi-tree in most temples is surrounded by a platform built of brick or stone in which niches are made to hold lighted oil lamps.
The niches are meant to shelter the lamps from wind and rain.
In any Buddhist temple there are many other places where lamps can be lit in that way.
Sometimes special lamp-stands are constructed for the purpose.
Of special significance is the lamp called the dolosmahe-pahana, sometimes found in Buddhist temples and devalayas.
It is called thus because it is expected to keep burning all-year round.
Special light offerings are also made on auspicious occasions.
On full-moon days when devotees flock to the temples, lamps are lit in large numbers, for it is the custom among the Sri Lankan Buddhists invariably to take flowers and coconut oil on their visits to the temple as two indispensable articles of worship.
There are also occasions when devotees light and offer a particular large number of lamps for special purposes, such as redeeming a vow or on special occasions like Vesak Day.
Many Buddhists perform the ritual of light offering to counter evil planetary influences.
In order to obtain maximum results from the ritual, the devotees make it a point to purify themselves completely before attending the ceremony by bathing and wearing fresh, clean clothes.
Coconut oil used as an illuminant is specially prepared for the purpose and taken separately from the coconut oil used for household purposes.
Wicks are prepared from a clean, white, fresh cloth.
Sometimes the inhabitants of an entire village co-operate in holding a mass-scale lamp offering.
For instance, they may offer, lighted lamps in memory of the, elements of the Dhamma comprising the Buddha's Teaching.
This important Buddhist ritual was practiced even in ancient Sri Lanka.
King Dutugemunu is recorded to have lit one thousand lamps with ghee as the illuminant and with white wicks burning perpetually in twelve sacred places in Anuradhapura.
King Vasabha is also said to have lit one thousand oil lamps at Cetiyapabbata, Thuparama, Mahathupa, and the Bodhi-tree.
Today, this ritual has become so popular and elaborate that the annual Vesak festival commemorating the birth, Enlightenment, and Parinibbana of the Buddha has become more or less a festival of lights.
Vesak lanterns of various kinds and shapes are lit in Buddhist homes on this day.
Pandals well illuminated with multi-colored electric bulbs, depicting various scenes from the Master's life and from the Jataka stories, also constitute a type of light offering to the Buddha.
Yet another aspect of the ritual of light offering is the burning of camphor near the object of worship like dagabas, Buddha statues, etc.
Camphor gives out a fragrant smell as it burns, and is also regarded as having a very pure flame, although its smoke has a strong blackening effect.
Camphor-burners have been found in ancient temples, showing that this was an ancient practice.
The offering of food and drink is still another aspect of the ritual of worship.
When food is offered to the Buddha in a religious place it is usually done in front of a Buddha-image.
If it is the morning meal that is offered, it would be something suitable for breakfast, usually milk-rice.
If it is lunch, it would be the usual rice-and-curry meal and is invariably offered before noon.
At the Dalada Maligawa in Kandy and the Sri Mahabodhi in Anuradhapura, these rituals are performed regularly and with meticulous care and also somewhat elaborately, accompanied by other subsidiary rituals like the beating of drums.
It is an important part of this ritual that whatever food is offered in this manner should be separately prepared with special care and should not be tasted before the offering.
The stanza that is popularly used for the offering of food runs as follows:
“O Lord, accept with favor this food which has been ritualistically prepared.
Receive it, O Noble One, out of compassion.
As regards the offering of drinks and beverages, it is customary to offer these prepared from fruit-juices.
Unlike the solid foods, these may be offered in the afternoon, in keeping with the meal habits of the Buddhist monks.
Offering of incense generally consists of joss sticks, these being the most easily available.
Otherwise this offering is made by putting certain kinds of sweet-smelling powders or incense into glowing charcoal so that it smokes well.
A kind of resin, known locally as sambrani, is the variety generally used.
The chew of betel is yet another item of offering.
This is mostly for consumption after meals, and consists of betel leaves, arecanut, and certain other items like cloves, nutmeg, cardamons, etc.
which give a pleasant smell and a pungent taste when chewed.
For every kind of offering there are separate stanzas like the one quoted earlier for food.
These stanzas are composed in Pali, which is supposed to be the language in which the Buddha preached his doctrine.
When visiting the temple the object of worship that ranks first is the dagaba enshrining the bone-relics of the Buddha.
There are three categories of worshipful objects: bodily relics, consisting of the bones collected after cremation; those articles the Buddha used, e.g., the alms-bowl, Bodhi-tree, etc.; and those memorials that have been erected on his account as a mark of remembrance, e.g., images, paintings, etc.
The devotee is expected to worship these in due order, reciting the appropriate stanzas and making at least an offering of a few flowers.
An important aspect of the worship of the dagaba and the Bodhi-tree is the custom of circumambulation as a mark of respect.
Usually three rounds are done, always keeping the object of worship to the right side and with the hands clasped together in adoration.
As regards dagaba worship in Sri Lanka, the local Buddhists have a separate stanza for worshipping each of the sixteen sacred places hallowed by the Lord Buddha on his three visits to the island.
There is also a popular stanza that covers in a general manner all the three categories of worshipful objects mentioned above:
“Forever do I worship all the dagabas situated all over, all the bodily relics, the Mahabodhi, and Buddha-images.
The worship of the dagaba or stupa is an important merit-acquiring act of devotional Buddhism in Sri Lanka as also in other Buddhist lands.
The first such dagaba to be constructed after the official introduction of Buddhism into the country by the arahant Mahinda was the Thuparama at Anuradhapura, which enshrines the collar-bone of the Buddha.
It was constructed by the first Buddhist ruler of Sri Lanka, King Devanampiya Tissa, in the rd century B.Since then dagabas have become so popular among the local Buddhists that almost every village temple has a dagaba as an indispensable feature.
A special ritual connected with the dagaba is the enshrining of relics, which is done with much ceremony at a specially selected astrologically auspicious moment called nakata.
A similar ritual is that of pinnacle-setting, which is the concluding stage in the construction of a dagaba.
It should be mentioned here that scriptural sanction for dagaba worship is found in the words of the Buddha himself in the Maha-parinibbana Sutta, where he has enumerated four categories of individuals worthy of dagabas.
These are the Tathagata, a Paccekabuddha, a disciple of the Tathagata, and a universal monarch.
The worship and offerings made to the Buddha's body after his passing away may also be cited as an instance in this connection.
The most important item that comes within the uddesika kind of sacred object is the Buddha-image, which is found in every temple in its image-house.
In addition to the central image or images, the inside walls of the temple — and sometimes the ceiling as well — are covered with paintings depicting events from the Buddha's life, as well as from his past lives as a Bodhisatta, recorded in the Jataka stories.
An important ceremony associated with the Buddha-image is the ritual of painting its eyes, which is performed with much care on an auspicious occasion as the last item of its construction.
Until this is done the image is not considered an adequate representation of the Buddha.
Collective worship of the Buddha is generally performed in a public place of worship so that anyone who wishes may participate: in a temple before the shrine room, at a dagaba, a Bodhi-tree, or any other such place.
The devotees stand in a row in front of the place of worship and pass the items of offering from hand to hand towards the shrine room, dagaba, or the Bodhi-tree.
These offerings usually consist of bowls or vases of flowers, incense, joss sticks, beverages, fruit drinks, medicinal items, oil-lamps, etc.
Here no distinction of age, position, or sex is observed.
All participate in a common act of merit.
A bhikkhu or a number of bhikkhus may sometimes head the line.
The commonest of the Buddha-pujas is the one performed in the evening, around p.m., known as the gilampasa Buddha-puja or the Buddha-offering consisting of medicaments and beverages.
If the Buddha-puja is done in the morning it would be one consisting of milk-rice or any other item of food suitable for breakfast.
The mid-day food also may be offered in this manner.
The mid-day meal is offered to the Buddha when lay people bring food to the monastery to offer as alms to the bhikkhus.
First, under the guidance of a bhikkhu, they perform the offering to the Buddha, who is represented symbolically by relics and an image; thereafter the food is offered to the resident bhikkhus.
It is the established tradition that in whatever circumstances alms are offered to the bhikkhus, the first portions are offered to the Buddha beforehand.
The variations in the kinds of food offered are in keeping with the meal habits of the Buddha and his monk-disciples, who refrain from taking solid food and milk-foods after mid-day.
Once the offerings are placed in the appropriate place, lamps lit, and incense burnt, stanzas are recited for each kind of offering made so that the offerings become valid.
This is done by a bhikkhu who first administers the Refuges and Precepts and then recites the relevant stanzas aloud, while the other participants, with their hands clasped in adoration, repeat them in chorus after the bhikkhu.
Sometimes this kind of public Buddha-puja is accompanied by drumming and horns, called hevisi-puja or offering of music, which usually accompanies many Buddhist functions.
As the final item of the programme, one of the participating bhikkhus delivers a short sermon explaining the significance of the occasion.
It may also be mentioned here that this kind of public puja is performed as a general act of merit-acquisition on religiously important days such as the full-moon days or in remembrance of important dead personages.
In the latter case the ritual is held on the death anniversary of the person concerned.
It is believed that the dead person can partake of the merits transferred to him from his new existence and thereby obtain relief from any unfortunate realm in which he might have been born.
If the ritual is performed for such a purpose, the participating monk would specially mention this fact and transfer the merits earned.
Whatever be the purpose for which the ceremony is held, the concluding part is marked by certain features which are of further interest.
One is the usual practice of the transference of merit to all beings, including gods and spirits, by reciting the appropriate stanzas.
Another is the general aspiration that the participants make to the effect that by the merits earned from the ritual they may not be born into the company of foolish and unworthy friends but into the company of wise and virtuous men until they attain Nibbana.
They also do not fail to add the final attainment of Nibbana to this list.
Yet another popular aspiration which has a greater social significance is the following:
The ritual is concluded by asking for pardon for whatever lapses may have occurred inadvertently:
“O Lord, Tathagata of extensive wisdom, may you excuse me for whatever transgressions might have been done by me through body, speech, or mind due to negligence.
Sometimes a similar request is made to the Dhamma and the Sangha as well.
However, as the idea of pardoning one's sins is foreign to Buddhism, this kind of request would be meaningful only if the devotee does so with full understanding as an expiatory act, as a means of self-reformation, for the Buddha, unlike the God of theistic religions, cannot forgive sins.
Another kind of Buddha-puja is the one regularly done in temples and Buddhist devalayas.
It is the daily offering of food and drink made to the Buddha by the temple authorities.
At the Dalada Maligawa in Kandy and the Sri Mahabodhi at Anuradhapura offerings of this kind are made on a solemn and grand scale.
These two places assume this significance because they are the two most deeply venerated sacred places for the Buddhists of Sri Lanka.
The breakfast, noon meal, and the evening drinks are all offered regularly at fixed hours accompanied by drumming and horn playing.
Often, the public also make their own offerings.
Another important Buddhist ritual is the honoring of the Buddha with what appears to be a relic of the musical performance held in order to revere and pay homage to the sacred memory of the Master.
The historical beginning of this form of worship can be traced as far back as the time of the Buddha.
A passage in the Maha-parinibbana Sutta records that after his passing away, while the body of the Buddha was lying in state for seven days at Kusinara in the capital of the Mallas, complete musical performances inclusive of dance, song, and orchestration were held in his honor.
This undoubtedly was an unreserved expression by the lay patrons of their deep veneration for the Master.
Of this kind of offering, all that seems to have survived is drumming and some light dancing engaged in by the drummers themselves to the drum-beat and horns.
In Sri Lanka the ritual is performed by the professionals belonging to the drummer caste and as an offering it is popularly known as sabda-puja or the “offering of sound.
This orchestration is collectively called hevisi and usually consists of two drums, a twin-drum with one face for each and turned upwards, and a horn-like instrument called horanava referred to earlier.
Drumming of this type, with a bigger number of drummers, is an essential part of Buddhist processions as well.
This kind of drumming also takes place at other Buddhist ceremonies, such as pirit chanting and alms-giving, to be described below.
At important temples where offerings of food are made to the Buddha and the deities at meal times, drumming is performed to coincide with the offering and continues until the ritual of offering is over.
This kind of regular service is known as tevava.
The ritual may also be held on Poya days, especially the full-moon day, in temples as a special offering to the Buddha.
An important point to be noted in this pujava is that while the other kinds of offering are made by the worshipper himself, in this case he hires professionals to make the offering on his behalf.
But in big temples like the Dalada Maligawa at Kandy, payments in money are not usually made as the drummers have the hereditary right to the tenure of the temple lands in return for which these services are performed.
The veneration of the Bodhi-tree has been a popular and a widespread ritual in Sri Lanka from the time a sapling of the original Bodhi-tree at Buddhagaya was brought from India by the Theri Sanghamitta and planted at Anuradhapura during the reign of King Devanampiya Tissa in the third century B.Since then a Bodhi-tree has become a necessary feature of every Buddhist temple in the island.
The ritualistic worship of trees as abodes of tree deities was widely prevalent in ancient India even before the advent of Buddhism.
This is exemplified by the well-known case of Sujata's offering of milk-rice to the Bodhisatta, who was seated under a banyan tree on the eve of his Enlightenment, in the belief that he was the deity living in that tree.
By making offerings to these deities inhabiting trees the devotees expect various forms of help from them.
The practice was prevalent in pre-Buddhist Sri Lanka as well.
According to the Mahavamsa, King Pandukabhaya fixed a banyan tree near the western gate of Anuradhapura as the abode of Vessavana, the god of wealth and the regent of the North as well as the king of the yakkhas.
The same king set apart a palmyra palm as the abode of vyadha-deva, the god of the hunt.
After the introduction of the Bodhi-tree, this cult took a new turn.
While the old practice was not totally abandoned, pride of place was accorded to the worship of the pipal tree, which had become sacred to the Buddhists as the tree under which Gotama Buddha attained Enlightenment.
Thus there is a difference between the worship of the Bodhi-tree and that of other trees.
To the Buddhists, the Bodhi-tree became a sacred object belonging to the paribhogika group of the threefold division of sacred monuments, while the ordinary veneration of trees, which also exists side-by-side with the former in Sri Lanka, is based on the belief already mentioned, i.e., that there are spirits inhabiting these trees and that they can help people in exchange for offerings.
The Buddhists also have come to believe that powerful Buddhist deities inhabit even the Bodhi-trees that receive worship in the purely Buddhist sense.
Hence it becomes clear that the reverence shown to a tree is not addressed to the tree itself.
However, it also has to be noted that the Bodhi-tree received veneration in India even before it assumed this Buddhist significance; this practice must have been based on the general principle of tree worship mentioned above.
Once the tree assumed Buddhist significance its sanctity became particularized, while the deities inhabiting it also became associated with Buddhism in some form.
At the same time, the tree became a symbol representing the Buddha as well.
This symbolism was confirmed by the Buddha himself when he recommended the planting of the Ananda Bodhi-tree at Jetavana for worship and offerings during his absence.
Further, the place where the Buddha attained Enlightenment is mentioned by the Buddha as one of the four places of pilgrimage that should cause serene joy in the minds of the faithful.
As Ananda Coomaraswamy points out, every Buddhist temple and monastery in India once had its Bodhi-tree and flower altar as is now the case in Sri Lanka.
King Devanampiya Tissa, the first Buddhist king of Sri Lanka, is said to have bestowed the whole country upon the Bodhi-tree and held a magnificent festival after planting it with great ceremony.
The entire country was decorated for the occasion.
The Mahavamsa refers to similar ceremonies held by his successors as well.
It is said that the rulers of Sri Lanka performed ceremonies in the tree's honor in every twelfth year of their reign.
King Dutugemunu performed such a ceremony at a cost of, pieces of money.
King Bhatika Abhaya held a ceremony of watering the sacred tree, which seems to have been one of many such special pujas.
Other kings too, according to the Mahavamsa, expressed their devotion to the Bodhi-tree in various ways.
It is recorded that forty Bodhi-saplings that grew from the seeds of the original Bodhi-tree at Anuradhapura were planted at various places in the island during the time of Devanampiya Tissa himself.
The local Buddhists saw to it that every monastery in the island had its own Bodhi-tree, and today the tree has become a familiar sight, all derived, most probably, from the original tree at Anuradhapura through seeds.
However, it may be added here that the notion that all the Bodhi-trees in the island are derived from the original tree is only an assumption.
The existence of the tree prior to its introduction by the Theri Sanghamitta cannot be proved or disproved.
The ceremony of worshipping this sacred tree, first begun by King Devanampiya Tissa and followed by his successors with unflagging interest, has continued up to the present day.
The ceremony is still as popular and meaningful as at the beginning.
It is natural that this should be so, for the veneration of the tree fulfills the emotional and devotional needs of the pious heart in the same way as does the veneration of the Buddha-image and, to a lesser extent, of the dagaba.
Moreover, its association with deities dedicated to the cause of Buddhism, who can also aid pious worshippers in their mundane affairs, contributes to the popularity and vitality of Bodhi-worship.
The main center of devotion in Sri Lanka today is, of course, the ancient tree at Anuradhapura, which, in addition to its religious significance, has a historical importance as well.
As the oldest historical tree in the world, it has survived for over, years, even when the city of Anuradhapura was devastated by foreign enemies.
Today it is one of the most sacred and popular places of pilgrimage in the island.
The tree itself is very well guarded, the most recent protection being a gold-plated railing around the base.
Ordinarily, pilgrims are not allowed to go near the foot of the tree in the upper terrace.
They have to worship and make their offerings on altars provided on the lower terrace so that no damage is done to the tree by the multitude that throng there.
The place is closely guarded by those entrusted with its upkeep and protection, while the daily rituals of cleaning the place, watering the tree, making offerings, etc., are performed by bhikkhus and laymen entrusted with the work.
The performance of these rituals is regarded as of great merit and they are performed on a lesser scale at other important Bodhi-trees in the island as well.
Thus this tree today receives worship and respect as a symbol of the Buddha himself, a tradition which, as stated earlier, could be traced back to the Ananda Bodhi-tree at Jetavana of the Buddha's own time.
The Vibhanga Commentary says that the bhikkhu who enters the courtyard of the Bodhi-tree should venerate the tree, behaving with all humility as if he were in the presence of the Buddha.
Thus one of the main items of the daily ritual at the Anuradhapura Bodhi-tree is the offering of alms as if unto the Buddha himself.
A special ritual held annually at the shrine of the Anuradhapura tree is the hanging of gold ornaments on the tree.
Pious devotees offer valuables, money, and various other articles during the performance of this ritual.
Another popular ritual connected with the Bodhi-tree is the lighting of coconut-oil lamps as an offering, especially to avert the evil influence of inauspicious planetary conjunctions.
When a person passes through a troublesome period in life he may get his horoscope read by an astrologer in order to discover whether he is under bad planetary influences.
If so, one of the recommendations would invariably be a bodhi-puja, one important item of which would be the lighting of a specific number of coconut-oil lamps around a Bodhi-tree in a temple.
The other aspects of this ritual consist of the offering of flowers, milk-rice, fruits, betel, medicinal oils, camphor, and coins.
These coins are washed in saffron water and separated for offering in this manner.
The offering of coins as an act of merit-acquisition has assumed ritualistic significance with the Buddhists of the island.
Every temple has a charity box into which the devotees drop a few coins as a contribution for the maintenance of the monks and the monastery.
Offerings at devalayas should inevitably be accompanied by such a gift.
At many wayside shrines there is provision for the offering of panduru and travelers en route, in the hope of a safe and successful journey, rarely fail to make their contribution.
While the coins are put into the charity box, all the other offerings would be arranged methodically on an altar near the tree and the appropriate stanzas that make the offering valid are recited.
Another part of the ritual is the hanging of flags on the branches of the tree in the expectation of getting one's wishes fulfilled.
Bathing the tree with scented water is also a necessary part of the ritual.
So is the burning of incense, camphor, etc.
Once all these offerings have been completed, the performers would circumambulate the tree once or thrice reciting an appropriate stanza.
The commonest of such stanzas is as follows:
“I worship this Bodhi-tree seated under which the Teacher attained omniscience by overcoming all enemical forces.
I too worship this great Bodhi-tree which was honored by the Leader of the World.
My homage to thee, O King Bodhi.
The ritual is concluded by the usual transference of merit to the deities that protect the Buddha's Dispensation.
In their religious observances the Sri Lankan Buddhists have adopted from Indian tradition the use of the lunar calendar.
The four phases of the moon are the pre-new-moon day, when the moon is totally invisible, the half-moon of the waxing fortnight, the full moon, and the half-moon of the waning fortnight.
Owing to the moon's fullness of size as well as its effulgence, the full-moon day is treated as the most auspicious of the four phases.
Hence the most important religious observances are held on full-moon days and the lesser ones in conjunction with the other phases.
In the Buddhist calendar, the full moon, as the acme of the waxing process, is regarded as the culmination of the month and accordingly the period between two full moons is one lunar month.
The religious observance days are called poya days.
The Sinhala term poya is derived from the Pali and Sanskrit form uposatha primarily signifying “fast day.” Fasting on this day was a pre-Buddhist practice among the religious sects of ancient India.
While the monks use the monthly moonless day and the full-moon day for their confessional ritual and communal recitation of the code of discipline, the lay devotees observe the day by visiting temples for worship and also by taking upon themselves the observance of the Eight Precepts.
A practicing Buddhist observes the poya day by visiting a temple for the rituals of worship and, often, by undertaking the Eight Precepts.
The Eight Precepts include the Five Precepts, with the third changed to abstinence from unchastity, and the following three additional rules:
to abstain from dancing, singing, music, and improper shows, and from ornamenting the body with garlands, scents, unguents, etc.;
to abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds and seats.
If one decides to observe the Eight Precepts, one would wake up early, bathe and clad oneself in clean white garments, and go to the nearest temple.
The incumbent monk administers the precepts to the entire group assembled for the purpose.
Thereafter they would spend the day according to a set timetable which would include sermons, pujas, periods of meditation, and Dhamma discussions.
At meditation centers there will be more periods of meditation and fewer sermons and pujas.
The observance of the Eight Precepts is a ritualistic practice of moral discipline quite popular among the Sinhala Buddhists.
While the Five Precepts serve as the moral base for ordinary people, the Eight Precepts point to a higher level of training aimed at advancement along the path of liberation.
The popular practice is to observe them on full-moon days, and, among a few devout lay Buddhists, on the other phases of the moon as well.
The poya observance, which is as old as Buddhism itself, has been followed by the Sinhala Buddhists up to the present day, even after the Christian calendar came to be used for secular matters.
Owing to its significance in the religious life of the local Buddhists, all the full-moon days have been declared public holidays by the government.
Another noteworthy fact about this day is that every full-moon poya has assumed some ritualistic significance in one way or other.
The first and the foremost of the poya holy days is the full-moon day of Vesak, commemorating the birth, Enlightenment, and passing away of the Buddha.
The significance of Vesak is further heightened for the Sinhala Buddhists, as Sri Lankan tradition holds that it was on the Vesak Poya Day, in the eighth year after his Enlightenment, that the Buddha paid his third visit to Sri Lanka, journeying to Kelaniya on the invitation of the Naga King Maniakkhika.
Consequently, Kelaniya has become a very popular place of worship and pilgrimage, the center of worship there being the celebrated dagaba, enshrining the gem-set throne offered to the Buddha by the Nagas.
An annual procession is held there to commemorate the event.
Both in importance and in temporal sequence, the next significant poya is the full-moon of Poson, which is specially noteworthy to the Sri Lankan Buddhists as the day on which Emperor Asoka's son, the arahant Mahinda, officially introduced Buddhism to the island in the rd century B.Accordingly, in addition to the normal ritualistic observances undertaken on a poya day, on Poson day devotees flock to Anuradhapura, the ancient capital city of the country, for it was there that arahant Mahinda converted the then ruler, King Devanampiya Tissa, and his court to Buddhism, thereby setting in motion a series of events that finally made Sri Lanka the home of Theravada Buddhism.
Even today, on Poson Poya, Anuradhapura becomes the center of Buddhist activity.
Mihintale, the spot where the momentous encounter between the Elder and the King took place, accordingly receives the reverential attention of the devotees.
The two rituals of pilgrimage and the observance of the Eight Precepts are combined here.
Processions commemorative of the event, referred to as Mihundu Peraheras, are held in various parts of the country.
The next poya is Esala, which commemorates several significant events in the history of Buddhism.
The most prominent of these is the Buddha's preaching of his First Sermon, the Dhammacakkappavattana Sutta, to the five ascetics at the Deer Park, near Benares, thereby inaugurating his public ministry.
The other noteworthy events connected with this day include the conception of the Bodhisatta in the womb of Queen Maya, his Great Renunciation, the performance of the Twin Miracle, and his preaching the Abhidhamma for the first time in the Tavatimsa heaven.
An additional factor that enhances the value of this poya to Sri Lanka is the first local ordination of a Sri Lankan, when Prince Arittha, the nephew of the king, entered the Order at Anuradhapura, under arahant Mahinda, following the introduction of Buddhism.
On this day there also took place the laying of the foundation for the celebrated dagaba, the Mahathupa or the Ruwanvelisaya and also its enshrinement of relics by King Dutugemunu.
It is owing to the combination of all these events that the Sinhala Buddhists fittingly observe the day ceremonially by holding Esala festivals throughout the island, giving pride of place to the internationally famous Kandy Esala Perahera.
The term perahera, primarily meaning “procession,” signifies a popular Buddhist ceremony replete with many rituals, commencing and culminating respectively with the kap-planting and the water-cutting ceremonies.
These two ceremonies are respectively the introductory and the concluding rites of the annual Esala festivals, held in July and August in various parts of the island.
They are essentially connected with the Buddhist deities, either to invite their blessings or to give thanks to them for favors received.
During this period every year, such religious festivals are held in almost all the religious centers of Sri Lanka where there are abodes dedicated to various Buddhist deities.
However, the festival par excellence of this category is the Kandy Esala Perahera, which is connected with the Temple of the Tooth and the abodes of the four Buddhist deities, Vishnu, Kataragama, Natha, and the Goddess Pattini.
The main feature of all these festivals held during this period is the elaborate procession held on the lines of the Kandy Esala Perahera.
Both the kap-planting and water-cutting ceremonies are performed by the lay officiating priests of the devalaya concerned, who are traditionally the experts regarding the details of their performance.
These details are generally regarded as secret and are not divulged to the profane public.
The preliminary rite of kap-planting consists of planting a shaft, usually fashioned from a felled young jak tree, which must have borne no fruit.
When cut, this tree exudes a white sap which is regarded as a symbol of prosperity.
Even felling the tree is done with several attendant rituals at an auspicious time: the trunk is divided into four, one for each of the devalayas, where it is carried with drums and attendance.
On the day of the new moon, at an auspicious hour, the “kaps” thus prepared are set up in the ground in a special place decorated with leaves, flowers, and fruits.
For five nights small processions are conducted within the devalaya precincts around the consecrated kaps.
Sometimes benedictory stanzas are chanted by monks.
This rite of kap is a kind of vow that the Esala festival, consisting mainly of the perahera, will be held; it is also an invitation to the deities to be present during the festival, providing the necessary protection for its successful performance.
In this sense it is this ritual that inaugurates the festival.
The water-cutting ceremony, which is the concluding ritual of the Esala festival, is performed in the early hours of the day following the final perahera.
The officiating lay-priest proceeds on a caparisoned elephant to a selected place along a river bank.
He would either go to a selected spot in the river by boat or wade through the water to a particular spot and after drawing a magic circle on the water with the sword he carries, he “cuts” the water and fills the vessel he carried there with water from that spot.
Before doing so he empties the water that he took in this same manner the previous year.
He then returns to the devalaya, and the vessel of water is kept there until the following year.
The ritual is repeated annually in an identical manner.
This is believed to be a rain-making ceremony of sympathetic magic, which type of ritual is quite common in agrarian societies the world over.
The Buddhists seem to have adopted this to suit their purposes.
The annual Esala Perahera in Kandy, held in honor of the Sacred Tooth Relic of the Buddha, is the most colorful traditional procession in the country.
It is the prototype of the other peraheras held elsewhere in the island in such places as Kataragama, Aluthnuwara, Lankatilaka, Bellanwila, Devinuwara, etc.
The Kandy Perahera is itself the latest expression of the annual festival in honor of the Tooth Relic that has been held with state patronage from the time the relic was brought to Sri Lanka from India in the th century A.Although periodically there have been intermittent breaks due to unsettled political conditions, the festival was never neglected intentionally.
This had been so even during colonial times.
Respected as the palladium of Sinhala royalty, the Relic had been accommodated in different parts of the country, depending on the change of the capital city.
Ultimately it came to stay in Kandy, which was the last royal seat of the Sinhala people.
Esala Poya assumes prominence for yet another ritual of the Sri Lankan Buddhists.
This is the annual rains retreat of the monks, Vassa, which commences on the day following the Esala full moon.
On the next poya day, Nikini, those monks who failed to commence the normal Vassa on the day following Esala Poya, are allowed to enter the “late Vassa.
The poya that follows Nikini is Binara, which assumes solemnity as marking the inauguration of the Order of Bhikkhunis with the ordination of Queen Mahapajapati and her retinue.
Next follows the Vap Poya, which concludes the final month of the three-month rains retreat.
During the following month kathina robes are offered to the monks who have duly completed the Vassa.
The high esteem in which this ritual is held by the Sinhala Buddhists may be gauged from the fact that the month is popularly referred to as the “month of robes”.
The November full moon, called Il, signifies the terminal point for the kathina ritual.
It is also the day for commemorating such events as the despatch of the first sixty disciples by the Buddha on missionary work, the prospective Buddha Metteyya being declared a sure Buddha-to-be by Gotama Buddha, and the passing away of the arahant Sariputta, the Buddha's foremost disciple.
The Unduwap Poya that follows in December is of great moment to Sri Lanka as commemorating two memorable events connected with the visit of Theri Sanghamitta, sister of arahant Mahinda, from India in the third century B..
The first of these events was the arrival at Anuradhapura of a sapling of the sacred Bodhi-tree at Buddhagaya, brought to Sri Lanka by Sanghamitta.
The planting of this tree is the origin of the Bodhi-puja in the country.
The other memorable event commemorated by this poya is the establishment of the Order of Nuns in Sri Lanka by the Theri Sanghamitta when she ordained Queen Anula and her entourage of women at Anuradhapura.
Records indicate that the Bhikkhuni Sangha thus established flourished during the Anuradhapura period, but disappeared after the decline of that kingdom.
Historical records are silent as to the reasons for its extinction, but they do report how the Sinhala Bhikkhuni Sangha helped in the establishment of the Order of Nuns in China.
In the th century a group of Sinhala nuns headed by the Bhikkhuni Devasara went to China to confer higher ordination there and the Bhikkhuni Sangha thus established survives there to this day.
The Sinhala Buddhists commemorate this poya day with peraheras, observance of the Eight Precepts, and meetings.
The day is designated Sanghamitta Day.
Nowadays the dasasil matas take an active part in initiating these commemorative functions.
Next follows the Durutu Poya when the Sinhala Buddhists commemorate the first visit of the Buddha to the island.
According to the Mahavamsa, nine months after his Enlightenment, the Buddha visited present Mahiyangana in the Badulla District, where stands the dagaba by that name enshrining the Buddha's hair relics and the collar bone.
The Buddhists remember the event by holding an annual perahera.
This much-venerated dagaba is also of consequence as the first edifice of this type to be constructed here, originating the ritual of dagaba worship in Sri Lanka.
The poya that follows, Navam Poya, celebrates the Buddha's appointment of the two arahants, Sariputta and Moggallana, as his two chief disciples.
It also marks the Buddha's decision to attain Parinibbana in three months' time.
The Medin Poya in March is hallowed by the Buddha's first visit to his parental home after his Enlightenment, during which he ordained the princes Rahula, Nanda, and many others as monks.
The month that follows is called Bak, which corresponds to April.
In this month it is not the full-moon day but the new-moon day that invites attention as signalizing the Buddha's second visit to Sri Lanka, when he visited Nagadipa on the day preceding the new-moon day in the fifth year after his Enlightenment.
The above brief account of the twelve poya days demonstrates how the poya day has become intimately connected with the life of the Buddha and consequently with the principal events of early Buddhist history.
The Sri Lankan Buddhists, quite accustomed as they are to commemorate such events with rituals and ceremonies in full measure, have maintained these traditions up to the present.
Pirit is a collective term designating a set of protective chants or runes sanctioned by the Buddha for the use of both laymen and bhikkhus.
Pirit-chanting is a very popular ceremony among the Buddhists of Sri Lanka.
As the term itself implies it means a safety rune, the ceremonial recital of which is regarded as capable of warding off all forms of evil and danger, including disease, the evil influence of the planets, evil spirits, etc.
These may be real dangers to the safety of persons and property as well as superstitiously believed-in calamities.
In addition to this curative and positive aspect, pirit is also chanted for the attainment of general success.
In the domestic and social life of the Sri Lankan Buddhist no important function can be considered complete without this ceremony.
However, the ceremony may vary from the simple to the highly elaborate, depending on the occasion and the status of the sponsor.
The essence of the pirit ceremony consists in the ritualistic chanting of certain Pali texts selected from the canonical scriptures.
These extracts are found collected and arranged in a particular order in the Book of Parittas, or Pirit-Pota, known in Pali as Catubhanavara.
It contains extracts, including such suttas as the Ratana, Mangala, Metta, Atanatiya, etc.
The use of protective spells — variously known as paritta, rakkha, mantra, dharani, kavaca, etc.
— against various dangers has been a common practice among the Indians from very early times.
The Buddha himself is said to have adopted the practice on several occasions.
The public recitation of the Ratana Sutta at Vesali is the best known instance.
The Khandha Paritta, Atanatiya Sutta, and the Metta Sutta are some parittas that have received the sanction of the Buddha himself.
As the parittas generally embody statements of truth as taught in Buddhism their recitation is regarded as an “asseveration of truth” whereby evil can be averted.
The Ratana Sutta is a good example of this kind of paritta.
It draws its power by wishing the listeners safety after affirming the excellent qualities of the Three Gems of Buddhism — the Buddha, Dhamma, and the Sangha.
The power of virtue contained in the Mangala Sutta and the power of loving kindness contained in the Metta Sutta are two other aspects that make pirit effective.
The power of the sound waves resulting from the sonorous and rhythmic recitation and also from particular combinations of certain letters and syllables also play a part in exercising this beneficial influence.
The vibrating sound waves produced by the sonorous and mellifluous chanting adds to the effect of the truths enunciated.
The ceremonial recitation with various ritualistic observances and with the presence of the Triple Gem in the form of the relic casket representing the Buddha, the Pirit-Pota representing the Dhamma, and the reciting bhikkhus representing the Sangha, are additional factors that are regarded as increasing the efficacy of pirit chanting.
Among the laity of Burma and of Sri Lanka the book of parittas is more widely known than any other Pali book.
Any Buddhist, educated or not, knows what it is and holds it in honor and respect.
Even in ancient times the blessings of the pirit ceremony were sought in times of national calamities just as in Vesali at the time of the Buddha.
King Upatissa, Sena II and Kassapa V are three such Sinhala monarchs who had the ceremony performed under such circumstances.
The incorporation of the item called dorakada-asna, as shall be seen, shows that it is a ritual that has gradually been elaborated in course of time.
The simplest form of the pirit ceremony is held when what is called the mahapirita — the Mangala, Ratana, and Metta Suttas and a few benedictory stanzas — is chanted by a few monks, usually three or four, three times with a break in between.
The three times may consist of the morning and evening of one day and the morning of the following day, or the evening of one day and the following morning and evening.
The monks are conducted to the particular household and the chanting takes place in any room of the house according to choice.
The monks sit around a table on which a clean white cloth is spread and flowers and puffed rice are strewn.
A pot of filtered water is also placed in the center of the table and one end of a ball of three-stranded thread is twisted around it.
The thread then passes through the hands of the reciting monks and is next held by the person or the persons on whose behalf the chanting is being done.
These would be seated on a mat on the ground in front of the reciting monks.
The water in the pot, designated pirit-water, and the sacred thread, become sanctified through the chanting and are used thereafter as a protection against evil.
The thread is used by tying a piece around the arm or the wrist, and the water by drinking it or sprinkling it, according to requirements.
In the simplest form, the ceremony is called varu-pirita or vel-pirita as the ceremony is confined only to a portion of the day and only the mahapirita is chanted.
But the full-fledged pirit ceremony is a much more elaborate ritual.
This also has two main forms — one lasting for one whole night and the other for one week or even longer.
The former is the more usual form as a domestic ceremony while the latter is held on special occasions, especially for public purposes.
Whatever the form may be, when this kind of chanting is undertaken, a special pavilion called the pirit mandapaya is constructed for the purpose.
If the ceremony is to be performed in a private home, this pavilion is put up in a central room of the house.
Generally it would measure about twelve by twelve feet and is gaily decorated with tissue paper, tinsel, etc.
Its roof is covered with a white canopy from which are hung small cuttings of arecanut flowers, betel twigs, tender twigs of the iron-wood tree, etc.
Two water pots on which opened coconut racemes are kept are placed on either side of the entrance.
Two lighted coconut-oil lamps are also placed upon the coconut racemes.
In the center of the pavilion is a table on which a clean white cloth is spread.
Upon it are strewn puffed rice, broken rice, white mustard, jasmine buds, and panic grass.
These five varieties, known as lada-pas-mal, are regarded as having a sanctifying and purifying power in combination and are hence used for ritualistic purposes at Buddhist ceremonies.
In the center of the table is the filtered water pot around which the three-stranded sacred thread is twisted.
This thread is drawn round the interior of the pavilion and when the chanting commences it is held by the chanting monks and given over to be held by the person or persons for whose benefit the ceremony is held.
A palm-leaf copy of the Pirit-Pota, regarded as more sanctified than the printed one, occupies a significant place on the table, representing the Dhamma, the second member of the Buddhist Trinity.
Consequently, while the printed copy is used for the legibility of its script, the palm-leaf copy is regarded as indispensable on the table.
The other important item that is brought inside the pavilion is the casket containing the bone-relics of the Buddha, representing the Buddha.
This is placed on a separate decorated table on a side within the pavilion.
In the seating arrangement for the monks, two chairs, centrally placed near the table, are referred to as yuga-asana or “seats for the duel.” During a greater part of the all-night recital, two monks occupying these two seats continue the chanting, taking it in relays, instead of the full assembly.
A post called indra-khila or raja-gaha is planted securely and fastened between these twin chairs.
This post, resembling a mace in more ways than one, is attractively decorated and serves as a symbol of authority and protection for the officiating monks.
This is generally erected only when the ceremony lasts for a week or longer.
Even when the ceremony is held in a private home, the temple is inevitably connected with every stage of the ritual.
The temple authorities are responsible for assigning the required number of monks.
On the evening of the day on which the chanting takes place, a few members from the particular household go to the temple in order to conduct the monks.
The monks would come in a procession in single file in order of seniority, attended by drumming.
At the head of the procession is carried the relic casket, borne on the head of a layman, under an umbrella or a canopy.
The beating of drums continues throughout.
As the monks enter the home, a layman washes their feet while another wipes them.
They walk to the pavilion on a carpet of white cloth and take their seats around the table.
The relic casket, Pirit-Pota, and the bhikkhus thus come together, representing the Triple Gem, the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, respectively.
Before the commencement of the ceremony proper, the usual time of which is around p.m., the monks are welcomed and requested to perform the ceremony by being offered a tray in which betel leaves, arecanut, cardamons, nutmeg, etc., are nicely arranged, the ingredients being those taken for the chew of betel.
This invitation is usually extended by the chief householder if it is in a private home.
Otherwise some leading lay devotee would do it.
One of the senior monks present would accept the invitation on behalf of the entire Sangha and, in order to make the invitation formally valid, he would get the lay devotee to repeat after him the following Pali stanza requesting the monks to begin the ceremony:
“Please recite the noble pirit for the avoidance of all misfortune, for the attainment of all success, and for the destruction of all suffering.
Next he would explain the significance of the occasion in a short address.
This is followed by ceremonial drumming, as a ritualistic preamble to the ceremony, serving both as an invitation to the gods and an offering of sound.
The monks too commence the chanting by reciting a stanza that invites all the divine beings of the universe to the ceremony:
“May the divine beings of the entire universe come here to hear the good doctrine of the King of Sages that confers both heavenly happiness and the freedom of Nibbana.
From the commencement of the chanting until its conclusion the following morning, the pavilion is not vacated.
The mahapirita, with which the chanting begins, is chanted in a rhythmic manner by all the monks, numbering about ten or twelve, seated in order of seniority.
The rest of the discourses are chanted by two or four monks.
The ceremony is concluded the following morning with the recital, once again, of the mahapirita at which ceremonial drumming takes place once more.
This drumming is also performed at the recital of important discourses like the Dhammacakkappavattana Sutta and the Atanatiya Sutta.
Once the chanting is concluded, convenient lengths of the thread, sanctified by the chanting, are snapped off and tied around the wrists or the arms of those assembled.
A little of the sanctified water is given to everyone for drinking.
When the ceremony continues for several days, the chanting must continue night and day without a break.
When the set of suttas constituting pirit is completed, chanting is recommenced from the beginning and in this manner they are recited over and over again until the session is concluded.
Both to begin and to end the session, the mahapirita is recited in chorus by all the monks on each day at sunrise and sunset.
An important ceremony connected with the seven-day pirit ceremony is known as dorakada-asna, which seems to have entered the pirit ceremony during the Kandyan period.
The theme of this ritual is to invite all the deities residing in the vicinity and request them to partake of the merits derived from the pirit ceremony and to help dispel all evil and bring about prosperity to everybody.
This ritual involves several stages commencing from the morning of the last day of the pirit ceremony, i.e., the seventh day if it is a seven-day ceremony.
The first stage is the preparation of the message to be taken to the neighbouring temple where the abodes of the gods are also found.
For this purpose several palm leaves, on which the message is to be written, are brought to the chanting pavilion in a ceremonial procession and handed over to a monk who has been previously selected to write the message.
Next, this particular monk writes down the auspicious time for the messenger of the gods to set out to the devalaya and reads it aloud, to be sanctioned by the assembled monks.
Once this is done another monk, also previously selected, reads aloud a text written in a highly ornate stilted style, enumerating the temples and devalayas at which the deities are requested to be present at the pirit chanting that evening.
This text is called the vihara-asna.
Until these preliminaries are gone through, the other monks keep holding the sacred thread.
After this, the monk who was appointed to write the message begins to write it while the other monks retire.
The message contains the invitation — which is a command from the Sangha and hence not to be turned down — addressed to all the deities residing at the religious places enumerated in the vihara-asna to come and partake of the merits of the week's pirit chanting.
The message is prepared in quadruplicate.
These are then hung on a pole and handed over to a young boy, specially selected for the task and richly attired as befits a messenger of the gods.
Mounted on a caparisoned elephant and escorted by men with swords, he carries the message in a procession to the devalaya.
This procession is called the devaduta-perahera, “the procession of the gods' messenger,” and has many features like dancers, drummers, mask-dancers, stilt-walkers, etc.
At the devalaya, the bhikkhus and the deva-dutaya first go near a Buddha-statue and pay homage, after which they proceed to the building where the statues of the gods are and chant the Metta Sutta.
The gods concerned are usually Vishnu and Kataragama.
This is followed by ceremonial drumming as an invitation to the gods, and next a monk reads out the message aloud.
The four messages are given to the lay officiating priest of the devalaya to be hung in the four cardinal directions inside the devalaya.
These are meant for the Regents of the Four Quarters — Datarattha, Viruda, Virupakkha, and Vessavana — who are requested to come to the ceremony with their assemblies.
The procession now returns.
Until the monks arrive for the pirit chanting, the devadutaya is kept confined and guarded.
Once the monks arrive and take their seats inside the pavilion, a dialogue takes place between the devadutaya and a monk, the purpose of which is to reveal to the assembled gathering that the task of the messenger, which was to invite the gods to partake of the merits, has been done and that all the gods have arrived.
The devadutaya makes this statement standing and guarded by the swordsmen, at the entrance to the chanting pavilion within which the monks have taken their seats.
It is this statement of the devadutaya which thus comes to be called the dorakada-asna, meaning “the message read at the threshold.” The gist of this statement, written in the same kind of stilted language as the vihara-asna referred to earlier, is that all the gods invited have arrived for the pirit ceremony so that they may dispel all misfortune and bring about prosperity to all.
After the dorakada-asna, another monk, standing within the pavilion, reads out a similar text called the anusasana-asna, wherein all the gods assembled are requested to rejoice in the merits of the entire ceremony.
This monk holds in his hand a round-handled fan made of the talipot leaf, elaborately decorated, a symbol of authority and high ecclesiastical position.
These three ritualistic texts mentioned in the foregoing account were all composed during the Kandyan period when ceremonies and rituals, especially those connected with the gods, became more popular than during the earlier periods.
It is also worth noting, that this ceremony of dorakada-asna has, in addition to its religious and ritualistic significance, considerable dramatic and theatrical value as well, for the whole event, from the preliminaries of the morning to the grand finale of the anusasana in the evening, contains much impersonation, mime, and dialogue.
In this connection we may note that as early as the time of Buddhaghosa there were Buddhist rituals with such theatrical features as is shown by the exorcist ritual of reading the Atanatiya Sutta described in the Digha Nikaya Commentary.
The recital of the Jayamangala Gatha, a set of eight benedictory stanzas extolling the virtues of the Buddha, may also be cited as a popular custom partly related to the chanting of pirit.
This is usually done on important occasions like a marriage ceremony, when setting out on an important journey, or when inaugurating any venture of significance.
This custom is inevitably observed at what is called the Poruva ceremony when, after a couple to be married ascends a small decorated platform, they are blessed for future prosperity.
The recital is usually done by an elderly person who, for the occasion, assumes the position of an officiating priest.
At public functions a bevy of young girls clad in white uniforms also do the recital.
The contents of the stanzas recited clearly show that the ritual is intended to bring happiness and prosperity to the persons concerned or the successful completion of the project.
Accordingly these verses have come to be called “the stanzas of success and prosperity,” Jayamangala Gatha, and have become quite popular among all sections of the Buddhists.
While the origin of these stanzas is shrouded in mystery, it can be stated with certainty that they were composed in Sri Lanka by a devoted Buddhist poet.
The earliest available reference to them is during the Kandyan period when they are given in a list of subjects that a monk should study.
This shows that they had become well established during the th and th centuries; hence they must have been composed at least a century earlier.
These stanzas are regarded as efficacious because they relate eight occasions, each based on a beautiful story, when the Buddha triumphed over his powerful opponents.
The chanting of what is called set-pirit by a few bhikkhus at the inauguration of new ventures or at receptions and farewells to important public personages has also become quite common.
The chanting usually consists of a sutta like the Mangala, Ratana, or Metta Sutta, and a few benedictory stanzas.
Set-pirit is broadcast by the Sri Lanka Broadcasting Corporation every morning as the first item of its programme.
The ceremony of pirit-chanting is very often accompanied by another important ceremony, that of almsgiving.
It is generally known as sanghika-dana, meaning “the alms given to the community of monks.” Such a ceremonial almsgiving is often preceded by an all-night pirit ceremony.
Even otherwise this ceremony too is usually performed on important occasions in the same way as the pirit ceremony, associated with such events as house-warming, setting out on a long journey, a marriage, birth, or death anniversaries, and so forth.
At least four monks who have obtained higher ordination must participate for the dana to become valid as a full-fledged sanghika-dana.
Such danas were held even during the Buddha's time, the Buddha himself participating in very many of them.
Of the many items of offering that dana or the act of generosity could include, food is usually regarded as the most important and the formal meal offering accordingly is done with much ceremony and ritual.
The monks are conducted from the temple in procession with drumming as in the case of pirit.
A layman leads the procession, with the relic casket, representing the Buddha, borne on his head under an umbrella or canopy.
As they approach the particular household they are received by the host.
As the monks step into the house, one person washes their feet, while another wipes them.
This part of the ceremony is the same as in the case of the pirit ceremony.
The monks are then conducted to the cushioned seats arranged on the floor against the wall.
Alms are first offered to the Buddha in a separate bowl, and are placed on a separate table on which the relic casket, containing a bone-relic of the Buddha, has been set.
All the items of food are served in plates and placed on mats or low tables before the seated monks.
A senior monk administers the Three Refuges and the Five Precepts to the assembled gathering, as this has become the established custom with which any Buddhist function commences.
After he has given a short address on the significance of the occasion, the food is formally presented by getting the chief householder to repeat a Pali statement: imam bhikkham saparikkharam bhikkhusanghassa dema.
Next, the food is served and once the monks have finished eating the other requisites, referred to in the statement quoted, are also offered.
The most important item among these offerings is what is traditionally known as “the eight monastic requisites”: the alms-bowl, three robes, belt, razor, water-strainer, and sewing needle.
This offering is regarded as especially meritorious.
As it is an expensive item and therefore difficult to offer to all the monks, generally one ata-pirikara is offered to the chief monk and other items such as books, towels, pillow-cases, umbrellas, etc., are presented to the other monks.
Once this is over, another monk administers what is called punnanumodana or “thanks-giving” wherein all those who were connected with the ceremony are requested to partake of the merits for their future good.
The participants are also called upon to transfer the merits they have thus acquired for the well-being of their dead kinsmen and friends as well as for the sustenance of beings in the deva worlds, i.e., the deities, who are expected to protect the donors out of gratitude.
The relic casket and the monks are conducted back to the temple in the same manner as they were brought and the proceedings are concluded.
A related ritual that cannot be ignored as regards the ceremony of almsgiving is the custom of getting the neighbours and friends also to serve into the alms-bowl that is offered to the Buddha.
On the morning of the day on which the almsgiving takes place a separate bowl is kept on a table for this purpose.
This is called the Buddha-pattare, or the Buddha's alms-bowl.
Alms served into it are regarded as offered to the Buddha himself.
The neighbours would come with plates of rice prepared in their homes and serve into it.
This rice is also taken when the bowl of food is prepared for offering to the Buddha, near the relic casket at the time of the dana proper, the purpose here being to get the neighbours and outsiders also to participate in this merit-making ceremony.
Among Buddhists death is regarded as an occasion of major religious significance, both for the deceased and for the survivors.
For the deceased it marks the moment when the transition begins to a new mode of existence within the round of rebirths.
When death occurs all the kammic forces that the dead person accumulated during the course of his or her lifetime become activated and set about determining the next rebirth.
For the living, death is a powerful reminder of the Buddha's teaching on impermanence; it also provides an opportunity to assist the deceased person as he or she fares on to the new existence.
Both aspects of death — the message of impermanence, and the opportunity to help the departed loved one — find expression in the Buddhist funeral rites of Sri Lanka.
Naturally, the monastic Sangha plays a prominent role in the funeral proceedings.
One of the most important parts of the funeral rites is the ritual called “offering of cloth on behalf of the dead”.
This is done prior to the cremation or the burial of the body.
Monks are assembled in the home of the dead person or in the cemetery.
The proceedings begin with the administration of the Five Precepts to the assembled crowd by one of the monks.
This is followed by the recitation in chorus of the well-known stanza:
Next follows this ritual, which consists of the offering of a length of new white cloth to the monks.
The cloth, called a pamsukula — literally, a dust-heap cloth — is intended to be cut into pieces and then stitched into a robe.
After offering it, the close relatives of the deceased sit together on a mat, assume a reverential posture, and together they pour water from a vessel into a cup placed within a plate until the cup overflows.
While the water is being poured, the monks intone in unison the following stanzas extracted from the Tirokuddha Sutta of the Khuddakapatha:
The context shows that the pouring of water in this manner is a ritualistic act belonging to the field of sympathetic magic, symbolizing the beneficial inheritance of the merit transferred by the living to the dead, as a kind of dakkhina or offering.
The entire ritual is hence an act of grace whereby merit is transferred to the departed so that they may find relief from any unhappy realm wherein they might have been born.
Another funeral rite is mataka-bana or “preaching for the benefit of the dead.” The usual practice is to conduct a monk to the house of the dead person, generally on the third day after the funeral and to request him to preach a sermon suited to the occasion.
Accordingly he preaches a suitable sermon for about an hour's duration to the assembled audience, which inevitably consists of the deceased's relatives and the neighbours of the household.
At the end of the sermon, the monk gets the relatives to recite the necessary stanzas to transfer to the deceased the merits acquired by organizing the event.
Following this, a gift is offered to the monk, and the invitees are also served with refreshments.
Three months from the date of death, it is customary to hold an almsgiving in memory of the deceased and thence to repeat it annually.
As in the case of the rituals mentioned earlier, here too the purpose is to impart merit to the deceased.
Hence it is called the offering in the name of the dead.
The basis of the practice is the belief that if the dead relative has been reborn in an unhappy existence, he or she would expect his or her living relatives to transfer merit in this manner as these departed spirits or petas are incapable of performing any meritorious deed on their own.
Even their hunger and thirst, which is perpetual, subside only in this manner.
Hence they are referred to as “living on what is given by others”.
This custom can be traced to the Buddha's own time when King Bimbisara was harassed by a group of his departed kinsmen, reborn as petas, because the king had failed to give alms to the Buddha in their name.
Once this was fulfilled as requested by the Buddha, the petas became happy and ceased to give any more trouble.
This was the occasion on which the Buddha preached the Tirokuddha Sutta referred to earlier, which further says that once these rites are performed, these contented spirits bless the donors in return.
These rites, it may be mentioned here, resemble the sraddha ceremonies of the Hindus in some ways.
And it is also significant that, according to the Buddha himself, only the dead relatives who have been reborn as petas are capable of receiving this benefit.
The Vassa, a three-month rains retreat, was instituted by the Buddha himself and was made obligatory for all fully ordained bhikkhus; the details are laid down in the Mahavagga of the Vinaya Pitaka.
The retreat extends over a period corresponding to the North Indian rainy season, from the day following the full moon of July until the full-moon day of October; those who cannot enter the regular Vassa are permitted to observe the retreat for three months beginning with the day following the August full moon.
From the time Buddhism was introduced to Sri Lanka by the arahant Mahinda, the observance of Vassa — Vas in Sinhala — has been one of the mainstays of monastic life in the island.
During the Vas the monks are expected to dwell permanently in their temples and suspend all traveling.
If unavoidable circumstances necessitate traveling, they are allowed to leave their residences on the promise that they will return within a week.
On the first day of the retreat the monks have to formally declare that they will dwell in that manner in the selected monastery or dwelling.
The Vassa is also a time for the lay Buddhists to express their devotion to the cause of Buddhism by supporting the Sangha with special diligence, which task they regard as a potent source of merit.
It is customary for prominent persons to invite monks to spend the Vas with them in dwellings specially prepared for the purpose.
In this latter case the host would go and invite the monk or monks formally.
If the monks accept the invitation, the hosts would prepare a special temporary dwelling in a suitable place with a refectory and a shrine room.
On the first day of the Vas they would go with drummers and dancers to the monastery where the invitees reside and conduct them thence in procession.
The hosts would assume responsibility for providing all the needs of the monk or monks during this period, and they attend to this work quite willingly as they regard it as highly meritorious.
If no special construction is put up, the lay supporters would invite the monks to observe the retreat in the temple itself.
At the close of the Vas season, the monks have to perform the pavarana ceremony.
At this ceremony, held in place of the Patimokkha recitation, each monk invites his fellows to point out to him any faults he has committed during the Vas period.
On any day following the day of pavarana in the period terminating with the next full-moon day, the kathina ceremony is held.
Different monasteries will hold the kathina on different days within this month, though any given monastery may hold only one kathina ceremony.
The main event in this ceremony is the offering of the special robe known as the kathina-civara to the Sangha, who in turn present it to one monk who has observed the retreat.
The laity traditionally offer unsewn cloth to the monks.
Before the offering takes place, the robe is generally taken, with drumming, etc., around the village in the early hours of the morning.
Once the robe is given to the Sangha, certain monks are selected to do the cutting, sewing, and dying of the robe — all in a single day.
Public contributions are very often solicited to buy the robe if it is not a personal offering.
This ceremony, which is performed with keen interest and devotion, has today become an important occasion of great social and religious significance for the Buddhist laity.
This seems to have been so even in historical times when many Sinhala kings made this offering with much interest and devotion.
There is deep ritualistic significance in the two stages of monastic ordination called pabbajja and upsampada.
The former is the initial admission into the homeless life as a novice or samanera, which can be granted to any male over the age of seven or eight, provided certain conditions are satisfied.
The ritual proper consists in shaving the hair and beard, donning the dyed robes, whose color ranges from yellow to brown, and then taking from the selected preceptor the Three Refuges in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, and the Ten Precepts: abstinence from destroying life, theft, unchastity, lying, fermented liquor, spirits, and strong drinks which cause intoxication and heedlessness, eating solid food after midday, dancing, singing, music, and improper shows, etc., adorning and beautifying the person by the use of garlands, scents, and unguents, using high and luxurious beds and seats, and receiving gold and silver, i.e., money.
The ceremony is performed on an auspicious day at the monastery where the ordination is sought.
Thus the postulant becomes a novice.
The full or higher ordination is more formal and difficult.
The higher ordination ceremony should be conducted in a prescribed and duly consecrated “chapter house”, without which the ritual is not valid.
If the candidate possesses the necessary qualifications like knowledge and intelligence and he is above twenty years of age, he may formally apply for admission and appear before a chapter of bhikkhus.
Before admission he is made to put away the yellow robes and wear the clothes of a householder and face an interview at which he would be thoroughly examined as to his fitness for admission.
If he successfully passes the test, he is led aside, reclothed in mendicant robes, and called back.
Bearing his alms-bowl, he once again appears before the Sangha and goes through certain formalities after which, if all the monks agree, he is declared admitted.
This refers to the ritual of confession performed by the monks on the new-moon and the full-moon days, when the Disciplinary Code, the Patimokkha, is recited.
This is a set of rules, to be observed by the members of the Buddhist Order.
When each of the seven sections of the rules is recited amidst the assembled Order, if any among those present has infringed any of those rules, he should confess and undergo any punishment prescribed.
Silence implies absence of guilt.
Bali is the ceremony wherein the presiding deities of the planets are invoked and placated in order to ward off their evil influences.
The belief in the good and evil influence of the planets according to the time and place of one's birth is quite widespread in Sri Lanka.
The first thing done at the birth of a child is to cast the horoscope, which has to be consulted subsequently at all the important events of his or her life.
When a calamity like a serious illness comes upon such a person, the horoscope would inevitably be consulted, and if the person is under a bad planetary influence, the astrologer would recommend some kind of propitiatory ritual.
This could be a minor one like the lime-cutting ritual or a major one like a bali ceremony, depending on the seriousness of the case.
If it is a bali ceremony, he might also recommend the specific kind of bali suitable for the occasion.
The term bali signifies both the ritual in general and also the clay representations of the planetary deities which are made in relief on frameworks of bamboo and painted in appropriate colors.
The ritual consists of dancing and drumming in front of the bali figures by the bali artist, who continuously recites propitiatory stanzas calling for protection and redress.
The patient sits by the side of the bali figures.
The bali artist is helped by a number of assistants working under him.
The knowledge and art of performing the ritual are handed down in traditional families.
The retentive power of these artists is remarkable, for they can continue to recite the appropriate formulas and verses from memory for days.
The bali ceremony is a mixture of Buddhism and folk religion.
This cult of the planets and the allied deities has become an important element in the popular living Buddhism of the island.
The origins of this type of bali ritual have to be traced to the Kotte Period of the th and th centuries, when it was introduced into the island from South India by some Hindu brahmans from that region.
However, mainly owing to the efforts of the celebrated Buddhist monk of the period, Ven.
Vidagama Maitreya Thera, this ritual was recast with a Buddhist significance, both in form and content, in that all the verses and formulas used in the ritual are those extolling the virtues of the Triple Gem — the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha — and of the Buddhist deities.
It is these spiritual qualities that are invoked to bring redress.
The entire ritual is thus made subservient to Buddhism.
The ceremony begins after paying homage to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
Even during the course of the ceremony this homage is paid at important junctures.
The majority of the stanzas recited as benedictory verses by the artist extol the virtues of the Triple Gem or refer to the Buddha's previous existences as a Bodhisatta.
The verbal part of the entire ritual consists mainly of the recitation of these verses and the pronouncement of the blessing: “By the power of those virtues let the evil influence of the planets disappear.” It is believed that this kind of pronouncement of blessings becomes effective only if they are made at such an elaborate ceremony like bali.
As in the case of the pirit ceremony described earlier, the spiritual qualities of the Buddha are regarded as superior to any worldly powers like those of the planets and stars as in the present instance, and consequently the ceremonial and ritualistic pronouncement of those qualities is believed to counteract those evil forces.
Those propitiatory recitations also include the panegyrics praising those planetary deities.
The preparation for the bali ceremony takes a day or two.
Plantain stems, tender coconut leaves, coconut and arecanut racemes, powdered resin, limes, betel, torches made by wrapping clean rags around dry reeds, coconut oil, flowers of different colors, and burnt offerings are among the main items needed.
Plastic clay and reeds will be needed in large quantities to cast the bali figures.
Life-size images of the planetary deities are moulded from these and painted beautifully in bright colors.
Each planetary deity has its own dress, colors, diagram, support, weapon, etc.
It is the nine planets that are generally propitiated: the sun, moon, Mars, Mercury, Jupiter, Venus, Saturn, and Rahu and Ketu, the ascending and the descending nodes of the moon respectively.
When everything is ready, with the bali figures propped up leaning against a wall and the patient seated by a side facing the figures, the chief bali artist starts the proceedings by taking the Five Precepts and reciting a few benedictory stanzas while the drummers start drumming.
This takes place in the evening.
After these preliminaries it is more or less customary for the chief artist to retire to the side, while one or two of his assistants would appear on the scene to perform the more vigorous part of the ritual, consisting mainly of dancing and reciting.
The dancing artist wears an attractive and colorful dress consisting of white tights, a red jacket adorned with white beads, anklets, pads of jingling bells around his calves, and an elaborate headdress.
In one hand he takes a pandama or lighted torch adequately fed with coconut oil.
While reciting formulas and dancing to the beat of the drum, he throws handfuls of powdered resin into the burning pandama, setting up flares of flames which are regarded as very powerful in driving away the invisible evil spirits.
In addition to the virtues of the Triple Gem, his recitation would also include legends and anecdotes taken from the Buddha's and Bodhisatta's lives.
Sometimes references to previous Buddhas are also made.
Planetary deities are eulogized and requested to stop troubling the patient.
Coconut-oil lamps, an incense burner, water pots with full-blown coconut racemes are among the items inevitably found on the scene.
Offerings done on altars made of plantain trunks and tender coconut leaves will also be found.
A number of such altars called pideni-tatu may be set up; these are for the departed kinsmen of the family who are expected to stop harassing the living after receiving these offerings, which generally consist of rice, seven selected curries cooked together, burnt offerings, colored flowers, betel leaves, five kinds of seeds, etc.
A live cock, with its legs tied together so that it cannot run about, is placed in a corner as an offering to the evil spirits.
This is a kind of scapegoat, for all the evil influences of the patient are supposed to be transferred to this bird, which is released on the following morning.
The ceremonies actually end early in the morning when the artists carry the clay images and the altars of offerings or pideni-tatu and leave them at the cross-roads that the evil spirits who give trouble are believed to frequent.
Tovil or “devil-dancing” is another ritualistic healing ceremony that primarily belongs to folk religion.
As in the case of the bali ceremony, here too many Buddhist elements have crept in and it has become a ceremony purporting to fulfill, at the popular level, the socio-religious needs of the simple rural Buddhists.
Tovil is essentially a demonic ritual mainly exorcistic in character, and hence a healing ceremony.
In its exorcist form it is meant to curb and drive away any one or several of the innumerable hosts of malevolent spirits, known as yakkhas, who are capable of bringing about pathological states of body and mind.
Petas or departed spirits of the malevolent type, referred to as mala-yakku or mala-peta, are also brought under the exorcist power of tovil.
While some of these could be subdued by the chanting of pirit, there are some for whom methods of a more drastic type have to be adopted.
The most popular of such methods is the tovil ceremony.
As was pointed out earlier in relation to rituals in general, tovil is also an important aspect of folk religion that has been adopted by the Sinhala Buddhists.
In the case of tovil too, religious sanction is conferred on folk-religious elements that have crept into normative Buddhism, supplementing, as it were, whatever is lacking in it to satisfy the religious needs of the masses.
The Buddha is the chief of living beings, who include the yakkhas and other related non-human beings that figure in tovil.
Although they have the power to make their victims ill in various ways — such as by possession, gaze, etc.
— they have to leave them once propitiatory offerings of food, drink, etc., are made to them.
Even the mere mention of the Buddha's virtues is enough to frighten them.
Moreover, the chief of the yakkhas, Vessavana, is one of the four regents of the universe and as such a devoted follower of the Buddha.
The ordinary yakkhas that trouble human beings have to obey his commands.
Thus, in all rituals connected with tovil, it is in the name of the Buddha and Vessavana that the yakkhas are commanded to obey the orders of the exorcist.
And in the rich folklore that deals with tovil, there are many anecdotes that connect every ritual or character with some Buddha of the past or with some Buddhist deity.
It is of interest to find a purely Buddhist form of an exorcist ritual that has been practiced by the Buddhists of Sri Lanka from very early times.
This is the recital of the Atanatiya Sutta in order to exorcise an evil spirit that has taken possession of a person.
The commentary to the sutta, dating at least as far back as the time of Buddhaghosa or even earlier, gives a detailed description of how and when to recite it.
According to this description, first the Metta, Dhajagga, and Ratana Suttas should be recited.
If the spirit does not leave by such recital, the Atanatiya Sutta is to be recited.
The bhikkhu who performs the recital should not eat meat or preparations of flour.
He should not live in a cemetery, lest the evil spirits get an opportunity to harass him.
From the monastery to the patient's house, he should be conducted under an armed guard.
The recitation of the paritta should not be done in the open.
Thoughts of love for the patient should be foremost in the reciter's mind.
During the recital too he should be under armed guard.
If the spirit still refuses to leave, the patient should be taken to the monastery and the recital performed in the courtyard of the dagaba.
Many preliminary rites are recommended before such a recital.
These include getting the patient to offer a seat to the bhikkhu who is to recite the paritta, the offering of flowers and lamps to the dagaba, and the recitation by the bhikkhu of a set of benedictory stanzas, called -mangala-gatha.
A full assembly of the deities should also be summoned.
The person possessed should be questioned as to his name, by which is implied the identity of the spirit who has taken possession of him.
Once the name is given, the spirit, but visibly the patient, should be addressed by that name.
It should be told that the merits of offering incense, flowers, alms, etc.
are all transferred to him and that the mangala-gatha just referred to have been recited in order to appease him and that he should therefore leave the patient in deference to the Sangha.
If the spirit still refuses to leave, the deities should be informed of his obstinacy and the Atanatiya Paritta should be recited after declaring that as the spirit does not obey them, they are carrying out the order of the Buddha.
It is significant that this is a purely Buddhist ritual of considerable antiquity performed on lines similar to those in tovil.
But the difference between the two should also be noted.
When tovil is performed to cure a person possessed by a spirit, the spirit is ordered to leave the patient after accepting the offering of food and drink.
But in the case of the Atanatiya ritual, it is the merits earned by making offerings to the Buddha that are transferred to the spirit.
Another significant difference is that the Atanatiya recital, in keeping with its purely Buddhist spirit, is much milder and more restrained than its tovil counterpart.
The latter, however, is much more colorful and theatrical owing to its complex and essentially secular character.
From the purely curative aspect, too, there is another attractive feature in tovil: when the spirit leaves the patient it does so leaving a sign of its departure, like breaking a branch of a tree, making a sound like a hoot, etc.
It is perhaps because of these attractive features that tovil has become more popular in the island, replacing the truly Buddhist ceremony of the Atanatiya recital.
Nowadays in Sri Lanka, tovil has become the most popular form of cure adopted for spirit possession as well as other pathological conditions consequent on this.
When a person is ill and medical treatment does not respond, the suspicion arises that it is due to some influence of an evil spirit.
The person to be consulted in such a case is the exorcist known as kattadiya or yakadura or yaddessa who would discover and identify the particular evil spirit causing the disease and perform the appropriate tovil.
There are also certain forms of tovil performed as pregnancy rituals and others as means of eradicating various forms of evil influences like the evil eye, evil mouth, etc..
The devil-dancers start their ceremony by first worshipping the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, as in the case of the bali ceremony.
The yakkhas — who constitute one of the main classes of malevolent spirits placated in devil-dancing — are believed to become satisfied with the offerings made by people through tovil and cease harassing them.
The yakkhas like Riri, Sanni, Kalukumaraya, Suniyan, Mahasohon, Maru, etc.
are some of the main spirits placated.
There are eighteen main yakkhas in this category, each representing a particular kind of illness, and in tovil these demons are represented by the devil-dancers themselves, who wear their specific masks and other apparel in keeping with the traditional forms ascribed to these spirits.
It is believed that by dancing, chanting, and acting the part of the demons after assuming their likenesses through masks and other paraphernalia, the demons possessing the patient would leave him.
The sound waves created by the drum-beat and the chanting of stanzas accompanied by rhythmic dancing in keeping with these sounds are all performed to a set pattern traditionally laid down.
The collective effect of the ceremony is believed to cure the patient's illness.
Thus this dancing in tovil is a therapeutic ritual.
The impersonation of the demon by the dancer is regarded as tantamount to the actual presence of the demon who becomes placated through offerings, recitations, chanting, miming, etc.
When the spirits are threatened and asked to leave the patient, they are asked to do so under the command and in the name of the Buddha.
The ceremony known as rata-yakuma is performed to make barren women conceive, or for the pre-natal care of pregnant women, and to ensure the safe delivery of children.
One of the episodes mimetically performed by the exorcist in this ceremony shows how barren women, according to a Buddhist legend preserved among the Sinhala people, offer cloths to the past Buddha Dipankara, the fourth in the line of twenty-eight Buddhas accepted by Theravada Buddhists; they obtain children through the merits of the act.
Among the rituals specially connected with women may be mentioned those devil-dancing ceremonies that invoke the yakkha called Kalukumaraya in Sinhala.
He is very often associated with another group of yakkhas called rata-yakku, whose leader is a female named Riddi-bisava.
Another pregnancy ritual that deserves mention here is the one known as kalas-tabima.
When the first signs of pregnancy appear in a woman, a new clay pot is filled with certain ingredients and kept apart with the solemn promise that once the child is safely delivered a tovil will be performed.
The ritual known as hat-adiya in the tovil ceremony called suniyam-kapima, signifies the seven steps the Bodhisatta Siddhattha is said to have taken just after he was born.
Two important facts that emerge from this brief description of tovil is the theatrical value present in these rituals and the way in which religious sanction has been obtained for their adoption by the Buddhists.
The large number of rituals and ceremonies connected with the goddess Pattini also come under Buddhist practices.
This goddess, believed to be of South Indian origin, has become the most popular female deity of the Sinhala Buddhists.
While Hindu goddesses like Lakshmi, Sarasvati, and Kali are also worshipped by the Buddhists, only Pattini has separate abodes among the Buddhists.
The most important of the rituals connected with Pattini is the gam-maduwa, which is an all-purpose ceremony.
As this ceremony is usually held after the harvest by offering the first portion of paddy harvested, this is also a ceremony of first-fruit offerings.
A gam-maduwa has many interludes dramatized mainly from rich legendary lore about the goddess Pattini.
Kohomba-kankariya, or the ritual of the god Kohomba, is a ceremony similar to the gam-maduwa but performed more as an expiatory ritual.
Two other ceremonies of this type are pan-madu and puna-madu.
All these are different forms of the same type of ritual with slight differences.
They are generally referred to as devol-madu or occasions for the propitiation of the gods.
The general purpose of such devol-madu is the attainment of immunity from disease and evil influences and the achievement of success, especially agricultural, for the entire village.
A point that is sociologically important is that as they are big communal gatherings they also fulfill the social needs of the village folk.
As they are performed in public places to bless the community as a whole and turn out to be social get-togethers, they bear a corporate character.
When it is decided that such a ceremony should be held, all the village folk would forget their differences and work together to make it a success.
Further, while it mainly serves as a ritual to propitiate the deities, it is a form of entertainment as well.
Serving as it does the socio-religious needs of the masses, it becomes a big social event for the entire village.
Gara-demons; -yaka ) are a group of demons twelve in number whose female aspects are called the Giri goddesses.
Their chief is called Dala-raja who is represented as having three hooded cobras over his head, ear-ornaments, two protruding tusks, and a torch in each hand.
When referred to in the singular as gara-yaka it is he that is intended and when performing the ritual it is the mask pertaining to him that is generally used as representing the group.
These demons are not inimical to humans but are regarded as removing various kinds of uncleanliness and evil influences.
Accordingly it is customary among the Sinhala Buddhists to perform the ritual called gara-yak-natuma at the end of religious ceremonies like annual peraheras, tovil ceremonies, etc.
This is to ward off what is called vas-dos in the terminology of the folk religion, the effects of evil-eye, evil mouth, evil thoughts, etc.
The malicious influences of these evil forces have to be eliminated before the participants return to their normal activities.
And for this it is these demons that have to be propitiated.
Accordingly, they are invited to come and take away their prey, promising not to harm the participants thereafter.
A dancer impersonates the gara-yaka by wearing the appropriate mask just referred to and in the dialogue that takes place between him and another dancer, he promises to comply with the request if certain things are given to him.
These include drinks, food, sweets, and money.
These items are given and he departs in peace.
The ceremony is held annually at the Vishnu Devalaya in Kandy after the annual Esala Perahera.
It goes on for one week from the last day of the Perahera and is referred to as vali-yak-natuma.
Besides the ceremonies and rituals like pirit, sanghika-dana, kathina, etc., that can be traced in their origin to the time of the Buddha himself, there is another popular practice resorted to by the average Sri Lankan Buddhist which cannot be traced to early Buddhism so easily.
This is deva-worship, the worship of deities, in what are popularly called devalayas or abodes dedicated to these deities.
This practice cannot be described as totally un-Buddhistic, yet at the same time it does not fall into the category of folk religious practices like bali and tovil adopted by popular Buddhism.
The word deva, meaning “god” or “deity” in this context, signifies various classes of superhuman beings who in some respects are superior to ordinary human beings through their birth in a higher plane.
As such, they are capable of helping human beings in times of difficulty.
There is also another class of such superior beings who were originally extraordinary human beings.
After their death, they have been raised to the level of gods and are worshipped and supplicated as capable of helping in times of need.
These are the gods by convention or glorified human heroes like the Minneriya Deviyo, who was glorified in this manner in recognition of his construction of the great Minneriya Tank at Polonnaruwa, or God Vibhishana, one of the four guardian deities of Sri Lanka.
Both these categories of deities are, however, subject to the samsaric laws pertaining to birth and death.
Thus it is seen that deva-worship is based on the theory that a superior being can help an inferior being when the latter needs such help.
In addition to their role as helpers in need, an additional duty ascribed to the devas is the safeguarding of the Buddha-sasana, i.e., the Buddhist religion.
This also has its origin in the story of the Buddha himself when the four divine regents of the universe mounted guard over him and helped on various occasions of the Bodhisatta's life from his conception onwards.
The benevolence of the deities is also extended to the protection of the faithful followers of the Buddha's teachings as exemplified by Sakka, the good Samaritan in many Buddhist stories.
In Sri Lanka there are four deities regarded as the guardians of the Buddha-sasana in the island: Vishnu, Saman, Kataragama, and Vibhishana.
Although Vishnu is originally a Hindu god, the Buddhists have taken him over as a Buddhist deity, referring to him also by the localized designation Uppalavanna.
And so are Siva, specially under the name Isvara, and Ganesha under the name Ganapati or the more popular appellation Gana-deviyo.
In the devala-worship the devotees make offerings to these deities and solicit their help for special purposes, especially in their day-to-day problems.
A noteworthy feature in this practice is the presence of a mediator between the deity and the devotee, a priest called kapurala, or kapu-mahattaya or simply kapuva, the equivalent of the Hindu pusari.
This figure has been copied from South Indian Hindu practices, for even in North India the devotees appeal directly to these higher powers without the help of such an intermediary.
By devala offering is meant the offering of food and drink as well as gifts of cloth, coins, gold, and silver often accompanied by eulogies addressed to the particular resident deity and recited by the kapurala.
In many Buddhist temples in Sri Lanka there are devalayas dedicated to various deities.
Devala-worship of this type is a ritual that has gained popularity among the local Buddhists since the Polonnaruwa period.
In the present day it has acquired a vital place in the religious life of the Buddhist masses.
This is one of the aspects by which the “great tradition” of Nikaya Buddhism has been supplemented by popular elements.
This shows that if Buddhism is to prevail as a living force among all classes of its adherents, it has to make provision for the popular demands related to the day-to-day life of the common populace.
It is customary for many Sri Lankan Buddhists to visit a devalaya of one of the deities and make a vow that if the problem at hand is solved, they will make an offering to the deity concerned.
Offerings are made even without such a special request.
Whatever the case may be, this practice has become a ritual of propitiation through the kapuralas.
The main duties of the kapuralas are to look after the devalayas in their charge, to perform the prescribed rituals, and to offer in the inner shrine the offerings brought by devotees.
The kapurala is given a fee for his services.
Once the ritual is over, a part of the offerings is given back to the devotee for him to take home and partake of as having a sacramental value.
The offerings normally consist of milk-rice, coconuts, betel, camphor, joss-sticks, fruits, along with flowers, garlands, flags, etc.
All these are arranged in an orderly manner in a basket or tray and handed over respectfully to the kapurala, who takes it inside and offers it at the statue of the main deity inside the inner room.
The devotees wait outside with clasped hands while the kapurala makes his pleadings on their behalf.
The statement he recites, called yatikava in Sinhala, is a panegyric of the deity concerned and it constitutes a humble and respectful request to bring succour to the devotee in his particular predicament.
After this the kapurala emerges from the inner shrine room and blesses the devotees by using his thumb to place on their forehead a mark of a paste made from saffron, sandalwood, and other ingredients.
This mark, the symbol of sanctification, is known as the tilaka.
This form of ritualistic propitiation of deities is a clear adaptation of the Hindu system where the very same method is followed, though more elaborately.
Kataragama.
Devalayas dedicated to the different deities are scattered all over the island.
God Kataragama in southern Sri Lanka is by far the most popular, as he is considered to be the most powerful deity capable of granting the requests of the worshipper.
It is for this reason that he has acquired territorial rights throughout the island.
Devalayas dedicated to him are found in many places in the island, some of which are maintained by the Hindus.
Ganesha.
The elephant-shaped god Ganesha, regarded as the god of wisdom and the remover of obstacles, is also very popular among the Buddhists under the names Ganapati or Gana-deviyo.
He is worshipped as the chief of obstacles because it is believed that he is responsible for creating and removing obstracles.
He does this through troops of inferior deities or demi-gods considered as attendants of Siva, present almost everywhere, who are under his command.
It is in this sense that he is called Gana-pati, which is the epithet popular among the Buddhists.
The devalayas dedicated to him are mostly run by the Hindus.
The Buddhists worship him either through his statues, found in many Buddhists temples, or by visiting the Hindu kovils dedicated to him.
As the god of wisdom and of learning, he is propitiated at the time a child first reads the alphabet.
As the chief of obstacles, as their creator as well as remover, the Hindus begin their devala-ritual by making the first offering to him.
Another popular aspect of his worship in some parts of Sri Lanka can be observed along the main roads, especially in the North-Central Province, where his statue is placed near trees and propitiated by travelers so that they may have a safe journey.
The propitiation usually consists of breaking a coconut in his name, offering a coin, etc.
Natha.
Natha is purely a Buddhist god, apparently the local counterpart of the all-compassionate Mahayana Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara.
He is referred to in Sri Lanka by the abbreviated form Natha.
His cult, as that of Natha, had become quite popular during the Kotte period, while references to him are found as early as the th and th centuries as shown by archaelogical evidence.
The center of the cult was Totagamuwa near Hikkaduwa in the Galle District.
Two of the more ancient devalayas dedicated to this deity are found at Kandy and at Vagiriya.
The premises of the Kandy devalaya, opposite the Temple of the Tooth, are considered especially lucky and sacred, for the important royal rites like choosing a name for the king, putting on the royal sword, etc., were held there.
It was Natha's all-pervading compassion that seems to have been appealed to by the local devotees.
Vishnu.
The important Hindu god Vishnu has also assumed a special Buddhist significance in the island.
He is identified with the god Uppalavanna of the Mahavamsa, to whom Sakka, the king of the gods, is said to have entrusted the guardianship of Sri Lanka at the request of the Buddha before his passing away.
This god is said to have arrived in the island to fulfill this mission.
The name Uppalavanna means “the color of the blue water-lily.” As Vishnu is of the same color, Uppalavanna became identified with Vishnu, and in the wake of the Mahavamsa tradition, he became, as Vishnu, the protector of the Buddha-sasana in Sri Lanka.
The calculated omission of the name Vishnu in the Mahavamsa in this connection may be viewed as an attempt at total localization of the divinity with a view to harmonize him with the cultural fabric of the island.
His main shrine is at Devinuwara, at the southern tip of the island, where an annual Esala festival is held in his honor.
If the identification is correct his cult can be traced to the earliest phase of the history of the island and has been popular up to the present day.
Pattini.
Goddess Pattini, referred to above, is prominent as the most popular female Buddhist divinity; she has her devalayas scattered throughout the country.
Her cult goes back at least to the second century A.The then ruler, King Gajabahu, is said to have introduced the worship of this divinity into the island from South India.
The legend about her life is told in the Tamil poem Silappadikaram.
According to the myths current in the island about her, she had seven incarnations, being born seven times from water, the tusk of an elephant, a flower, a rock, a fire, cloth, and a mango.
Hence she is designated as sat-pattini, sat meaning seven.
There are colorful stories woven around these births.
The story about her unswerving fidelity to her fickle husband Kovalan in her birth as Kannagi, is quite popular among the local Buddhists as attested by the existence of many Sinhala literary works dealing with the story.
Her favors are sought especially at times of pestilences like chicken pox, measles, etc.
and also by women who desire children.
It is customary for the Sri Lankan Buddhists to visit her devalaya and worship her with offerings after recovery from infectious diseases.
The banishment of evil influences and the attainment of prosperity in general and good harvests are other purposes behind the ceremonies performed in her honor.
She also plays an important part in the ceremonies connected with the offering of first fruits.
Devalayas dedicated to her are found in many parts of the island, the one at Navagamuwa, about fifteen miles from Colombo on the old Avissavella Road, being the most important.
The sanctity of this place seems to go back to the time of King Gajabahu.
Sakka.
Sakka, the king of the gods, has been an important figure in the Buddhist affairs of Sri Lanka.
Tradition connects him with the Buddha himself in connection with the landing of Vijaya and his followers in the island in the th century B.On this occasion, at the Buddha's request, Sakka is said to have entrusted Vishnu with the guardianship of Buddhism in the island.
It was Sakka too who sought arahant Mahinda and requested him to come over to the island when the time became opportune for its conversion.
Saman.
Another important deity in the island is Mahasumana, Sumana or Saman, the guardian or the presiding deity of Sri Pada mountain or Sumanakuta, which the Buddhists treat as sacred on account of its bearing the impression of the Buddha's left foot, which he left on his third visit to the island..
God Saman is recorded as having met the Buddha on the latter's first visit to the island when he visited Mahiyangana to drive away the yakkhas.
Saman became a stream-entrant after listening to the Buddha, who gave him a handful of hairs with which he erected the dagaba at Mahiyangana.
He is regarded as the chief deity of the area surrounding the sacred mountain as well as of the hill-country in general.
Accordingly his main shrine is at Ratnapura, where an annual festival is held in his honor.
Vibhishana.
Another deity, somewhat similar to Saman, is Vibhishana, who is regarded as the brother of the pre-historic King Ravana of Sri Lanka.
His main shrine is at Kelaniya, as a part of the famous Buddhist temple there.
Dadimunda.
Another deity who likewise came into prominence during the Kandyan period is Dadimunda who, according to the prevalent tradition, landed at Dondra in South Sri Lanka from South India.
He proceeded to Alutnuvara in the Kegalla District, taking up permanent residence there in a temple, which he himself got constructed.
This is the chief shrine of this deity and here too an annual festival is held.
He is regarded as a general of Vishnu and accordingly, at the main Vishnu shrines in the island, he also has his shrine on a side.
Another interesting tradition says that he was the only deity who did not run away in fear at the time of Bodhisatta Siddhattha's struggle with Mara.
While all the other deities took flight in fright, he alone remained fearless as the Bodhisatta's only guardian.
He is portrayed in the attire of a Kandyan chief with his special attribute, a walking stick.
His Kandyan dress symbolizes his suzerainty over the Kandyan area.
Huniyan Deviyo.
The patron deity of the sorcerers in Sri Lanka is Huniyan or Suniyan, who has been promoted from the status of a demon to that of a deity.
He is also regarded as the deity presiding over a village area bounded by its boundaries, in which role he is designated as gambhara-deviyo.
In many of the composite devalayas he too has his shrine, the one at Lunava, about seven miles from Colombo close to the Galle Road, near the Lunava railway station, being his chief devalaya.
Besides these deities so far enumerated there are many other minor figures who are too numerous to be mentioned here.
What is important is that in the case of all these deities, the method of propitiation and worship is the same as explained earlier and every such deity is in charge of a particular aspect of life.
And all of them are faithful Buddhists, extending their respective powers not only to the Buddha-sasana but also to those who follow it faithfully.
As Buddhists, none of these is regarded as superior or even remotely equal to the Buddha.
They all are followers of the Buddha, who has transcended the round of rebirth, while they are still within samsara, hoping to achieve release from it by following the Buddha's Teaching.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Buddhism originated with an Indian prince known as the Buddha, who taught in Northeast India in the fifth century BTwo centuries later, with the support of the Emperor Asoka, Buddhism spread over the greater part of India and from there traveled the full breadth of the Asian continent.
In several tidal waves of missionary zeal it rose up from its Indian homeland and inundated other regions, offering the peoples among whom it took root a solid foundation of faith and wisdom upon which to build their lives and a source of inspiration towards which to direct their hopes.
At different points in history Buddhism has commanded followings in countries as diverse geographically, ethnically, and culturally as Afghanistan and Japan, Siberia and Cambodia, Korea and Sri Lanka; yet all have looked towards the same Indian sage as their master.
Though for historical reasons Buddhism eventually disappeared from India by about the twelfth century, before it vanished it had profoundly transformed Hinduism.
In our own time Indian thinkers as different as Swami Vivekananda, Tagore, Gandhi, and Nehru have looked upon the Buddha as a model.
In the twentieth century, too, while Buddhism has lost much of its following in the East, it has begun to have a growing impact on an increasing number of people in the West, and in its own quiet way it is sending down firm roots in several countries of the Western hemisphere.
In the course of its long history Buddhism has assumed a wide variety of forms.
Because of its peaceful, non-dogmatic character, it has always adapted easily to the pre-existent cultures and religious practices of the people among whom it has spread, becoming in turn the fountainhead of a new culture and world view.
So successful has Buddhism been in integrating itself with a country's indigenous culture that it is often difficult for us to discern the common thread that binds the different forms of Buddhism together as branches of the same religion.
The outer surfaces differ so greatly: from the gentle, ceremonial Theravada Buddhism of Sri Lanka and Southeast Asia, to the contemplative and devotional practices of Far Eastern Mahayana Buddhism, to the mysterious ritualism of Tibetan Vajrayana Buddhism.
Yet, though the outer faces of these Buddhist schools may differ drastically, they all remain rooted in a common source, the life and teaching of the man known to us as the Buddha.
Surprisingly, though the Buddha stands so far back from us in time, further back than all the later teachers who rose to eminence in the river of Buddhist history, it is still his voice that speaks to us most directly, in a language we can immediately understand, in words, images, and ideas to which we can immediately respond.
If we place side by side the texts of the Chandogya Upanishad and the Buddha's Discourse on the Four Noble Truths, which are separated in time by perhaps only a hundred years, the former seems to come from a cultural and spiritual milieu so remote we can hardly comprehend it, while the latter sounds almost as if it had been spoken last week in Bombay, London, or New York.
In attitude and perspective the Buddha comes so close to us it is hard to believe he is separated from us by a gulf of some, years.
That the Buddha's teaching should remain perennially relevant throughout the changing eras of human history, that his message should be undimmed by the sheer passage of time, is already implicit in the title by which he is most commonly known.
For the word “Buddha,” as is widely known, is not a proper name but an honorific title meaning “the Enlightened One,” “the Awakened One.” This title is given to him because he has woken up from the deep sleep of ignorance in which the rest of the world is absorbed; because he has penetrated the deepest truths about the human condition; and because he proclaims those truths with the aim of awakening others and enabling them to share his realization.
Despite the shifting scenarios of history over twenty-five centuries, despite the change in world views and modes of thought from one epoch to the next, the basic truths of human life do not change.
They remain constant, and are recognizable to those mature enough to reflect on them and intelligent enough to understand them.
For this reason, even today in our age of jet travel, computer technology, and genetic engineering, it is perfectly fitting that the One who has Awakened should speak to us in words that are just as powerful, just as cogent, just as illuminating as they were when they were first proclaimed long ago in the towns and villages of Northeast India.
Although we cannot determine with absolute precision the dates of the Buddha's life, many scholars agree that he lived from approximately to BC; a growing number of scholars follow a different chronology which places the dates about eighty years later.
As is natural with a spiritual leader who has made such a powerful impact on human civilization, the account of his life that has come down to us has been embroidered with myth and legend, which serve to bring before the mind's eye the loftiness of his spiritual stature.
Nevertheless, in the oldest source on the Buddha's life, the Sutta Pitaka of the Pali Canon, we find a number of texts from which we can construct a fairly realistic picture of his career.
What is striking about the picture given by these texts is that it shows the Buddha's life as a series of lessons which embody and convey the essential points of his teaching.
Thus, in his own life, the person and the message merge together in an indissoluble union.
The future master was born into the Sakyan clan in a small republic nestled in the Himalayan foothills, in a region which at present lies in southern Nepal.
His given name was Siddhattha and his family name Gotama.
Legend holds that he was the son of a powerful monarch, but in actuality the Sakyan state was an oligarchic republic, so his father was probably the chief of the ruling council of elders.
By the Buddha's time the Sakyan state had become a tributary of the powerful state of Kosala, which corresponds to present-day Uttar Pradesh.
Even the oldest suttas tell us that the infant's birth was attended by various wonders.
Soon afterwards, a sage named Asita came to visit the baby, and recognizing on his body the marks of future greatness, he bowed down to the child in homage.
As a royal youth, Prince Siddhattha was raised in luxury.
His father had built for him three palaces, one for each season of the year, and there he enjoyed himself in the company of his friends.
At the age of sixteen he married his cousin, a beautiful princess named Yasodhara, and lived a contented life in the Sakyan capital, Kapilavatthu; during this time he was probably trained in the martial arts and the skills of statecraft.
As the years passed, however, when he reached his late twenties, the prince became increasingly introspective.
What troubled him were the great burning issues we ordinarily take for granted — the questions concerning the purpose and meaning of our lives.
Is the purpose of our existence the enjoyment of sensual pleasures, the achievement of wealth and status, the exercise of power?
Or is there something beyond these, more real and fulfilling?
These must have been the questions that rippled across his mind, for we find his own reflections recorded for us in a discourse called “The Noble Quest”:
Monks, before my enlightenment, being myself subject to birth, aging, sickness and death, to sorrow and defilement, I sought what was subject to birth, aging, sickness and death, to sorrow and defilement.
Then I considered thus: “Why, being subject to birth… to defilement, should I seek what is subject to birth… and defilement?
Suppose that, being myself subject to birth, having understood the danger in what is subject to birth, I seek the unborn, the supreme security from bondage, Nibbana.
Suppose that, being myself subject to aging, sickness and death, to sorrow and defilement, I seek the unaging, unailing, deathless, sorrowless and undefiled state, the supreme security from bondage, Nibbana.
Thus, at the age of, in the prime of life, with his parents weeping, he cut off his hair and beard, put on the saffron robes of a mendicant, and entered upon the homeless life of renunciation.
The developed Buddha biography adds that he left the palace on the very day that his wife gave birth to their only child, the boy Rahula.
Having left behind his home and family, the Bodhisatta or “seeker of enlightenment” headed south for Magadha, in whose environs small groups of seekers were quietly pursuing their quest for spiritual illumination, usually under the guidance of a guru.
At the time northern India could boast of a number of accomplished masters famous for their philosophical systems and achievements in meditation.
Prince Siddhattha sought out two of the most eminent, Alara Kalama and Uddaka Ramaputta.
From them he learned systems of meditation which, from the descriptions in the texts, seem to have been forerunners of Raja Yoga.
The Bodhisatta mastered their teachings and systems of meditation, but though he reached exalted levels of concentration, he found these teachings insufficient, for they did not lead to the goal he was seeking: perfect enlightenment and the realization of Nibbana, release from the sufferings of sentient existence.
Having left his teachers, the Bodhisatta adopted a different path, one that was popular in ancient India and still has followers today: the path of asceticism, of self-mortification, pursued in the conviction that liberation is to be won by afflicting the body with pain beyond its normal levels of endurance.
For six years the Bodhisatta followed this method with unyielding determination.
He fasted for days on end until his body looked like a skeleton cloaked in skin; he exposed himself to the heat of the midday sun and the cold of the night; he subjected his flesh to such torments that he came almost to the door of death.
Yet he found that despite his persistence and sincerity these austerities were futile.
Later he would say that he took the path of self-mortification further than all other ascetics, yet it led, not to higher wisdom and enlightenment, but only to physical weakness and the deterioration of his mental faculties.
Just then he thought of another path to enlightenment, one which balanced proper care of the body with sustained contemplation and deep investigation.
He would later call this path “the middle way” because it avoids the extremes of sensual indulgence and self-mortification.
He had experienced both extremes, the former as a prince and the latter as an ascetic, and he knew they were ultimately dead ends.
To follow the middle way, however, he realized he would first have to regain his strength.
Thus he gave up his practice of austerities and resumed taking nutritious food.
At the time five other ascetics had been living in attendance on the Bodhisatta, hoping that when he attained enlightenment he would serve as their guide.
But when they saw him partake of substantial meals, they became disgusted with him and left him, thinking the princely ascetic had given up his exertion and reverted to a life of luxury.
Now he was alone, and complete solitude allowed him to pursue his quest undisturbed.
One day, when his physical strength had returned, he approached a lovely spot in Uruvela by the bank of the Nerañjara River.
Here he prepared a seat of straw beneath an asvattha tree and sat down cross-legged, making a firm resolution that he would never rise up from that seat until he had won his goal.
As night descended he entered into deeper and deeper stages of meditation until his mind was perfectly calm and composed.
Then, the records tell us, in the first watch of the night he directed his concentrated mind to the recollection of his previous lives.
Gradually there unfolded before his inner vision his experiences in many past births, even during many cosmic aeons; in the middle watch of the night he developed the “divine eye” by which he could see beings passing away and taking rebirth in accordance with their karma, their deeds; and in the last watch of the night he penetrated the deepest truths of existence, the most basic laws of reality, and thereby removed from his mind the subtlest veils of ignorance.
When dawn broke, the figure sitting beneath the tree was no longer a Bodhisatta, a seeker of enlightenment, but a Buddha, a Perfectly Enlightened One, one who had attained the Deathless in this very life itself.
For several weeks the newly awakened Buddha remained in the vicinity of the Bodhi Tree contemplating from different angles the Dhamma, the truth he had discovered.
Then he came to a new crossroad in his spiritual career: Was he to teach, to try to share his realization with others, or should he instead remain quietly in the forest, enjoying the bliss of liberation alone?
At first his mind inclined to keeping quiet; for he thought the truth he had realized was just too deep for others to understand, too difficult to express in words, and he was concerned he would just weary himself trying to convey his realization to others.
But now the texts introduce a dramatic element into the story.
Just at the moment the Buddha decided to remain silent, a high deity named Brahma Sahampati, the Lord of a Thousand Worlds, realized that if the Master remained silent the world would be lost, deprived of the stainless path to deliverance from suffering.
Therefore he descended to earth, bowed down low before the Enlightened One, and humbly pleaded with him to teach the Dhamma “for the sake of those with little dust in their eyes.
The Buddha then gazed out upon the world with his profound vision.
He saw that people are like lotuses in a pond at different stages of growth, and he understood that just as some lotuses close to the surface of the water need only the sun's rays to rise above the surface and fully blossom, so there are some people who need only to hear the noble teaching to win enlightenment and gain perfect liberation of mind.
When he saw this his heart was stirred by deep compassion, and he decided to go back into the world and to teach the Dhamma to those who were ready to listen.
The first ones he approached were his former companions, the five ascetics who had deserted him a few months earlier and were now dwelling in a deer park at Sarnath near Benares.
He explained to them the truths he had discovered, and on hearing his discourse they gained insight into the Dhamma, becoming his first disciples.
In the months ahead his following grew by leaps and bounds as both householders and ascetics heard the liberating message, gave up their former creeds, and declared themselves disciples of the Enlightened One.
Each year, even into his old age, he would wander among the villages, towns, and cities of the Ganges plain, teaching all who would lend an ear; he would rest only for the three months of the rainy season, and then resume his wanderings, which took him from present Delhi even as far east as Bengal.
He established a Sangha, an order of monks and nuns, for which he laid down an intricate body of rules and regulations; this order still remains alive today, perhaps the world's oldest continuous institution.
He also attracted many lay followers who became devoted supporters of the Master and his Sangha.
After an active ministry of forty-five years, at the ripe age of eighty, the Buddha headed for the northern town of Kusinara.
There, surrounded by many disciples, he passed away into the “Nibbana element with no remainder of conditioned existence,” severing forever his bondage to the round of rebirths.
I said earlier that each of the major events in the Buddha's life gives us a specific object lesson in his teaching.
Now I want to draw out the lessons suggested by these events.
First, the Bodhisatta's awakening to the harsh realities of human existence — his discovery of our bondage to old age, illness, and death — teaches us the importance of deep reflection and critical thinking.
His awakening reflects back to us the somnambulance in which we usually live, mired in our pleasures and petty concerns, oblivious to the “great affair” staring us in the face at every moment of our lives.
His awakening reminds us that we ourselves must emerge from the comfortable but dangerous cocoon of ignorance in which we have settled down; that we must break away from our thoughtless infatuation with our youth, health, and vitality; that we must rise to a new level of mature understanding which will enable us to triumph in our inevitable encounter with the Lord of Death.
The Bodhisatta's departure from the palace, his “great renunciation,” teaches us a lesson in values.
It shows us that from among the wide range of values which we can draw upon to give order to our lives, the quest for enlightenment and liberation should reign supreme.
This goal ranks far above the pleasure, wealth, and power to which we ordinarily give priority, even above the call of social duty and mundane responsibilities.
This does not mean, of course, that everyone who wants to follow the Buddha's path must be ready to leave behind home and family and adopt the lifestyle of a monk or nun.
The Buddha's community of disciples included many householders as well as monks, devout laymen and laywomen who attained high levels of awakening while living active lives within the world.
But the Buddha's example does show us that we must all order our values according to a scale which gives the highest place to the most worthy goal, to that which is also the most real of all realities, Nibbana; and we should never allow the claims of mundane obligations to pull us away from pursuing our aspiration.
Next, the Bodhisatta's six years of struggle shows us that the quest for the highest goal is a strenuous undertaking that calls for deep dedication and unrelenting effort.
Fortunately for us, the Bodhisatta found that the practice of self-mortification is a fruitless exercise, and thus we need not follow him in this direction.
But his uncompromising pursuit of truth underscores the degree of effort that the quest for enlightenment requires, and those who seek such a goal in full earnestness must be ready to submit to a difficult and demanding course of training.
The Buddha's enlightenment teaches us that ultimate wisdom and deliverance from suffering is a real potential inherent in human beings, one we can realize for ourselves without the aid or grace of an external savior.
His enlightenment also highlights the ideal of sensible moderation, “the middle way,” which has characterized Buddhism throughout its long history.
The quest for truth may be a difficult undertaking, one which makes harsh demands on us, but it does not ask us to subject ourselves to penance and self-punishment.
Final victory is to be won, not by tormenting the body, but by developing the mind, and this takes place through a course of training that balances care for the body with the cultivation of our higher spiritual faculties.
The decision the Buddha made after his enlightenment brings home another lesson to us.
At this critical juncture, when he was faced with the choice of either keeping his enlightenment to himself or taking up the challenge of teaching others, the mandate of compassion prevailed in his heart.
Leaving behind the quietude of the forest, he took upon himself the burden of guiding errant humanity along the path to liberation.
This choice has had a tremendous impact on the subsequent development of Buddhism, for throughout its long history the spirit of compassion has been the heartbeat of the Buddha's dispensation, its innermost animating spirit.
It was the Buddha's compassionate example that motivated Buddhist monks and nuns to travel across seas, mountains, and deserts, at the risk of their lives, to share the blessings of the Dhamma with those still lost in darkness.
It is this example that inspires many Buddhists today, in a wide variety of ways, even when they can express their compassion only in humble acts of kindness and tender concern for those less fortunate than themselves.
Finally, the Buddha's passing away, his attainment of final Nibbana, teaches us once again that everything conditioned must perish, that all formations are impermanent, that even the greatest of spiritual masters is no exception to the very law he so often proclaimed.
His passing away also teaches us that the highest bliss and peace comes only by relinquishing all, through the stilling of all conditioned things.
For this is the final entrance way to the attainment of the unconditioned, the Deathless, Nibbana.
To ask why the Buddha's teaching proved so attractive and gained such a large following among all sectors of Northeast Indian society is to raise a question which is also relevant to us today.
For we live at a time when Buddhism is exerting a strong appeal upon an increasing number of people, especially among those whose level of education and capacity for reflection has made them indifferent to the claims of revealed religion.
I believe the remarkable success of Buddhism, as well as its contemporary appeal, can be understood principally in terms of two factors: one, the aim of the teaching; and the other, its methodological features.
Unlike the so-called revealed religions, which rest upon faith in unverifiable doctrines, the Buddha formulated his teaching in a way that directly addresses the critical problem at the heart of human existence — the problem of suffering — and he promises that those who follow his teaching to its end will realize here and now the highest happiness and peace.
All other concerns apart from this, such as theological dogmas, metaphysical subtleties, rituals and rules of worship, the Buddha waves aside as irrelevant to the task at hand, the unraveling of the problem of suffering.
This pragmatic thrust of the Dhamma is clearly illustrated by an incident related in the texts.
Once a monk named Malunkyaputta was pondering the great metaphysical questions — whether the world is eternal or non-eternal, infinite or finite, etc.
— and he felt unhappy because the Buddha had refused to answer them.
So one day Malunkyaputta went to the Master and told him, “Either you answer these questions for me or I leave the order.
The Buddha then told Malunkyaputta that the spiritual life did not depend on any answers to these questions, which were mere distractions from the real challenge of following the path.
He then compared the metaphysician to a man struck by a poisoned arrow.
When his relatives bring a surgeon, the man tells him, “ I won't let you remove the arrow until you let me know the name of the man who struck me, the type of bow he used, the material from which the arrow was made, and the kind of poison he used.” That man would die, the Buddha said, before the arrow was removed, and so too the metaphysician, struck with the arrow of suffering, will die without ever finding the path to freedom.
Not only does the Buddha make suffering and release from suffering the focus of his teaching, but he deals with the problem of suffering in a way that reveals an extraordinary degree of psychological insight.
Like a psychoanalyst, the Buddha traces suffering to its roots within our minds, to our craving and clinging, and he holds that the cure, the solution to the problem of suffering, must also be achieved within our minds.
To gain freedom from suffering it is futile to pray to the gods, to worship holy objects, to attach ourselves to rituals and ceremonies.
Since suffering arises from our own mental defilements, we have to purify our minds of these defilements, from our greed, hatred, and ignorance, and this requires profound inner honesty.
While other religions lead us outward — towards ideas of a deity who determines our fate, or to lofty philosophical abstractions like the idea of a universal self or a nondual reality in which all opposites are resolved — the Buddha leads us back to ourselves, always keeping his teaching attuned to the hard facts of experience.
He places the mind at the forefront of his analysis and says that it is the mind which fashions our actions, the mind which shapes our destiny, the mind which leads us towards misery or happiness.
The beginning point of the teaching is the ordinary mind, in bondage and subject to suffering; the end point is the enlightened mind, completely purified and liberated from suffering.
The whole teaching unfolds between these two points, taking the most direct route.
Self-reliance.
This discussion of the aim of the Buddha's teaching leads us to the teaching's characteristic features.
One of its most attractive features, closely related to its psychological orientation, is its emphasis on self-reliance.
For the Buddha, the key to liberation is mental purity and correct understanding, and for this reason he rejects the notion that we can gain salvation by leaning on any external authority.
He says: “By oneself is evil done, by oneself is one defiled.
By oneself is evil left undone, by oneself is one purified.
Purity and defilement depend on oneself; no one can purify another”.
This stress on human effort, on our capacity to liberate ourselves, is a distinctive feature of early Buddhism and offers a remarkable affirmation of the human potential.
The Buddha does not claim any divine status for himself, nor does he assert that he is an agent of human salvation.
He claims to be, not a personal savior, but a guide and teacher: “You yourselves must strive, the Buddha only points the way.
Those who meditate and practice the path are freed from the bonds of death”.
Throughout his ministry he urged his disciples to “be islands to yourselves, be refuges to yourselves, without looking to any external refuge.” Even on his deathbed he gave his followers this last piece of advice: “All conditioned things are subject to decay.
Attain the goal by diligence.
Experiential Emphasis.
Since wisdom or insight is the chief instrument of enlightenment, the Buddha always asked his disciples to follow him on the basis of their own understanding, not from obedience or unquestioning trust.
He calls his Dhamma ehipassiko, which means “Come and see for yourself.” He invites inquirers to investigate his teaching, to examine it in the light of their own reason and intelligence, and to gain confirmation of its truth for themselves.
The Dhamma is said to be paccattam veditabbo viññuhi, “to be personally understood by the wise,” and this requires intelligence and sustained inquiry.
Once the Buddha arrived at the town of a people called the Kalamas, who had been visited by many other ascetics.
Each visiting teacher would praise his own doctrine to the sky and tear down the views of his rivals, and this left the Kalamas utterly confused.
So when the Buddha arrived they came to him, explained their dilemma, and asked if he could offer some guidance.
The Buddha did not praise his own teaching and attack his rivals.
Rather, he told them:
It is right for you to doubt; doubt has arisen in you about dubious matters.
Come, Kalamas, do not rely on oral tradition, or on the lineage of teachers, or on holy scriptures, or on abstract logic.
Do not place blind trust in impressive personalities or in venerated gurus, but examine the issue for yourselves.
When you know for yourselves that something is unwholesome and harmful, then you should reject it.
And when you know for yourselves that something is wholesome and beneficial, then you should accept it and put it into practice.
Universality.
Because the Buddha's teaching deals with the most universal of all human problems, the problem of suffering, he made his teaching a universal message, one which was addressed to all human beings solely by reason of their humanity.
At the time the Buddha appeared on the Indian scene the higher religious teachings, recorded in the Vedas, were reserved for the brahmans, a privileged elite who performed sacrifices and rituals for others.
Ordinary people were told to perform their duties in a spirit of humility in the hope that they might win a more fortunate rebirth and thus gain access to the sacred teachings.
But the Buddha placed no restrictions on the people to whom he taught the Dhamma.
He held that what made a person noble was his personal character and conduct, not his family and caste status.
Thus he opened the doors of liberation to people of all social classes.
Brahmans, kings and princes, merchants, farmers, workers, even outcasts — all were welcome to hear the Dhamma without discrimination, and many from the lower classes attained the highest stage of enlightenment.
Within the wider Indian society the Buddha did not attempt to abolish the caste system, which, it seems, had not yet developed into the complex, oppressive system it became several centuries later.
However, he flatly rejected the orthodox brahman view that a person's class status was an indication of his intrinsic worth.
Within the Sangha, the monastic order, he completely disregarded all distinctions of social class, declaring,
Just as the waters of the four great rivers flow into the ocean and become known simply as the water of the ocean, so when people of all four social classes go forth as monks in my teaching, they give up their social status and become known simply as disciples of the Buddha.
As part of his universalist project, the Buddha also threw open the doors of his teaching to women.
Among the followers of Brahmanism, sacred teachings were the province of men.
Women were to perform their domestic chores dutifully, to care for their husbands and in-laws, and to bear children, preferably sons.
They were excluded from performing the Vedic rituals and even the teachings of the Upanishads were, with rare exceptions, the prerogative of men.
The Buddha, in contrast, taught the Dhamma freely to both men and women.
At first he hesitated to establish an order of nuns, since this would have been a radical step in his age; but once he agreed to create the order of nuns, women from all walks of life — princesses, housewives, daughters of good family, servant women, even former prostitutes — went forth into homelessness and attained the highest goal.
A Code of Ethics.
One aspect of the Buddha's universalism deserves special mention: this is his conception of a universal code of ethics.
It would be too extreme to say that the Buddha was the first religious teacher to formulate a moral code, for moral codes of different kinds had been laid down from the dawn of civilization.
But it might not be farfetched to say that the Buddha was one of the very first teachers to separate out true moral principles from the complex fabric of social norms and communal customs with which they were generally interwoven.
With astute sophistication of thought, the Buddha provides for us an abstract principle to use as a guideline in determining the basic precepts of morality.
This is the rule of “using oneself as a standard” for deciding how to treat others.
From this abstract principle, he derives the four main precepts of his moral code: to abstain from killing, from stealing, from sexual misconduct, and from lying.
In the interest of personal welfare and communal harmony he adds a fifth: to abstain from intoxicants.
Together, these give us the Five Precepts, the basic moral code of Buddhism.
The Buddha, however, did not regard morality merely as a set of rules based on reasoning.
He taught that there is a universal law which connects our conduct with our personal destinies, ensuring that moral justice ultimately prevails in the world.
This is the law of karma and its fruit, which holds that our intentional actions determine the type of rebirth we take and the diverse experiences we undergo in the course of our lives.
This law is utterly impersonal in its operation.
It gives no one preferential treatment; it recognizes no VIPs or favorites, but works with absolute uniformity towards all.
Those who violate the laws of morality — whether they be high class or low class, rich or poor — acquire unwholesome karma and must suffer the consequences: a bad rebirth and future misery.
Those who adhere to the moral rules, who engage in virtuous conduct, acquire wholesome karma leading to future benefits: a good rebirth, a happy life, and progress on the way to final liberation.
In conformity with the psychological orientation of his teaching, the Buddha gave special attention to the subjective springs of morality.
He traces immoral behavior to three mental factors called the “three unwholesome roots” — greed, hatred, and delusion; and he traces ethical behavior to their opposites, the three wholesome roots — non-greed or generosity, non-hate or kindness, and non-delusion or wisdom.
He also directs us to a more refined interior level of ethical purity to be achieved by developing, in meditation, four lofty attitudes called the “divine abodes”.
These are loving-kindness, the wish for the happiness and welfare of all beings; compassion, the wish that all afflicted with suffering be freed from their suffering; altruistic joy, rejoicing in the happiness and success of others; and equanimity, impartiality of mind.
These four attitudes are to be developed universally, towards all beings without distinctions or discrimination.
Before I close there is one further feature of the Buddha's method that I want to mention.
This is what might be called his “skill in means.” Through his deep meditative attainments and his enlightened wisdom, the Buddha had the special ability to discover the precise way to teach the people who came to him for guidance.
He could read deep into the hidden recesses of a person's heart, perceive that person's aptitudes and interests, and frame his teaching in the exact way needed to transform that person and lead him or her on to the path of freedom.
The texts abound in many examples of this supreme pedagogic skill of the Buddha.
Here I will relate just two famous instances.
The first is the case of Angulimala, a serial killer who lived in the forests of Kosala outside the capital Savatthi.
Angulimala repeatedly attacked travelers, killed them, and cut off their fingers, which he wove into a necklace that he wore around his neck.
He had killed hundreds of people and was feared throughout the kingdom.
He was “wanted dead or alive,” but no one had the courage to pursue him.
The Buddha saw, however, with his supernormal vision, that Angulimala had another side to his character: as terrible as he was, he had the hidden potential to become an arahant, a saint.
Thus one day, all alone, he headed out for the forest where Angulimala was dwelling.
When Angulimala saw him he thought, “Ah, now I will kill this ascetic and cut off his finger for my necklace.” He started to run after him with his knife poised in the air.
But no matter how fast he ran he could not reach him.
For the Buddha, while walking along slowly, had performed a feat of psychic power such that Angulimala, running with all his might, could not catch up with him.
Angulimala ran and ran but could not gain an inch.
He then called out, “Stop, ascetic, stop!” The Buddha replied, “I have stopped, Angulimala, you stop too.
This statement had a deep impact on the criminal, an impact which struck down to the depths of his heart.
He realized that the ascetic before him was the famous teacher, the Enlightened One, and he knew the Buddha had come to him out of compassion, to save him from his terrible deeds.
He threw away his knife, bowed down at the Master's feet, and asked to be accepted as a monk.
The Buddha admitted him into the order and after a short time Angulimala became an arahant, perfectly wise and deeply compassionate.
The second story concerns the woman Kisagotami.
She was a poor woman who had married into a wealthy family, but she did not bear children and was thus scorned by her in-laws.
This made her very miserable.
But after some time she conceived and gave birth to a son, who became for her the source of boundless joy.
Now that she had brought forth an heir to their wealth, everyone else in her husband's family too accepted her.
But a few months after his birth the child died, and Kisagotami became distraught.
She refused to believe the boy was dead, but convinced herself he was only ill.
Thus she went around everywhere asking people to give her medicine for her son.
The townsfolk ridiculed her and abused her, calling her a mad woman, until she finally came into the presence of the Buddha.
When she asked him for medicine, he did not give her an eloquent sermon on impermanence.
He told her that he could indeed make some medicine for her son, but first she would have to bring him one ingredient: mustard seeds from a home where no one had ever died.
Quite optimistic, she went from house to house, asking for mustard seeds.
At each door people readily gave her seeds, but when she asked the donor whether anyone in that home had ever died, she was told, “Here a father has died, here a mother, here a wife, here a husband, a brother, a sister,” and so on.
She thus came to see that death is the universal fate of all living beings, not a unique calamity that befell her own son.
So she returned to the Buddha, aware now of the universal law of impermanence.
When the Master saw her coming he asked her, “Did you bring the mustard seeds, Gotami?” And she replied: “Done, sir, is this business of the mustard seeds.
Grant me a refuge.” The Buddha had her ordained as a nun, and after some time she realized the highest goal and became one of the most eminent nuns in the Bhikkhuni Sangha or Order of Nuns.
To sum up, the Buddha's mission was to establish a path to spiritual perfection, to full enlightenment and Nibbana, liberation from suffering.
He did this by propounding a teaching that acknowledged our capacity for attaining spiritual perfection yet which also remained fully respectful of the intelligence and autonomy of human beings.
His approach was psychological in orientation, non-dogmatic, pragmatic, and open to investigation.
He emphasized self-effort, moral rectitude, and personal responsibility, and he proclaimed his message universally, holding that the potential for spiritual growth and even for the highest enlightenment was accessible to anyone who makes the appropriate effort.
It is these factors that give to the ancient teaching of the Buddha such a distinctly modern flavor, making it so relevant to us in these times of shifting ideas and changing values.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Myanmar, or Burma as the nation has been known throughout history, is one of the major countries following Theravada Buddhism.
In recent years Myanmar has attained special eminence as the host for the Sixth Buddhist Council, held in Yangon between and, and as the source from which two of the major systems of Vipassana meditation have emanated out into the greater world: the tradition springing from the Venerable Mahasi Sayadaw of Thathana Yeiktha and that springing from Sayagyi U Ba Khin of the International Meditation Centre.
This booklet is intended to offer a short history of Buddhism in Myanmar from its origins through the country's loss of independence to Great Britain in the late nineteenth century.
I have not dealt with more recent history as this has already been well documented.
To write an account of the development of a religion in any country is a delicate and demanding undertaking and one will never be quite satisfied with the result.
This booklet does not pretend to be an academic work shedding new light on the subject.
It is designed, rather, to provide the interested non-academic reader with a brief overview of the subject.
The booklet has been written for the Buddhist Publication Society to complete its series of Wheel titles on the history of the Sasana in the main Theravada Buddhist countries.
The material has been sifted and organised from the point of view of a practicing Buddhist.
Inevitably it thus involves some degree of personal interpretation.
I have given importance to sources that would be accorded much less weight in a strictly academic treatment of the subject, as I feel that in this case the oral tradition may well be more reliable than modern historians would normally admit.
One of the objectives of the narrative is to show that the Buddha's Teaching did not make a lasting impression on Myanmar immediately upon first arrival.
The Sasana had to be re-introduced or purified again and again from the outside until Myanmar had matured to the point of becoming one of the main shrines where the Theravada Buddhist teachings are preserved.
The religion did not develop in Myanmar.
Rather, the Myanmar people developed through the religion until the Theravada faith became embedded in their culture and Pali Buddhism became second nature to them.
I dedicate this work to my teachers, Mother Sayamagyi and Sayagyi U Chit Tin.
There are four dominant ethnic groups in the recorded history of Myanmar: the Mon, the Pyu, the Myanmar, and the Shan.
Uncertainty surrounds the origins of the Mon; but it is clear that, at least linguistically, they are related to the Khmer.
What is known is that they settled in the south of Myanmar and Thailand while the Khmer made northern Thailand, Laos, and Cambodia their home.
These two peoples were probably the first migrants to the region, apart from Indian merchants who established trading colonies along the coast.
The Mon with their distinct language and culture competed for centuries with the Myanmar.
However, today their influence and language is limited to remote areas of the south.
The Pyu, like the Myanmar, are a people of Tibeto-Burman origin with a distinct culture and language.
They lived in the area around Prome long before the Myanmar pushed into the plains of Myanmar from the north.
Their language was closely related to the language of the Myanmar and was later absorbed by it.
Their script was in use until about the fourteenth century, but was then lost.
The Myanmar people began to colonise the plains of Myanmar only towards the middle of the first millennium AD.
They came from the mountainous northern regions and may well have originated in the Central Asian plains.
After the Myanmar, the Shan flooded in from the North, finally conquering the entire region of Myanmar and Thailand.
The Thai people are descended from Shan tribes.
The northeast region of modern Myanmar is still inhabited predominantly by Shan tribes.
In the sixth century BC, most of what we now know as Myanmar, Thailand, Laos, and Cambodia was sparsely populated.
While migrants from the east coast of India had formed trading colonies along the coast of the Gulf of Martaban, these coastal areas of Myanmar and Thailand were also home to the Mon.
By this time, the Khmer probably controlled Laos, Cambodia, and northern Thailand, while Upper Myanmar may already have been occupied to some extent by Myanmar tribes.
As these early settlers did not use lasting materials for construction, our knowledge of their civilization remains scant.
We do know, however, that their way of life was very simple — as it remains today in rural areas — probably requiring only wooden huts with palm-leaf roofs for habitation.
We can assume that they were not organised into units larger than village communities and that they did not possess a written language.
Their religion must have been some form of nature worship or animism, still found today among the more remote tribes of the region.
There were also more highly developed communities of Indian origin, in the form of trading settlements located along the entire coast from Bengal to Borneo.
In Myanmar, they were located in Thaton, Pegu, Yangon, and Mrauk-U in Arakan; also probably along the Tenasserim and Arakan coasts.
These settlers had mainly migrated from Orissa on the northeastern coast of the Indian subcontinent, and also from the Deccan in the southeast.
In migrating to these areas, they had also brought their own culture and religion with them.
Initially, the contact between the Hindu traders and the Mon peasants must have been limited.
However, the Indian settlements, their culture and traditions, were eventually absorbed into the Mon culture.
G.E.
Harvey, in his History of Burma, relates a Mon legend which refers to the Mon fighting Hindu strangers who had come back to re-conquer the country that had formerly belonged to them.
This Mon tale confirms the theory that Indian people had formed the first communities in the region but that these were eventually replaced by the Mon with the development of their own civilization.
As well as the Indian trading settlements, there were also some Pyu settlements, particularly in the area of Prome where a flourishing civilization later developed.
Also, it is assumed that some degree of migration from India to the region of Tagaung and Mogok in Upper Myanmar had taken place through Assam and later through Manipur, but the “hinterland” was of course much less attractive to traders than the coastal regions with their easy access by sea.
A tradition of Myanmar says that Tagaung was founded by Abhiraja, a prince of the Sakyans, who had migrated to Upper Myanmar from Nepal in the ninth century BThe city was subsequently conquered by the Chinese in approximately BC, and Pagan and Prome were founded by refugees fleeing southward.
In fact, some historians believe that, like the Myanmar, the Sakyans were a Mongolian rather than an Indo-Aryan race, and that the Buddha's clansmen were derived from Mongolian stock.
The source of information for many of the events related forthwith is the Sasanavamsa.
The Sasanavamsa is a chronicle written in Pali by a bhikkhu, Pannasami, for the Fifth Buddhist Council held in Mandalay in.
As the Sasanavamsa is a recent compilation, many events mentioned therein may be doubted.
However, as it draws on both written records, some of which are no longer available, and on the oral tradition of Myanmar, information can be included in this account with the understanding that it is open to verification.
There are many instances in the history of Southeast Asian tribes in which a conquering people incorporates into its own traditions not only the civilization of the conquered, but also their clan gods, royal lineage, and thereby their history.
This fact would explain the visits of the Buddha to Thaton and Shwesettaw in the Mon and Myanmar oral tradition, and the belief of the Arakanese that the Buddha visited their king and left behind an image of himself for them to worship.
Modern historiography will, of course, dismiss these stories as fabrications made out of national pride, as the Myanmar had not even arrived in the region at the time of the Buddha.
However, it is possible that the Myanmar and Arakanese integrated into their own lore the oral historical tradition of their Indian predecessors.
This does not prove that the visits really took place, but it seems a more palatable explanation of the existence of these accounts than simply putting them down to historical afterthought of a Buddhist people eager to connect itself with the origins of their religion.
The Sasanavamsa mentions several visits of the Buddha to Myanmar and one other important event: the arrival of the hair relics in Ukkala soon after the Buddha's enlightenment.
Tapussa and Bhallika, two merchants from Ukkala, were traveling through the region of Uruvela and were directed to the Buddha by their family god.
The Buddha had just come out of seven weeks of meditation after his awakening and was sitting under a tree feeling the need for food.
Tapussa and Bhallika made an offering of rice cake and honey to the Buddha and took the two refuges, the refuge in the Buddha and the refuge in the Dhamma.
As they were about to depart, they asked the Buddha for an object to worship in his stead and he gave them eight hairs from his head.
After the two returned from their journey, they enshrined the three hairs in a stupa which is now the great Shwedagon Pagoda in Yangon.
It is believed in Myanmar that the hill upon which the Shwedagon Pagoda stands was not haphazardly chosen by Tapussa and Bhallika but was, in fact, the site where the three Buddhas preceding the Buddha Gotama in this world cycle themselves deposited relics.
Buddha Kakusandha is said to have left his staff on the Theinguttara Hill, the Buddha Konagamana his water filter, and Buddha Kassapa a part of his robe.
Because of this, the Buddha requested Tapussa and Bhallika to enshrine his relics in this location.
Tapussa and Bhallika traveled far and wide in order to find the hill on which they could balance a tree without its touching the ground either with the roots or with the crown.
Eventually, they found the exact spot not far from their home in Lower Myanmar where they enshrined the holy relics in a traditional mound or stupa.
The original stupa is said to have been feet high.
Today the Shwedagon pagoda has grown to over feet.
The Myanmar oral tradition speaks of four visits of the Buddha to the region.
While these visits were of utmost significance in their own right, they are also important in having established places of pilgrimage up to the present day.
Punna, a merchant from Sunaparanta, went to Savatthi on business and there heard a discourse of the Buddha.
Having won faith in the Buddha and the Teachings, he took ordination as a bhikkhu.
After sometime, he asked the Buddha to teach him a short lesson so that he could return to Sunaparanta and strive for arahatship.
The Buddha warned him that the people of Sunaparanta were fierce and violent, but Punna replied that he would not allow anger to arise, even if they should kill him.
In the Punnovada Sutta, the Buddha instructed him not to be enticed by that which is pleasant, and Punna returned and attained arahatship in his country.
He won over many disciples and built a monastery of red sandalwood for the Buddha.
He then sent flowers as an invitation to the Buddha and the Buddha came accompanied by five hundred arahats, spent the night in the monastery, and left again before dawn.
Sakka, the king of the thirty-three devas living in the Tavatimsa plane, provided five hundred palanquins for the bhikkhus accompanying the Buddha on the journey to Sunaparanta.
But only of the palanquins were occupied.
One of them remained empty until the ascetic Saccabandha, who lived on the Saccabandha mountain in central Myanmar, joined the Buddha and the bhikkhus accompanying him.
On the way to Sunaparanta, the Buddha stopped in order to teach the ascetic Saccabandha.
When Saccabanda attained arahatship, he then joined the Buddha and completed the total of bhikkhus who usually traveled with the Master.
On the return journey, the Buddha stopped at the river Nammada close to the Saccabandha mountain.
Here, the Blessed One was invited by the Naga king, Nammada, to visit and preach to the Nagas, later accepting food from them.
The tradition of Myanmar relates that he left behind a footprint for veneration near this river, which would last as long as the Sasana.
Another footprint was left in the rock of the Saccabandha mountain.
These footprints, still visible today, were worshipped by the Mon, Pyu, and Myanmar kings alike and have remained among the holiest places of pilgrimage in Myanmar.
In the fifteenth century, after the decimation of the population through the Siamese campaigns, knowledge of the footprints was lost.
Then, in the year, King Thalun sent learned bhikkhus to the region; fortuitously, they were able to relocate the Buddha's footprints.
Since then Shwesettaw, the place where the footprints are found, has once again become an important place of pilgrimage in Myanmar.
And in the dry season thousands of devout Buddhists travel there to pay respects.
Candrasuriya, the king of Dhannavati, on hearing that a Buddha had arisen in India, desired to go there to learn the Dhamma.
The Buddha, aware of his intention, said to Ananda: “The king will have to pass through forests dangerous to travelers; wide rivers will impede his journey; he must cross a sea full of monsters.
It will be an act of charity if we go to his dominion, so that he may pay homage without risking his life.
So the Buddha went there and was received with great pomp by King Candrasuriya and his people.
The Buddha then taught the five and eight precepts and instructed the king in the ten kingly duties, namely, universal beneficence, daily paying homage, the showing of mercy, taxes of not more than a tenth part of the produce, justice, punishment without anger, the support of his subjects as the earth supports them, the employment of prudent commanders, the taking of good counsel, and the avoidance of pride.
The Buddha remained for a week and on preparing for his departure the king requested that he leave an image of himself, so that they could worship him even in his absence.
The Buddha consented to this and Sakka the king of the gods himself formed the image with the metals collected by the king and his people.
It was completed in one week and when the Buddha breathed onto it the people exclaimed that now there were indeed two Buddhas, so alike was the image to the great sage.
Then the Buddha made a prophesy addressing the image: “I shall pass into Nibbana in my eightieth year, but you will live for five thousand years which I have foreseen as the duration of my Teaching.
The Mahamuni image remained in its original location until when King Bodawpaya conquered Arakan and had the image transported to Mandalay where a special shrine, the Arakan pagoda, was built to enshrine the three-meter image.
To have this image in his capital greatly added to his prestige as a Buddhist king, as it was one of the most sacred objects in the region.
The king himself went out of his city to meet the approaching image with great devotion and “through the long colonnades leading to the pagoda, there used to come daily from the Myanmar palace, so long as a king reigned there, sumptuous offerings borne in stately procession, marshalled by a minister and shaded by the white umbrella.
The Third Buddhist Council was held in the reign of Emperor Asoka in the year BC in order to purify the Sangha, to reassert orthodox teaching and to refute heresy.
But the work of the Council did not stop there.
With the support of Emperor Asoka, experienced teachers were sent to border regions in order to spread the teachings of the Buddha.
This dispersal of missionaries is recorded in the Mahavamsa, a Sinhalese chronicle on the history of Buddhism:
According to the Sasanavamsa, the above mentioned regions are the following: Kasmira and Gandhara is the right bank of the Indus river south of Kabul; Mahisamandala is Andhra; Vanavasa is the region around Prome; Aparantaka is west of the upper Irrawaddy; Maharattha is Thailand; Yona, the country of the Shan tribes; and Suvannabhumi is Thaton.
The Sasanavamsa mentions five places in Southeast Asia where Asoka's missionaries taught the Buddha's doctrine, and through their teaching many gained insight and took refuge in the Triple Gem.
There are two interesting features mentioned in the text.
First, in order to ordain nuns, bhikkhunis, other bhikkhunis had to be present, and secondly, the Brahmajala Sutta was preached in Thaton.
The Sasanavamsa goes on to describe sixty thousand women ordaining in Aparanta.
It states that women could not have been ordained without the presence of bhikkhunis, as in Sri Lanka where women could only be ordained after Mahinda's sister Sanghamitta had followed her brother there.
In this case, the author surmises that bhikkhunis must have followed Dhammarakkhita to Aparanta at a later stage.
The Brahmajala Sutta, which the arahats Sona and Uttara preached in Thaton, deals in detail with the different schools of philosophical and religious thought prevalent in India at the time of the Buddha.
The fact that Sona and Uttara chose this Sutta to convert the inhabitants of Suvannabhumi indicates that they were facing a well-informed public, familiar with the views of Brahmanism that were refuted by the Buddha in this discourse.
There can be no doubt that only Indian colonisers, not the Mon, would have been able to follow an analysis of Indian philosophy as profound as the Brahmajala Sutta.
While there is no conclusive archaeological proof that Buddhism continued to be practiced in southern Myanmar after the missions of the Third Council, the Sasanavamsa refers to an unbroken lineage of teachers passing on the Dhamma to their disciples.
In a third century AD inscription by a South Indian king in Nagarjunakonda, the land of the Cilatas is mentioned in a list of countries visited by a group of bhikkhus.
Historians believe the Cilatas or Kiratas to be identical to the Mon populations of Lower Myanmar.
The inscription states that the bhikkhus sent to the Cilata country converted the population there to Buddhism.
In the same inscription, missions to other countries such as Sri Lanka are mentioned.
It is generally believed that most of these countries had received earlier Buddhist missionaries sent by Buddhist kings, but as civilization in these lands was relatively undeveloped, teachings as profound as the Buddha's had probably become distorted by local religions or possibly been completely lost.
It is possible that these missions did not so much re-establish Buddhism, but rather purify the type of Buddhism practiced there.
Southern India was then the guardian of the Theravada faith and obviously remained in contact with countries that had been converted in earlier times but were unable to preserve the purity of the religion.
As has been already mentioned, the first datable archaeological finds of the Mon civilization stem from the Mon kingdom of Dvaravati in the South of Thailand.
They consist of a Roman oil lamp and a bronze statue of the Buddha which are believed to be no later than the first or second century AD.
In discussing the Mon Theravada Buddhist civilization, we cannot remain in Myanmar only.
For only by studying the entire sphere of influence of the Mon in this period, can a comprehensive picture be constructed.
This sphere includes large parts of present day Thailand.
In fact, the Chinese Buddhist pilgrim, Yuan Chwang, who traveled to India in about AD, describes a single Mon country stretching from Prome to Chenla in the east and including the Irrawaddy and Sittang deltas.
He calls the country Dvaravati, but the annals of the court of China of the same period mention Dvaravati as a vassal of Thaton.
We can, therefore, safely conclude that the Mon of the region formed a fairly homogenous group in which the distribution of power was obviously not always evident to the outsider.
Lower Myanmar was also inhabited by another ethnic group, the Pyu, who were probably closely related to the modern Myanmar.
They had their capital at Sri Ksetra and were also followers of the Theravada Buddhist faith.
Chinese travelers' reports of the mid-third century AD refer to the kingdom of Lin-Yang where Buddha was venerated by all and where several thousand monks or bhikkhus lived.
As Lin-Yang was to the west of Kamboja and could not be reached by sea, we can infer that the Chinese travelers must have been referring to the ancient kingdom of Prome.
This is all the more likely as archaeological finds prove that only about one century later Pali Buddhist texts, including Abhidhamma texts, were studied by the Pyu.
The earliest highly developed urban settlement of the Pyu was Beikthano, near Prome.
However, its importance dwindled towards the sixth century, when Sri Ksetra became the center of Pyu civilization.
A major monastery built in the fourth century has been unearthed at Beikthano.
The building, constructed in brick, with a stupa and shrine located nearby, is identical to the Buddhist monasteries of Nagarjunakonda, the great Buddhist center of southern India.
It is situated near a stupa and a shrine, a design which is identical to the one used in South India.
Bricks had been used by the Pyus since the second century AD for the construction of pillared halls, which formed the temples of their original religion.
Interestingly, the Pyu bricks have always been of the exact dimensions as those used at the time of Emperor Asoka in India.
But the brick laying techniques used in the monastery in Beikthano were far inferior to the ones used in their southern Indian counterparts.
For such a major edifice as the monastery at Beikthano to have been constructed, the religion must have been well established at least among the ruling class.
How long it took for Buddhism to become influential in Pyu society is difficult to determine, but some historians assume that the first contacts with Asokan religious centers in India took place in the second century AD.
This would allow for a period of development of two hundred years until the first important shrine was built.
Despite the Indian architectural influence, the inferior brick laying techniques found in Beikthano indicate that indigenous architects and artisans, rather than imported craftsmen or Indian colonisers, were employed in the construction of monasteries and other important buildings.
It should, of course, not be forgotten that the Pyu possessed an architecture of their own and a highly developed urban culture that had evolved quite independently of Indian influences.
Theravada Buddhism found a fertile ground in this highly developed civilization.
It is probable that the Pyu civilization was more advanced than that of the Mon.
The Pyu sites found around Prome are the earliest urban sites in Southeast Asia found to date.
The urban developments and datable monuments in Thailand and Cambodia are only from the seventh century.
Older artifacts may have been found in Thailand, but they were not products of indigenous people and do not prove the existence of a developed civilization.
The information we have of the state of the religion in the Mon and Pyu societies during the first four centuries AD is very limited.
However, by the fifth century, with the development of religious activity in the region, information becomes more substantive.
The historical tradition of Myanmar gives the credit for this religious resurgence to a well-known Buddhist scholar, Acariya Buddhaghosa.
Acariya Buddhaghosa was the greatest commentator on the Pali Buddhist texts, whose Visuddhimagga and commentaries to the canon are regarded as authoritative by Theravada scholars.
The chronicles of Myanmar firmly maintain that Buddhaghosa was of Mon origin and a native of Thaton.
They state that his return from Sri Lanka, with the Pali scriptures, the commentaries, and grammatical works, gave a fresh impetus to the religion.
However, modern historians do not accept that Buddhaghosa was from Myanmar while some even doubt his existence.
Despite this contention, Eliot, in his Hinduism and Buddhism, gives more weight to circumstantial evidence and writes:
The Sinhalese chronicles, especially the Mahavamsa, place Buddhaghosa in the first half of the fifth century.
Although he spent most of his active working life in Sri Lanka, he is also credited with imbuing new life into Theravada Buddhism in South India, and developing such important centers as Kancipura and Uragapuram that were closely connected with Prome and Thaton.
Proof of this connection can be found in archeological finds in the environs of Prome which include Pali literature inscribed in the Kadambe script on gold and stone plates.
This script was used in the fifth and sixth century in southern India.
All in all, Myanmar has a valid case for claiming some connection with Buddhaghosa.
It is, of course, impossible to prove that he was born there or even visited there, but his influence undoubtedly led to great religious activity in the kingdoms of Lower Myanmar.
From the fifth century until the conquest of Lower Myanmar by Pagan, there is a continuous record of Buddhism flourishing in the Mon and Pyu kingdoms.
The Mon kingdoms are mentioned in travel reports of several Chinese Buddhist pilgrims and also in the annals of the Chinese court.
In the fifth century, Thaton and Pegu are mentioned in the Buddhist commentarial literature for the first time.
They were now firmly established on the map as Buddhist centers of learning.
Despite this, Buddhism was not without rivals in the region.
This is shown, by the following event some chronicles of Myanmar mention.
A king of Pago, Tissa by name, had abandoned the worship of the Buddha and instead practiced Brahmanical worship.
He persecuted the Buddhists and destroyed Buddha images or cast them into ditches.
A pious Buddhist girl, the daughter of a merchant, restored the images, then washed and worshipped them.
The king could not tolerate such defiance, of course, and had the girl dragged before him.
He tried to have her executed in several ways, but she seemed impossible to kill.
Elephants would not trample her,while the fire of her pyre would not burn her.
Eventually the king, intrigued by these events, asked the girl to perform a miracle.
He stated that, if she was able to make a Buddha image produce seven new images and then make all eight statues fly into heaven, she would be set free.
The girl spoke an act of truth, and the eight Buddha statues flew up into the sky.
The king was then converted to Buddhism and elevated the girl to the position of chief queen.
Until now, archaeological finds of Mon ruins in Myanmar are meager, but at P'ong Tuk, in southern Thailand, a Mon city, dating from the second half of the first millennium AD, has been unearthed.
Here, excavations have revealed the foundations of several buildings.
One contained the remains of a platform and fragments of columns similar to the Buddhist vihara at Anuradhapura in Sri Lanka; another, with a square foundation of round stones, seems to have been a stupa.
Statues of Indian origin from the Gupta period were also found at the site.
The Theravada Buddhist culture of the Mon flourished in both Dvaravati and Thaton.
However, the Mon civilization in Thailand did not survive the onslaught of the Khmer in the eleventh century who were worshipping Hindu gods.
In Myanmar, the Mon kingdom was conquered by Pagan.
The Myanmar were eager to accept the Mon culture and especially their religion, while the Khmer, as Hindus, at best tolerated it.
The Pyu culture of this period is well documented because of archaeological finds at Muanggan, a small village close to the ancient ruins of Hmawza.
There two perfectly preserved inscribed gold plates were found.
These inscriptions reveal three texts: the verses spoken by Assaji to Sariputta, a list of categories of the Abhidhamma, and the formula of worship of Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
At the same site, a book with twenty leaves of gold protected with golden covers, was discovered.
It contained texts such as the paticca-samuppada, the vipassana-nanas, and various other excerpts from the Abhidhamma and the other two baskets of the Buddhist scriptures.
The scripts in all these documents are identical to scripts used in parts of southern India, and can be dated from the third to the sixth century AD.
In addition to these golden plates, a number of sculptures and reliefs were found in Hmawza.
They depict either the Buddha or scenes from his life, for example, the birth of the Buddha and the taming of the wild elephant Nalagiri.
The sculpture is similar in style to that of Amaravati, a center of Buddhist learning in South India.
There were also unearthed remains of Brahman temples and sites of Mahayana worship of east Indian origin; hence it would appear that several faiths, of which the Theravada was the strongest, co-existed in Sri Ksetra, the then capital of the Pyu.
The script used by the Pyu is indicative of major links with Buddhist kingdoms in South India rather than with Sri Lanka.
And it can be surmised that the bhikkhus of the Deccan and other regions of southern India were the teachers of both the Mon and the Pyu in religious matters as well as in the arts and sciences.
The inscriptions show how highly developed scholarship of the Pali Buddhist texts must have been in Lower Myanmar even in these early days.
Learning had gone well beyond the basics into the world of Abhidhamma studies.
Pali was obviously well known as a language of learning, but unfortunately no original texts composed in Sri Ksetra or Thaton have come down to us.
Interestingly, some of the texts inscribed on these gold plates are not identical to the same canonical texts as they are known today.
Therefore, the Tipitaka known to the Pyu must have been replaced by a version preserved in a country that had no close contact with the Pyu.
This could well have been Sri Lanka, as this country came to play an important role in the history of Buddhism in Myanmar through the friendship between the conqueror of Lower Myanmar, Anawratha, and the king who drove the Hindus from Sri Lanka, Vijayabahu.
The finds on the site of the ancient Pyu capital confirm the reports of the Chinese pilgrims and also the Tang imperial chronicles of China which state: “They dislike taking life.
They know how to make astronomical calculations.
They are Buddhists and have a hundred monasteries, with brick of glass embellished with gold and silver vermilion, gay colours and red kino… At seven years of age the people cut their hair and enter a monastery; if at the age of twenty they have not grasped the doctrine they return to the lay state.
Both Buddhist cultures in the south of Myanmar, the Mon and the Pyu, were swept away in the eleventh century by armies of the Myanmar who had found a unifying force in their leader, the founder of Pagan and champion of Buddhism, Anawratha.
Pagan is believed to have been founded in the years - AD, by the Myanmar, who had already established themselves as rice growers in the region around Kyauksai near Mandalay.
Anawratha began to unite the region by subjugating one chieftain after another and was successful in giving the Myanmar a sense of belonging to a larger community, a nation.
The crucial event in the history of Myanmar is not so much the founding of the city of Pagan and the building of its walls and moat, but more Pagan's acceptance of Theravada Buddhism in the eleventh century.
The religion was brought to the Myanmar by a Mon bhikkhu named Shin Arahan.
The religion prevailing among the Myanmar before and during the early reign of Anawratha was some form of Mahayana Buddhism, which had probably found its way into the region from the Pala kingdom in Bengal.
This is apparent from bronze statues depicting Bodhisattas and especially the “Lokanatha,” a Bodhisatta believed, in Bengal, to reign in the period between the demise of the Buddha Gotama and the advent of the Buddha Metteyya.
Anawratha continued to cast terracotta votive tablets with the image of Lokanatha even after he embraced the Theravada doctrine.
In India, Buddhism had split into numerous schools, some of which differed fundamentally from the teachings of Pali Buddhism, which is also called Theravada Buddhism.
The Ari, the monks or priests of this Mahayana Buddhist form of worship, are described, in later chronicles of Myanmar, as the most shameless bogus ascetics imaginable.
They are said to have sold absolution from sin and to have oppressed the people in various ways with their tyranny.
Their tantric Buddhism included, as an important element, the worship of Nagas, which was probably an ancient indigenous tradition.
At this time, the beginning of the eleventh century, the Buddhist religion among the Mon in Suvannabhumi was on the decline as people were disturbed by robbers and raiders, by plagues, and by adversaries of the religion.
These most probably came from the Hindu Khmer kingdom in Cambodia and the north of Thailand.
The Khmer were endeavoring to add Thaton and the other Mon kingdoms of the south to their expanding empire.
Shin Arahan must have feared that bhikkhus would not be able to continue to maintain their religious practice and the study of the scriptures under these circumstances.
He went, therefore, upcountry where a new, strong people were developing, prosperous and secure from enemies.
It is interesting to note that in this same period, Buddhism was under attack in other places as well.
The Colas, a Hindu dynasty strongly opposed to Buddhism, arose in southern India, one of the last strongholds of Theravada Buddhism.
They were able to expand their rule to include most of Sri Lanka between and.
The great Mon city, Dvaravati, a Theravada center in southern Thailand, fell to the Khmer, the masters of the whole of Thailand, who were Shaivaite Hindus.
In the north of India, Muslim armies were trying to destroy what little was left of Buddhism there.
“In this perilous period,” writes Professor Luce, “Buddhism was saved only by such valiant fighters as Vijayabahu in Sri Lanka and Anawratha.
Shin Arahan arrived in the vicinity of Pagan and was discovered in his forest dwelling by a hunter.
The hunter, who had never before seen such a strange creature with a shaven head and a yellow robe, thought he was some kind of spirit and took him to the king, Anawratha.
Shin Arahan naturally sat down on the throne, as it was the highest seat, and the king thought: “This man is peaceful, in this man there is the essential thing.
He is sitting down on the best seat, surely he must be the best being.” The king asked the visitor to tell him where he came from and was told that he came from the place where the Order lived and that the Buddha was his teacher.
Then Shin Arahan gave the king the teaching on mindfulness, teaching him the same doctrine Nigrodha had given Emperor Asoka when he was converted.
Shin Arahan then told the monarch that the Buddha had passed into Parinibbana, but that his teaching, the Dhamma, enshrined in the Tipitaka, and the twofold Sangha consisting of those who possessed absolute knowledge and those who possessed conventional knowledge, remained.
The king must have felt that he had found what had been missing in his life and a genuine alternative to the superficial teachings of the Ari monks.
He built a monastery for Shin Arahan, and according to some sources, stopped all worship of the Ari monks.
Tradition has it that he had them dressed in white and even forced them to serve as soldiers in his army.
The Ari tradition continued for a long time, however, and its condemnation is a feature of much later times, and not, as far as contemporary evidence shows, of the Pagan era.
The Sasanavamsa gives an alternate version of Anawratha's conversion according to which Shin Arahan had originally come from Sri Lanka to study the Dhamma in Dvaravati and Thaton and was on his way to Sri Ksetra in search of a text when he was taken to Anawratha by a hunter.
The king asked him, “Who are you?” — “O King, I am a disciple of Gotama.” — “Of what kind are the Three Jewels?” — “O King, the Buddha should be regarded as Mahosadha the wise, his doctrine as Ummagga, his order as the Videhan army.
This version is interesting in that Anawratha is portrayed as being a Buddhist with knowledge of Jataka stories, such as the Mahosadha Jataka referred to above, even before meeting Shin Arahan.
This assumption that he was no stranger to Buddhism is supported by the fact that earlier kings had been followers of Buddhism in varying degrees.
Caw Rahan, who died about years before Anawratha's accession, is said to have built a Sima and five Pagodas, and Kyaung Pyu Min built the white monastery outside Pagan.
Kyaung Pyu Min is believed to have been Anawratha's father.
Through Shin Arahan, Anawratha had now found the religion he had been yearning for and he decided to set out and procure the scriptures and holy relics of this religion.
For he wished his kingdom to be secured on the original teachings of the Buddha.
He tried to find the scriptures and relics of his new religion in different quarters.
In his enthusiasm he did not limit his quest to Thaton, but also searched among the Khmer in Angkor, and in Tali, the capital of the Nanchao, a kingdom in modern day Yunnan, in China, where a tooth of the Buddha was enshrined.
But everywhere he was refused.
He then went to Thaton, where his teacher Shin Arahan had come from, to request a copy of the scriptures.
According to the tradition of Myanmar, Anawratha's request was refused, and unable to endure another refusal he set out with his army in the year to conquer Thaton and acquire the Tipitaka by force.
Before conquering Thaton, however, he had to subjugate Sri Ksetra, the Pyu capital.
From there, he took the relics enshrined in King Dwattabaung's Bawbaw-gyi Pagoda to Pagan.
Some think that the aim of his campaign was mainly to add the prosperous Indian colonies of Lower Myanmar to his possessions, while others think he may have actually been called to Thaton to defend it against the marauding Khmer.
Whatever the immediate cause of his campaign in the lower country, we know for certain that he returned with the king of Thaton and his court, with Mon artists and scholars and, above all, with Thaton's bhikkhus and their holy books, the Tipitaka.
Suvannabhumi and its Mon population were now in the hands of the Myanmar and the Mon culture and religion were accepted and assimilated in the emergent Pagan with fervor.
Initially the fervor must have been restricted to the king and possibly his immediate entourage, yet even they continued to propitiate their traditional gods for worldly gain as the new religion was considered a higher practice.
Theravada Buddhism does not provide much in the way of rites and rituals, but a royal court cannot do without them.
So the traditional propitiation of the Nagas continued to be used for court ceremonials and remained part of the popular religion, while the bhikkhus were accorded the greatest respect and their master, the Buddha Gotama, was honored with the erection of pagodas and shrines.
There were contacts between the new kings of Myanmar and Sri Lanka that are recorded not only in the chronicles of the two countries but also in stone inscriptions in South India.
As the Hindu Colas had ruled Sri Lanka for more than half a century, Buddhism had been weakened and King Vijayabahu, who had driven out the Vaishnavite Colas, wanted to re-establish his religion.
So in, he requested King Anawratha of Myanmar, who had assisted him financially in his war against the Colas, to send bhikkhus to re-introduce the pure ordination into his country.
It is interesting to note that the Culavamsa refers to Anawratha as the king of Ramanna, which was Lower Myanmar, also called Suvannabhumi.
He was approached as the conqueror and master of Thaton, a respected Theravada center, rather than as the king of Pagan, a new and unknown country.
The bhikkhus who traveled to Sri Lanka brought the Sinhalese Tipitaka back with them and established a link between the two countries which was to last for centuries.
Anawratha is mentioned in the Myanmar, Mon, Khmer, Thai, and Sinhalese chronicles as a great champion of Buddhism because he developed Pagan into a major regional power and laid the foundation for its glory.
He did not, however, build many of the temples for which Pagan is now so famous as the great age of temple building started only after his reign.
It is important to realize that his interest was not restricted only to Pagan.
He built pagodas wherever his campaigns took him and adorned them with illustrations from the Jatakas and the life of the Buddha.
Some maintain that he used only Jatakas as themes for the adornment of his religious buildings because that was all he possessed of the Tipitaka.
Such a conclusion is negative and quite superficial.
After all, during Asoka's time Jatakas and scenes from the life of the Buddha were used for illustrations in Bharut and Sanchi, the great stupas near Bombay.
We cannot therefore deduce that the builders of Bharut and Sanchi were acquainted only with the Jatakas.
These edifying stories which teach the fundamentals of Buddhism so skillfully are singularly suited to educate an illiterate people beset by superstitions through the vivid visual means of the stone reliefs depicting these stories.
It is almost unthinkable that the Mon Sangha, who taught Anawratha, had no knowledge of at least all of the Vinaya.
Otherwise, they would not have been able to re-establish a valid ordination of bhikkhus in Sri Lanka.
Anawratha left behind innumerable clay tablets adorned with images of the Buddha, the king's name, and some Pali and Sanskrit verses.
A typical aspiration on these tablets was: “By me, King Anawratha, this mould of Sugata has been made.
Through this may I obtain the path to Nibbana when Metteyya is awakened.” Anawratha aspired to become a disciple of the Buddha Metteyya, unlike many later kings of Myanmar who aspired to Buddhahood.
Is this an indication that this warrior had remained a modest man in spite of his empire building?
Anawratha was succeeded by a number of kings of varying significance to Buddhism in Myanmar.
His successors inherited a relatively stable and prosperous kingdom and consequently were able to embark on the huge temple building projects for which their reigns are still remembered.
This is the time when kings such as Kyanzitta and others built pagodas, libraries, monasteries, and ordination halls.
These kings must have possessed coffers full of riches collected from their extensive kingdom which they lavished on the religion of the Buddha.
Their palaces were probably built of wood as was the last palace of the Myanmar dynasty.
Though the palaces must have reflected the wealth and power of the rulers, the more durable brick was not deemed necessary for such worldly buildings.
This is similar to views still found in rural areas of Myanmar today.
The only structure adorned to any extent in a village is the monastery and the buildings attached to it, such as the rest house.
The villagers are very modest with regard to their private houses and even consider it improper to decorate them.
Their monastery, however, is given every decoration affordable.
Kyanzitta, who had been Anawratha's commander-in-chief and had succeeded Anawratha's son to the throne, consolidated Theravada Buddhism's predominance in Pagan.
In his reign, such important shrines as the Shwezigon Pagoda, the Nanda, Nagayon, and Myinkaba Kubyauk-gyi temples were built.
With the three latter temples, Kyanzitta introduced a new style of religious building.
The traditional stupa or dagoba found in India and Sri Lanka is a solid mound in which relics or other holy objects are enshrined.
The area of worship is situated around them and is usually marked by ornate stone railings.
In the new style of building, however, the solid mound had been hollowed out and could be entered.
The central shrine was surrounded by halls which housed stone reliefs depicting scenes from the Buddha's life and Jataka stories.
Kyanzitta's aim was the conversion of his people to the new faith.
Whereas Anawratha had been busy expanding his empire and bringing relics and the holy scriptures to Pagan, Kyanzitta's mission was to consolidate this enterprise.
Enormous religious structures such as the Nanda Temple attracted the populace and the interiors of the temples allowed the bhikkhus to instruct the inquisitive in the king's faith.
Professor Luce writes:
Kyanzitta's efforts for the advancement of Buddhism were not limited to his own country.
For in one of his many inscriptions, he also mentions that he sent craftsmen to Bodhgaya to repair the Mahabodhi temple, which had been destroyed by a foreign king.
The upkeep of the Mahabodhi temple became a tradition with the kings of Myanmar, who continued to send missions to Bodhgaya to repair the temple and also to donate temple slaves and land to the holiest shrine of Buddhism.
Kyanzitta also initiated an extensive review and purification of the Tipitaka by the bhikkhus.
This was the first occasion in Myanmar's history when the task of a Buddhist Sangayana or Synod, comparing the Sinhalese and Suvannabhumi's Tipitaka, was undertaken.
It is possible and even probable that this huge editing work was carried out along with visiting Sinhalese bhikkhus.
By nature of Myanmar's geographical position, external influences swept in predominantly from northern India, and therefore tantric Buddhism, dominant especially in Bengal, remained strong.
However, Kyanzitta succeeded in firmly establishing the Pali Tipitaka by asking the bhikkhus to compare the ancient Mon Tipitaka with the texts obtained from the Mahavihara in Sri Lanka.
In this way, he also made it clear that confirmation of orthodoxy was to be sought in Sri Lanka and not in any other Buddhist country.
Though Mahayana practices were tolerated in his reign, they were not officially regarded as the pure religion.
It is characteristic of Pagan that these two branches of Buddhism co-existed — the religion of the Theras, which was accepted as the highest religion — and the tantric practices, which included the worship of spirits or nats and gave more immediate satisfaction.
Pagodas are often adorned with figures of all types of deities, but the deities are normally shown in an attitude of reverence towards the pagoda, a symbol of the Buddha.
The ancient gods were not banished, but had to submit to the peerless Buddha.
Tradition attributes to King Anawratha the observation: “Men will not come for the sake of the new faith.
Let them come for their old gods, and gradually they will be won over.
An approach such as this, whether it was Anawratha's or Kyanzitta's, would suggest that the practice of the old religion of the Ari monks was allowed to continue and that the conversion of the country was gentle and peaceful as befits the religion of the Buddha.
Although later Myanmar chronicles refer to the Ari monks as a debased group of charlatans who were totally rooted out by Anawratha, this is far from the truth.
A powerful movement of “priests” who incorporated magic practices in their teachings continued to exist throughout the Pagan period, and though they may have respected the basic rules of the Vinaya and donned the yellow robe, their support was rooted in the old animistic beliefs of the Myanmar.
It should not be forgotten that the Myanmar first started to settle in the area of Kyauksai in the sixth century AD and that the “man in the field” was in no way ready for such highly developed a religion as Theravada Buddhism.
The transition had to be gradual, and the process that started remains still incomplete in the minds of many people, especially in the more remote areas of the hill country.
The example of Kyanzitta's son Rajakumar, however, shows how even in those early days the teachings of the Buddha were understood and practiced not only by the bhikkhus, but also by lay people and members of the royal court.
Rajakumar's conduct is proof of his father's ability to establish men in the Dhamma and survives as a monument just as the Ananda temple does.
Rajakumar was Kyanzitta's only son and his rightful heir.
Due to political misadventures Kyanzitta was separated from his wife and therefore not aware of the birth of his son for seven years.
When his daughter gave birth to his grandson he anointed him as future king immediately after his birth.
Rajakumar grew up in the shadow of his nephew, the crown prince, but neither during his father's reign nor after his death did he ever try to usurp the throne through intrigue or by force.
He was a minister zealous in the affairs of state, prudent and wise.
He was also a scholar of the Tipitaka and instrumental in its review, vigorously supporting his father in his objective to establish Buddhism.
But he is best known for his devotion to his father in his last years when his health was failing.
In order to restore the king's health he built five pagodas which to this day are called Min-o-Chanda, “The Welfare of the Old King.” When the king was on his deathbed:
Rajakumar's nephew was King Alaungsithu, who continued the tradition of his dynasty of glorifying the Buddha's religion by building a vast temple, the Sabbannu Temple, probably the largest monument in Pagan.
During his many travels and campaigns, he built pagodas and temples throughout Myanmar.
The faith that Shin Arahan had inspired in Anawratha and his successors continued to inspire Alaungsithu.
Shin Arahan, who had seen kings come and go and the flowering of the religion he brought to Pagan, is believed to have died during the reign of King Alaungsithu, in about.
After the death of Alaungsithu, Pagan was thrown into turmoil by violent struggles for the throne.
Several kings reigned for short periods and spent most of their time and resources in power struggles.
One even succeeded in alienating the great king of Sri Lanka, Parakramabahu, by mistreating his emissaries and breaking the agreements between the two countries.
Eventually Parakramabahu invaded Myanmar, devastating towns and villages and killing the king.
The new king, Narapati, blessed the country with a period of peace and prosperity.
This conducive atmosphere was to allow outstanding scholarship and learning to arise in Pagan.
Kyawswa was a king under whom scholarship was encouraged even more, undoubtedly because the king himself spent most of his time in scholarly pursuits including memorizing passages of the Tipitaka.
He had relinquished most of his worldly duties to his son in order to dedicate more time to the study of the scriptures.
Two grammatical works, the Saddabindu and the Paramatthabindu, are ascribed to him.
It would appear that his palace was a place of great culture and learning as his ministers and his daughter are credited with scholarly works as well.
During the twelfth century, a sect of forest dwellers also thrived.
They were called arannaka in Pali and were identical with the previously mentioned Ari of the later chroniclers of Myanmar.
This was a monastic movement that only used the yellow robes and the respect due to them in order to follow their own ideas.
They indulged in business transactions and owned vast stretches of land.
They gave feasts and indulged in the consumption of liquor, and, though they pretended to be practicing the teachings of the Buddha, their practices were probably of a tantric nature.
It would appear that they had a considerable amount of influence at the royal court and one of the main exponents of the movement was even given the title of royal teacher.
Superstition and magic were gaining dominance once again and Anawratha's and Kyanzitta's empire was slowly sliding into decadence.
The last king of Pagan, Narathihapate, whom the Myanmar know by the name Tayoupyemin, repeatedly refused to pay symbolic tribute to the Mongol emperors in Peking who in had conquered neighbouring Yunnan.
He even went so far as to execute ambassadors of the Chinese emperor and their retinue for their lack of deference to the king.
He became so bold and blinded by ignorance that he attacked a vassal state of the Mongols.
The emperor in Peking was finally forced to send a punitive expedition which defeated the Pagan army north of Pagan.
The news of this defeat caused the king and his court to flee to Pathein.
As the imperial court in Peking was not interested in adding Pagan to its possessions, the Yunnan expedition did not remain in the environs.
When the king was later murdered and the whole empire fell into disarray, the Yunnani generals returned, looting Pagan.
The territories were divided amongst Shan chiefs who paid tribute to the Mongols.
G.E.
Harvey honors the kings of Pagan with the following words:
The contact with Sri Lanka was very important for the growth of the religion in Pagan.
As was shown previously, it started with the friendship of Anawratha and Vijayabahu, both of whom fought for Buddhism: Anawratha to establish a new kingdom, Vijayabahu to wrench an old one from the clutches of the Hindu invaders.
They supported each other in their struggles and then together re-established the Theravada doctrine in their respective countries, Anawratha sending bhikkhus to Sri Lanka to revive the Sangha, while Vijayabahu reciprocated by sending the sacred texts.
The continued contact between the two countries was beneficial to both: many a reform movement, purifying the religion in one country spread to the other as well.
Bhikkhus visiting from one country were led to look at their own traditions critically and to reappraise their practice of the Dhamma as preserved in the Pali texts.
After the fall of the main Buddhist centers in southern India, centers which had been the main allies of the Mon Theravadins in the south, Sri Lanka was the only ally in the struggle for the survival of the Theravada tradition.
Leading bhikkhus of Pagan undertook the long and difficult journey to Sri Lanka in order to visit the holy temples and study the scriptures as they had been preserved by the Sinhalese Sangha.
Shin Arahan's successor as the king's teacher left the royal court for Sri Lanka, returning to Pagan only to die.
He was succeeded by a Mon bhikkhu, Uttarajiva, who led a pilgrimage to Sri Lanka in.
This was to cause the first upheaval in the Sangha of Pagan.
Uttarajiva traveled to Sri Lanka accompanied by Chapada, a novice who remained behind on the island in order to study the scriptures in the Mahavihara, the orthodox monastery of Sri Lanka and the guardian of the Theravada tradition.
After ten years, he returned to Pagan accompanied by four elders who had studied with him.
The Kalyani inscription, written about three hundred years later, relates that Chapada considered the tradition of the Myanmar bhikkhus impure.
He had consequently taken four bhikkhus with him because he needed a chapter of at least five theras in order to ordain new bhikkhus.
It is possible that the Myanmar bhikkhus, who seemed to have formed a group separate from the Mon bhikkhus, had paid more attention to their traditional worship than was beneficial for their practice of the Dhamma.
It is also possible that there was an element of nationalist rivalry between the Mon bhikkhus and the Myanmar bhikkhus.
As he showed a penchant for the reform movement, the Myanmar king Narapati seems to have accepted the superiority of the Mon bhikkhus, though he did not neglect the other bhikkhus.
Chapada and his companions refused to accept the ordination of the Myanmar bhikkhus as legitimate in accordance with Vinaya.
They established their own ordination, following which the Myanmar bhikkhus sent a delegation to Sri Lanka to receive the Mahavihara ordination for themselves.
After Chapada's death, the reform movement soon split into two factions, and eventually each of the four remaining bhikkhus went his own way, one of them leaving the order altogether.
“Thus in the town of Arimaddana there were four schools… Because the first of these to come was the school of the Elder Arahan from Sudhamma it was called the first school; while the others, because they came later, were called the later schools.
It is surprising how quickly a relatively simple people absorbed the great civilization that arrived in their midst so suddenly.
Even before the conquest of Thaton, Pagan possessed some ornate religious buildings, which is indicative of the presence of artists and craftsmen.
It is quite likely, however, that these were Indians from Bengal and the neighbouring states.
The type of Buddhism that had come to Pagan from India was an esoteric religion, as some old legends indicate.
It was the jealously guarded domain of a group of priests, who made no attempt to instruct the people but were happy if their superiority remained unquestioned by a superstitious populace.
The advent of Theravada Buddhism with its openness and its aim to spread understanding must have been quite revolutionary in Pagan and obviously the people were eager to acquire the knowledge offered to them by the bhikkhus.
Mabel Bode says in her Pali Literature of Burma:
The principal works of the Pagan period still extant are Pali grammars.
The most famous of these is the Saddaniti, which Aggavamsa completed in.
Uttarajiva gave a copy of this work to the bhikkhus of the Mahavihara in Sri Lanka and it “was received with enthusiastic admiration, and declared superior to any work of the kind written by Sinhalese scholars.” The Saddaniti is still used to teach grammar in the monasteries in Myanmar and has been printed many times.
B.Law regards it as one of the three principal Pali grammars along with the grammars by Kaccayana and Moggallana.
K.R.
Norman says: “The greatest of extant Pali grammars is the Saddaniti, written by Aggavamsa from Arimaddana in Burma…” Aggavamsa was also known as the teacher of King Narapatisithu and was given the title Aggapandita.
Unfortunately, no other works by this author are known today.
The second famous author of Pagan was Saddhammajotipala who has been previously mentioned under his clan name of Chapada.
He was a disciple of Uttarajiva and is credited with a great number of works, but in the case of some it is doubtful whether he actually composed them himself or merely introduced them from Sri Lanka.
His works deal not only with grammar, but also with questions of monastic discipline and the Abhidhamma, which in later centuries was to become a favorite subject of Myanmar scholars.
His work on Kaccayana's grammar, the Suttaniddesa, formed the foundation of his fame.
However, his specialty would appear to have been the study of Abhidhamma, as no less than four noted works of his on the subject attained fame: Samkhepavannana, Namacaradipani, Matikatthadipani, and Patthanagananaya.
According to the Pitaka-thamain, a history of Buddhism in Myanmar, he also devoted a commentary to the Visuddhimagga by Buddhaghosa called the Visuddhimagga-ganthi.
There are no written records that refer to meditation being practiced in Myanmar before this century.
However, his interest in the Visuddhimagga is indicative of an interest in meditation, if only in the theory rather than in the practice.
Another scholar of Pagan, Vimalabuddhi, also wrote a commentary concerning Abhidhamma, the Abhidhammatthasangahatika, in addition to another important grammatical work, the Nyasa, a commentary on Kaccayana's grammar.
Other grammatical works of some importance were written, but none acquired the standing of Aggavamsa's Saddaniti.
However, a rather peculiar work worth mentioning is the Ekakkharakosa by Saddhammakitti.
It is a work on Pali lexicography enumerating words of one letter.
After Narathihapate had fled Pagan in fear of the Mongol army, he was never able to re-establish his authority, even though the Mongols supported the Pagan dynasty.
The Mongol court in Peking preferred a united neighbouring country under a single ruler, but in spite of its efforts Myanmar was divided into several principalities mainly under Shan tribal leaders.
These self-styled princelings paid tribute to the Chinese Mongol court and were nominally its subjects.
The Shan, at this time still nomadic tribes in the north, broke into an already destabilized Myanmar like a tidal wave.
They penetrated the entire region as far as the Mon country and established themselves as rulers in many towns and cities.
The intrigues, fratricidal wars, and murders that make up the history of their courts are innumerable.
A division of the country into Upper and Lower Myanmar is somewhat arbitrary, as, after the fall of Pagan, the two regions were composed of many competing principalities.
However, there were the two principle kingdoms of Ava in Upper Myanmar and Pago in Lower Myanmar.
Hostilities between these two prevailed, as well as with the neighbouring smaller states including the Shan fiefs of Chiang Mai and Ayutthaya in Thailand.
Intrigues within and between courts were rife.
Sometimes these claimed victims only within the circle of the powerful and mighty, and sometimes whole towns were looted and destroyed, and their population massacred or carried off into slavery.
But, in spite of politically unsettled conditions, the Sangha survived, because the new rulers, initially somewhat barbaric, soon accepted the religion of their subjects.
Just as the Myanmar had adopted the religion and culture of the more refined Mon, so the Shan submitted to the sophisticated civilization of the peoples they subjugated.
The Shan initially established their capital at Pinya in Upper Myanmar to the north of Pagan and transferred it to Ava in.
Ava was to remain the capital of Upper Myanmar until the eighteenth century.
The Sasanavamsa praises Thihathu, the youngest of three Shan brothers who wrested power from the Pagan dynasty in Upper Myanmar, as a Buddhist king who built monasteries and pagodas.
He had a bhikkhu as his teacher and supported thousands of bhikkhus in his capital Pinya and later Ava.
However, Pagan remained the cultural and religious capital of the region for the whole of the fourteenth century.
Scholarly works were composed in its monasteries throughout this period whereas no such works are known to have been written in the new centers of power.
The works of this period of scholarship were mostly concerned with Pali grammar.
Two generations later, a descendant of Thihathu secured himself a place in religious history as a great patron of scholarship.
As in the courts of some previous kings, his court was also devoted to scholarly learning; and not only bhikkhus, but also the palace officials, produced treatises on religious subjects and the Pali language.
Although the political situation remained unsettled in Upper Myanmar throughout the fifteenth century, in the main, this affected only those in power and their usurpers.
Consequently the Sangha appears to have flourished, while the traditional devotion to the support of the Sangha through gifts of the four requisites remained unchanged.
The royal court, followed by the leading families, made great donations of monasteries, land, and revenue to the bhikkhus.
In approximately, two Mahatheras from Sri Lanka settled in Ava.
Here they joined a group of famous scholars, of whom Ariyavamsa was the most outstanding.
The Sasanavamsa tells us of his great wisdom and humility in an anecdote.
The elder Ariyavamsa had studied the books of the Abhidhamma Pitaka, but felt he had not gained real understanding.
Eventually he came to a bhikkhu in Sagaing who kept his mouth always filled with water in order not to have to engage in meaningless chatter.
Ariyavamsa did not talk to “the Elder Water-bearer,” as this bhikkhu was known in the Myanmar language, but simply performed the duties of a disciple to his teacher for two days.
On the third day, the Venerable Water-bearer spat out the water and asked Ariyavamsa why he was serving him.
When Ariyavamsa told him that he wanted to learn from him, the Venerable Water-bearer taught him the Abhidhammattha-vibhavani-tika, a subcommentary on the Abhidhammattha-sangaha.
After two days, Ariyavamsa grasped the meaning and his teacher asked him to write a commentary on this book in order to help others to gain understanding.
During the composition of his first work, Ariyavamsa submitted his writings to the assembled bhikkhus on every Uposatha day, reading out what he had composed and asking his brethren to correct any mistakes they found.
On one occasion, a visiting bhikkhu twice made a sound of disapproval during the reading.
Ariyavamsa carefully noted the passages where the sound of disapproval had occurred.
On reflecting on them in the evening, he found one error of grammar where he had used the wrong gender and also a repetition, an error of style.
He approached the bhikkhu who had made the sounds during the reading and out of gratitude for the correction gave him his own outer robe.
Ariyavamsa composed several works in Pali: works on the Abhidhamma, on grammatical subjects, and a study of the Jatakas.
But his very important contribution to Buddhism in Myanmar was the fact that all his writing was in the Myanmar vernacular.
He was probably the first bhikkhu to write treatises on religious subjects in the local idiom, thus making the religion accessible to a greater number of people.
The work by Ariyavamsa still known today is a commentary on the anutika of the Abhidhamma.
Towards the end of the fifteenth century, a bhikkhu by the name of Silavamsa composed several epic poems in Pali.
They were, of course, of a religious nature dealing with subjects such as the life of the Buddha, or Jataka stories.
This genre was later very popular in the Myanmar language and there are many poems relating Jataka stories which were sung by bards throughout the country until recently.
In the Sasanavamsa, however, Pannasami disapproves of bhikkhus writing or reciting poetry as he considers it to be in breach of the Vinaya rules.
He says that because of this, Silavamsa's name was excluded from the Theraparampara, a listing of eminent bhikkhus of Myanmar by ancient chroniclers.
The Mon civilization in Lower Myanmar flourished after Pagan's importance waned, once again reliving the era of glory that it had experienced prior to Anawratha's conquest.
Wareru, the Shan ruler who had established himself in Martaban in, was soon converted to Buddhism.
He was a Shan peddler who had astutely wrested power from a son of the last king of Pagan, a son who had revolted against his father and founded an independent kingdom.
Under Wareru's rule, scholarship in the Mon monasteries flourished and a code of law was compiled which still forms the foundation of the legal literature of Myanmar.
The Mon bhikkhus based this code on ancient Hindu codes of law which had found their way into Mon tradition through Indian colonisers and merchants.
At the beginning of the fourteenth century two respected Mon theras named Buddhavamsa and Mahanaga revived the tradition of their countryman Chapada in making a pilgrimage to Sri Lanka.
There, they accepted new ordination in the Mahavihara monastery, the guardian of Sinhalese orthodoxy.
The bhikkhus of the Mahavihara asked those ordained in other countries to revert to the lay-state before being re-ordained as novices and full bhikkhus, as it was considered of the utmost importance that the ordination be handed down in an unbroken tradition from the time of the Buddha.
This was especially significant in Myanmar where there were some reservations about the continuity of the tradition.
By disrobing, a bhikkhu forgoes the seniority he has acquired through the years spent in robes and, in this case, he also states that he considers his former ordination invalid.
One can imagine that such a step is not taken lightly but only after careful consideration.
King Dhammazedi takes a special place in the history of the religion in Myanmar.
He unified the Sangha in the Mon country and purified the order of the bhikkhus.
He recorded his great service to the country in the Kalyani inscription, which will be quoted below.
Dhammazedi was a bhikkhu of Mon origin who taught one of the queens at the royal palace in Ava.
This lady, Shin Sawbu, was the daughter of the king of Pago.
She had been queen to several unfortunate kings of Upper Mynamar and had beeen conveyed into the hands of the subsequent kings along with the throne.
She had become disenchanted with the life of a queen and desired to return to her native land.
Dhammazedi and a fellow Mon bhikkhu helped her to escape and brought her back to Pago.
Eventually she became queen of Pago, but after reigning only a few years she wished to retire and do works of merit.
She found that the only people worthy of the throne of Pago were her teachers, the two bhikkhus.
She let fate decide which would be the future king by concealing miniature imitations of the regalia in one of the two bowls in which she offered them their daily alms food.
She handed the throne over to Dhammazedi who had received the fateful bowl and spent the rest of her life at Dagon building the terrace around the Shwedagon Pagoda and gilding the sacred mound.
The Shwedagon became what it is today chiefly thanks to Shin Sawbu's munificence.
Dhammazedi assumed government in Pago after leaving the Order of the bhikkhus.
He moved the capital closer to the Swemawdaw Pagoda and built several pagodas and shrines.
His name is also connected with a collection of wise judgments and the translation of Wareru's Code of Law into the vernacular.
In, Dhammazedi sent a mission to Bodhgaya to repair the temple and make plans and drawings of it.
Dhammazedi had received his education in monasteries of Ava which adhered to the Sihala Sangha.
The Sihala Sangha was the faction of the Sangha of Myanmar that accepted only the Mahavihara of Sri Lanka as the ultimate authority in religious questions.
King Dhammazedi knew from direct experience the state of the Sangha in Lower Myanmar and was determined to improve it.
Having lived as a bhikkhu for so many years, he was also singularly qualified to change the Sangha for the better.
He chose twenty-two senior bhikkhus to lead the reform movement and informed them:
At the beginning of the chosen bhikkhus with their twenty-two disciples embarked on the journey to Sri Lanka.
They sailed in two ships, one taking about two months while the other needed six full months to arrive on the shore of the Buddhist island.
They received the upasampada ordination at the Mahavihara from th to th July.
The return journey of the forty-four Mon bhikkhus was not so smooth, however.
One group arrived home in August, while the other group took three years to return to Pago and ten of the bhikkhus died en route.
Following their return, Dhammazedi had a pure ordination hall consecrated and made the following proclamation:
In order to confer the bhikkhu ordination outside the middle country, a chapter of five bhikkhus is needed, one of whom must be qualified to serve as preceptor and another as teacher.
The latter two must have spent at least ten years in robes as fully ordained bhikkhus.
So if Dhammazedi wanted to have local bhikkhus ordained in the new ordination, it was necessary to find two senior bhikkhus.
Since those returning from Sri Lanka had been ordained for a period of only three years, they could not act as preceptor or teacher.
Local bhikkhus who had not received the ordination of the Mahavihara in Sri Lanka were unacceptable, as otherwise the ordination would again have been invalidated by one who was not of pure descent.
Fortunately, the two theras who had undertaken a pilgrimage to Sri Lanka at the beginning of the century and had received the Sinhalese ordination at that time, were still alive.
As a result, one was able to act as preceptor and the other as teacher of the newly ordained bhikkhus.
The stage was now set for the reformation and unification of the Mon Order of bhikkhus and soon the re-ordination of almost the entire Order of bhikkhus began.
The Kalyani inscription records the number of, ordinations in hundreds of ordination halls newly constructed for the purpose.
It is interesting to note how forcefully the king reformed the Order through royal decrees that would hardly be tolerated today.
He declared that all bhikkhus who were, for example, practicing medicine or other arts and crafts or who even slightly infringed on the Vinaya rules would be expelled.
The king as a layman, however, did not have the power to defrock a bhikkhu who had not broken one of the four Parajika rules.
Dhammazedi circumvented this by threatening to punish with royal penalties the mother, father, relatives, and lay supporters of bhikkhus whose behavior was not in accordance with the rules of the Vinaya.
It goes without saying that a king who could allow himself to take such drastic measures in regard to the Sangha must have had the support of a broad section of the Order and also the people.
After years spent in robes, he was keenly aware of the problems of monastic life and because of this even senior bhikkhus respected and accepted his council.
We can assume that all his actions to reform the Order were firstly discussed with his bhikkhu teachers and then implemented with their blessings.
There being no such thing as a Buddhist Church with a central authority, the Sangha has little possibility to regulate itself.
Only the committed support of a worldly power can protect the Order of bhikkhus from those who take advantage of the respect that is given to the yellow robe.
Dhammazedi's support for the religion was so great that his fame spread well beyond the borders of Myanmar and bhikkhus from neighbouring countries such as Thailand came to his realm to receive ordination there.
Though the reform movement did not spread to Upper Myanmar and cause the same mass ordinations there, it did not remain without influence in the kingdom of Ava and other principalities, and many bhikkhus came to the Mon bhikkhus to receive the Kalyani ordination.
The beginning of the sixteenth century was one of the most difficult periods for Buddhism in Upper Myanmar.
While the religious fervor of Dhammazedi still lived on in the kingdom of Pago in Ava, Shan rulers were endeavoring to bring about the destruction of the Sangha.
A Shan king named Thohanbwa was particularly well-known for his barbarity.
He destroyed pagodas and monasteries and robbed their treasures.
Although he was a king, he was uneducated and ignorant.
Hence fearing the influence of the bhikkhus and suspicious of their moves, he brought about the massacre of thousands.
Under these terror regimes of the Shan rulers the Myanmar did not feel safe.
Many, including learned bhikkhus, fled to Toungoo, the stronghold of the Myanmar race in the south.
Despite the anarchy prevailing, some respected treatises on Pali grammar were written in Upper Myanmar in these years.
Better times, however, lay ahead for Buddhism in the Golden Land.
Two successive kings of Myanmar origin from Toungoo would unite the country and fulfill the duties of Buddhist kings.
The wars fought by these two kings, King Tabinshwehti and King Bayinnaung, were long in duration and exceedingly cruel.
They succeeded in gaining control of the Mon kingdom in Lower Myanmar and the kingdom of Ava.
They conquered all of what is today Myanmar including the Shan states as far east as Chiang Mai, and made incursions into lower Thailand and Yunnan where some kings paid tribute to the Myanmar court.
Bayinnaung deferred to the Mon as far as culture and religion were concerned and dressed in Mon style.
Under his royal patronage, the Mon Sangha produced scholarly works on grammar and the Abhidhamma and also helped with the collection and standardisation of a code of law based on the old Mon code compiled during Wareru's reign.
Bayinnaung not only unified the country politically, but also made Buddhist principles the standard for his entire dominion.
He forbade the sacrificial slaughter of animals, a custom still practiced by the Shan chiefs, the worshippers of certain spirits, and the followers of some other religions.
He built pagodas and monasteries in all the newly conquered lands and installed learned bhikkhus in order to convert the often uncivilized inhabitants to gentler ways.
The main religious building of his reign is the Mahazedi Pagoda, a majestic monument to the Buddha in the capital, Pago.
He also crowned the main pagodas in Myanmar with the jewels of his own crown, a custom practiced by many rulers of the country.
He continued in the tradition of Dhammazedi, in supporting the Sihala Sangha and in sponsoring the ordination of many bhikkhus in the Kalyani Ordination Hall near Pago.
It is said that he built as many monasteries as there were years in his life.
It remains a mystery how a king who had such deep devotion to the religion of the Buddha and who was so generous towards it could spend his life fighting campaign after campaign to expand his realm.
He caused bloodshed and suffering in the conquered regions and at home people starved because farmers were drafted into the army.
However this may be, Bayinnaung seems to have been able to reconcile fighting expansionist wars with being a pious Buddhist.
After King Bayinnaung, Pago rapidly lost its significance.
Bayinnaung's son persecuted the Mon and consequently re-ignited racial tensions that would plague Myanmar for centuries.
Later, Pago was to fall into the hands of a Portuguese adventurer who pillaged the pagodas and monasteries.
Eventually the whole of Lower Myanmar, already depopulated by the incessant campaigns of Bayinnaung and his successors, was pillaged by all the surrounding kings and princelings.
The country was devastated and people starved.
The Sasanavamsa records one major problem of the Vinaya during the sixteenth century.
At the beginning of the century, the bhikkhus of Toungoo were divided over whether or not bhikkhus could partake of the juice of the toddy palm which was generally used to prepare fermented drink.
The dispute was settled by a respected thera who decided that toddy juice was permissible only if it was freshly harvested.
What motivated the royal court probably remained largely a mystery to the ordinary citizens, except when they were pressed into service in the king's army.
There was little sense of collective responsibility as it is cultivated in today's democracies.
Everyone looked after himself and his immediate circle and governments were sometimes more of a scourge than a protection.
Kings did not always provide a visible administration beyond appointing governors at whose mercy local people were.
These governors often endeavored to establish independence as soon as they perceived inherent weaknesses in their masters.
Many accumulated great wealth for themselves.
There was, however, one element in the policy of rulers which, with a few exceptions, remained fairly stable throughout Myanmar history.
Most kings supported Buddhism and the Sangha provided a framework of continuity as no other entity could.
Ray writes:
The best insurance of a peaceful life in Myanmar was to become a bhikkhu, as they were not drafted into armies or enslaved by conquerors and as long as the lay people had food to eat they were also fed.
The bhikkhus not only provided a link between the people and those in power, they often played a role in the affairs of state.
This is illustrated by an event which occurred in the middle of the seventeenth century and is related by the Sasanavamsa.
The king, Ukkamsika, popularly known as King Thalun, was a devoted Buddhist and thanks to him, learning flourished in Myanmar.
The king's son, however, tried to dethrone his father, and Thalun, taken by surprise, had to flee accompanied only by two companions.
Coming upon a river, the only vessel in sight was the boat of a samanera.
The samanera agreed to take them onboard as passengers, and they ended up in the samanera's monastery where they revealed their true identities and asked for protection from their persecutors.
They were referred to another monastery where lived a bhikkhu wise in worldly affairs.
Following his advice, the bhikkhus formed a living wall around the monastery and, as no Buddhist will attack a man in robes, the rebels who had come to kill the king had to withdraw.
Another example of the beneficial influence of the Sangha is their appeal for clemency to King Bayinnaung.
Bhikkhus often tried to stay executions in accordance with the principles of metta and karuna and sometimes their efforts achieved success.
During one of Bayinnaung's Thai campaigns, the peasantry around Pago revolted and razed the royal city to the ground.
Bayinnaung, after hurrying back from Ayutthaya, captured several thousand rebels and was ready to burn them alive.
It was the custom then to burn deserters from the army alive and obviously rebellion was considered to be a crime of similar gravity.
The bhikkhus of all races intervened on behalf of the poor wretches and were able to save all from the pyre, except for seventy ring leaders, the most serious offenders.
There are several instances in Myanmar history when bhikkhus also mediated between contending kings or princes and helped to avoid bloodshed.
This was often the case when cities were besieged and both parties realised that they could not win.
The king who was besieged would normally take the initiative and send his bhikkhus to the king in attack.
Often the bhikkhus were authorized to negotiate on behalf of the monarch.
An armistice agreed by or in the presence of bhikkhus was more likely to be honored than a promise given without their blessings.
Therefore, if the two parties were sincere in their offers to negotiate, they usually requested bhikkhus to be mediators and judges.
The seventeenth century was a period of dynamic growth in the history of Buddhism in Myanmar.
Many outstanding developments took place, and principal among these were the numerous translations of texts into the Myanmar language and the great increase in the study of the Abhidhamma.
It is quite possible that the two developments were inter-connected.
In the first half of the century, Manirathana Thera translated the following texts into the Myanmar language: Atthasalini, Sammohavinodani, Kankhavitarani, Abhidhammatthavibhavini, Sankhepavannana.
Of these five, only the Kankhavitarani, Buddhaghosa's commentary on the Patimokkha, is not concerned with Abhidhamma.
In the second half of the century Aggadhammalankara translated Kaccayana's Pali grammar, the Abhidhammatthasangaha, Matika, Dhatukatha, Yamaka, and the Patthana into the Myanmar tongue.
Later, the Nettippakarana was also translated.
It cannot be a coincidence that nine out of twelve translated works were texts of the Abhidhamma or its commentaries.
The reason for these translations must have been a developing interest in the psychology of Buddhism among the Buddhist followers who could not themselves read Pali.
Whether these were only bhikkhus or whether lay people were also interested in exploring the scriptures for themselves is difficult to determine now.
However, what is known is that almost every boy and many of the girls attended monastic schools, whose curriculum was probably established by this period, if not earlier.
Included in the curriculum were studies of the Mangala Sutta, Metta Sutta, Ratana Sutta, and the other parittas, as well as basic literacy which included some Pali.
In addition a number of the Abhidhamma texts had to be committed to memory.
The intention behind these translations and commentaries in the Myanmar language was obviously to make the words of the Buddha accessible to a wider audience who would, then, not be solely dependent on the authority of the Pali scholars.
In the later half of the century, the bhikkhu Devacakkhobhasa designed a system for the study and teaching of the Patthana, the last book of the Abhidhamma, which in Myanmar is believed to be the highest teaching of the Buddha.
The king at the time of Devacakkhobhasa was so impressed by the bhikkhu's proficiency in these higher teachings and by his system of instruction, that he ordered the Patthana to be studied in all the monasteries of Myanmar.
It is not unreasonable to assume that the king himself studied these teachings.
Otherwise he would hardly have been in a position to appreciate them and make them compulsory reading for the Myanmar bhikkhus.
This emphasis on Abhidhamma in general and the Patthana in particular has survived in Myanmar to the present day.
The movement, therefore, that began in the seventeenth century is still of great significance for Buddhism there.
The Patthana, for instance, is ubiquitous in Myanmar.
The twenty-four conditions of the Patthana can be found printed on the fans of the bhikkhus, on calendars, and on posters.
In some monasteries, the bhikkhus are woken every morning by twenty-four strokes on a hollow tree trunk, while the bhikkhu striking the tree trunk has to recite the twenty-four conditions as he does so.
Even little children learn to recite the twenty-four conditions along with the suttas of protection.
As the Patthana is the highest and most difficult teaching of the Buddha, it is believed that it will be the first to be lost.
In order to slow the decline of the Sasana, many people of Myanmar, bhikkhus and lay people alike, memorize the Patthana and recite it daily.
In Pagan, the Jataka stories and the history of the Buddha's life were the main subjects of religious study.
In later centuries, Pali grammar and the study of the Vinaya were foremost on the agenda.
Dhammazedi's reform movement drew the attention back to the foundations of all monastic life, the code of conduct for the bhikkhus as laid down by the Buddha himself.
Though stricter observation of the Vinaya would have to be re-emphasised in the future, its foundation was firm enough to insure that progressive reform movements would be instigated within the Sangha and not be dependent on external impetus.
How far a bhikkhu was allowed to stray from the ideal had been defined in strictures that had become integral to the Sangha.
Based on this foundation of sila, the Sangha was now free to give increased attention to higher teachings.
The age of the Abhidhamma had dawned.
The Abhidhamma remained no longer the domain of a chosen few, but began to be studied by many.
The wealth of translations from the Abhidhamma would suggest that in the seventeenth century it had become so popular that it may have been taught even to lay people.
The Myanmar language had developed and had been enriched with Pali terms so that it could convey the difficult concepts of Abhidhamma.
civilization had matured to an extent never seen before.
Myanmar was ready to study the analysis of mind and matter as taught by the Buddha.
The stage was being set for the widespread practice of insight meditation in later times.
In the succession of rulers of the eighteenth century some were strong and despotic, while others were ineffective and withdrawn.
Some tried to expand their power and fought wars, while others appeared satisfied with existing conditions.
There were several wars with Thailand and the population of Myanmar had to bear the deprivations that war invariably brings not only to the conquered, but also to the country where the conquering armies are levied.
After a war between the Mon and the Myanmar in which the Mon initially attacked and then conquered Ava itself, the Myanmar king Alaungpaya, who believed himself a Bodhisatta, crushed Mon resistance once and for all.
After Pago had fallen into his hands in, Lower Myanmar was devastated and many of the Mon survivors fled to Thailand or were deported as slaves.
Like Bayinnaung, Alaungpaya established a Myanmar empire, at the same time decimating the population of the country by drafting the peasantry into the army for campaigns against Ayutthaya and other countries.
The Sasanavamsa does not comment on the atrocity of war.
War is perceived as it is, cruel and pitiless — but it is the affair of rulers, not of bhikkhus.
The manner in which rulers conduct their affairs is entirely their responsibility.
Pannasami probably took very seriously the Buddha's injunction that a member of the Sangha should not talk about rulers and royal affairs.
The Sasanavamsa pays much attention to a controversy which raged in monastic circles throughout the eighteenth century.
At the beginning of the century, some bhikkhus began to wear their robes outside the monasteries as they were worn within them, that is, covering only one shoulder.
Even when going on their daily alms round, they failed to drape the robe in the traditional way.
When challenged as to the orthodoxy of this practice, they produced various interpretations and opinions, but could not validate their practice through the authority of the scriptures.
Different kings endorsed one or other of the two opinions and bhikkhus of the orthodox school even died for their conviction when a king had outlawed the covering of both shoulders.
The most interesting aspect of this historical period of the religion is not so much the actual controversy as the power the king had in religious affairs.
The kings of Myanmar were not normally expert in the Vinaya and yet they took the final decision in matters of monastic discipline after due consultation with the leaders of the Sangha.
In the more than one hundred years that this controversy prevailed, different kings supported the orthodoxy of either view.
This shows that this system is not entirely satisfactory.
However, the right view which was in accordance with the Vinaya did eventually triumph due to the persistence of the majority of the Sangha.
Only the worldly power was in a position to regulate the Sangha into which undesirable elements entered repeatedly.
To keep the Order pure, it had to be always under careful scrutiny and bogus ascetics had to be removed.
The kings of Myanmar in co-operation with the Sangharajas and the other senior bhikkhus had established a system of supervision of the bhikkhus by royal officials.
In every township, the king's representatives were responsible for ensuring that the bhikkhus adhered scrupulously to the rules of the Vinaya.
Bhikkhus who transgressed were taken before religious courts and punished according to the code of discipline.
The controversy concerning the correct manner of wearing the robes came up for arbitration for the last time under Bodawpaya, the fifth son of Alaungpaya.
He decided in favor of orthodoxy and thenceforth all bhikkhus had to cover both shoulders on the daily alms round.
This ruling created one unified sect throughout Myanmar under the leadership of a council of senior bhikkhus appointed by the king.
These were called the Thudhamma Sayadaws and the Thudhamma sect has survived in Myanmar down to the present day.
Bodawpaya appointed a chapter of eight eminent bhikkhus as Sangharajas, leaders of the Sangha, and charged them with the duty to safeguard the purity of the Order of bhikkhus.
As a direct result of the discipline and stability created by the work of these senior bhikkhus, the Sangha prospered, and consequently scholarship flourished under Bodawpaya's reign.
The name of the Mahasangharaja Nanabhivamsa is especially noteworthy in this respect.
Nanabhivamsa was an eminently learned bhikkhu who had proven his wisdom even as a young man.
Only five years after his ordination as a bhikkhu, he had completed a commentary on the Nettippakarana.
Eight years after full ordination, at the age of twenty-eight, he became Sangharaja, and then Mahasangharaja, the title conferred by the king on the highest bhikkhu in his realm.
Soon after this, he wrote his well respected “new sub-commentary” on the Digha Nikaya, the Sadhujjanavilasini.
At the request of the king, he wrote a commentary on Buddhaghosa's Jatakatthakatha and several other treatises.
The king was so devoted to the head of the Sangha that he dedicated a “very magnificent five storied monastery” to him and later many other monasteries as well.
According to the Sasanavamsa, Nanabhivamsa was not only a scholar, but also practiced the ascetic practices sitting always alone.
He divided his time between the various monasteries under his tutelage and was an indefatigable teacher of the scriptures.
Scholarship flourished in the reign of King Bodawpaya and Myanmar was able, for the first time, to return thanks to Sri Lanka for nurturing the religion in the Golden Land.
The bhikkhu ordination preserved in Myanmar was re-introduced to Sri Lanka where the Sasana had been interferred with by an unwise king.
In the later half of the eighteenth century, the upasampada ordination in Sri Lanka was barred to all except the members of the landed aristocracy.
This was a result of royal decree probably issued with the support of at least a section of the Sangha.
However, this was a flagrant defilement of the letter and the spirit of the Buddha's instructions.
The conferring of the upasampada ordination is dependent only upon such conditions as the candidate being a man, free from government service, free of debt, free of contagious diseases, and upon his having his parents' consent, etc.
Members of the lower castes had now only the possibility of becoming novices, a condition that created dissatisfaction.
A sizeable section of ordained bhikkhus also disapproved of the royal order, but were in no position to defy it within the country.
The only recourse for those of the lower castes desiring the higher ordination was therefore to travel to other Buddhist countries to ordain.
At first, missions were sent to Thailand where Dhammazedi's reforms lived on through the ordination conferred to Thai bhikkhus in Pago and through the scores of Mon bhikkhus who had found refuge in Thailand from the Myanmar armies.
At the beginning of the nineteenth century, however, Sinhalese bhikkhus began traveling to Myanmar to find the pure ordination there.
The fame of the then Mahasangharaja of Myanmar, Nanabhivamsa, influenced their choice.
Scholarship had developed in all fields: Pali grammar, the Vinaya, the Suttanta, and the Abhidhamma.
Myanmar had, after a long period of development, become the custodian of Buddhism.
The first delegation from Sri Lanka arrived in and was welcomed with a magnificent reception by King Bodawpaya himself.
Nanabhivamsa, the wise Sangharaja, ordained the samaneras as bhikkhus and instructed them for some time in the scriptures.
On returning to Sri Lanka, they were accompanied by five Myanmar bhikkhus and a letter from Nanabhivamsa to the Sinhalese Sangharaja.
Five bhikkhus form a full chapter and apparently the Myanmar bhikkhus were permitted to ordain bhikkhus without class distinction.
Even today, Sri Lanka possesses three schools, the Amarapura Nikaya, the Siyama Nikaya, and the Ramanna Nikaya.
The Amarapura Nikaya was so called because King Bodawpaya had established his capital in Amarapura and the bhikkhus had received their ordination there.
The Ramanna Nikaya was presumably founded by bhikkhus who had received ordination from Mon bhikkhus in the tradition of the Dhammazedi reforms and who had fled to southern Thailand from the wrath of the Myanmar kings.
Both these schools were allowed to ordain bhikkhus without discriminating against the lower classes.
Only the Siyama Sangha continued to follow the royal command, and ordained only novices of the higher castes as bhikkhus.
Missions from Sri Lanka continued to travel to Amarapura to consult with its senior theras and they were all given royal patronage and sent back with gifts of the Pali scriptures and commentarial texts.
Although King Bodawpaya would appear to have been a pious and devout king, his relationship with the Sangha was somewhat problematic.
He supported it at times and even used it to extend his own glory, but at times he seemed almost jealous of the respect the bhikkhus received from the people.
He realised that the bhikkhus were not respected out of fear, but were held in genuine esteem and affection by his subjects.
His jealousy became apparent on different occasions.
At one time, he declared that from then on the bhikkhus were no longer to be addressed by the traditional title “Hpoungyi” meaning “The One of Great Merit.” This form of address was to be reserved for the king.
Then again he tried to confiscate land and other goods given to the Sangha and to pagodas by previous generations.
When the Sangharajas could not answer his questions to his satisfaction, he invited the Muslim clergy for a meal to test their faith.
He had heard that they were so strict in the observance of their discipline that they would rather die than eat pork.
Unfortunately for them, they did not display great heroism as they all ate the pork offered to them by the king.
Bodawpaya is also reputed to have been beset by a form of megalomania.
He wanted to force the Sangha to confirm officially that he was the Bodhisatta of the next Buddha to come in this world cycle, the Buddha Metteyya.
On this issue, however, the Sangha was not to be bent even in the face of royal wrath.
The bhikkhus refused, and the king was finally forced to accept defeat.
Another expression of his inflated self-esteem was the Mingun Pagoda near Sagaing.
It was to be by far the biggest temple ever built.
Scores of slaves and laborers worked on its construction until funds were depleted.
However, it was never completed and remains today as a huge shapeless square of millions of bricks.
To his credit, King Bodawpaya imposed the morality of the Five Precepts in his whole realm and had offenders executed immediately.
Capital punishment was prescribed for selling and drinking alcohol, killing larger animals such as buffaloes, spreading heretical views, and the smoking of opium.
Bodawpaya ruled the country with an iron fist and brought offending lay people as well as bhikkhus to heel.
His successors were benevolent, but possibly they could be so only because of the fear his rule had instilled in the populace.
Bodawpaya's successor, Bagyidaw, was the first of the Myanmar kings to lose territory to the white invaders coming from the West.
The Myanmar court was so out of touch with the modern world that it still believed Myanmar to be the center of the world and her army virtually invincible.
Hence the king was not unduly disturbed when the British raj, governing the Indian sub-continent, declared war on the Kingdom of Ava in.
It came to a battle near the coast in which the Myanmar general Mahabandhula achieved little or nothing against modern British arms.
The Indian colonial government occupied all of the Myanmar coast as far south as Tenasserim in and forced the treaty of Yandabo on King Bagyidaw.
In the treaty, he was forced to accept the new borders established by the Indian government and pay compensation to the invaders for the annexation of the coast of Lower Myanmar.
However, Bagyidaw made a very important contribution to the development of the Sangha and to the literature of Myanmar in general.
His predecessor, Bodawpaya, had united the Sangha by resolving the dispute relating to the draping of the robe over one or two shoulders.
Bagyidaw saw the necessity of creating stability for the Sangha.
He felt that this could be achieved to some extent by bestowing on it a sense of its own history.
He commissioned a work on the history of the religion starting from the time of the Buddha, which was to show an unbroken succession of the pure tradition from teacher to pupil.
Its purpose was to praise the diligent theras and expose the shameless ones.
This work, the Thathana-lin-ga-ya-kyan, was composed at the king's request by the ex-bhikkhu Mahadhamma-thin-gyan, a leading member of the committee appointed by King Bagyidaw to compile the famous Hman-nan-ya-za-win, The Glass-palace Chronicle, a secular history of Myanmar.
The Thathana-wun-tha -lin-ga-ya-kyan was completed in; and in, it was printed in the form of a modern book for the first time in Yangon.
Pannasami based his Sasanavamsa on this work.
About forty percent of the Sasanavamsa is straight translation from the original work, about forty percent summaries and paraphrasing of the latter, and only some twenty percent Pannasami's own work.
Pannasami states in his introduction to the Sasanavamsa that his treatise is based on the works of the ancients.
The concept of mental property or copyright had not been born and there was no moral need to refer the reader to sources except to give authority to a statement.
The only references that would lend authority to a treatise would be the scriptures, their commentaries, and sub-commentaries, but not a work as recent as the Thathana-wuntha-lin-ga-ya-kyan.
The preface to the original work in Myanmar explains the reason for its compilation.
The king's representative had many times pleaded with the author to write a history of the succession of religious teachers so that the people would not become heretical.
Apparently the king felt that the lack of a work recording the history of the pure religion in its entirety left scope for wrong views to arise.
But with an authoritative record of the lineage of teachers, bhikkhus could not call on views of shameless bhikkhus of the past anymore in order to support their heresies.
This is exactly what had happened again and again through the centuries and especially in the robe-draping dispute.
The ekamsikas, the one-shoulder-drapers, had repeatedly dug out obscure teachers in order to support their point of view.
This was to be made impossible once and for all.
Whether this has been successful is difficult to ascertain without a detailed study of the developments in the Sangha since the publication of this work.
However, the fact that the original Myanmar chronicle was revised and translated into Pali for the Fifth Buddhist Council indicates that it was by this time considered a useful tool to put the king's authority behind a well-defined orthodox lineage, thus making it easy to refute heresy by referring to the historical teachers.
King Bagyidaw never overcame his shock over the loss of part of his realm.
He was declared insane and was removed from the throne by Tharawaddy-Min, King Mindon's father.
In the reign of Tharrawaddy-Min, another mission from Sri Lanka visited Myanmar and was received by the Sangharaja Neyyadhammabhivamsa.
Neyyadhamma instructed the two bhikkhus and the accompanying novice in the teachings and conferred the bhikkhu ordination on the novice.
He is known for his critical emendation of the text of the Saddhammapajjotika and its translation into Myanmar.
He was also the teacher of the later Sangharaja Pannasami, the compiler of the Sasanavamsa and one of the most influential theras at the time of King Mindon.
Neyyadhamma showed the need for a recension of at least some of the Pali texts by editing the Saddhammapajjotika.
His disciple, Pannasami, was to preside over the recension of the entire Tipitaka as Sangharaja under King Mindon.
Tharrawaddy-Min was himself deposed because of insanity by his son Pagan-Min, the brother of Mindon-Min.
Pagan-Min appointed Pannajotabhidhaja as his Sangharaja.
In his tenure, scholarship received encouragement as the Sangharaja himself wrote a commentary and its sub-commentary in Myanmar on the Anguttara Nikaya.
Other works of the time, all in the vernacular, are a translation of the Saddhammavilasini and commentaries on the Samyutta Nikaya and the Digha Nikaya.
This is also the time when the author of the Sasanavamsa appears.
He started his scholarly career with the translation into Myanmar of a commentary on the Saddatthabhedacinta.
His next work was a comparison of the existing versions of the Abhidhanappadipika and the translation of his emended text.
In accord with the pre-eminence Myanmar had achieved in the Theravada Buddhist world, the kings of the country became less fierce and wars were fewer.
The successors of Bodawpaya seem to have shown a genuine interest in religion as well as in improving the administration of the country.
Upper Myanmar moved into a period of peace, which meant improved conditions for the bhikkhus.
The first half of the nineteenth century saw the translation of many Pali texts into the Myanmar language.
Almost the whole of the Suttanta was now available in the vernacular and many commentaries and sub-commentaries on Suttanta, Abhidhamma, and the Vinaya were composed in it.
This not only made it easier for bhikkhus with limited linguistic skills to study the texts, but also made them readily accessible to the laity.
That people in a peaceful country have more time for the study of religion is obvious and soon Myanmar would see the first Buddhist texts printed on modern printing presses.
This made it possible for a great number of people to acquire texts relatively cheaply without having to pay a scribe to copy them laboriously onto palm leaves.
Politically Pagan-Min was no luckier than Bagyidaw, as he lost the provinces of Pathein and Yangon to the British, who were ever ready to create some pretext for war.
So, in, the Kingdom of Ava lost access to the sea and became increasingly dependent on the colonial power.
Like his father, Pagan-Min was overthrown in a palace revolt.
Although not a leader of the uprising, his brother Mindon was placed on the throne.
He did not execute the deposed king as was usually the case after a revolt, but allowed him to end his days in dignity.
The occupation by the British forces was of utmost significance for the Sangha as the British administration did not grant the traditional protection afforded it by a Buddhist ruler.
In accordance with the colonial policy established in India, that the colonial government should be strictly secular, the new lords refused to take on the role of a Buddhist monarch and accept responsibility for the enforcing of the bhikkhus' discipline.
Without this, Buddhism in Lower Myanmar soon suffered and offending bhikkhus went unpunished.
The colonial administration would recognise its mistake only much later, when it was too late, and when they were not able to establish control in the Sangha any longer.
Even today King Mindon's reign is surrounded by the mystique of a golden era in the minds of the Myanmar people.
No war occurred during the twenty-five years of his tenure and the king himself is said to have been of gentle disposition and adverse to violence.
He even declared a dislike for capital punishment which was customarily inflicted by sovereigns for the slightest disobedience or even disagreement.
He was not only held in esteem by his subjects, but even praised by a British envoy.
The colonisers' comments on the Myanmar and their kings were usually dictated by a parochial narrow-mindedness and a simplistic view that was only widened by contact with the conquered.
Therefore General Fytche's words describing King Mindon are all the more impressive: “Doubtless one of the most enlightened monarchs that has ever sat on the Burmese throne.
He is polished in his manner, has considerable knowledge of the affairs of state and the history and the statistics of his own and other countries.
In personal character he is amiable and kind and, according to his light, religious.
King Mindon transferred the capital from Ava to Mandalay, the last royal capital before the British annexation of the whole of Myanmar in.
In the early years of his reign, Mindon strove to improve monastic discipline.
Although a system of official investigation of complaints relating to bhikkhus' misdemeanours existed, each king had to take his own initiative in re-establishing order in the Sangha.
Mindon found that the attitude of many members of the Sangha to their code of conduct was exceedingly lax.
He therefore wanted all bhikkhus of his dominions to take a vow of obedience to the Vinaya rules in front of a Buddha image.
He consulted the Sangharaja who convened an assembly of mahatheras, the Thudhamma Council.
As opinions regarding the vow differed, the primate's disciple, Pannasami, had to deliver a religious address in support of the king's views.
He reasoned that vows were also taken by the bhikkhus at the time of ordination and that if the king sincerely desired to improve the discipline in the Order, he should be supported.
All agreed, and the vow was prescribed.
The greatest challenge King Mindon had to face as a Buddhist monarch was undoubtedly his duty to look after the spiritual welfare of his subjects not only in his own dominions, but also in the parts of Myanmar occupied by the British.
Moreover, he and many of the leading sayadaws of his court were increasingly aware that the British were only waiting for an occasion to annex the whole of Myanmar.
Mindon's army clearly would not be able to stand up to the might of the Indian colonial government.
Therefore, it was not only important to support religious activities in the occupied territories but it was also essential to prepare the religion for the time when it would have to survive without the support of a Buddhist monarch.
The British had made it clear at the outset that they would not take over the traditional role of the Myanmar kings, that of protector of the Sasana.
The new masters' religion, Christianity, rapidly gained influence through the missionary schools.
The schools were popular because their education provided much assistance in securing a job and favor with the colonisers.
Christian religious education was a compulsory part of their curriculum.
After the conquest of Lower Myanmar, many bhikkhus had fled north in order to remain within the jurisdiction of the Myanmar kings.
Many monasteries in British Myanmar were left without an incumbent and whole villages were therefore bereft of the opportunity to receive religious and general education.
King Mindon, aware of this situation, tried to convince bhikkhus to return to Lower Myanmar in order to serve their people.
The king's efforts proved successful and many bhikkhus returned to their places of origin.
But soon it became clear that without the king's ecclesiastic officials to control the discipline of the Sangha, many bhikkhus developed a careless attitude towards their code of discipline.
The Okpo Sayadaw, from Okpo between Yangon and Pago, had stopped many bhikkhus on their way to Upper Myanmar when the movements of bhikkhus out of the conquered territories was at its peak around.
He assembled the bhikkhus around himself teaching that the Sangha needed no protection from the secular power if it observed the rules of the Vinaya strictly.
His monastery was the birth place of a movement of strict monastic discipline.
He also emphasised that mental volition was what really mattered in the religion of the Buddha and that acts of worship done with an impure intention were worthless.
He obviously felt that much of the Buddhist practice had become a ritual and that the essence had been lost.
In addition to this, however, his movement also challenged the authority of the king's Council of Sayadaws, the leaders of the unified Thudhamma sect, when he declared their ordination was invalid due to a technicality.
As a result, he took the higher ordination anew together with his followers.
The Okpo Sayadaw was not the only critic of the Thudhamma sayadaws.
In Upper Myanmar, the Ngettwin Sayadaw criticized many religious practices and maintained that a radical reassesment of religious teachings was necessary.
The Ngettwin Sayadaw was also a source of inspiration for the Okpo Sayadaw and other reformers.
He had been the teacher of Mindon's chief queen and had also advised the king on many occasions.
Interestingly, he was a driving force in a movement in Upper Myanmar that wanted to return to the fundamentals of the religion, but more radically than the Okpo Sayadaw.
The Ngettwin Sayadaw, together with many other bhikkhus, left the royal city and went to live in the forest near Sagaing.
He started to preach that meditation was essential for all bhikkhus and he required an aspirant to novicehood to prove that he had practiced meditation before he would ordain him.
All the bhikkhus around him had to spend a period of the day in meditation and he emphasised that meditation was of much greater importance than learning.
He advised lay people to stop making offerings of flowers, fruits, and candles to Buddha images, but to meditate regularly on the Uposatha days.
Of course, his instructions that offerings to Buddha images were fruitless and merely dirtied the places of worship, caused considerable unhappiness with the traditional Thudhamma Council and presumably with many ordinary people.
However, the Ngettwin Sayadaw never strove to form a different sect by holding a separate ordination as did the Okpo Sayadaw.
His reforms were within the community and within a Buddhist society that was presided over by a king.
The Okpo Sayadaw had no place for royalty in his view of the world and did not hesitate to confront the system that was still alive, though obviously doomed.
Two other important sayadaws of King Mindon's reign deserve mention: the Shwegyin Sayadaw and the Thingazar Sayadaw.
The Shwegyin Sayadawalso tried to reform the Sangha and his movement is still very much alive and highly respected in Myanmar today.
He had studied under the Okpo Sayadaw, but when he returned to his native Shwegyin near Shwebo in Upper Myanmar, he avoided controversy in never rebelling against the Thudhamma Council.
He introduced two new rules for his bhikkhus, that they must not chew betel and consume tobacco after noon.
He also maintained that the Sangha must regulate itself without help from the authority, but he never doubted the validity of the traditional ordination ceremony.
The Thingazar Sayadaw was one of the most popular of the great sayadaws of his time.
He was also part of the movement to return to the basics of the teachings and greatly emphasised the importance of practice as opposed to mere scholarship.
Though he was greatly honored by the king and made a member of the Thudhamma Council, he preferred spending long periods in solitude in the forest.
In the numerous monasteries built for him by the royal family and the nobility of the country, he insisted on the practice of the purest of conduct in accordance with the Vinaya.
However, he did not involve himself in disputes with the extreme reformers or the Thudhamma council.
He became very popular through the humorous tales he told in sermons preached in his frequent travels up and down the country.
King Mindon had no easy task.
One section of the Sangha was pressing for far reaching reforms, yet it was the king's duty to maintain a certain continuity of the traditional ways for the benefit of the people in general.
What complicated the situation was the fact that the Sangha of Lower Myanmar felt more and more independent of the Buddhist monarch and his Thudhamma council of senior mahatheras.
This is illustrated graphically by the Okpo Sayadaw's declaration that the Sangha needed no regulation by the worldly power.
This view gained popularity also in Upper Myanmar.
Luckily, King Mindon's devotion to Buddhism was genuine and he was not deterred by the difficulties confronting him.
He was determined not to allow the Sangha to split into factions that were openly opposing each other.
This he achieved to some extent through careful diplomacy and through the calling of a great Synod, a Sangayana, in the royal city of Mandalay.
The Sangayana, or Buddhist Council, is the most important function of the Buddhist religion.
The first Sangayana was held during the first Rains Retreat after the Parinibbana of the Buddha; the texts to be regarded as authentic were determined at this time.
There had been three more Sangayanas since, according to the Theravada tradition.
The council convened by the great Emperor Asoka, whose missionaries brought Buddhism to Myanmar, probably provided the most inspiration for Mindon.
The Fourth Council, the one prior to Mindon's council, was held in Sri Lanka in the first century BC, at the Aluvihara near Matale, for the purpose of writing down the Tipitaka, which up to that time had been passed on orally.
King Mindon himself presided over the Fifth Buddhist Council, during which all the canonical texts were recited and the correct form was established from among any variant readings.
The task took more than three years to accomplish, from to.
When the bhikkhus had completed their great project, the king had all of the Buddhist scriptures, the Tipitaka, engraved on marble slabs.
The slabs were then housed each in a separate small pagoda about three meters high with a roof to protect the inscriptions from the elements.
The small shrines were built around a central pagoda, the Kutho-daw Pagoda, the Pagoda of the Noble Merit.
To commemorate the great council, King Mindon crowned the Shwedagon Pagoda in Yangon with a new Hti or spire.
The Fifth Buddhist Council and the crowning of the Shwedagon Pagoda reminded all the people of Myanmar of the importance of their religion, as well as of the fact that the king and the Thudhamma Council of senior monks were still the guardians of the Sasana.
The authority of the Thudhamma Council was greatly enhanced also in Lower Myanmar through the synod.
Although the British had not allowed King Mindon to attend the raising of the new spire onto the Shwedagon, the crowning was a symbol of the religious unity of Myanmar which persisted in spite of the British occupation.
The religion was also later to become the rallying point for the Myanmar nationalists who fought for independence from the colonisers.
King Mindon's reign produced a number of scholarly works as well as translations from the Pali.
Neyyadhamma, the royal preceptor, himself wrote a sub-commentary on the Majjhima Nikaya, which had been translated by one of his disciples under his guidance.
A commentary in Myanmar on the Pali Jatakas was composed by Medhavivamsa and the compiler of the Sasanavamsa, Pannasami, put his name to a great number of works.
One of the queens of King Mindon requested Pannasami to write the Silakatha and the Upayakatha.
His teacher asked him to compose the Voharatthabheda, Vivadavinicchaya, Nagarajuppattikatha.
He also wrote a commentary on Aggavamsa's Saddaniti.
Whether all these works were composed by Pannasami or whether they were composed under his supervision and control is difficult to assess.
It is interesting to note that a majority of his works were composed in Pali, which was no doubt an attempt to encourage bhikkhus not to forgo Pali scholarship now that Myanmar translations were readily available.
The calling of a great Buddhist council to purify the scriptures was part of this movement towards the revival of the study of the original texts.
During King Mindon's reign bhikkhus from Sri Lanka came to Mandalay on several occasions to solve difficult questions of Vinaya and to receive the bhikkhu ordination in Myanmar.
After Mindon's death in, his son Thibaw ascended the throne.
He was weak and of feeble intellect, and his reign was short.
In, he lost his kingdom to the British empire and was exiled to India.
With the complete annexation of Myanmar by the British, a historical era came to an end.
Theravada Buddhism developed in Myanmar over more than two millennia.
The visits of the Buddha were the first brief illuminations in a country that was shrouded in darkness.
The worship of the Buddha that is thought to have resulted from these visits and from the arrival of the hair relics, may have been merely part of a nature religion.
The pure religion could not endure for long in a country which was yet on the brink of civilization.
Later, however, the teachings of the Buddha were brought repeatedly to those lands by various people.
The visits of the Arahats sent out after Emperor Asoka's council are historically more acceptable than the visits of the Buddha.
Their teachings were understood and perpetuated possibly in Indian settlements along the coast and later in communities of people from central Asia such as the Pyu.
Through their contact with India, these cultural centers of the Pyu and Mon could remain in contact with Buddhism.
At first the important centers of Theravada Buddhism were in northern India and later in South India and then Sri Lanka.
Through repeated contact with orthodox bhikkhus abroad, the understanding of Buddhism grew ever stronger in the minds of the people of Myanmar.
The religion was distorted dozens of times through ignorance and carelessness, but someone always appeared to correct the teachings with the help of the mainstays of the Sasana abroad.
Gradually the role was reversed: instead of traveling abroad for advice, the bhikkhus of Myanmar became the guardians of Theravada Buddhist teaching and their authority was respected by all.
Eventually, when Theravada Buddhism had long been lost to India and its future was uncertain in Sri Lanka, it found a secure home in Southeast Asia, especially in Myanmar.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The Pali word metta is a multi-significant term meaning loving-kindness, friendliness, goodwill, benevolence, fellowship, amity, concord, inoffensiveness and non-violence.
The Pali commentators define metta as the strong wish for the welfare and happiness of others.
Essentially metta is an altruistic attitude of love and friendliness as distinguished from mere amiability based on self-interest.
Through metta one refuses to be offensive and renounces bitterness, resentment and animosity of every kind, developing instead a mind of friendliness, accommodativeness and benevolence which seeks the well-being and happiness of others.
True metta is devoid of self-interest.
It evokes within a warm-hearted feeling of fellowship, sympathy and love, which grows boundless with practice and overcomes all social, religious, racial, political and economic barriers.
Metta is indeed a universal, unselfish and all-embracing love.
Metta makes one a pure font of well-being and safety for others.
Just as a mother gives her own life to protect her child, so metta only gives and never wants anything in return.
To promote one's own interest is a primordial motivation of human nature.
When this urge is transformed into the desire to promote the interest and happiness of others, not only is the basic urge of self-seeking overcome, but the mind becomes universal by identifying its own interest with the interest of all.
By making this change one also promotes one's own well-being in the best possible manner.
Metta is the protective and immensely patient attitude of a mother who forbears all difficulties for the sake of her child and ever protects it despite its misbehavior.
Metta is also the attitude of a friend who wants to give one the best to further one's well-being.
If these qualities of metta are sufficiently cultivated through metta-bhavana — the meditation on universal love — the result is the acquisition of a tremendous inner power which preserves, protects and heals both oneself and others.
Apart from its higher implications, today metta is a pragmatic necessity.
In a world menaced by all kinds of destructiveness, metta in deed, word and thought is the only constructive means to bring concord, peace and mutual understanding.
Indeed, metta is the supreme means, for it forms the fundamental tenet of all the higher religions as well as the basis for all benevolent activities intended to promote human well-being.
The present booklet aims at exploring various facets of metta both in theory and in practice.
The examination of the doctrinal and ethical side of metta will proceed through a study of the popular Karaniya Metta Sutta, the Buddha's “Hymn of Universal Love.” In connection with this theme we will also look at several other short texts dealing with metta.
The explanation of metta-bhavana, the meditation on universal love, will give the practical directions for developing this type of contemplation as set forth in the main meditation texts of the Theravada Buddhist tradition, the Visuddhimagga, the Vimuttimagga and the Patisambhidamagga.
The historical background which led the Buddha to expound the Karaniya Metta Sutta is explained in the commentary written by Acariya Buddhaghosa, who received it from an unbroken line of Elders going back to the days of the Buddha himself.
It is told that five hundred monks received instructions from the Buddha in the particular techniques of meditation suitable to their individual temperaments.
They then went to the foothills of the Himalayas to spend the four months of the rains' retreat by living a life of withdrawal and intensive meditation.
In those days, a month or two before the rains' retreat started, monks from all parts of the country would assemble wherever the Buddha lived in order to receive direct instruction from the Supreme Master.
Then they would go back to their monasteries, forest dwellings or hermitages to make a vigorous attempt at spiritual liberation.
This was how these five hundred monks went to the Buddha, who was staying at Savatthi in Jeta's Grove in the monastery built by Anathapindika.
After receiving instructions they went in search of a suitable place, and in the course of their wandering they soon found a beautiful hillock at the foothills of the Himalayas.
This, according to the commentary, “appeared like a glittering blue quartz crystal: it was embellished with a cool, dense, green forest grove and a stretch of ground strewn with sand, resembling a pearl net or a silver sheet, and was furnished with a clean spring of cool water.” The bhikkhus were captivated by the sight.
There were a few villages nearby, and also a small market-town ideal as alms-resort.
The monks spent a night in that idyllic grove and the next morning went to the market-town for alms.
The residents there were overjoyed to see the monks, since rarely did a community of monks come to spend the retreat in that part of the Himalayas.
These pious devotees fed the monks and begged them to stay on as their guests, promising to build each a hut near the grove on the sandy stretch so that they could spend their days and nights plunged in meditation under the ancient boughs of the majestic trees.
The bhikkhus agreed and the devotees of the area soon built little huts in the fringe of the forest and provided each hut with a wooden cot, a stool and pots of water for drinking and washing.
After the monks had settled down contentedly in these huts, each one selected a tree to meditate under, by day and by night.
Now it is said that these great trees were inhabited by tree-deities who had a celestial mansion built, appropriately using the trees as the base.
These deities, out of reverence for the meditating monks, stood aside with their families.
Virtue was revered by all, particularly so by deities, and when the monks sat under the trees, the deities, who were householders, did not like to remain above them.
The deities had thought that the monks would remain only for a night or two, and gladly bore the inconvenience.
But when day after day passed and the monks still kept occupying the bases of the trees, the deities wondered when they would go away.
They were like dispossessed villagers whose houses had been commandeered by the officials of visiting royalty and they kept watching anxiously from a distance, wondering when they would get their houses back.
These dispossessed deities discussed the situation among themselves and decided to frighten the monks away by showing them terrifying objects, by making dreadful noises and by creating a sickening stench.
Accordingly, they materialized all these terrifying conditions and afflicted the monks.
The monks soon grew pale and could no longer concentrate on their subjects of meditation.
As the deities continued to harass them, they lost even their basic mindfulness, and their brains seemed to become smothered by the oppressing visions, noise and stench.
When the monks assembled to wait upon the seniormost Elder of the group, each one recounted his experiences.
The Elder suggested: “Let us go, brethren, to the Blessed One and place our problem before him.
There are two kinds of rains' retreat — the early and the late.
Though we will be breaking the early one by leaving this place, we can always take upon ourselves the late one after meeting the Lord.” The monks agreed and they set out at once, it is said, without even informing the devotees.
By stages they arrived at Savatthi, went to the Blessed One, prostrated at his feet, and related their frightful experiences, pathetically requesting another place.
The Buddha, through his supernormal power, scanned the whole of India, but finding no place except the same spot where they could achieve spiritual liberation, told them: “Monks, go back to the same spot!
It is only by striving there that you will effect the destruction of inner taints.
Fear not!
If you want to be free from the harassment caused by the deities, learn this sutta.
It will be a theme for meditation as well as a formula for protection.
Then the Master recited the Karaniya Metta Sutta — the Hymn of Universal Love — which the monks learned by rote in the presence of the Lord.
Then they went back to the same place.
As the monks neared their forest dwellings reciting the Metta Sutta, thinking and meditating on the underlying meaning, the hearts of the deities became so charged with warm feelings of goodwill that they materialized themselves in human form and received the monks with great piety.
They took their bowls, conducted them to their rooms, caused water and food to be supplied, and then, resuming their normal form, invited them to occupy the bases of the trees and meditate without any hesitation or fear.
Further, during the three months of the rains' residence, the deities not only looked after the monks in every way but made sure that the place was completely free from any noise.
Enjoying perfect silence, by the end of the rainy season all the monks attained to the pinnacle of spiritual perfection.
Every one of the five hundred monks had become an arahant.
Indeed, such is the power intrinsic in the Metta Sutta.
Whoever with firm faith will recite the sutta, invoking the protection of the deities and meditating on metta, will not only safeguard himself in every way but will also protect all those around him, and will make spiritual progress that can be actually verified.
No harm can ever befall a person who follows the path of metta.
The Metta Sutta consists of three parts, each of which focuses on a distinct aspect of metta.
The first part covers that aspect which requires a thorough and systematic application of loving-kindness in one's day-to-day conduct.
The second part expresses loving-kindness as a distinct technique of meditation or culture of mind leading to samadhi — higher consciousness induced by absorption.
And the third part underlines a total commitment to the philosophy of universal love and its personal, social and empirical extensions — loving-kindness through all bodily, verbal and mental activities.
Metta has been identified as that specific factor which “ripens' the accumulated merit acquired by the ten ways for the acquisition of merit, such as the practice of generosity, virtue, etc.
Again, it is metta which brings to maturity the ten exalted spiritual qualities known as “perfections”.
The practice of metta thus can be likened to bringing into being a great tree, from the time the seed is sown to the time the tree is heavily laden with luscious fruits and sends forth its sweet odor far and wide, attracting myriads of creatures to it to enjoy its tasty and nutritious bounty.
The sprouting of the seed and the growth of the plant are, as it were, brought about by the first part of the sutta.
In the second part the tree, robust and developed, is fully covered with fragrant and beautiful flowers, riveting all eyes upon it.
As a pattern of behavior, the first aspect of metta makes one's life grow like a tree, useful, generous and noble.
Metta, as meditation, effects that spiritual efflorescence whereby one's entire life becomes a source of joy for all.
The third part envisages in this imagery the fruition of that process of spiritual development whereby one brings about an all-embracing application of spiritual love which can powerfully condition society as a whole and lead one to the heights of transcendental realization.
The human mind is like a mine holding an inexhaustible storehouse of spiritual power and insight.
This immense inner potential of merit can be fully exploited only by the practice of metta, as is clear from the description of metta as that “maturing force” which ripens the dormant merits.
In the Mangala Sutta it is said that only after one has effected an elevating interpersonal relationship does one choose the right environment for the merits of the past to find fruition.
This finding of fruition is exactly what metta does.
Mere avoidance of wrong company and living in a cultured environment is not enough; the mind must be cultivated by metta.
Hence the allusion to the fruition of past merit.
Ethics, in the Buddhist context, is right conduct, which brings happiness and peace of mind, and never gives rise to remorse, worry or restlessness of mind.
This is the immediate psychological benefit.
Right conduct also leads to a happy rebirth, enabling an aspirant to progress further on the onward path to spiritual liberation.
It is also the basis for progress in Dhamma here and now.
In other words, right speech, right action and right livelihood of the Buddha's Noble Eightfold Path constitute right conduct in the best sense.
Buddhist ethics is twofold: fulfillment of certain virtues, and precepts of abstinence.
Caritta, as found in the Metta Sutta, is as follows:
Varitta is covered by the next gatha:
Caritta and varitta are thus practiced through metta expressed in bodily and verbal action; the resultant inner happiness and altruistic urge is reflected by the aspirant's metta of mental action, as found in the conclusion of the stanza:
The ethics of metta thus provides not only subjective well-being, or the opportunity to progress in Dhamma here and now and to enjoy a happy rebirth in the future, but it means the giving of fearlessness and security — abhayadana and khemadana.
An analysis of the behavior-pattern and traits commended by the Metta Sutta for meaningful interaction, both with reference to persons individually and to society as a whole, provides ample insight into the great implications of the sutta for mental health.
Ability is not just mere efficiency or skill, but means doing a thing well, out of consideration for others, so that one may not cause inconvenience to others.
As an able man can become very conceited, the practitioner is advised to be “honest and upright,” while being “gentle in speech, meek and not proud” -_ indeed a perfect synthesis and an equilibrium of traits.
He who is contented is “easy to support.” Frugality, from consideration of others, is a noble trait.
To the extent that one's own needs are cut down as an example to others and as a means not to inconvenience them, to that extent one shows refinement.
The more gross and materialistic a person becomes, the more his needs increase.
The yardstick to judge the mental health of a given society is thus the diminution of needs, that is to say, the element of satisfaction.
A materialistic and egocentric life is characterized not only by an increase in wants but also by restlessness, showing itself in being over-busy and overactive and lacking in moderation and self-restraint.
Metta, which promotes the well-being of all, naturally has to be built on such qualities of sober humanism as are reflected in having a few meaningful and select tasks which conduce to the maximum well-being of all concerned.
Living a simple life as an expression of metta involves a reorientation of one's outlook and conduct, even in our competitive, pleasure-seeking and possession-minded world.
A man of simple living is gentle, yet efficient and effective, and has restraint over his sense-faculties, being moderate, frugal and controlled.
Mental culture through meditation for such a person becomes natural and effortless: hence the attribute “tranquil in his senses.
Metta in conduct includes the exercising of prudence, that is to say, practical wisdom.
It is only a sagacious and wise person who can really practice metta in all its varied forms in daily life, and through all modes of human relationship.
Self-righteousness, arising from a sense of being better or more devout than others, can be a masquerade of spiritual practice.
To be “not brazen, nor fawning on families” thus is a pointer for the person of metta not to indulge in self-righteousness of any form.
Further, the practitioner of metta is advised to refrain from any action, even social conventions, for which a wise man may reprove him as lacking in prudence or propriety.
It is not good enough that one should be good, but one should also appear to be good, in consideration not only of one's own well-being but also of others' well-being.
An exemplary life is to be lived for the benefit of all, for the welfare of society.
A person living thus now plunges into the cultivation of the all-embracing mind of metta through definite techniques of meditation as envisaged in the remaining part of the sutta.
Metta is also called a paritta — a spiritual formula capable of safeguarding one's well-being, protecting one against all dangers, and rescuing one from mishaps and misfortunes.
When the monks could not stay and meditate in that beautiful forest provided with all facilities because the deities were hostile to them, they had to leave the place.
And when they were armed with the protection of the Metta Sutta, which they recited and meditated upon throughout their journey, by the time they reached the place, the deities were full of friendly feelings and already waiting for them.
Hostility had been turned into hospitality.
The protection of paritta works both subjectively and objectively.
Subjectively, as metta cleanses and strengthens the mind, it also awakens the dormant potentials, resulting in the spiritual transmutation of the personality.
Transformed by metta, the mind is no longer haunted by greed, hatred, lust, jealousy and those other mind-polluting factors which are one's real enemy and source of misfortune.
Objectively, metta as a thought-force is capable of affecting any mind anywhere, developed or undeveloped.
The radiation of metta can not only calm a person or remove the darts of hate from within him, but in some cases can even cure him of severe illness.
It is a common experience in Buddhist countries to see how people are cured from all sorts of diseases and freed from misfortunes through the recitation of paritta.
Thus metta is a real healing power.
In this way does metta act as a paritta, a healing formula affording safeguards.
The Pali commentaries explain:
by being inoffensive and thus avoids offensiveness;
by not torturing and thus avoids torturing;
by the non-destruction and thus avoids destructiveness;
by being non-vexing and thus avoids vexing;
by projecting the thought, “May all beings be friendly and not hostile”;
by projecting the thought,” May all beings be happy and not unhappy”;
by projecting the thought, “May all beings enjoy well-being and not be distressed.
In these eight ways one loves all beings; therefore, it is called universal love.
And since one conceives this quality, it is of the mind.
And since this mind is free from all thoughts of ill-will, the aggregate of love, mind and freedom is defined as universal love leading to freedom of mind.
From the above passage it will be seen that metta implies the “outgrowing” of negative traits by actively putting into practice the correlative positive virtues.
It is only when one actively practices non-harassment towards all beings that one can outgrow the tendency to harass others.
Similarly, it is with the other qualities of inoffensiveness, non-tormenting, non-destroying and non-vexing in deed, word and thought that one can outgrow the negative traits of being offensive, of tormenting others, of destructiveness and of vexatiousness.
Over and above such positive conduct and principled way of life, one further cultivates the mind through that specific technique of meditation called metta-bhavana, which generates powerful thoughts of spiritualized love that grow boundless, making consciousness itself infinite and universal.
Thoughts that wish all beings to be friendly and never hostile, happy and never unhappy, to enjoy well-being and never be distressed, imply not only sublimity and boundlessness, but also utter freedom of mind.
Hence the appropriateness of the expression “universal love leading to freedom of mind.
As for the meanings of the five aspects opposed by metta, harassment is the desire to oppress or damage; offensiveness is the tendency to hurt or injure; torturing is a synonym of the sadistic tendency to torment, subjecting others to pain or misery; destructiveness is to put an end to or to finish, the trait of the extremist and the iconoclast; vexing is to tax, trouble or cause others worry and strain.
Each of these tendencies is rooted in antipathy and malevolence, and provides a contrast with metta, both as a mode of conduct and as a psychological state or attitude of mind.
The substitution of a negative trait by the opposed positive course implies a very developed and mature approach to life.
The ability to remain non-harassing, inoffensive, non-torturing, non-destructive and non-vexing means a very refined, beautiful and loving mode of behavior in a world where interaction between human beings creates so much tension and misery.
According to the Visuddhimagga, metta is a “solvent” that “melts” not only one's own psychic pollutants of anger, resentment and offensiveness, but also those of others.
Since it takes the approach of friendship, even the hostile one turns into a friend.
Metta is characterized as that which “promotes welfare.” Its function is to “prefer well-being” rather than ill.
It manifests as a force that “removes annoyance” and its proximate cause is the tendency to see the good side of things and beings and never the faults.
Metta succeeds when it loves, and it fails when it degenerates into worldly affection.
It will be clear from this analysis that only when one tends to see the good in people, and prefers the welfare of others, and accordingly is inoffensive and actively promotes well-being, does metta function as a solvent.
It is said that the ultimate purpose of metta is to attain transcendental insight, and if that is not possible, it will at least effect a rebirth in the sublime sphere of the Brahma world, apart from bringing inner peace and a healthy state of mind here and now.
Hence the Buddha's assurance in the Metta Sutta:
Love wards off ill-will, which is the most damaging of emotions.
Hence it is said: “For this is the escape from ill-will, friends, that is to say, the freedom of mind wrought by universal love”.
In the practice of metta it is important to understand the emotions which nullify metta either by being similar or being dissimilar.
The Visuddhimagga calls them “the two enemies — the near and the remote.” Greed, lust, worldly affection, sensuality — all these are said to be the “near enemies” because they are similar in tendencies.
The lustful also sees the “good side” or “beauty,” and therefore gets involved.
Love should be protected from it lest the masquerades of these emotions deceive the meditator.
Ill-will, anger and hatred, being dissimilar emotions, therefore constitute the “remote enemy.” The remote enemy can easily be distinguished so one need not be afraid of it, but one should overcome it by projecting a higher force, that of love.
But one has to be wary of the near enemy because it creates self-deception, which is the worst thing that can happen to an individual.
It is said that metta begins only when there is zeal in the form of a desire to act.
Having commenced through earnest effort, it can be continued only when the five mental hindrances — sensual desire, ill-will, sloth and torpor, restlessness and worry, and doubt — are put down.
Metta reaches consummation with the attainment of absorption.
There are various ways of practicing metta-bhavana, the meditation on universal love.
Three of the principal methods will be explained here.
These instructions, based on canonical and commentarial sources, are intended to explain the practice of metta-meditation in a clear, simple and direct way so that anyone who is earnest about taking up the practice will have no doubts about how to proceed.
For full instructions on the theory and practice of metta-bhavana the reader is referred to the Visuddhimagga, Chapter IX.
Sit down in a comfortable posture in a quiet place — a shrine room, a quiet room, a park, or any other place providing privacy and silence.
Keeping the eyes closed, repeat the word “metta” a few times and mentally conjure up its significance — love as the opposite of hatred, resentment, malevolence, impatience, pride and arrogance, and as a profound feeling of good will, sympathy and kindness promoting the happiness and well-being of others.
Now visualize your own face in a happy and radiant mood.
Every time you see your face in the mirror, see yourself in a happy mood and put yourself in this mood during meditation.
A person in a happy mood cannot become angry or harbor negative thoughts and feelings.
Having visualized yourself in a happy frame of mind, now charge yourself with the thought; “May I be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may I live happily.” As you suffuse yourself in this way with the positive thought-force of love, you become like a filled vessel, its contents ready to overflow in all directions.
Next, visualize your meditation teacher, if living; if not, choose some other living teacher or revered person.
See him in a happy frame of mind and project the thought: “May my teacher be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may he live happily.
Then think of other people who are to be revered, and who are also living — monks, teachers, parents and elders, and intensely spread towards each one of them the thought of metta in the manner mentioned already: “May they be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
The visualization must be clear and the thought-radiation must be “willed” well.
If the visualization is hurried or the wishing is performed in a perfunctory or mechanical way, the practice will be of little avail, for then it will be merely an intellectual pastime of thinking about metta.
One must clearly understand that to think about metta is one thing, and to do metta, to actively project the will-force of loving-kindness, is quite another.
Note that only a living person is to be visualized, not a dead one.
The reason for this is that the dead person, having changed form, will be out of the focus of metta-projection.
The object of metta always is a living being, and the thought-force will become ineffective if the object is not alive.
Having radiated thoughts of metta in the order already mentioned — oneself, the meditation teacher and other revered persons — one should now visualize, one by one, one's dear ones beginning with the members of one's family, suffusing each one with abundant rays of loving-kindness.
Charity begins at home: if one cannot love one's own people one will not be able to love others.
While spreading metta towards one's own family members, care should be taken to think of a very dear one, like one's husband or wife, at the end of this circle.
The reason for this is that the intimacy between husband and wife introduces the element of worldly love which defiles metta.
Spiritual love must be the same towards all.
Similarly, if one has had a temporary misunderstanding or quarrel with any family member or relative, he or she should be visualized at a later stage to avoid recalling the unpleasant incidents.
Next, one should visualize neutral people, people for whom one has neither like nor dislike, such as one's neighbors, colleagues in one's place of work, bare acquaintances, and so on.
Having radiated loving thoughts on everyone in the neutral circle, one should now visualize persons for whom one has dislike, hostility or prejudice, even those with whom one may have had a temporary misunderstanding.
As one visualizes disliked persons, to each one must mentally repeat: “I have no hostility towards him/her, may he/she also not have any hostility towards me.
May he/she be happy!
Thus, as one visualizes the persons of the different circles, one “breaks the barrier” caused by likes and dislikes, attachment and hatred.
When one is able to regard an enemy without ill-will and with the same amount of goodwill that one has for a very dear friend, metta then acquires a sublime impartiality, elevating the mind upward and outward as if in a spiral movement of ever-widening circles until it becomes all-embracing.
By visualization is meant “calling to mind” or visualizing certain objects, such as a person, a certain area or a direction or a category of beings.
In other words it means imagining the people towards whom thoughts of love are to be projected or spread.
For instance, you imagine your father and visualize his face in a very happy and radiant mood and project the thought towards the visualized image, mentally saying: “May he be happy!
May he be free from disease or trouble!
May he enjoy good health.” You may use any thought which promotes his well-being.
By radiation is meant, as explained above, the projection of certain thoughts promoting the well-being of those persons towards whom one's mind is directed.
A metta-thought is a powerful thought-force.
It can actually effect what has been willed.
For wishing well-being is willing and thus is creative action.
In fact, all that man has created in different fields is the result of what he has willed, whether it is a city or a hydro-electric project, a rocket going to the moon, a weapon of destruction, or an artistic or literary masterpiece.
Radiation of thoughts of metta, too, is the development of a willpower that can effect whatever is willed.
It is not a rare experience to see diseases cured or misfortunes warded off, even from a great distance, by the application of the thought-force of metta.
But this thought-force has to be generated in a very specific and skillful way, following a certain sequence.
The formula for radiating metta that is used here has come down from the ancient Patisambhidamagga: “May they be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily”.
The commentarial explanation of these terms is highly significant.
“Free from hostility” means absence of hostility whether aroused on account of oneself or others, or on account of oneself because of others or of others because of oneself or others.
One's anger towards oneself might take the form of self-pity, remorse or a gripping sense of guilt.
It can be conditioned by interaction with others.
Hostility combines anger and enmity.
“Free from affliction” means absence of pain or physical suffering.
“Free from distress” means the absence of mental suffering, anguish or anxiety, which often follows upon hostility or bodily affliction.
It is only when one is free from hostility, affliction and distress that one “lives happily,” that is, conducts oneself with ease and happiness.
Thus all these terms are interconnected.
By order is meant visualizing objects, one after the other, by taking the path of least resistance, in a graduated sequence, which progressively widens the circle and therewith the mind itself.
The Visuddhimagga is emphatic about this order.
According to Acariya Buddhaghosa, one must start the meditation on metta by visualizing oneself, and thereafter a person for whom one has reverence, then one's dear ones, then neutral people, then hostile persons.
As one radiates thoughts of love in this order, the mind breaks all barriers between oneself, a revered one, a dear one, a neutral one and a hostile one.
Everyone comes to be looked upon equally with the eye of loving-kindness.
In the Visuddhimagga Acariya Buddhaghosa gives a very apt analogy for the breaking of the barriers: “Suppose bandits were to come to the meditator who is sitting in a place with a respected, a dear, a neutral, and a hostile or wicked person and demand, 'Friend, we want one of you for the purpose of offering human sacrifice.' If the meditator were to think, 'Let him take this one or that one,' he has not broken down the barriers.
And even if he were to think, 'Let none of these be taken, but let them take me,' even then he has not broken down the barriers since he seeks his own harm, and metta meditation signifies the well-being of all.
But when he does not see the need for anyone to be given to the bandits and impartially projects the thought of love towards all, including the bandits, it is then that he would break down the barriers.
The first method of practicing meditation on metta employs the projection of loving thoughts to specific individuals in order of increasing remoteness from oneself.
The second method presents an impersonal mode of radiating metta which makes the mind truly all-embracing, as suggested by the Pali term metta-cetovimutti, “the liberation of mind through universal love.” The unliberated mind is imprisoned within the walls of egocentricity, greed, hatred, delusion, jealousy and meanness.
As long as the mind is in the grip of these defiling and limiting mental factors, for so long it remains insular and fettered.
By breaking these bonds, metta liberates the mind, and the liberated mind naturally grows boundless and immeasurable.
Just as the earth cannot be rendered “earthless,” even so the mind of metta cannot be limited.
After completing the radiation of metta towards selected persons, when the mind breaks the barriers existing between oneself and revered ones, beloved ones, friends, neutral ones and hostile ones, the meditator now embarks on the great voyage of impersonal radiation, even as an ocean-worthy ship voyages through the vast, measureless ocean, nevertheless retaining a route and a goal as well.
The technique is as follows.
Imagine the people residing in your house as forming an aggregate, then embrace all of them within your heart, radiating the metta thoughts: “May all those dwelling in this house be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.” Having visualized one's own house in this manner, one must now visualize the next house, and all its residents, and then the next house, and the next, and so on, until all the houses in that street are similarly covered by all-embracing loving-kindness.
Now the meditator should take up the next street, and the next, until the entire neighborhood or village is covered.
Thereafter extension by extension, direction-wise, should be clearly visualized and spread with metta-rays in abundant measure.
In this way the entire town or the city is to be covered; then the district and the entire state should be covered and radiated with thoughts of metta.
Next, one should visualize state after state, starting with one's own state, then the rest of the states in the different directions, the east, south, west and north.
Thus one should cover the whole of one's country, geographically visualizing the people of this land regardless of class, race, sect or religion.
Think: “May everyone in this great land abide in peace and well-being!
May there be no war, no strife, no misfortune, no maladies!
Radiant with friendliness and good fortune, with compassion and wisdom, may all those in this great country enjoy peace and plenty.
One should now cover the entire continent, country by country, in the eastern, southern, western and northern directions.
Geographically imagining each country and the people therein according to their looks, one should radiate in abundant measure thoughts of metta: “May they be happy!
May there be no strife and discord!
May goodwill and understanding prevail!
May peace be unto all!
Thereafter one should take up all the continents — Africa, Asia, Australia, Europe, North and South America — visualizing country by country and people by people, covering the entire globe.
Imagine yourself at a particular point of the globe and then project powerful rays of metta, enveloping one direction of the globe, then another, then another and so on until the whole globe is flooded and thoroughly enveloped with glowing thoughts of universal love.
One should now project into the vastness of space powerful beams of metta towards all beings living in other realms, first in the four cardinal directions — east, south, west and north — then in the intermediary directions — northeast, southeast, southwest, northwest — and then above and below, covering all the ten directions with abundant and measureless thoughts of universal love.
According to the cosmology of Buddhism there are numberless world- systems inhabited by infinitely varied categories of beings in different stages of evolution.
Our earth is only a speck in our world-system, which again is a minute dot in the universe with its innumerable world-systems.
Towards all beings everywhere one should radiate thoughts of boundless love.
This is developed in the next method of practice, the universalization of metta.
The universalization of metta is effected in these three specific modes:
According to the Patisambhidamagga, the generalized radiation of metta is practiced in five ways, the specified radiation in seven ways, and the directional radiation in ten ways.
These ten directional ways may be combined with the five categories of general radiation and with the seven categories of specified radiation, as we will show.
In each of these modes of practice, any of the four phrases of the standard metta formula — “May they be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily” — may be used as the thought of radiation.
Thus four types of thought applied to five, seven, and objects of metta amount to modes of radiation.
Any of these can be used as a vehicle for attaining absorption through the technique of metta-bhavana.

The five ways of generalized radiation are as follows:
“May all those that breathe be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all creatures be free from hostility, free from affliction.
free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all those with individual existence be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all those who are embodied be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
The seven ways of specified radiation are as follows:
“May all males be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all the Noble Ones be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all worldlings be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all gods be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all human beings be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all those in states of woe be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
The ten ways of directional radiation involve sending thoughts of metta to all beings in the ten directions.
This method, in its basic form, is applied to the class of beings, the first of the five generalized objects of metta.
But it can be developed further by extending metta through each of the five ways of generalized radiation and the seven ways of specified radiation, as we will see.
“May all beings in the western direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the northern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the southern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the northeastern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the southwestern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the northwestern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings in the southeastern direction be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings below be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
“May all beings above be free from hostility, free from affliction, free from distress; may they live happily.
In this technique of universalizing metta, each of the five categories of generalized radiation refers to the total dimension of animate, sentient, or organic existence, belonging to the three mundane spheres, namely, the kamaloka, the sphere of sensory existence where desire is the primal motivation; the rupaloka, the realm of the radiant Brahma gods with subtle form; and the arupaloka, the realm of the formless beings with pure mental life.
Whether it is a “being,” or that which “breathes,” or a “creature,” or that which has “individual existence,” or that which “is embodied” — all refer to the totality of animate existence, the distinction being that each term expresses comprehensively a certain aspect of life in its entirety.
While visualizing each category one should keep in mind the specific aspect expressed by its designation.
If one trains the mind in the manner of a “mental drill” after having exercised it with the first two methods, the meaning of the five unspecified or generalized terms will become clear.
By the time one has completed the two methods, the consciousness will be sufficiently developed and all-embracing.
And with such a consciousness, when each of these universal concepts is grasped, the universalization becomes effortless.
It may be pointed out that visualization of each of these is no longer of individual objects, but of a concept which is total and all-embracing.
The radiation in this case becomes a “flowing out” of love in abundant measure towards the conceptualized mental object — all beings, all creatures, etc.
Each of the seven categories of specified radiation comprehends a part of the total range of life, and in combination with the others expresses the whole.
Itthi refers to the female principle in general, incorporating all females among the devas, human beings, animals, demons, spirits and denizens of hell.
Purisa means the male principle evident in all the spheres of existence, and both itthi and purisa together comprehend the entirety.
Again, from another angle, the ariyas or the spiritually transformed seers, and the anariyas or worldlings bound to the wheel of becoming, comprehend the totality.
Ariyas are those who have entered the transcendental path; they are to be found in the human world and the celestial worlds and therefore they constitute the tip of the pyramid of sentient existence.
Worldlings are in all the spheres of existence and constitute the body of the pyramid from the base to the tip, so to say.
Likewise, the three categories of deva, manussa and vinipatika — gods, human beings, and those fallen into states of woe — comprehend the totality in terms of cosmological status.
Devas, the radiant celestial beings, comprise the upper layer, human beings the middle layer, and vinipatikas the lower layer of the cosmological mound.
The “mental drill” in terms of directional radiation, the radiation of metta to the above twelve categories of beings in the ten directions, makes the universalization of metta a most exhilarating experience.
As one mentally places oneself in a particular direction and then lets love flow out and envelop the entire region, one literally transports the mind to the sublimest heights leading to samadhi, concentrated absorption of the mind.
When one projects this total wish for others to dwell happily, free from hostility, affliction and distress, not only does one elevate oneself to a level where true happiness prevails, but one sets in motion powerful vibrations conducing to happiness, cooling off enmity, relieving affliction and distress.
It will be seen, therefore, that universal love simultaneously infuses well-being and happiness and removes the mental and physical suffering caused by the mental pollutants of hostility, enmity and anger.
One sleeps happily; one wakes happily; one does not suffer bad dreams; one is dear to human beings; one is dear to non-human beings; the gods protect one; no fire or poison or weapon harms one; one's mind gets quickly concentrated; the expression of one's face is serene; one dies unperturbed; and even if one fails to attain higher states, one will at least reach the state of the Brahma world.
Monks, when universal love leading to liberation of mind is ardently practiced, developed, unrelentingly resorted to, used as one's vehicle, made the foundation of one's life, fully established, well consolidated and perfected, then these eleven blessings may be expected.
Metta cetovimutti — universal love leading to liberation of mind — signifies the attainment of samadhi, absorption based upon meditation on metta.
Since metta liberates the mind from the bondage of hatred and anger, selfishness, greed and delusion, it constitutes a state of liberation.
Every time one practices metta, for however short a period, one enjoys a measure of freedom of mind.
Measureless freedom of mind, however, is to be expected only when metta is fully developed into samadhi.
The various applications of metta, as indicated by the terms “practiced, developed,” etc., signify a well-structured force brought about not only by specific hours of meditation, but also by converting all one's deeds, words and thoughts into acts of metta.
By “practiced” is meant the ardent practice of metta, not as a mere intellectual exercise, but by committing oneself wholeheartedly to it and making it life's guiding philosophy, something which conditions one's attitudes, outlook and conduct.
By “developed” is implied the various processes of inner culture and mental integration effected by the practice of meditation on universal love.
Since meditation brings about unification of mind by integrating the various faculties, it is called development of mind.
The Buddha taught that the entire mental world is developed by the practice of meditation on universal love, leading to mind's liberation and the transformation of the personality.
“Unrelentingly resorted to” emphasizes repeated practice of metta all through one's waking hours, in deed, word and thought, and maintaining the tempo of metta-awareness throughout.
Repeated action means generation of power.
All the five spiritual powers, namely, faith, vigor, mindfulness, concentration and wisdom, are exercised and cultivated by the repeated practice of metta.
“Used as one's vehicle” signifies a “total commitment” to the ideal of metta as the only valid method for the solution of interpersonal problems and as an instrument for spiritual growth.
When metta is the only “mode of communication,” the only vehicle, life automatically is a “divine abiding” as mentioned in the Metta Sutta.
“Made the foundation of one's life” is making metta the basis of one's existence in all respects.
It becomes the chief resort, the haven, the refuge of one's life, making one's refuge in the Dhamma a reality.
“Fully established” refers to a life that is firmly rooted in metta, has anchorage in metta under all circumstances.
When metta is effortlessly practiced, not even by error does one violate the laws of universal love.
“Well consolidated” means one is so habituated to metta that one remains effortlessly immersed in it, both in meditation as well as in one's day-to-day conduct.
“Perfected” indicates a mode of completeness through total adherence and development, leading to that fully integrated state in which one enjoys perfect well-being and spiritual felicity, indicated by the passage detailing the eleven blessings of metta.
The benefits of metta are indeed great and comprehensive.
For a follower of the Buddha this is one supreme instrument that can be wielded with advantage everywhere.
The subjective benefit of universal love is evident enough.
The enjoyment of well-being, good health, peace of mind, radiant features, and the affection and goodwill of all are indeed great blessings of life accruing from the practice of metta-meditation.
But what is even more wonderful is the impact which metta has on the environment and on other beings, including animals and devas, as the Pali scriptures and commentaries illustrate with a number of memorable stories.
Once the Buddha was returning from his almsround together with his retinue of monks.
As they were nearing the prison, in consideration of a handsome bribe from Devadatta, the Buddha's evil and ambitious cousin, the executioner let loose the fierce elephant Nalagiri, which was used for the execution of criminals.
As the intoxicated elephant rushed towards the Buddha trumpeting fearfully, the Buddha projected powerful thoughts of metta towards it.
Venerable Ananda, the Buddha's attendant, was so deeply concerned about the Buddha's safety that he ran in front of the Buddha to shield him, but the Buddha asked him to stand aside since the projection of love itself was quite sufficient.
The impact of the Buddha's metta-radiation was so immediate and overwhelming that by the time the animal neared the Buddha it was completely tamed as though a drunken wretch had suddenly become sober by the magical power of a spell.
The tusker, it is said, bowed down in reverence in the way trained elephants do in a circus.
The Visuddhimagga records the case of one landlord of Pataliputra, Visakha by name.
It seems he had heard that the island of Sri Lanka was a veritable garden of Dhamma with its innumerable shrines and stupas adorning the isle.
And blessed with a favorable climate, the people were highly righteous, following the Teaching of the Buddha with great fervor and sincerity.
Visakha decided to visit Sri Lanka and spend the rest of his life there as a monk.
Accordingly, he made over his great fortune to his wife and children and left home with a single gold coin.
He stopped for some time at the port town of Tamralipi waiting for a ship, and during that time engaged himself in business and made a thousand gold coins.
Eventually he reached Sri Lanka and went to the capital city of Anuradhapura.
There he went to the famous Mahavihara and asked the abbot's permission to enter the Sangha.
As he was led to the chapter house for the ordination ceremony, the purse containing the thousand gold coins dropped out from under his belt.
When asked, “What is it?” he said, “I have a thousand gold coins, sir.” When he was told that a monk cannot possess any money, he said, “I don't want to possess it but I wanted to distribute it among all who come for this ceremony.” Accordingly he opened his purse and strewed the entire yard of the chapter house, saying, “Let no one who has come to witness Visakha's ordination depart empty-handed.
After spending five years with his teacher, he now decided to go to the famous Cittalapabbata forest, where a good number of monks with supernatural powers lived.
Accordingly, he went to the jungle-monastery of Cittalapabbata.
On his way he came to a fork in the road and stood wondering which way to turn.
Since he had been practicing metta-meditation assiduously, he found a certain deva living in the rock there, holding out a hand pointing the road to him.
After reaching the Cittalapabbata jungle-monastery, he occupied one of the huts.
Having stayed there for four months, as he was thinking of leaving the next morning, he heard somebody weeping, and when he asked, “Who is that?” the deva living in the manila tree at the end of the walkway said, “Venerable sir, I am Maniliya.
“Why are you weeping?
“Because you are thinking of going away from here.
“What good does my living here do you?
“Venerable sir, so long as you live here, the devas and other non-human beings treat each other with kindness.
When you are gone, they will again start their wrangling and quarrels.
“Well, if my living here makes all of you live at peace, it is good.” And so he stayed on for another four months.
It is said that when he again thought of going, again the deity wept.
So this Elder stayed on permanently and attained Nibbana there.
Such is the impact of metta-bhavana on others, even among invisible beings.
There is also the famous story of the cow.
It seems that a cow was giving milk to her calf in a forest.
A hunter wanting to kill her flung a spear which, when it struck her body, bounced off like a palm leaf.
So mightily powerful is metta — loving-kindness.
This is not the case of one who has developed metta-samadhi.
It is a simple case of the consciousness of love for the offspring.
Indeed, the power of metta can never be told enough.
The commentaries to the Pali canon are replete with stories, not only of monks, but also of ordinary people who overcame various dangers, including weapons and poison, through the sheer strength of metta — selfless love.
But let not metta be mistaken as a mere sentiment.
It is the power of the strong.
If the leaders from different walks of life were to give metta a fair trial, no principle or guideline to action would be found to possess greater efficiency or fruitfulness in all spheres.
In everything man is the ultimate unit.
If man decides to substitute metta as a policy of action for aggression and ill-will, the world will turn into a veritable abode of peace.
For it is only when man shall have peace within himself, and boundless goodwill for others, that peace in the world will become real and enduring.
Ven.
Acharya Buddharakkhita is founder and president of the Maha Bodhi Society in Bangalore, India.
In he was a member of the editorial board of the Sixth Buddhist Synod in Rangoon, which brought out a complete edition of the Pali canon.
Since then he has written numerous books and translations of Buddhist texts, which have been published in many countries.
Best known is his classic English rendering of the Dhammapada, published by the BPS under the title The Dhammapada: The Buddha's Path of Wisdom.
He also edits and publishes a monthly magazine, Dhamma.
An internationally recognized meditation master, he has lived and taught abroad, and founded the Buddhayoga Meditation Society in the United States.
He has also taught Buddhology at the Nalanda Pali Postgraduate Institute, Bihar University.
Firmly committed to putting Buddhist principles into practice, he has achieved distinction for multi-faceted humanitarian activities in his native India.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
WEBU SAYADAW: There are duties towards the cetiya, the Bodhi tree, towards teachers, parents, wife and children.
If we fulfill these, we practice good conduct and this is morality.
While we are fulfilling our duties, is it not possible to practice mindfulness of breathing also?
If we do not fulfill these duties, can we say that our morality is complete?
If our morality is not perfect, can we expect to experience the happiness we aspire for?
If we are not happy, if our mind is not concentrated, we can't attain insight-wisdom.
Today is Uposatha day.
At dawn you all woke up with the thought, “Today is Uposatha day,” and you undertook to keep the eight precepts.
Have you been mindful continuously since then?
DISCIPLE: No, sir, we haven't.
S: How much of this time have you spent being aware of the in-breath and out-breath?
D: At times we are aware, sir, at times we are not, sir.
S: How long did your mind stay with the object and how much time did you lose?… As you remain silent, I assume that you have been able to keep up your awareness all the time.
D: No, sir, we haven't.
S: In that case I have to ask you some more questions.
How many times does your mind dissolve in a flash of lightning?
D: Billions and billions of times, sir.
S: So it arises and disintegrates billions of times.
Every time the mind arises it takes some object, pleasant or unpleasant, liked or disliked.
Is there a time when this constant continuous stream of mental objects is cut off or interrupted?
D: No, sir, the mind always takes an object.
S: Yes, and these good and bad friends arise in your mind due to the skillful and unskillful deeds or kamma you have done in the past.
Now, if a pleasant object which we call a good friend enters the stream of consciousness, what happens?
D: Liking or greed arises, sir.
S: If liking arises, is this good or bad?
D: It is bad, sir.
S: But if a bad friend, an unpleasant mind-object arises, what happens then?
D: Dislike or aversion arises, sir.
S: If we allow aversion or dislike to arise, is this skillful or unskillful?
D: It is unskillful, sir.
S: So, if we accept the agreeable mind-objects, liking, craving, wanting and lust arise and we are creating unskillful acts which lead to the four lower planes of existence.
But if unpleasant thoughts or images arise and we take possession of them, then worry, grief, suffering, anger and aversion arise and these mental states lead to the lower planes too.
Now, at what time does no pleasant or unpleasant thought or image or sound or sight or taste or touch arise?
D: There is no such time, sir.
The mind always takes an object.
S: And all these objects arising in our minds are the results of the deeds you have done in the past, in samsara.
Be an object pleasant or unpleasant, when it arises, what do you normally do?
D: We react unskillfully and create bad karma for ourselves, sir.
S: If a pleasant object arises in the mind, liking, craving, wanting arise.
This craving, what is it like?
Is it not like a fire?
Craving is like a fire.
What about disliking, aversion and hatred?
D: That is also like a fire, sir.
S: So, whatever arises, we have to suffer the burning of fire, don't we?
D: Yes, sir.
S: But of course, if greed and aversion have to arise, let them arise.
If we are practicing the teachings of the Buddha, can they affect us?
While we are practicing meditation on the breath greed and aversion don't get an opportunity to possess our minds.
The teachings of the Buddha resemble the great lake Anotatta.
If the fires of greed or aversion or any other fires fall into this lake, they are extinguished and we don't have to suffer their scorching heat any longer.
Only if we know each arisal of the mind in the billions of times it arises in a split-second, can we justly say that we have achieved real wisdom and insight.
Mind and body arise billions of times in the wink of an eye, and with it your good and bad friends.
If you are not watchful, these good and bad deeds of yours will again be accumulated in you billions of times.
Now, who is responsible for the pleasant and unpleasant sensations that continuously arise in your body?
D: We are responsible for them ourselves, sir.
S: The debts you have accumulated in the incalculably long period of samsara are with you.
If you don't apply the Buddha's teachings and practice, you will accumulate the same debts again and again, billions of times in every split-second.
Are you able to count these debts?
D: No, sir, they are incalculable.
S: Therefore you should apply this practice the Buddha taught.
If you don't accept what arises and disintegrates of its own accord then your accumulated debts will diminish and no new debts will be accumulated.
If you realize this arising and vanishing for yourselves, then you don't make new debts and you get rid of the old ones.
Thus you attain to the higher wisdom.
This technique of being aware of in-breath and out-breath can be practiced anywhere.
You can practice it while you are alone or in company, while you are sitting, walking, standing or lying down.
Wherever you are you can practice it.
Now, do you have to spend money in order to practice this meditation?
D: No, sir.
S: Do you have to take time off work to practice?
D: No, sir.
S: In that case, what is so difficult about it?
Will this practice make you feel tired?
D: No, sir.
S: If you make great profit in your business and people ask you “How much gold, how much silver have you got,” will you tell them?
D: No, sir.
S: And why not?
D: One shouldn't tell others such things, sir.
S: Now, which jewel is more precious, gold and silver, or the Dhamma?
D: The Dhamma is more precious, sir.
S: Then don't talk to others about your achievements.
What is the time now?
D: Seven p.m., sir.
S: How much time have you got left until sunrise?
D: About ten hours, sir.
S: Do you think that you can practice meditation for that long without a break?
Work hard to rid yourselves of your debts.
The efforts of the past and meritorious deeds performed in the past are giving their good results.
WEBU SAYADAW: You have taken the precepts.
Now that you have undertaken the practice of the perfection of morality, fulfill it.
What you realize when you penetrate the Four Noble Truths is called “Bodhi,” awakening.
You are born at a good time and in a good form of existence.
Now then, emulate the wise disciples of the Buddha and put forth effort as strong as theirs, so that you may attain the awakening to which you aspired.
Those who received the teachings from the Buddha himself worked ceaselessly in all four postures sitting, standing, lying down and walking — and thus attained enlightenment.
The human beings, Devas, and Brahmas who achieved their aspiration for awakening on just one occasion cannot be counted in hundreds, thousands, hundreds of thousands, or millions.
Sometimes in one split-second an incalculably large number of beings achieved their aspirations.
From the time the Buddha attained full awakening, beings have been able to attain Nibbana.
But it is not only during the lifetime of the Buddha that beings can attain Nibbana.
Nibbana can be attained as long as the teachings of the Buddha are available.
The attainment of Nibbana is not bliss just for a brief moment.
It will have lasting effects for the rest of the round of birth and death, samsara.
What the Buddha taught is the way out of suffering.
You don't have to know a vast amount.
If you practice one technique properly with strong and steadfast effort, you will come to know for yourselves that you are people of great strength.
You will not have to ask others about the teachings, and you will not even have to tell others that you are practicing.
Once you have established effort, you will not only know what good teachers told you, but you will clearly know for yourselves how the viriya iddhipada factor arises in a split-second.
You do have the fortune of being able to follow the good advice of the Buddha as his disciples did in the past.
When I increase effort, then the viriya iddhipada factor will increase also.
And then what will happen?
I will think: “With just this much effort, the viriya iddhipada factor has arisen to this extent.
But my energy is not exhausted yet.
There is still more.
I shall increase my effort further.
And the will to increase effort will arise.
At this same instant effort increases.
As effort increases the viriya iddhipada factor becomes stronger.
When these factors have thus arisen to a very high standard, then all your aspirations can be fulfilled.
Do not take rest.
Do not take breaks or time off.
Work continuously.
If you develop continuously, you will become happier and happier.
In this way the disciples of the Buddha became very happy, never getting enough of this happiness.
Do you understand?
If a king rules over a country, does he say complacently, “This one country is sufficient for me”?
DISCIPLE: No, sir, he doesn't remain satisfied.
SAYADAW: And if he rules a whole continent and has become emperor, is he satisfied then?
D: No, sir, he isn't.
S: If he isn't satisfied, what will he do?
D: He will try to acquire more and more territory, sir.
S: When a man is emperor over a continent, he wants the whole world.
When he gets the whole world, he wants to become a universal monarch.
Once he is a universal monarch will he say, “This is enough” and be satisfied?
D: No, sir, he will not be satisfied.
S: All those who are perfect in their faith and have performed the highest form of generosity and demonstrated the greatest form of respect can't be satisfied.
They will practice meditation and will gradually attain the stages of absorption.
Once they are capable of entering into the states of Nibbana, only this happiness will count for them.
Nibbana is the highest and noblest form of happiness there is.
One can never experience enough of the highest and noblest form of happiness, it is said.
And not only the direct disciples of the Buddha were able to achieve it; if you put forth continuous effort to the same extent that the wise of old did, you too will experience this highest happiness, even now.
Then you will know: “I experienced a happiness that doesn't last only for a moment, or just for a lifetime, but for the remainder of my time in the cycle of birth and death.
And why did I attain this happiness?
Because I was born into the right form of existence, because I was born at the right time, because I put forth strong effort.
At any time, when human beings, Devas and Brahmas accepted and practiced the teachings, they were successful.
In this context, “at any time” means that whenever one undertakes this practice, he obtains understanding.
The time span in which the teachings of the Buddha are available is very important and special: if you want to attain Nibbana you can, at any time.
Even now it is easy.
Don't say, “This is not my cup of tea,” or “This isn't suitable for me,” or “I won't get anything out of this.” You do have noble aspirations and you can fulfill them now.
So if you say to yourselves, “I shall take up the practice right now,” don't you think you can get real understanding?
You can get it practicing in a group or by yourself.
Seek for yourself.
Take up one of the techniques that the Buddha taught and practice it with one-pointedness and strong effort.
Establish awareness of the in-breath and out-breath and the spot where the air touches while breathing in and out.
When you are thus aware of the spot, can there still be worry, anxiety and fear?
Can there still be greed, aversion and delusion?
And when you concentrate your mind in this way, you revere the teachings, don't you?
D: Yes, sir.
S: You will understand that the degree you come out of suffering depends on how much effort you put in and on how strongly the viriya iddhipada factor arises out of this effort.
D: We understand, sir.
S: There will be no more room for doubt because you have now practiced the technique and experienced it for yourselves, and so you know it.
You will think, “Even in such a short time I am able to come out of suffering immediately to such an extent, but my strength is not yet exhausted.” And the will to exert still more effort arises, and you will become happy with a happiness of which you will never tire.
Now tell me.
There is such a thing as a universal monarch in the world, isn't there?
D: Yes, sir, there is.
S: When the time is right for a universal monarch to arise, will no one notice this fact?
D: We don't know, sir.
S: About a hundred years before the universal monarch arises the good news goes around and a commotion arises.
Then all set their hopes on the universal monarch and yearn for him.
They are happy, and when he is born they rejoice.
What are the circumstances necessary for a universal monarch to arise?
D: Only when the “jewel of the wheel” arrives, can someone become universal monarch.
S: Yes, before the universal monarch wheel-jewel arises he is called an embryonic universal monarch, but even then his authority, wealth and power are considerable.
Will he say, “Let the universal wheel-jewel not arise, what I have got is quite enough for me”?
D: No, sir, he won't.
S: And why not?
D: Because he wants to become still greater through the arisal of the wheel-jewel.
S: So, when will the wheel-jewel come?
D: It will come at the right time, sir.
S: The wheel-jewel arises due to the merit the embryonic universal monarch has accumulated.
But there are still duties for him, and having understood these duties and keeping them in mind, he has to fulfill them.
Now, say there is an embryonic universal monarch.
His merit is ripe, but he doesn't fulfill the duties that are the final cause for his becoming a universal monarch.
Will the wheel-jewel arise of its own accord?
D: No, sir, it will not arise by itself, I think.
He will have to exercise himself further.
S: Now let's say you were the embryonic universal monarch waiting for the wheel-jewel to arise so that you will reign over the whole world.
You will still have to practice further.
You have to keep precepts.
But would you say, “Well, I don't need the wheel-jewel anymore.
I am quite satisfied with the riches and splendor I have attained”?
D: No, sir.
S: You will not give up at this point, because if you become a universal monarch you will be able to reign according to the Dhamma so that the whole world will be happy.
Do you think the people of your provinces will say to you, “O embryonic universal monarch, you have got enough power”?
D: No, sir, certainly not.
S: So, what will the people say?
D: “Work hard and fulfill your duties,” they will say, sir.
S: And why this?
D: Because they want the wheel-jewel to arise, sir.
S: Yes, you see, because of the power of the wheel-jewel of the universal monarch, all will experience many different types of happiness.
But when one has become a universal monarch, will this give him results for the rest of the cycle of birth and death?
How long can he be a universal monarch?
D: Only as long as the wheel-jewel is there, sir.
S: Yes, even a universal monarch can be on his throne at best for one life-span.
But now the Buddha's teachings are available.
If all the good beings who have taken birth in a happy existence take up the practice of the Buddha's teachings, they can attain even to awakening, as they aspired.
But it is as with the embryonic universal monarch: he doesn't become a universal monarch just enjoying the royal splendor that he has already achieved; he will only become a universal ruler when he has fulfilled the duties and disciplines necessary to obtain the wheel-jewel.
Now, when do you want to attain Nibbana?
D: Very soon, sir.
S: What does that mean?
D: Now, immediately, sir.
S: So, you are going to obtain it right now?
D: If it's possible, sir.
S: Well, at the time you accept it, you will reach it.
D: One can get it only when the ten parami are completed, sir.
S: You still don't understand.
We were talking about the embryonic universal monarch just now.
He attained that point because of his fulfilling the ten parami.
This fulfillment of the parami means that he can become a universal monarch for certain.
But when will he become a universal monarch?
When he has fulfilled the practices and duties that cause the arising of the wheel-jewel.
So, if he undertakes these, the jewel will arise.
Now, don't you tell me you want Nibbana?
If you practice now, you will realize it now.
Will you take up practicing?
But then don't get up after some time and run away.
If you want to become a sovereign ruler, what do you have to do?
You have to master all the arts that are required of an accomplished prince and princess.
So what do you think you have to master as sons and daughters of the Buddha?
D: We have to master morality, concentration and wisdom, sir.
S: What do you have to do to become a king?
You have to study and practice the eighteen arts a king has to master.
You have to learn about war-elephants, strategy, how to overcome enemies, and so forth.
Once you have learned all this, what will you do when you encounter enemies?
D: We'll attack them, sir.
S: There are enemies who obstruct our progress towards Nibbana, and if we want to get there, we have to fight them.
Will you fight them after having equipped yourselves with weapons?
D: Yes, sir.
S: You will have to sit for a long time.
Once the battle starts, you will have to fight for real.
Once you have deployed your troops in the battlefield, you will have to go ahead.
Only if you prevail will you become a king.
D: We shall fight, sir.
S: Good, go ahead.
Don't get up and run away, even if time seems long.
If you fight well, you will become sovereign king.
During the time of the Buddha, people learned the teachings from the Buddha himself.
The Buddha simply taught how to defeat all forms of ignorance.
Do you think that all those who listened to his words and then practiced accordingly repulsed ignorance?
They really refuted all forms of ignorance and therefore they were victorious.
They attained supreme happiness.
Establish yourselves in effort and all your aspirations will be fulfilled.
You are well equipped with weapons for the battle, aren't you?
D: Yes, sir.
S: And you will fight, won't you?
Your enemies do attack and they attack often and with full force.
Are sloth, torpor and laziness friends or foes?
What do you do when they come?
I think it has been some time that you haven't fought a battle?
D: Quite some time, sir.
S: Tell me about the weapons you will have to use, and how you have to fight.
D: We have to fight for one hour every day, sir.
S: Only one hour a day?
D: We can't even always manage that much, sir.
S: Look here!
Is this because the weapons are soft or because the warriors are soft?
D: We are soft, sir.
S: Are princes and princesses who want to become rulers soft too?
D: No, sir.
They can't be because soft princes are defeated.
S: But these princes here, are they people with strength and fortitude or are they soft?
D: We are soft, sir.
S: As sons and daughters of the Buddha do you want to become sovereigns of Nibbana or do you want to remain princes and princesses?
D: We all want to become rulers, sir.
S: So, the weapon you have is good; attack!
But only if you hold the weapon properly will the enemy fear you.
I think you don't hold the weapon properly.
D: We do attack, sir, but our way of attack is weak.
Out of compassion give us a powerful weapon, sir.
S: I can only give you the weapon.
This weapon will not do anything; only if you take this weapon and make use of it can you win.
No weapon is weak, and you don't have just one.
You have a whole store of weapons.
If I were to enumerate them, it would become a long list.
D: Sir, we fail because we have so many weapons.
S: No, it's because you don't fight.
You have to fight.
Do you understand?
Don't you want to become sovereign kings?
Do you want to stay princes and princesses?
D: We try hard, sir, but we never succeed.
S: Yes, yes, but the weapon is fine.
You don't understand because you don't fight.
You are talking like most.
You meditate, you put forth effort, but in spite of that you sound as if there was no effort.
There is so much energy in you, but you don't use it.
You do have energy.
If you put all your stock of energy to use, you will assuredly become real sons and daughters of the Buddha, become kings by attaining Nibbana.
Sons and daughters of the Buddha have the ability to accept instructions, make effort, and follow the teachings of the Buddha.
All who practice the teachings, be they humans, Devas or Brahmas, can fulfill their different aspirations for Nibbana.
Even if you keep up the awareness of in-breath and out-breath throughout only one day, you will understand much.
You may say that you have been meditating for so many years, but have you really ever been able to keep your mind focused for a full day?
D: No, sir.
S: By one day I mean a day and a night, twenty-four hours.
Now do this: practice the teachings of the Buddha to the full for one day and one night.
If you have done this once, you will all be able to appreciate the value of just one single day.
Some of you may have been practicing for twenty or thirty years and some even longer.
But just examine yourselves.
Have you really, having established yourselves in complete effort, fulfilled one single day in practice?
Have you?
D: No, sir, we haven't.
S: And why have you never devoted yourselves fully for one whole day?
You do have the energy required, don't you?
D: Yes, sir.
S: You don't use the energy you have in the right place.
You waste it for no purpose.
Are you still going to shows and entertainments?
D: Yes, sir.
We watch the pwe all night until dawn, without sleeping.
S: How many nights in a row do you do this?
D: About two or three nights, sir.
S: How many shows have you seen in all?
D: I can't remember, sir.
S: You see; there you have plenty of energy.
Day and night.
There your effort is strong.
Now, how many times have you observed the Uposatha precepts?
D: Many times, sir.
S: I mean, how many days have you observed the eight Uposatha precepts day and night?
D: We have observed them ever since we were children, sir.
S: How many days all together?
A day I call a day and a night, twenty-four hours.
Do you get a full day of Uposatha observances, if you look at it like this?
D: No, sir, we don't.
We observed them about half a day at a time, sir.
S: Have you fulfilled them to the utmost during the half-day?
D: We are unable to do that, sir.
We started this morning, sir, and shall keep it up until tomorrow.
S: You do have the will to work, but you don't usually use it for this noble purpose, but rather to watch pwe.
If you die while watching a pwe, where will you go?
D: To the lower world, sir.
S: Do you want that?
D: No, sir.
S: Even if you don't want it, it has great power over you, doesn't it?
If you were to really observe Uposatha, with full effort for a whole day, could you not then fulfill your aspirations?
If you keep up the practice for one Uposatha day, you will understand, you will come to know something.
The real disciples of the Buddha take the precepts on Uposatha days, and then they immediately take the object and firmly keep their attention fixed on it.
Now if your attention is so firmly fixed on an object, can sloth, torpor or laziness disturb you?
D: No, sir, they can't.
S: If your attention is firmly established on the in-breath and out-breath and the point of contact, do we still hear other people's conversation?
D: No, sir.
S: What if someone speaks very loudly?
D: It doesn't disturb us, sir.
S: There is no wanting, aversion or delusion.
If our minds are thus purged of greed, aversion and ignorance, will there still be loneliness, depression and laziness?
D: No, sir.
S: Are we still missing company?
D: No, sir.
S: Do we still want to know what others are saying?
D: No, sir.
S: If someone comes and invites us out, are we excited?
D: No, sir.
S: We shall not jealously guard what we have got.
Good people are not like that.
We share it with those with whom we live: “May they also get what I have got.” Now, what will happen if all establish strong effort from sunrise to sunset, without a break?
This is a long time-span, from sunrise to sunset.
But will you feel it to be long?
D: No, sir.
S: “Today the time went so quickly!
We observed Uposatha and the time just flew!
And I really don't know why this day was so short.” And after sunset you will again establish awareness of the object and then day will break and you still continue with the awareness of the spot below the nose, above the upper lip until it is light.
Without interruption.
And you will wonder, “This night passed really quickly; now it is day again!
This is how they used to practice on Uposatha day.
When the direct disciples of the Buddha undertook to practice for a day, they practiced for twenty-four hours.
And when day came, they were still not satisfied and said, “In the long cycle of birth and death we have been doing all those other things for a long time, but not this.” And they continued their work without wavering.
Do you have days like this?
D: Our days contain some interruptions, sir.
S: If someone keeps Uposatha, and his mind wanders here and there — just anybody, I don't mean you — so his mind flits around here and there.
But he is at a pagoda or under a holy Bodhi tree, and say he dies at that moment.
What will happen to this worshiper?
D: He will go to the lower worlds, sir.
S: How many lower planes are there?
D: There are four lower planes, sir.
S: What are they?
D: Hell, the animal world, the plane of the hungry ghosts, and the demon world.
S: Now, who wants to go to hell or the animal world?
D: I don't, sir.
S: What about the ghost world or the demon world?
D: I don't want to go there, sir.
S: If you take the precepts and then don't firmly put your mind to observing the teachings of the Buddha, is that skilled or not?
D: It is unskillful, sir.
S: If someone observes the Uposatha without keeping his mind focused, where will he be reborn when he dies?
D: In the lower planes of existence, sir.
S: Are you sure?
D: Yes, sir, I'm sure.
S: If I talk about someone who doesn't keep his mind fixed on the object, I am not talking about you people; I'm talking about that worshiper.
D: Sir, out of compassion show us the good road out of the lower worlds.
S: Do you remember how you focused your mind as the Buddha taught?
D: Yes, sir, I remember.
S: So then, let us keep the mind on the spot.
What do you think?
D: Yes, sir.
S: But of course, now you can't do a full day anymore.
But if you practice until it is light, you will have done half a day.
What do you think?
D: We will keep our minds at the spot, sir.
S: What other things do you have to do tonight?
D: There is nothing to do at night, sir.
S: You have eaten, so you don't have to cook anymore, and there is nothing else to do.
Very good.
Will you stay here now that you have undertaken to keep Uposatha?
Won't you want to go away?
D: We shall do our best, sir.
S: If you say, “We shall do our best,” will there be no disturbances coming in?
Will no enemy attack?
Only if you really mean it are the enemies afraid.
If you are firm, they run.
You know about Mahakassapa, don't you?
D: Yes, sir, we have heard about him.
S: He met the Buddha and then practiced what the Buddha taught in order to escape from suffering.
There are four bodily postures: sitting, standing, walking and lying down.
Which of these is prone to let in the enemy?
Laziness and sloth come in while lying down, and they come to stay, don't they?
If we indulge in laziness and sloth, will we be able to develop in morality, concentration and wisdom?
D: No, sir, we won't.
S: Laziness and torpor are our enemies.
Therefore Mahakassapa rejected the one posture in which the enemy attacks and adopted the other three postures in which the enemy can't remain for long.
There are thirteen ascetic practices and Mahakassapa practiced all thirteen.
Only those among the disciples of the Buddha with the strongest determination practiced the sitter's practice, i.e., did not lie down for twenty-four hours a day.
If one takes up the sitter's practice and makes the strong determination not to sleep, this sloth and laziness can't overpower him.
Though these noble disciples of the Buddha neither lay down nor slept, they lived long and were very healthy.
Do you fight wars?
D: Yes, sir, we do.
S: Now, you are going to start your meditation.
What preparations do you have to make?
D: We have to spread out our mat.
S: If you spread out your mat before starting your meditation, soon someone will come along.
Who do you think that will be?
Do you think laziness and sleepiness will come your way?
D: If they come, sir, I shall lie down and sleep.
S: What will you say to them?
D: I won't say anything, sir.
S: You will say, “Ha, now only you come, I've got the mat ready a long time ago.” And what are you going to do then?
You are going to lie down flat on your back and sleep.
If you do this, will you be able to fulfill your aspiration for Nibbana?
D: No, sir.
S: If you practice without sleeping, you are establishing full effort and are always keeping your attention firmly fixed on the object, day and night.
If you practice in this way, your morality, your concentration and control over the mind, and your insight and wisdom will become stronger and stronger.
They will develop from moment to moment.
If you watch at show all night, you will feel tired in the morning.
But if you practice the teachings of the Buddha all night, you will experience happiness and joy without end, and you will not feel sleepy.
Do you understand?
This the Buddha taught — it is not my teaching.
If you follow the teachings of the Buddha and don't rest until you have understood them completely, you will really know.
If people tell you, “This shade is cool,” don't simply believe them, but try it out for yourselves.
If you just repeat, “It is cool, it is cool…” because others say so, you don't really know about its coolness; you merely talk about it.
If someone just babbles along, he doesn't show appreciation.
But if someone speaks from experience, then will he not be able to speak with deep appreciation, and radiant happiness, and love?
So pay attention and practice.
If you practice, you will reach your goal.
Not just hundreds, not thousands, not ten thousands, not hundreds of thousands — all who follow the teachings will master them.
When you start to meditate you still have to check: Is everything arranged?
Is there a place to sleep at night, and to rest during the day?
Only when all this is in order, will you meditate, isn't it so?
If you act in this way, you nurture your enemy, you call him a friend, you love him.
Once you recognize your enemy as such, do you still associate with him?
D: No, sir.
S: What do you do, if he comes?
D: We check him and defend ourselves.
S: How do you defend yourselves?
Will you attack him?
Will you mount a full attack?
D: We shall repulse him, sir.
S: How do you repulse him?
Softly, so that he doesn't get hurt?
D: We shall ward him off immediately so that he can't ever come back.
S: Yes, carry on.
Cut him off and throw him overboard so that he can't ever come back.
Well then, what will you do when tiredness and laziness really arise?
D: I shall probably fall asleep, sir.
S: What about others in the audience?
D: I don't know, sir.
S: Will you recognize the enemy and destroy him?
D: Just so, sir.
S: Very good.
I shall give you a simile.
If a man has fallen into a deep sleep and you wake him up, he will wake up quickly.
If you try and wake up someone who pretends to sleep, you will not be successful.
Why is this so?
D: The more one works on him the more he pretends to be asleep.
S: Yes.
Now what about you, are really fast asleep or do you pretend to sleep?
D: I don't know, sir.
S: If you are really asleep, you will simply get up, when I wake you up.
Will you get up?
D: Yes, sir.
S: Yes, and after getting up, you will go back to sleep, I think.
But I'm not sure about that.
I only think so.
D: I shall work hard as you instruct me, sir.
S: Put forth effort and you will become perfect.
You have all you need.
All of you have acquired the elements of insight and renunciation.
Because of this, you now esteem the teachings of the Buddha, you want to fulfill and practice them.
If the accumulation of the perfection of renunciation is small, your ears will be blocked to the teachings of the Buddha.
For instance, if somebody tells you to come to this place, you don't want to come because you are bored by this.
But now you are attracted by this teaching.
All you need now is the same amount of effort that the noble disciples of the Buddha made.
When you begin to practice you may worry, “If I sit for one or two hours I am aching and stiff.
How can I possibly sit for a whole day and night?
I think that's quite impossible.” Don't you worry like this?
D: No, sir, I don't.
S: Though you may not worry now, it will come up.
But don't worry in this way.
The Buddha didn't teach suffering.
He taught the way leading to happiness.
You may not believe this because you think your own thoughts.
But you have to work with full effort and without wavering.
Now, when you meditate with full effort, the viriya iddhipada factor will arise.
You will understand this.
But when you sit all of you feel some discomfort, don't you?
D: Yes, sir, we do.
S: Even if you are aching and stiff, there is a place where there is no pain.
There is sleepiness, and there is also a place where there is no sleepiness.
What do you do when you are drowsy?
D: I go to sleep, sir.
S: Do you ever get enough sleep?
D: Yes, sir, I do.
S: But you sleep every day, and now want to sleep again?
So you haven't actually had enough yet.
If you sleep every day, you will never get enough sleep.
So when you feel sleepy, make an effort to reach the place where there is no sleepiness and then you will need no more sleep.
Get up and walk up and down.
Keep your attention at the spot where the air touches when you breathe in and out.
If you keep it fixed on this spot with full effort, at some time you will find the place of no sleep.
There is no “I shall not find it”; there is only a “I haven't got there yet.” You will get it.
If you sleep and postpone meditation until you are rested, you will wake up when it is light and there will be no time left to meditate.
I am just telling you what the Buddha taught.
There is nothing I know.
All the Buddha taught is true.
All of you have to make a living, work, toil, and shoulder burdens, don't you?
D: Yes, sir.
S: So let us be simple.
You breathe, don't you?
D: Yes, sir, we do.
S: So, simply be aware of the in-breath, the out-breath and the point below the nose where the air touches.
It goes in and out without interruption, doesn't it?
D: Yes, sir, that's right.
S: Only when your attention wanders away, the continuity is broken.
Don't allow your attention to follow the breath.
Your attention should always remain with this small spot.
When you keep your attention there at the spot, your respiration will become soft and subtle.
Once it has become subtle, you don't have to make it rough again.
The Buddha didn't say that we should make the subtle rough.
When you feel the spot, touching it with your finger, your attention will not wander to other objects.
Can't you fix your attention firmly on the spot with the breathing?
D: I can, sir.
S: Will greed, aversion and delusion still arise when your attention is focused on the spot?
When you are well concentrated, even for a short moment, your mind is cleansed of greed, aversion and delusion for that short moment.
Can't you keep your attention fixed on the spot for a longer time-span?
D: Yes, sir, I can.
S: So, make a strong effort and keep your attention there.
If you keep it there, is there any drowsiness or laziness disturbing you?
D: They don't come up, sir.
S: But what will happen if you reduce your effort?
D: Laziness will come in, sir.
S: Sloth and laziness will come and your concentration will become weak.
This is because you're at the beginning; later it will improve.
If you view this laziness as a friend, not as an enemy, you will get used to it.
Though it comes you will not get lazy anymore.
When we feel sleepy, we say, “This is good.
Now I want to find the place where one doesn't feel sleepy quickly.
Then there will an end to sleeping.” Work, fix your attention firmly on the spot as I just instructed you and when your limbs ache, know: “The only way out of this is to get to a place where there is no pain.” Now, if the discomfort becomes very intense, is it too difficult then?
It is not difficult.
Don't worry about all this.
Simply keep your attention on the spot.
Put it back on the spot.
Don't allow it to go away!
If it runs away, you will never get to the place I just told you about.
Though we can't avoid being offered food and having to eat it, don't you think that we can keep our attention at the spot and eat?
Do you think you will pass comments like, “Too much salt, too little salt,” about the food that your wife, daughter, grand-daughter, brought from home?
D: I wouldn't comment, sir.
S: Do you think you would even notice that the food has too much salt?
D: No, sir.
S: Why?
Because you are aware of something far better, so you don't notice their food.
If you get upset and angry about food, even though you are observing the eight precepts, and you die at that moment of anger, where will you go?
D: To the lower worlds, sir.
S: If you work with proper effort, not just superficially, will you even know whether the food tastes good or not?
D: No, sir.
S: Keep your mind steadfastly focused on the spot.
Your daily work needn't suffer.
It doesn't cost you anything.
Others won't know about it.
Will you practice the sitter's practice tonight?
Keep your attention on the spot and you will find it very easy.
If you feel drowsy, of if you are aching, say: “Good, it has come early,” and then concentrate still harder on the spot.
If you reach the goal before drowsiness and discomfort come up, so much the better.
If these disturbances don't manifest, don't stop working, thinking, “If they don't even come up now, there is no need to work to get to a place where they don't exist.” Just keep working.
Will you undertake the sitter's practice?
Or will you, when sleepiness and tiredness set in, change to another postures and reduce your effort?
D: We won't reduce our effort, sir.
S: All of you, or just a few among you?
D: All of us, sir.
S: So, if you keep each other company, so much the better.
Now, then, undertake to carry out the sitter's practice!
Make it a firm vow!
You may think, “It wasn't right that we just gave in to sleepiness in the past.” Well, now you have undertaken the sitter's practice, and I think it is for the first time.
D: Yes, sir, the first time.
S: This is the weapon.
With this weapon you can fight your battle.
With this weapon you will be victorious.
If you fight with a pillow as a weapon, you cannot win.
I shall tell you a story you probably already know.
At the time of the Buddha, there was a rich lady who owned a big estate.
When she became old, she distributed the inheritance amongst he children.
But the children, after receiving the money, didn't care for their mother anymore.
She was not treated well in the houses of her sons and daughters and she was in distress.
When she was about eighty or ninety years old, the neighbors had her ordained as a nun, as they couldn't bear to see her poverty and suffering.
When the nuns of her nunnery were invited for alms food to a house one day, they all went.
Only Sona Theri, our old woman, had to stay back because she was too old to go along.
Before they left the nunnery, they said to Sona Theri, “You are very old, you can't come with us.
But fill the water pots for drinking water, and those for washing hands and feet, so that everything is ready when we return and also prepare some hot water.
But this nun was very old.
To carry the water she had to use a small pot, and as she was working away, she got very tired.
But she didn't rest.
She forced herself to do what she had been ordered to do.
Because she overworked herself, she fell down between the water pots and couldn't lift herself up anymore.
She didn't pretend; she was exhausted from carrying water.
She had been given the teachings of the Buddha.
So she thought: “Well, I can't fill the pots anymore.
There is more water to be carried and I haven't prepared any hot water yet either.
But I can't even get up.
I will take up an object of meditation given by the Buddha.” And she started meditating as we did.
She fixed her attention firmly on the spot.
She focused her attention so that it stayed there, whatever happened.
That's all.
And as she was meditating with strong effort, she did what had to be done and made an end to suffering.
Of course she was full of the bliss of emancipation.
When the others came back, they couldn't find her.
They said, “Where could this old nun have gone?”, and they looked all over the nunnery.
Eventually they found her lying between the water pots, and they all gathered around and abused her.
“Now what about our orders?
She didn't fill the pots, and there's no hot water either.
She is so lazy that she just lies down and sleeps.
But the old nun was absorbed in bliss.
The other nuns were worldlings, of course, and they stood there blaming her.
“Look how lazy she is.
No water pot is full, no hot water.
Just lying around!
You too can talk like that, can't you?
It's not pleasant talk.
But this nun was an arahant.
She had attained Arahatship along with the supernatural powers.
She said: “All you desire will be done.
There will be water in the pots and there will be hot water too.” And after saying this, she made a strong determination and the water pots were filled to the brim and the hot water was boiling over.
This nun was very old, and in exhaustion she fell down and could not get up again.
She practiced as you are doing now.
Do you hear this?
How long will it take you to reach the goal, you who are healthy and strong?
D: We shall work hard.
S: Will you still say, “Oh, we are old, we can't practice anymore”?
Sona Theri was eighty or ninety years old and she still carried water as she had been told.
When she fell down in exhaustion she just meditated.
The disciples of the Buddha attained the goal because their power of effort was great.
You have the teachings, the technique.
All you need now is effort.
And why do you need effort?
Because during meditation the enemies will come to disturb you.
Keep your attention on this small spot.
If your limbs ache, work that you reach the state where there is no aching.
When you are drowsy, work that you reach the state where there is no drowsiness.
Good, good.
Establish effort and meditate, work to make an end to all suffering.
WEBU SAYADAW: Be perfect in the practice of morality.
Only if your practice is perfect will all your aspirations of the present time and of the future be fulfilled without exception.
Because this is true, the aspirations of the good people of the past who practiced and strove were fulfilled completely.
You too have to take up the practice of that morality that brought about their happiness.
Work hard and perfect yourselves in it.
Being perfect in morality, keep your mind straight and practice charity as it pleases you, giving your possessions yourselves with sincerity to those who are worthy.
Approach and give your gifts and your respect to the peerless Buddha and his teachings, keeping in mind your aspiration for awakening, Nibbana.
This type of aspiration is called right aspiration.
What you realize when you penetrate the Four Noble Truths is called “Bodhi,” awakening.
There are different types of Bodhi: Sammasambodhi, Paccekabodhi, and Savakabodhi.
There are different types of Arahatship: Aggasavaka, Mahasavaka, Pakatisavaka.
You have always to keep in mind your aspirations for Nibbana, the highest goal.
Aspirations thus formed are well formed.
After having perfected yourself according to your aspiration, enter Nibbana.
The noble persons who have attained Nibbana are innumerable.
Why could they bring their various aspirations for Bodhi to fruition?
Because they had been born into the right form of existence at the right time and because they exerted proper effort.
When is the time when these aspirations can be brought to fruition?
From the moment the Buddha attained awakening many human beings, Devas and Brahmas came to the Buddha to pay respect and to show their devotion.
But no human being, no Deva and no Brahma was satisfied by merely being in the presence of the Buddha and having the opportunity to pay respect.
The Buddha observed them through his mind's eye and taught them the truth which he had penetrated through his own superknowledge, his omniscience.
As soon as they received the instructions of the Buddha they began to practice, to exert themselves with unwavering energy in all the four postures of the body.
This effort that is continuous, without break or pause and full of joy, is called good effort.
When their effort was perfect and equal to the effort of the wise of old, they arrived at their goal in due time and all the aspirations of their hearts came to an end.
Because they had achieved this state they were exceedingly happy and blissful.
What was the nature of their happiness, their bliss?
It was not happiness or bliss that lasted for only a moment or a single life time; it was that happiness that is so great that it is able to last for the remainder of samsara.
Even if you are born in the human plane for only one life you are able to rise above the suffering of the cycle of birth and death.
In this way happiness and bliss come to you.
When one has attained this happiness, when one has received the sign of bliss, when one has reached the goal, there is no jealous guarding of a secret.
No, one will want all human beings, Devas and Brahmas to attain this bliss and happiness.
As he knows for himself how to attain this happiness his acts of body, speech and mind will always be in harmony with the cause of attaining Nibbana.
He will act with joy as his base.
How could so many human beings, Devas and Brahmas attain such high states of bliss?
Only because they knew that they were going to bring the aspirations of their heart to fruition.
What are the things that support the Buddha's teachings?
They are the donation of shelter, robes, alms food and medicine for the monks.
Having understood this, they practiced it.
With these four requisites the wise supported the teachings of the Buddha.
While they supported the teachings of the Buddha by donating the four requisites, many human beings, Devas and Brahmas received the instructions of the Buddha.
They were endowed with the ability to understand and follow the instructions and they practiced with a joyful mind without taking rest, like the wise of old.
When they thus practiced they attained their goal without delay.
In just one moment innumerable human beings, Devas and Brahmas fulfilled the wish of their hearts.
The energetic people saw this and supported the teachings of the Buddha and established them in a very short time.
But they didn't do only this, this didn't satisfy them yet.
In order to strengthen and make firm the teachings they would also meditate.
So they were full of good volition and they were accordingly endowed with unwavering effort and faith.
Since the time of the Buddha there have been such noble people who supported and carried out the Buddha's teachings with supreme effort, and ever since the days of the Buddha human beings, Devas and Brahmas have been attaining Nibbana.
The number of those who have reached the goal in just a short moment can't be reckoned, let alone the number of all who have attained Nibbana.
Now the good time for all the various noble people has come.
This is so, because the time when a Buddha and his teachings blossom is the good time.
The existences of human beings, Devas and all the happy abodes are good.
Having been born into one of these, people accepted the teachings and, as you are doing now, practiced with full effort and arrived at the goal.
After his awakening the Buddha first honored the city of Rajagaha with his presence.
The king of this great city, Bimbisara, came to the Buddha, and because he received the teachings and followed them he attained the goal.
He was full of bliss.
He wanted others to attain the same bliss, and understanding the reason, the cause of his happiness, he donated the four requisites.
He did this so that his mother, father, grandmother and grandfather could fulfill their aspirations completely.
The Buddha, out of his great compassion, dwelt in the king's delightful garden.
Humans, Devas and Brahmas came to revere him there and with great compassion he taught them what he had realized himself.
In just one short moment innumerable humans, Devas and Brahmas achieved their aspirations.
And after this it went on and on.
The good time for all the people with noble aspirations had come!
The time at which there is a Buddha or his teaching is the good time.
Human life, the life as Deva or Brahma, is a good life.
Good effort is called the effort that is established after one has received the teachings.
And what are the Buddha's teachings?
What is contained in the Tipitaka and is preached and explained by noble disciples out of loving-kindness and compassion are the Buddha's teachings.
They are very extensive, profound and difficult to understand.
Though they are extensive, profound and difficult to understand, they really boil down to just one thing: the way of escape from suffering.
They are expounded by the wise in short and in full as time permits and everyone has knowledge of them according to his capacity.
You all have some understanding of the Tipitaka, in accordance with your capabilities.
If you were to talk about what you know it would never end.
But you have to establish strong effort and focus your mind on one object, and keep out all other objects.
When you fix your mind on one object exclusively with strong and stable effort, then you will be established in the teachings.
Isn't that so?
U BA KHIN: Yes, sir.
SAYADAW: To establish your attention thus is effort.
When you fix your attention on one object and no other object enters your mind and your attention is stable you reach viriya iddhipada, the basis of attaining perfection by effort.
Because the teachings are so extensive you may think it tiresome to practice them.
That is why I instruct you in this way: that you can reach the goal quickly.
What happens to the causes of suffering — greed, aversion and delusion — when you control your mind in this way?
U: They are cut out and become quiet.
S: People write and preach a lot about greed, aversion and delusion, don't they?
When they debate, they talk only to win the debate, whomever they are talking to.
But if they establish awareness of breathing and make their minds stable they acquire real merit.
Why don't we try to do this?
U: Yes, sir.
S: Will there be worry, fear and greed at that time?
U: There won't be.
S: No, there won't; there won't be any worry, fear and greed.
If there is worry, fear and greed, are you happy or unhappy?
U: Unhappy, sir.
S: And if there is no worry, fear and greed?
U: Then one is happy.
S: If one establishes effort only for one split-second the viriya iddhipada arises.
It excludes worry, fear and greed and there is happiness.
There are types of happiness which are not related to the happiness achieved through the Buddha's teachings, but people still call them happiness.
What sort of happiness am I talking about?
I am talking about the happiness of becoming a human being or Deva, of becoming a king, a rich man, a universal emperor, a Deva king, a Sakka or a Brahma.
Of course their enjoyment is also called happiness.
But let me give you an example.
If you were asked to bear the golden royal insignia and live in the golden palace of a country that abounded with gold, silver, gems, rice, water and paddy, that was plentiful in everything, would you accept this offer or not?
U: Of course I would accept.
S: Of course you would accept.
This country is so rich that there is absolutely nothing missing.
So you would live wearing your crown in your golden palace smiling all the time.
So I think, smiling like that all the time you would enjoy yourself, you would be happy, wouldn't you?
Would this happiness keep worry, fear and greed away?
U: No, it wouldn't.
S: Oh, really?
U: It wouldn't, sir.
S: I mean at that moment, you see.
U: It wouldn't.
S: Why are they all smiling and happy then?
U: Somebody could try to usurp the kingdom.
If something happens in his territory he would have duties to fulfill.
S: There is nothing like that.
This country is so good that there is no danger or worry of that kind.
It is a very peaceful country.
There is no problem at all; everything is calm and quiet.
There are no troubles at all, you just have to live in the golden palace wearing your crown.
So simply live there with your ministers, troops, concubines and wives.
You live always with a smile on your face.
Will worry, fear, greed and anxiety be kept a bay in these circumstances?
You are always smiling and happy.
So, do you think there is no worry?
U: There will be, sir.
U: Because there is the fear of death.
S: Yes, there will still be the fear of death.
But you are smiling still.
What is this smiling?
What about greed, aversion and delusion?
U: They won't be kept away.
S: Even smiles won't keep them away?
U: No, sir.
S: What do smiles mean?
U: They indicate that the object of mind is greed.
S: Really?
Is one happy if there is greed?
U: No, sir.
S: Is greed cool and pleasant?
U: No, it isn't.
S: Is it skillful or unskillful?
U: It is unskillful.
S: Are you happy when you are smiling as we just said?
U: No, sir.
S: But you are smiling great smiles, aren't you, but you aren't happy yet?
You are king, aren't you?
Maybe you aren't happy because you rule only one country?
I'll give you another one.
So?
U: Even then I won't be any happier.
S: Are you going to tell me that you don't want another country?
U: No, sir, I would take it.
S: You would take it, but still not be happy.
Well, I won't give you just another country, I'll give you the whole continent.
Will you tell me that you don't want it?
U: No, sir.
S: So, you will be happier then?
U: I won't be happier.
S: Really?
OK, I won't give you just another continent, but the whole planet and the wheel-jewel of the universal monarch.
Now there won't be any worry or fear.
With the turning of the wheel-jewel you will become universal monarch.
Will you be happy now?
U: I won't, sir.
S: Will you feel calm and cool?
U: I won't.
S: Why not, disciple?
U: There is still the burning of greed, aversion and delusion in my mind.
S: Oh, is it still there?
U: It's still there.
S: So you aren't happy yet.
Now, what about Sakka, the Brahmas and the Deva kings?
U: The same applies to them also.
S: We said they were happy and now you tell me the contrary?
U: The objects of their minds are greed, aversion and delusion.
S: Oh, really?
Let it be.
If one lives to a ripe old age always smiling and then dies smilingly, will he find peace in the cycle of births and deaths?
U: We won't find peace.
S: Where will this smiling fellow go?
U: When the karma of this smiling person comes to an end his fate will turn.
S: Yes, and where will this smiling fellow end up?
U: With his smiling, the mind will be controlled by greed and be destined for the lower worlds.
S: Oh, really?… I thought that being happy was good, disciples.
Is it not good?
I have to ask you, “Is it good?
U: No, it isn't.
S: OK, we are not happy yet.
But when I asked whether we would be happy later on, you said no.
There was no peace, you said.
U: There is no peace.
S: So, now there is no peace; What about later?
Will it become just a little bit better?
U: It won't improve, sir.
S: What will happen in the lower planes?
U: We will go to the lower planes.
S: Really?
So, there is no peace now, there won't be any after; what will be worse?
U: It will be worse later.
S: Oh.
We all thought we were quite alright, but it is not so.But now we've got the teaching of the Buddha and we can have as much of it as we want, can't we?
S: Endowed with the ability to accept the teachings we can take up one technique with steadfastness.
Will the happiness that derives from this practice become less the more we use it, the more we practice?
U: It won't.
S: Will it ever be exhausted?
U: It won't.
S: Oh, really?
My word, this thing is good.
Isn't it, my dear disciples?
And if we use it all the time, continuously, will it then get used up, will it come to an end?
U: It will neither diminish nor get used up.
S: Wait a minute.
We shall keep our attention focused while we are sitting like this, but while we are standing, can we still practice this?
S: And when we are walking?
S: Yes, we have to carry the burden of our body.
It is not the same as other worldly possessions.
When you work hard to acquire various jewels and gold and are successful, you will store them away in a certain place, I think.
But having acquired our body and mind, the five aggregates, is it possible to live with ease, happily and without making great efforts?
U: It isn't possible.
S: We have to shoulder our burden.
We can't rest for a short moment even, can we?
And for whom do we have to shoulder the burden of our bodies without ever taking rest?
U: For ourselves.
S: For the five aggregates.
U: For the five aggregates, sir.
S: Yes, we have to work, disciples.
If I practice this awareness a lot, then I don't want to miss this happiness that derives from it.
Isn't it possible to practice this all the time?
U: It is possible, sir.
S: This is very good.
Will it diminish?
U: No, sir, it won't.
S: Is it tiresome to keep up this awareness?
U: It isn't tiresome.
S: Will you use up material goods you have saved up?
U: No, sir.
S: You won't.
What about your work, will it be disturbed?
U: It won't be disturbed.
S: Will the others know about our practice?
U: They won't notice.
S: Oh, the others won't notice?
Yes, when we have the teachings of the Buddha and practice them continuously, when we are able to focus our mind on the object, we won't get tired, will we?
U: We won't, sir.
S: We won't spend anything; our work won't be disrupted, and others won't even notice.
You receive the teachings in no time and then you say to yourself, “Now I shall follow these teachings.” When you have this volition and put forth effort then the viriya iddhipada factor will arise and you will arrive at the goal in no time.
If you take up the practice now, will your progress be slow or fast?
U: According to circumstances, sir, sometimes it will be slow, sometimes…
S: No!
Wait, wait…
U: Yes, sir.
S: Never mind about this.
If I focus my attention according to the teachings and keep it with the awareness of respiration, isn't this much possible?
U: It is possible.
S: Is this quick or slow?
U: It is quick, sir.
S: You see, if you establish effort the viriya iddhipada factor arises.
Can you say how quick this is?
U: Yes, sir.
S: Have you put your attention there and does it stay?
U: Yes, sir.
S: As I decide to put it there, it stays, doesn't it?
U: It does.
S: So if it stays, you have reached happiness.
Are you able to speak as quickly as this happiness is able to arise?
U: I am not, sir.
S: It is easy to achieve happiness if you want it.
U: Yes, sir.
S: This is the highest sort of skillfulness.
Do you hear?
This is the highest, the highest.
Only if you have past merits can you be born as a human being and receive the Buddha Dhamma.
This type of skillfulness cannot be put in numbers.
Do you understand?
Then the six qualities of the Dhamma are there; the qualities of the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha.
When the Buddha taught this, the people understood.
Among the six qualities of the Dhamma, akaliko is one, isn't it?
What does akaliko mean?
U: Immediateness.
S: Immediateness means that as soon as you fix your attention the results come.
So, if you establish effort with intelligence the results come so quickly that you can't say “there” quicker than they come; or you can't even think that fast.
Is it so?
If you establish awareness now, if you keep it here with your effort, happiness arises in the very same moment.
This is immediate.
Who would have to question this anymore?
U: Who would have to doubt his own experience?
S: Yes, when happiness has arisen there is no looking for it anymore.
The answer comes by itself, doesn't it?
It doesn't take any time.
All of you are bright people and you have understood the teachings of the wise and compassionate Buddha while still young, even before the words of instruction were complete.
Though you understood, at times your mind will think as it pleases, but let us practice.
What happens in the mind when we plan to practice to acquire merit?
“I'll perform merits later on, now I have to do this quickly.” Doesn't this happen to you?
U: It does.
S: Is it good to think and speak like this?
S: And when you make efforts and the viriya iddhipada factor has arisen; what is the right thing to do?
U: The right thing to do is to practice.
S: Yes.
If you want to become happier and happier, you have to put forth effort as soon as you have received the instructions of the Buddha and have accepted them.
Then the viriya iddhipada factor will arise.
When you make use of this factor that arises in a split-second, does it get consumed?
U: It doesn't.
S: Do it diminish?
U: It doesn't.
S: You may decide that the happiness you've got was quite sufficient for now and the future and you say, “I don't want to progress.” Can you practice and not progress?
U: One will progress.
S: If you practice not just for a short time, but longer, will you achieve only as much as you get out of a short period of practice?
U: One will get more.
S: This is good, disciple.
This is possible because we are now in an auspicious era, because we are born into the right form of existence and because we make right effort.
The energetic get the true answer even without asking others.
Very good, do you hear?
Isn't this so?
U: It is so.
S: So, even if we live with this happiness all the time, it won't diminish, it won't be used up.
And what happens if one doesn't want to progress?
U: It isn't possible not to progress, sir.
S: Yes.
If you aspire to this there must be many different troubles.
Is it possible to attain Bodhi or not?
U: It is possible.
S: It is possible now and in the future.
So let us say, “I don't want to progress,” and then focus our minds.
Is this possible?
U: It isn't possible not to progress if we work.
S: Do we achieve greater happiness the more we work?
U: We do, sir.
S: We can attain Bodhi and we can also choose the time and the place of birth.
We can then choose a good existence as we wish.
When you attain the happiness you desire, what else do you need?
U: Nothing else, sir.
S: You don't need anything, you just have to choose.
Is choosing tiresome?
U: It isn't, sir.
S: You can drop at any time.
There are four stages to Nibbana.
Is it possible only for certain types of Ariyas — those who have attained one of the four stages?
Do we have to choose the state of Nibbana?
U: No, sir.
S: What about the place?
U: It isn't necessary.
S: Yes.
All by yourself, without any help?
U: It's possible.
S: And in a crowd?
If you go outside the pagoda it won't be possible, I think.
It is easy, isn't it?
The Buddha, the all-compassionate and omniscient, taught many humans, Devas and Brahmas the knowledge he had attained through penetrating the truth himself.
These beings, full of confidence after receiving the teachings, were able to fulfill their aspirations.
As you establish awareness you should establish continuous effort.
There are many different types of people.
Some are good at reciting or reading or preaching or explaining.
I have no doubt about you, disciples, with whomever you compete you will win.
U: Yes, sir.
S: Yes, though they are victorious in their talk, will they achieve anything if they don't practice?
S: So, what's the difficulty?
Talking is tiresome, isn't it?
All we have to do is to make efforts to bring to fruition the aspirations we have made and work as the wise of old did.
Understanding that we have to take up this work our minds will be focused.
You are very busy.
You may say, “We will practice later, when we are free.” Does this thought come up still?
U: It does.
S: Sometimes the mind is like that.
But I think you don't actually say so?
U: Maybe, sir.
S: You even speak your mind?
S: Well, if you want to say this, never mind.
But, for the future can't you burn these impurities out?
You do have the teachings of the Buddha and when this happens to you, get rid of doubts.
Strive to get the answers without asking others.
If you focus right now won't you get them immediately?
Isn't this possible?
U: Yes, it is possible, sir.
S: Is it possible to focus as you sit here?
U: Yes, it is, sir.
S: Is it possible to maintain the happiness you achieve in this way also when you are standing up?
U: It is, sir.
S: Yes.
And when you walk?
U: It's also possible then.
S: And when you carry out all your many responsibilities?
U: Then also it is possible.
S: You see, it is always possible.
U: If one is able to do it, it's possible.
S: What ability do you need?
There is nothing difficult in it.
Or is it difficult?
U: Once one has acquired proficiency in this it isn't difficult anymore.
S: He says that it is not possible after all to simply focus here.
Just put your attention here.
That's all.
Well, isn't it that easy?
U: It is easy, sir.
S: It is ever so easy.
The Buddha is incomparable.
He accumulated virtues without ever resting.
He completed his parami on his own working for the welfare of all.
Didn't he?
U: Yes, he did.
S: And because he could complete them it is easy for us now, isn't it?
It is easy.
How is it today?
You have to raise yourself happily and complete your work, and then, in accordance with your aspirations, you simply take the bliss you desire.
It is ever so easy.
Don't be modest.
Don't allow yourselves to think, “This is not possible for me,” “This is not suitable for me,” “This is not proper for us,” “This is not for me.” Aim at what you desire.
You will get it.
Isn't this so?
U: Yes.
It is, sir.
S: In the days of the Buddha too, humans, Devas and Brahmas came to the Buddha, worshiped him and after they received his teachings they achieved everything; they completed all their different aspirations, didn't they?
U: They did.
S: Isn't it possible to fulfill your aspiration by establishing unwavering effort while you are a king?
Can you count the names of the kings who attained complete understanding of the Dhamma?
U: They are without number, sir.
S: Many wealthy people made efforts and attained understanding while continuing their work in business, didn't they?
U: They did.
S: Isn't this possible?
U: It is, sir.
S: Can you count such wealthy people in numbers?
U: No, sir.
S: What about people who were neither kings nor rich people?
U: They are innumerable.
S: Didn't all those who received the teachings and followed them assiduously fulfill their wishes?
U: They did.
S: Humans and devas, all of them, lay disciple!
What about now, lay disciple?
The period of time is the same, the occasion is the same, the plane of existence is the same.
If we simply establish our effort and take the teachings, do we still have to choose certain times to practice?
U: There is no need for that.
U: That is correct, sir.
S: Yes!
The time and the form of existence is right.
You can achieve your aspirations at the time you wish to.
Can't you?
U: That's right, sir.
S: Yes!
Do you understand?
Before, they didn't practice because they were busy.
How is it with this “I'll practice when I'm free”?
Do we still have to set times like this?
U: It is not necessary to set aside certain times.
S: What happens if we practice only when we are free?
If we stop the practice then we won't attain what we ought to attain.
But now we get these jobs done and what else?
We also fulfill our aspirations.
We get two things done at the same time.
Don't we, lay disciples?
What is better: to get one thing done or to get two things done at the same time?
U: It is better to get two things done, sir.
S: You see, it's worth keeping yourself busy.
But, even though I say that it's working keeping yourself busy, don't start to enjoy simply being busy.
If you want to realize the teachings, don't just keep running all the time.
If you establish effort at the same time, the viriya iddhipada factor will arise.
Make yourselves firm in this.
If you say that you want to do this work, but still distract yourselves here and there, your progress will be slow, but if you establish this awareness and keep it up happily, then you will make progress.
What about this work that you can't avoid having to do?
U: We will also make progress with that.
S: Yes, lay disciples.
One doesn't only get the results of this noble work, but much more.
What I say is what the Buddha preached.
I'm not adding anything.
Now you are all people of great effort, aren't you?
But I just wanted to warn you.
What I just mentioned can happen at times.
When you get some holidays you decide to come here and meditate for a few days.
Then, you have to go back to work and don't get time off anymore.
You don't come back.
Does this happen sometimes?
U: It does happen.
S: Then you abandon the meditation, don't you?
Don't abandon it.
Carry on with this awareness and at the same time do your work.
Then you get two in one go, you get two.
If you postpone being aware to your hours of leisure you get only one benefit.
You are not fulfilling aspirations which are ordinary, are you?
You can attain to the highest and noblest bliss.
Now, what are these aspirations you are going to fulfill?
There are the different forms of Bodhi.
Bodhi means the penetrating understanding of the Four Noble Truths.
If you establish effort saying that you want to get it, you can fulfill all your different aspirations for Bodhi right now.
This is not ordinary.
And how are you going to fulfill them?
Each type of Bodhi has to be fulfilled in its own way; Sammasambodhi as Sammasambodhi, Paccekabodhi as Paccekabodhi.
Only if we understand in this way do we understand correctly.
It is like planting a mature seed when it rains; a plant springs up.
Here this plant is nursed well and when you go back it is deep rooted and strong.
Is it possible to explain how good this period, this time is?
It is so easy now, lay disciples!
How is it: is this a time when one is oppressed by worries and has to groan and moan?
U: No, sir.
S: Is it a time when we can only stare resignedly?
U: No, sir.
S: It is a time in which we can be happy and blissful immediately and never get enough of this joy.
You get even more than you wanted, you get even more than you aspired for, don't you, disciple?
U: Yes, sir.
S: Oh, yes.
You never get tired, not in the present and not in the remainder of samsara.
What are the teachings of the Buddha?
There is nothing that causes stress and misery in the teachings.
Is there?
There isn't!
It is pure happiness!
But the mind may get confused with many thoughts and I don't think that these thoughts are very pertinent.
Now, if you determine to establish this practice then I don't think that thoughts of doubt will remain at the back of your mind.
Can you not be successful in this way?
The mind will think what it wills.
Let it!
Follow the teachings, do you understand?
When you arrive at the goal you will probably find that it isn't the way you expected it to be.
Doesn't this happen to people?
U: It happened many times, sir.
S: Yes, it will happen.
Dear lay disciples, I am telling you only a little.
Those amongst you who work hard will think, “This monk is reluctant to tell us all, he is probably very unwilling to part with his knowledge.” You will think, “This is much greater.” When you strive for real happiness and because of this arrive at the goal, then you experience something that you cannot describe with words.
When you decide, “I'll strive so that I will know for myself,” then don't procrastinate.
Don't delay.
Do you hear?
This is so high.
It is so good, lay disciples.
Work hard, do you understand?
You are all people of great effort, aren't you?
U: Almost all are, sir.
S: Yes, good, good.
Work hard, won't you?
You see, when you yourselves arrive at the goal — and for many of you even before that time — you can give this happiness to others.
You will never feel reluctant to give.
You will want to give a great deal of it, a great deal.
U: This is true, sir.
In the course we are conducting now there are three or four students who after about three days of being here cry with great sobs because they regret not having come here earlier.
S: Yes, it is like that.
U: They think, “I should have come earlier!
S: Yes, this happens!
Work hard in order to attain the highest.
This is the perfect place.
U: It is a place to which you gave your blessings, venerable Sayadaw!
S: This is a nucleus.
It is the first center of many.
Do you hear me?
May this happiness spread slowly out from this place.
Yes, yes, you must work hard, strive diligently.
Working means that you must meditate and then at times you want to take rest.
Does this also happen to you here?
U: It doesn't, sir.
S: It doesn't?
U: If the students start to meditate at: they come out of their meditation cells only at pm.
At the beginning they do take breaks, but after two or three days they don't come out for breaks anymore.
S: Yes, you see!
It's like that!
The highest bliss cannot be described in words.
But the mind is like a magician.
Though one may be meditating here like this, calmly, negative thoughts may arise: “Oh, it is so tiring to meditate, how can I achieve anything?
I cannot do it.” Isn't that so?
U: It is just as you say, sir.
They do think in that way.
S: Yes, your mind may be cheating you, but after having established right effort there is no cheating yourself.
Or is it still possible?
U: No sir, it isn't.
S: Only before you really know can you cheat yourself.
U: Yes, sir.
S: Even so you may be saying to yourself that you are meditating too long.
So, now take rest.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
For centuries people have stood in awe of the Buddha and his attainments and have strived to express their feelings in stone and bronze and with brush and ink.
Some have been moved by what the Buddha said, its logical consistency, its scope and its humanism.
Others have been inspired by the personality of the Lord himself, his manner and conduct, and even his physical form.
The joyful faith and appreciation that is evoked on recollecting the Buddha's personality and singing his praise gives such people the strength they need to walk the Path.
For them the Dhamma comes alive through the life and example of the Buddha.
Such a person was the poet Matrceta.
He was born in India in about the first century A.D., and was converted from Hinduism to Buddhism by the great philosopher Aryadeva.
He wrote about a dozen works, some of such beauty that he came to be regarded as one of India's greatest poets.
I-tsing, the Chinese pilgrim who traveled through India in the seventh century A.D., says of Matrceta's poems:
I-tsing also recounts a beautiful legend that was told about the poet indicating his wide popularity:
Other than these few scraps of information we know nothing of Matrceta and today his name is remembered only for its association with his greatest work, the Satapañcasatka.
The name Satapañcasatka literally means “Hymn in a Hundred and Fifty Verses,” although there are actually a hundred and fifty-two, or in some versions, a hundred and fifty-three verses in the work.
It lies very much within the bhakti or devotional genre of Indian literature but is refreshingly free from the florid style that so often characterizes such works.
Shackleton-Bailey notes that the “style of the Hymn is simple and direct, free from swollen compounds and elaborate conceits.” Warder says that “the restraint of these verses is that of complete mastery of the medium, able to express rich meaning with a few carefully chosen words and without the support of outward display.” He goes on to say that the verses “are handled with a kind of reticence suggestive of the poet's humility and detachment, both of which are probably sincere.” Certainly all who are familiar with the Hymn in its original Sanskrit acknowledge the great beauty of both its language and meaning.
In ancient India numerous commentaries were written on the Hymn.
It was popular with the followers of all schools of Buddhism and was translated into several different languages.
Taranatha, the great Tibetan historian, says the Hymn had an important part to play in the spread of Buddhism outside India, and should it become as well known as it once was it may continue to create an interest in the Buddha and his teachings.
Centuries before Matrceta, the householder Upali was so inspired by the Buddha's presence that he too composed a hymn of praise.
When asked why he had done so he replied:
There can be no doubt that Matrceta's hymn likewise is an expression of a deep devotion to the Buddha and an admiration of his qualities.
But quite apart from the author's motive in writing it, the value and indeed the purpose of the Hymn to the Buddha is twofold.
First it is meant to awaken our faith.
Matrceta recognized as did the Lord himself that faith has the power to arouse a tremendous amount of positive zeal and energy.
Long before we have directly experienced it, faith keeps our eyes fixed firmly on the goal.
When we stumble and fall, faith picks us up; when doubt causes us to falter, it urges us on; and when we get side-tracked, it brings us back to the Path.
Without faith in the Buddha and the efficacy of his Dharma we would never even bother to try to put the teachings into practice.
As Nagarjuna says:
One associates with the Dharma out of faith, but one knows truly out of understanding; understanding is the chief of the two, but faith precedes.
The Buddha's qualities are worthy of respect in themselves, but when they are described so fully and so beautifully in verses like those of Matrceta, our faith can only be strengthened and grow.
The other purpose of the Hymn is to urge us into action.
Matrceta highlights the Buddha's gentleness, his non-retaliation, his patience and his other qualities, knowing that when we have a deep admiration for someone it is natural to try to emulate him.
One feels that he used his poetic skills to the full in the hope that we would be inspired enough to make the Buddha our model and follow his example.
When we read that the Buddha extended the hand of friendship to all without exception we feel we should try to do the same.
On being reminded that the Buddha endured abuse and hardship without complaint we find the strength to be a little more forbearing.
When brooding over our imperfections casts us down, nothing fills us with new determination and vigor more than calling to mind the Buddha's attainments.
The receptive mind will transform admiration into action.
The Hymn may have another value as well: as an aid to meditation.
In concentration meditation thoughts are silenced, in mindfulness meditation they are observed with detachment, but in recollection meditation thoughts are directed to a specific subject which is then carefully pondered upon.
The Buddha says: “Monks, whatever a monk ponders on and thinks about often the mind in consequence gets a leaning in that way,” and this is certainly true.
Any type of thought that is prominent in our mind will have an influence upon our personality and behavior.
To consciously and intentionally think positive thoughts will, in time, allow such thoughts to arise quite naturally, and from that will spring deeds associated with such positive thoughts.
In practicing the Recollection of the Buddha, Buddhanussati, one sits silently, and having made the mind receptive, thinks about the Buddha's many deeds and qualities.
In time, faith and devotion, both of which are important spiritual faculties, begin to gain in strength, thus adding energy and even fervor to our practice.
Those who do this meditation usually either read or recite the well-known Iti'pi so formula to help guide their thoughts.
But they may find that reading extracts from the Hymn to the Buddha can be used together with this formula, or at times as a substitute for it, with very positive results.
D.R.
Shackleton-Bailey has done a complete English translation of the Hymn to the Buddha and Edward Conze has translated parts of it.
Both these translations are literal and scholarly but do not give sufficient regard to the spirit of the work and the author's intention in writing it — to inspire and to uplift.
By reworking these two translations and occasionally referring to the Sanskrit text with the help of my friend, Ven.
Hippola Paññakithi, I have attempted to produce a readable rendering of this beautiful and important work.
Those interested in a scholarly version of the Hymn are advised to read Shackleton-Bailey's translation with its copious notes on language, manuscript variations and textual difficulties.
All references to the Pali Nikayas are to volume and page number of the Pali Text Society editions.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Bhikkhu Ñanamoli was born in England in and graduated from Exeter College, Oxford.
In he came to Sri Lanka, where he was ordained the following year at the Island Hermitage near Dodanduwa.
During his years in the Sangha Ven.
Ñanamoli translated into lucid English some of the most difficult texts of Theravada Buddhism.
In, on one of his rare outings from the Hermitage, he suddenly passed away due to heart failure.
Bhikkhu Bodhi is a Buddhist monk of American nationality, born in New York City in.
After completing a doctorate in philosophy at Claremont Graduate School, he came to Sri Lanka in, and was ordained the same year under the eminent scholar-monk, Ven.
Balangoda Ananda Maitreya.
Since he has been Editor for the Buddhist Publication Society, and its President since.
For one of right view, bhikkhus, right intention springs up.
For one of right intention, right speech springs up.
For one of right speech, right action springs up.
For one of right action, right livelihood springs up.
For one of right livelihood, right effort springs up.
For one of right effort, right mindfulness springs up.
For one of right mindfulness, right concentration springs up.
For one of right concentration, right knowledge springs up.
For one of right knowledge, right deliverance springs up.
Anguttara Nikaya:
The Sammaditthi Sutta, the Discourse on Right View, is the ninth sutta of the Majjhima Nikaya, the Collection of Middle Length Discourses.
Its expositor is the Venerable Sariputta Thera, the Buddha's chief disciple and the foremost of the Master's bhikkhu disciples in the exercise of the faculty of wisdom.
The Buddha declared that next to himself, it was the Venerable Sariputta who excelled in turning the incomparable Wheel of the Dhamma, in expounding in depth and in detail the Four Noble Truths realized with the attainment of enlightenment.
In the Sammaditthi Sutta the great disciple bears ample testimony to the Buddha's words of praise, bequeathing upon us a discourse that has served as a primer of Buddhist doctrine for generations of monks in the monasteries of South and Southeast Asia.
As its title suggests, the subject of the Sammaditthi Sutta is right view.
The analysis of right view undertaken in the sutta brings us to the very core of the Dhamma, since right view constitutes the correct understanding of the central teachings of the Buddha, the teachings which confer upon the Buddha's doctrine its own unique and distinctive stamp.
Though the practice of right mindfulness has rightly been extolled as the crest jewel of the Buddha's teaching, it cannot be stressed strongly enough that the practice of mindfulness, or any other approach to meditation, only becomes an effective instrument of liberation to the extent that it is founded upon and guided by right view.
Hence, to confirm the importance of right view, the Buddha places it at the very beginning of the Noble Eightfold Path.
Elsewhere in the Suttas the Buddha calls right view the forerunner of the path, which gives direction and efficacy to the other seven path factors.
Right view, as explained in the commentary to the Sammaditthi Sutta, has a variety of aspects, but it might best be considered as twofold: conceptual right view, which is the intellectual grasp of the principles enunciated in the Buddha's teaching, and experiential right view, which is the wisdom that arises by direct penetration of the teaching.
Conceptual right view, also called the right view in conformity with the truths, is a correct conceptual understanding of the Dhamma arrived at by study of the Buddha's teachings and deep examination of their meaning.
Such understanding, though conceptual rather than experiential, is not dry and sterile.
When rooted in faith in the Triple Gem and driven by a keen aspiration to realize the truth embedded in the formulated principles of the Dhamma, it serves as a critical phase in the development of wisdom, for it provides the germ out of which experiential right view gradually evolves.
Experiential right view is the penetration of the truth of the teaching in one's own immediate experience.
Thus it is also called right view that penetrates the truths.
This type of right view is aroused by the practice of insight meditation guided by a correct conceptual understanding of the Dhamma.
To arrive at direct penetration, one must begin with a correct conceptual grasp of the teaching and transform that grasp from intellectual comprehension to direct perception by cultivating the threefold training in morality, concentration and wisdom.
If conceptual right view can be compared to a hand, a hand that grasps the truth by way of concepts, then experiential right view can be compared to an eye — the eye of wisdom that sees directly into the true nature of existence ordinarily hidden from us by our greed, aversion and delusion.
The Discourse on Right View is intended to elucidate the principles that are to be comprehended by conceptual right view and penetrated by experiential right view.
The Venerable Sariputta expounds these principles under sixteen headings: the wholesome and the unwholesome, the four nutriments of life, the Four Noble Truths, the twelve factors of dependent arising, and the taints as the condition for ignorance.
It will be noted that from the second section to the end of the sutta, all the expositions are framed in accordance with the same structure, which reveals the principle of conditionality as the scaffolding for the entire teaching.
Each phenomenon to be comprehended by right view is expounded in terms of its individual nature, its arising, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
The grasp of this principle thus makes it clear that any entity taken for examination is not an isolated occurrence with its being locked up in itself, but part of a web of conditionally arisen processes that can be terminated by understanding and eliminating the cause that gives it being.
The right view arrived at by penetrating any of the sixteen subjects expounded in the sutta is discussed in terms of two aspects, both aspects of supramundane penetration.
The first is the initial penetration of the supramundane path that transforms a person from a worldling into a stream-enterer, a noble disciple who has entered irreversibly upon the stream to liberation.
This aspect of right view is indicated by the words that open each section, “ who has perfect confidence in the Dhamma and has arrived at this true Dhamma.” These qualities are attributes only of the stream-enterer and those of higher attainment along the path.
The description thus applies to the trainee, the disciple who has entered the path but has not yet reached its end.
The words signify right view as a transformative vision which has revealed the ultimate truths underlying our existence, but which must still be developed further to complete the full transformation it is capable of effecting.
The second aspect of supramundane right view is indicated by the closing words of each section, from “he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to lust” to “he here and now makes an end of suffering.” This description is fully applicable only to the arahant, the liberated one, and thus indicates that the right view conceptually grasped by the wise worldling, and transformed into direct perception with the attainment of stream-entry, reaches its consummation with the arrival at the teaching's final goal, the attainment of complete emancipation from suffering.
The translation of the Sammaditthi Sutta and its commentary presented here has been adapted from manuscripts left behind by Bhikkhu Ñanamoli.
The translation of the sutta has been adapted from Ven.
Ñanamoli's complete translation of the Majjhima Nikaya.
The version used has been taken from the edition of the complete Majjhima Nikaya translation that I prepared for publication by Wisdom Publications in the United States.
This version, tentatively scheduled for release in late, employs extensive substitution of Ven.
Ñanamoli's own technical terminology with my own preferred renderings of Pali doctrinal terms.
The commentary to the Sammaditthi Sutta is from the Papañcasudani, Acariya Buddhaghosa's complete commentary to the Majjhima Nikaya.
The translation of the commentary has also been adapted from a rendering by Ven.
Ñanamoli, contained in a notebook of his that was discovered only a few years ago at Island Hermitage.
The terminology used in the notebook version suggests that it was one of Ven.
Ñanamoli's earliest attempts at translation from the Pali; it certainly preceded his translation of the Visuddhimagga, The Path of Purification, first completed at the end of.
In adapting the translation, I have naturally replaced the technical terminology used in the notebook version with that used in the sutta.
In places I also decided to translate directly from the Pali text rather than adhere to Ven.
Ñanamoli's rendering, which sometimes tended to be literal to the point of awkwardness.
A few passages from the commentary that are concerned solely with linguistic clarification have been omitted from the translation.
Passages in the commentarial section enclosed in square brackets are taken from the subcommentary to the Sammaditthi Sutta, by Acariya Dhammapala.
Passages in parenthesis are additions either by Ven.
Ñanamoli or by myself.
The paragraph numbering of the commentarial section follows that of the sutta.
The phrases of the sutta that are selected for comment have been set in boldface.
The backnotes are entirely my own.
Bhikkhu Bodhi
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Park.
There the Venerable Sariputta addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Friends, bhikkhus.” — “Friend,” they replied.
The Venerable Sariputta said this:
“'One of right view, one of right view' is said, friends.
In what way is a noble disciple one of right view, whose view is straight, who has perfect confidence in the Dhamma, and has arrived at this true Dhamma?
“Indeed, friend, we would come from far away to learn from the Venerable Sariputta the meaning of this statement.
It would be good if the Venerable Sariputta would explain the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from him, the bhikkhus will remember it.
“Then, friends, listen and attend closely to what I shall say.
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
The Venerable Sariputta said this:
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands the unwholesome, the root of the unwholesome, the wholesome, and the root of the wholesome, in that way he is one of right view, whose view is straight, who has perfect confidence in the Dhamma, and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what, friends, is the unwholesome, what is the root of the unwholesome, what is the wholesome, what is the root of the wholesome?
Killing living beings is unwholesome; taking what is not given is unwholesome; misconduct in sensual pleasures is unwholesome; false speech is unwholesome; malicious speech is unwholesome; harsh speech is unwholesome; gossip is unwholesome; covetousness is unwholesome; ill will is unwholesome; wrong view is unwholesome.
This is called the unwholesome.
“And what is the root of the unwholesome?
Greed is a root of the unwholesome; hate is a root of the unwholesome; delusion is a root of the unwholesome.
This is called the root of the unwholesome.
“And what is the wholesome?
Abstention from killing living beings is wholesome; abstention from taking what is not given is wholesome; abstention from misconduct in sensual pleasures is wholesome; abstention from false speech is wholesome; abstention from malicious speech is wholesome; abstention from harsh speech is wholesome; abstention from gossip is wholesome; non-covetousness is wholesome; non-ill will is wholesome; right view is wholesome.
This is called the wholesome.
“And what is the root of the wholesome?
Non-greed is a root of the wholesome; non-hate is a root of the wholesome; non-delusion is a root of the wholesome.
This is called the root of the wholesome.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood the unwholesome, the root of the unwholesome, the wholesome, and the root of the wholesome, he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to lust, he abolishes the underlying tendency to aversion, he extirpates the underlying tendency to the view and conceit 'I am,' and by abandoning ignorance and arousing true knowledge he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view, whose view is straight, who has perfect confidence in the Dhamma and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands nutriment, the origin of nutriment, the cessation of nutriment, and the way leading to the cessation of nutriment, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is nutriment, what is the origin of nutriment, what is the cessation of nutriment, what is the way leading to the cessation of nutriment?
There are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that already have come to be and for the support of those seeking a new existence.
What four?
They are physical food as nutriment, gross or subtle; contact as the second; mental volition as the third; and consciousness as the fourth.
With the arising of craving there is the arising of nutriment.
With the cessation of craving there is the cessation of nutriment.
The way leading to the cessation of nutriment is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness and right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood nutriment, the origin of nutriment, the cessation of nutriment, and the way leading to the cessation of nutriment, he entirely abandons the underlying tendency to greed, he abolishes the underlying tendency to aversion, he extirpates the underlying tendency to the view and conceit 'I am,' and by abandoning ignorance and arousing true knowledge he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view, whose view is straight, who has perfect confidence in the Dhamma and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is suffering, what is the origin of suffering, what is the cessation of suffering, what is the way leading to the cessation of suffering?
Birth is suffering; aging is suffering; sickness is suffering; death is suffering; sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair are suffering; not to obtain what one wants is suffering; in short, the five aggregates affected by clinging are suffering.
This is called suffering.
“And what is the origin of suffering?
It is craving, which brings renewal of being, is accompanied by delight and lust, and delights in this and that; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for being and craving for non-being.
This is called the origin of suffering.
“And what is the cessation of suffering?
It is the remainderless fading away and ceasing, the giving up, relinquishing, letting go and rejecting of that same craving.
This is called the cessation of suffering.
“And what is the way leading to the cessation of suffering?
It is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
This is called the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands aging and death, the origin of aging and death, the cessation of aging and death, and the way leading to the cessation of aging and death, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is aging and death, what is the origin of aging and death, what is the cessation of aging and death, what is the way leading to the cessation of aging and death?
The aging of beings in the various orders of beings, their old age, brokenness of teeth, grayness of hair, wrinkling of skin, decline of life, weakness of faculties — this is called aging.
The passing of beings out of the various orders of beings, their passing away, dissolution, disappearance, dying, completion of time, dissolution of the aggregates, laying down of the body — this is called death.
So this aging and this death are what is called aging and death.
With the arising of birth there is the arising of aging and death.
With the cessation of birth there is the cessation of aging and death.
The way leading to the cessation of aging and death is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood aging and death, the origin of aging and death, the cessation of aging and death, and the way leading to the cessation of aging and death… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands birth, the origin of birth, the cessation of birth, and the way leading to the cessation of birth, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is birth, what is the origin of birth, what is the cessation of birth, what is the way leading to the cessation of birth?
The birth of beings into the various orders of beings, their coming to birth, precipitation, generation, manifestation of the aggregates, obtaining the bases for contact — this is called birth.
With the arising of being there is the arising of birth.
With the cessation of being there is the cessation of birth.
The way leading to the cessation of birth is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood birth, the origin of birth, the cessation of birth, and the way leading to the cessation of birth… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands being, the origin of being, the cessation of being, and the way leading to the cessation of being, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is being, what is the origin of being, what is the cessation of being, what is the way leading to the cessation of being?
There are these three kinds of being: sense-sphere being, fine-material being and immaterial being.
With the arising of clinging there is the arising of being.
With the cessation of clinging there is the cessation of being.
The way leading to the cessation of being is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood being, the origin of being, the cessation of being, and the way leading to the cessation of being… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands clinging, the origin of clinging, the cessation of clinging, and the way leading to the cessation of clinging, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is clinging, what is the origin of clinging, what is the cessation of clinging, what is the way leading to the cessation of clinging?
There are these four kinds of clinging: clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, clinging to rituals and observances, and clinging to a doctrine of self.
With the arising of craving there is the arising of clinging.
With the cessation of craving there is the cessation of clinging.
The way leading to the cessation of clinging is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood clinging, the origin of clinging, the cessation of clinging, and the way leading to the cessation of clinging… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands craving, the origin of craving, the cessation of craving, and the way leading to the cessation of craving, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is craving, what is the origin of craving, what is the cessation of craving, what is the way leading to the cessation of craving?
There are these six classes of craving: craving for forms, craving for sounds, craving for odors, craving for flavors, craving for tangibles, craving for mind-objects.
With the arising of feeling there is the arising of craving.
With the cessation of feeling there is the cessation of craving.
The way leading to the cessation of craving is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood craving, the origin of craving, the cessation of craving, and the way leading to the cessation of craving… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands feeling, the origin of feeling, the cessation of feeling, and the way leading to the cessation of feeling, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is feeling, what is the origin of feeling, what is the cessation of feeling, what is the way leading to the cessation of feeling?
There are these six classes of feeling: feeling born of eye-contact, feeling born of ear-contact, feeling born of nose-contact, feeling born of tongue-contact, feeling born of body-contact, feeling born of mind-contact.
With the arising of contact there is the arising of feeling.
With the cessation of contact there is the cessation of feeling.
The way leading to the cessation of feeling is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood feeling, the origin of feeling, the cessation of feeling, and the way leading to the cessation of feeling… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands contact, the origin of contact, the cessation of contact, and the way leading to the cessation of contact, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is contact, what is the origin of contact, what is the cessation of contact, what is the way leading to the cessation of contact?
There are these six classes of contact: eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, body-contact, mind-contact.
With the arising of the sixfold base there is the arising of contact.
With the cessation of the sixfold base there is the cessation of contact.
The way leading to the cessation of contact is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood contact, the origin of contact, the cessation of contact, and the way leading to the cessation of contact… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands the sixfold base, the origin of the sixfold base, the cessation of the sixfold base, and the way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base, he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is the sixfold base, what is the origin of the sixfold base, what is the cessation of the sixfold base, what is the way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base?
There are these six bases: the eye-base, the ear-base, the nose-base, the tongue-base, the body-base, the mind-base.
With the arising of mentality-materiality there is the arising of the sixfold base.
With the cessation of mentality-materiality there is the cessation of the sixfold base.
The way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood the sixfold base, the origin of the sixfold base, the cessation of the sixfold base, and the way leading to the cessation of the sixfold base… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands mentality-materiality, the origin of mentality-materiality, the cessation of mentality-materiality, and the way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is mentality-materiality, what is the origin of mentality-materiality, what is the cessation of mentality-materiality, what is the way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality?
Feeling, perception, volition, contact and attention — these are called mentality.
The four great elements and the material form derived from the four great elements — these are called materiality.
So this mentality and this materiality are what is called mentality-materiality.
With the arising of consciousness there is the arising of mentality-materiality.
With the cessation of consciousness there is the cessation of mentality-materiality.
The way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality is just this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view… right concentration.
“When a noble disciple has thus understood mentality-materiality, the origin of mentality-materiality, the cessation of mentality-materiality, and the way leading to the cessation of mentality-materiality… he here and now makes an end of suffering.
In that way too a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Saying, “Good, friend,” the bhikkhus delighted and rejoiced in the Venerable Sariputta's words.
Then they asked him a further question: “But, friend, might there be another way in which a noble disciple is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma?” — “There might be, friends.
“When, friends, a noble disciple understands consciousness, the origin of consciousness, the cessation of consciousness, and the way leading to the cessation of consciousness, in that way he is one of right view… and has arrived at this true Dhamma.
“And what is consciousness, what is the origin of consciousness, what is the cessation of consciousness, what is the way leading to the cessation of consciousness?
There are these six classes of consciousness: eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, mind-consciousness.
With the arising of formations there is the arising of consciousness.
